Digitized by the Internet Archive 

in 2007 with funding from 

Microsoft Corporation 



http://www.archive.org/detaNs/annakareninatolsOOtolsiala 



ANNA KARENINA 

VOL. I 




Vronsky pleading with Anna. 

Original Drawing by E. Boyd Sftiith. 



Anna Karenina 

BY 

LYOF N. TOLSTOI 



TRANSLATED FROM THE RUSSIAN 
. BY NATHAN HASKELL DOLE . 



ILLUSTRATED 



* 



NEW YORK 

THOMAS Y. CROWELL & COMPANY 

PUBLISHERS 



' > • J« 



Copyright, 1899, 
BY THOMAS Y. CROWELL & CO. 



INTRODUCTION 



ALEXANDER PUSHKIN, Russia's greatest poet 
and the inspirer of the two best works of Gogol, 
the father of Russian realism, may perhaps be regarded 
as the direct cause of Count TolstoY's greatest novel. 
A relative happened to be visiting at Yasnaya Polyana, 
and had been reading a volume of Pushkin. Count 
Tolstot picked up the work and opened it casually. 
Some one entered as he was glancing over the pages, 
and he exclaimed, " Here is something charming ! This 
is the way to write ! Pushkin goes to the heart of the 
matter." 

Count Tolstot was so impressed by Pushkin's direct 
ness that he immediately felt like emulating him. He 
asked to be kept free from interruptions, shut himself 
into his library, and began "Anna Karenina." 

The publication of it began in the Russky Viestnik 
or Russian Messenger in 1875; but it was frequently 
interrupted. Months and even years elapsed before it 
was concluded ; yet it kept public attention. Not even 
the break of several months between two of the parts 
was sufficient to cool the interest of its reader. After 
the appearance of the first part he wrote a friend : — 

" You praise * Anna Karenina,' and that is very pleas- 
ant to me ; the more so as I hear much in its favor ; 
but I am sure that there never was an author more 
indifferent to his success than I am in this case." 

A year later he wrote : — 

" For two whole months I have forborne to stain my 
hands with ink or to burden my heart with thoughts. 
Now, however, I turn once more to that dull common- 
place ' Anna Karenina,' moved solely to rid my desk of 
it — to make room for other tasks." 



2224844 



vi INTRODUCTION 

Even then he did not finish it. The next year he 
wrote : " The end of winter and the opening of spring 
are my busiest months for work. I must finish the 
novel of which I have grown so tired." But when he 
once took hold of it the spirit of it quickly seized him 
again, and much of it was written, as any one can see, 
with almost breathless haste. 

Polevof, in his illustrated " History of Russian Litera- 
ture," says of this story: "Count Tolstoi dwells with 
especial fondness on the sharp contrast between the 
frivolity, the tinsel brightness, the tumult and vanity, of 
the worldly life, and the sweet, holy calm enjoyed by 
those who, possessing the soil, live amid the beauties of 
Nature and the pleasures of the family." 

This contrast will strike the attention of every reader. 
It is the outgrowth of Count Tolstoi's own life ; his dual 
nature is portrayed in the contrasting careers of Levin 
and Vronsky. The interweaving of two stories is done 
with a masterly hand. One may take them separately 
or together ; each strand of the twisted rope follows its 
own course, and yet each without the other would be 
evidently incomplete. 

As one reads, one forgets that it is fiction. It seems 
like a transcript of real life, and one is constantly im- 
pressed by the vast accumulation of pictures, each illus- 
trating and explaining the vital elements of the Spopte. 
At times one is startled by the vivifying flashes of 
genius. The death of Anna is dimly suggested by the 
tragic occurrence of the brakeman's death in the Mos- 
cow railway station. A still more suggestive intimation 
of the approaching tragedy is found in the death of 
Vronsky's horse during the officers' handicap race at 
Peterhof. If one may so speak, the atmosphere of the 
story is electrified with fate. In this respect it is like 
a Greek drama. There is never a false touch. 

Count Tolstor's brother-in-law says there is no doubt 
that Levin is the portrait of the novelist himself, but 
represented as being "extremely simple in order to bring 
him into still greater contrast with the representatives 
of high life in Moscow and St. Petersburg." He also 



INTRODUCTION vii 

says that the description of the way that Levin and 
Kitty make use of the initial letters of the words in 
which they wish to express to each other their mutual 
love is faithful in its minutest details to the history of 
Count Tolstoi's own wooing. And undoubtedly many 
of the experiences of Levin on his estate are also tran- 
scripts of Count Tolstoi's own experiences. 

Tolstoi", like Levin, sought to reform and to better 
everything about him, and took part in the Liberal 
movements of the time ; but his schemes came to naught, 
one after the other, and his nihilism, — for he declares 
in his confession that he was a Nihilist in the actual 
meaning of the word, — his nihilism triumphs in bitter- 
ness on their ruins. The struggle in Levin's mind and 
the horror of his despair tempting him also to suicide 
are marvelously depicted. At length, as in Tolstoi's 
real life, the muzhik comes to his aid, light illumines 
his soul, and the work ends in a burst of mystic happi- 
ness, a hymn of joy, which he sings to his inmost soul, 
not sharing it with his beloved wife, though he knows 
that she knows the secret of his happiness. 

Interesting and instructive as this idyllic romance is, 
the chief power of the novelist is expended in portray- 
ing the illicit love of Vronsky and Anna. Its moral 
is the opposition of duty to passion. It has been said 
that the love that unites the two protagonists is sincere, 
deep, almost holy despite its illegality. They were born 
for each other ; it was love at first sight, a love which 
overleapt all bonds and bounds. But its gratification at 
the expense of honor brings the inevitable torment, espe- 
cially to the woman who had sacrificed so much. The 
agony of remorse, intensified by the mortifications and 
humiliations caused by her position, unites itself with 
an almost insane jealousy, product also of the unstable 
relation in which she is placed. At last the union 
becomes so irksome, so painful, so hateful, that the only 
escape from it is in suicide. 

Count Tolstoi manages with consummate skill to retain 
his own respect for the guilty woman. Consequently 
the reader's love and sympathy for the unhappy woman 



vMi INTRODUCTION 

never flag. He lays bare each throb of her tortured 
heart. He is the Parrhasius of novelists. 

Mr. Howells says: "The warmth and light of Tol- 
stoi's good heart and right mind are seen in 'Anna 
Karenina/ that saddest story of guilty love in which 
nothing can save the sinful woman from herself, — not 
her husband's forgiveness, her friend's compassion, her 
lover's constancy, or the long intervals of quiet in which 
she seems safe and happy in her sin. It is she who 
destroys herself persistently, step by step, in spite of all 
help and forbearance ; and yet we are never allowed to 
forget how good and generous she was when we first 
met her ; how good and generous she is fitfully, and 
more and more rarely to the end. Her lover works out 
a sort of redemption through his patience and devotion ; 
he grows gentler, wiser, worthier through it ; but even 
his good destroys her." 

Mr. Howells also comments on the extraordinary 
vitality of the work. 

"A multitude of figures pass before us," he says, 
"recognizably real, never caricatured nor grotesqued, 
nor-Jin any way unduly accented, but simple and actual 
in tj^eir evil or their good. There is lovely family life, 
the tenderness of father and daughter, the rapture of 
young wife and husband, the innocence of girlhood, the 
beauty of fidelity ; there is the unrest and folly of fashion, 
the misery of wealth, and the wretchedness of wasted 
and mistaken life, the hollowness of ambition, the cheer- 
ful emptiness of some hearts, the dull emptiness of 
others. It is a world, and you live in it while you read 
and long afterward, but at no step have you been be- 
trayed, not because your guide has warned or exalted 
you, but because he has been true, and has shown you 
all things as they are."- 

It is hardly worth while to particularize the immortal 
scenes with which the panoramic canvas is crowded, 
though the Vicomte de Vogii6 characterizes the death- 
bed scene of Nikolat Levin as " one of the most finished 
masterpieces of which literature has reason to be proud," 
and the description of the races at Tsarskoye-Selo, apart 



INTRODUCTION ix 

from its tragic moment, is amazing for its vividness and 
beauty. Indeed, there are dozens of wonderful pictures 
of life and death in the story. And no translation, 
however faithful, can do justice to the quiet humor 
packed away often in a single word of the staccato mu- 
zhik dialect, which no one ever handled more success- 
fully than Count Tolsto'f. 

The translation has been thoroughly revised and 
largely rewritten. All passages formerly omitted have 
been restored, and the occasional temptation to em- 
broider by paraphrase on what the author left purposely 
simple, plain, and direct, has been resisted. 

The Russian words and interjections (which, with the 
idea of giving local color, were employed in the first 
edition) have been for the most part eliminated, and the 
glossary is therefore superfluous. The translator's whole 
purpose has been to give a faithful presentation of this 
immortal work. 



CHIEF PERSONS OF THE STORY 



Aleksel Aleksandrovitch Karenin. 

Anna Arkadyevna Karenina (Madame Karenin). 

Count AlekseT (Alosha) Kirillovitch Vronsky. 

His mother, the Countess Vronsky or Vronskaya. 

His brother, Aleksandr Kirillovitch Vronsky. 

Prince {Kniaz) Stephan (Stiva) Arkadyevitch Oblonsky. 

Princess {Kniaginyd) Darya (Dolly, Dolinka, Dashenka) Aleksandrovna 

Oblonsky or Oblonskaya. ' 
Konstantin (Kostia) Dmitriyevitch (Dmitritch) Levin, proprietor of Po- 

krovsky. 
His brother, Nikola! Dmitriyevitch Levin. 
His mistress, Marya Nikolayevna. 

His half-brother, Sergye! Ivanovitch (Ivanuitch, Ivanitch) Koznuishef. 
Prince Aleksandr Shcherbatsky. 
Princess Shcherbatsky or Shcherbatskaya. 
Their daughter, the Princess (Kniazknd) Yekaterina (Kitty, Katyonka, 

Katerina, Katya) Aleksandrovna Shcherbatsky or Shcherbatskaya 

(afterwards Levin or Levina). 
Their nephew, Prince Nikolai Shcherbatsky. 



ANNA KARENINA 



PART FIRST 

"Vengeance is mine, I will repay " 

CHAPTER I 

ALL happy families resemble one another; every 
unhappy family is unhappy in its own way. 

All was confusion in the house of the Oblonskys. 
The wife had discovered that her husband was having 
an intrigue with a French governess who had been in 
their employ, and she declared that she could not live 
in the same house with him. This condition of things 
had lasted now three days, and was causing deep dis- 
comfort, not only to the husband and wife, but also to all 
the members of the family and the domestics. All the 
members of the family and the domestics felt that there 
was no sense in their living together, and that in any 
hotel people meeting casually had more mutual inter- 
ests than they, the members of the family and the 
domestics of the house of Oblonsky. The wife did not 
come out of her own rooms ; the husband had not been 
at home for two days. The children were running over 
the whole house as if they were crazy; the English 
maid was angry with the housekeeper and wrote to a 
friend begging her to find her a new place. The head 
cook had departed the evening before just at dinner- 
time ; the kitchen-maid and the coachman demanded 
their wages. 

On the third day after the quarrel, Prince Stepan 
Arkadyevitch Oblonsky — Stiva, as he was called in 
society — awoke at the usual hour, that is to say about 

VOL. i. — I I 



2 ANNA KARENINA 

eight o'clock in the morning, not in his wife's chamber, 
but in his library, on a leather-covered divan. He 
turned his portly pampered body on the springs of the 
divan, as if intending to go to sleep again, and as he 
did so threw his arm round the cushion and pressed his 
cheek to it. But suddenly he sat up and opened his eyes. 

"Well, well! how was it?" he mused, recalling a 
dream. " Yes, how was it ? Yes ! Alabin was giving a 
dinner at Darmstadt ; no, not at Darmstadt, but it was 
something American. Yes, but that Darmstadt was in 
America. Yes, Alabin was giving a dinner on glass 
tables, yes, and the tables sang '// mio tesoro ' ; no, not 
'// mio tesoro,' but something better; and some little 
water-bottles, they were women ! " said he, continuing 
his recollections. 

Prince Stepan's eyes flashed gayly and he smiled as 
he said to himself : — 

" Yes, it was very good, very good. There was some- 
thing extremely elegant about it, but you can't tell it in 
words, and when you are awake you can't express the 
reality even in thought." 

Then, as he noticed a ray of sunlight which came in at 
the side of one of the heavy window-curtains, he gayly 
set his feet down from the divan, found his gilt morocco 
slippers — they had been embroidered for him by his wife 
the year before as a birthday present — and, according 
to an old custom which he had kept up for nine years, 
he^ without rising, stretched out his hand to the place 
where in his chamber hung his dressing-gown. And then 
he suddenly remembered how and why he had been 
sleeping, not in his wife's chamber, but in the library ; 
the smile vanished from his face and he frowned. 

" Akh ! akh ! akh ! akh ! " he groaned, as he recol- 
lected everything that had occurred. And before his 
mind arose once more all the details of the quarrel with 
his wife, all the hopelessness of his situation, and most 
lamentable of all, his own fault. 

" No ! she will not and she cannot forgive me. And 
what is the worst of it, 'twas my own fault — my own 
fault, and yet I am not to blame. In that lies all the 



ANNA KARENINA 3 

tragedy of it," he said to himself. " Akh ! akh ! akh ! " 
he kept murmuring in his despair, as he thought over 
the exceedingly unpleasant consequences that would 
result to him from this quarrel. 

The most disagreeable moment was at the very first, 
when, as he came home from the theater, happy and 
self-satisfied, bringing a monstrous pear for his wife, he 
did not find her in the sitting-room, nor, to his surprise, 
was she in the library, and at last he saw her in her cham- 
ber holding the fatal, all-revealing letter in her hand. 

She — Dolly, that forever busy and fussy and foolish 
creature as he always considered her — was sitting mo- 
tionless with the note in her hand, and looked at him 
with an expression of terror, despair, and wrath. 

" What is this ? This ? " she demanded, pointing to 
the note. 

And as often happens, Stepan's torment at this recollec- 
tion was caused less by the fact itself than by the answer 
which he gave to those words of his wife. His experi- 
ence at that moment was the same as other people have 
had when unexpectedly detected in some shameful deed. 
He was unable to prepare his face for the situation caused 
by his wife's discovery of his sin. Instead of getting 
offended, denying it, justifying himself, asking forgive- 
ness, or even showing indifference — anything would 
have been better than what he really did — in spite of 
himself (by a reflex action of the brain as Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch explained it, for he loved Physiology) abso- 
lutely in spite of himself he suddenly smiled with his 
ordinary good-humored and therefore stupid smile. 

He could not forgive himself for that stupid smile. 
When Dolly saw that smile, she trembled as with phys- 
ical pain, poured forth a torrent of bitter words, quite 
in accordance with her natural temper, and fled from 
the room. Since that time she had not been willing to 
see her husband. 

" That stupid smile caused the whole trouble," 
thought Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

" But what is to be done about it, what is to be done ? " 
he asked himself in despair, and found no answer. 



ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER II 

Stepan Arkadyevitch was a sincere man as far as 
he himself was concerned. He could not practise self- 
deception and persuade himself that he repented of his 
behavior. He could not, as yet, feel sorry that he, a 
handsome, susceptible man of four and thirty, was not 
now in love with his wife, the mother of his five living 
and two buried children, though she was only a year 
his junior. He regretted only that he had not suc- 
ceeded in hiding it better from her. But he felt the 
whole weight of his situation and pitied his wife, his 
children, and himself. Possibly he would have had bet- 
ter success in hiding his peccadilloes from his wife had 
he realized that this knowledge would have had such an 
effect upon her. He had never before thought clearly of 
this question, but he had a dim idea that his wife had 
long been aware that he was not faithful to her, and 
looked at it through her fingers. As she had lost her 
freshness, was beginning to look old, was no longer 
pretty and far from distinguished and entirely common- 
place, though she was an excellent mother of a family, 
he had thought that she would allow her innate sense 
of justice to plead for him. But it had proved to be 
quite the contrary. 

"Akh, how wretched! aY! al! aY! how wretched!" 
said Prince Stepan to himself over and over and could 
not find any way out of the difficulty. " And how well 
everything was going until this happened ! How de- 
lightfully we lived ! She was content, happy with the 
children ; . I never interfered with her in any way, I 
allowed her to do as she pleased with the children and 
the household! To be sure it was bad that she 
had been the governess in our own house; that 
was bad. There is something trivial and common in 
playing the gallant to one's own governess ! But what 
a governess ! " 

He vividly recalled Mile. Roland's black roguish eyes 
and her smile. 



ANNA KARENINA $ 

" But then, while she was here in the house with us, I 
did not permit myself any liberties. And the worst of 
all is that she is already.... All this must needs happen 
just to spite me. At! a'f ! aY! But what, what is to be 
done?" 

There was no answer except that common answer 
which life gives to all the most complicated and unsolva- 
ble questions, — this answer: You must live according 
to circumstances, in other words, forget yourself. But 
as you cannot forget yourself in sleep — at least till 
night, as you cannot return to that music which the 
water-bottle woman sang, therefore you must forget 
yourself in the dream of life ! 

"We shall see by and by," said Stepan Arkadyevitch 
to himself, and rising he put on his gray dressing-gown 
with blue silk lining, tied -the tassels into a knot, and 
took a full breath into his ample lungs. Then with his 
usual firm step, his legs spread somewhat apart and 
easily bearing the solid weight of his body, he went 
over to the window, lifted the curtain, and loudly rang 
the bell. It was instantly answered by his old friend 
and valet Matve, who came in bringing his clothes, 
boots, and a telegram. Behind Matve came the barber 
with the shaving utensils. 

" Are there any papers from the court-house ? " asked 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, taking the telegram and taking 
his seat in front of the mirror. 

...."On the breakfast-table," replied Matve, looking 
inquiringly and with sympathy at his master, and after 
an instant's pause, added with a sly smile, "They have 
come from the boss of the livery-stable." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch made no reply and only looked 
at Matve in the mirror. By the look which they inter- 
changed it could be seen how they understood each 
other. The look of Stepan Arkadyevitch seemed to 
ask, " Why did you say that ? Don't you know?" 

Matve thrust his hands in his. jacket pockets, kicked 
out his leg, and silently, good-naturedly, almost smiling, 
looked back to his master : — 

" I ordered him to come on Sunday, and till then that 



6 ANNA KARENINA 

you and I should not be annoyed without reason," said 
he, with a phrase evidently ready on his tongue. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch perceived that Matve wanted to 
make some jesting reply and attract attention to him- 
self. Tearing open the telegram, he read it, using his 
wits to make out the words, that were as usual blindly 
written, and his face brightened. 

.... " Matve, sister Anna Arkadyevna will be here 
to-morrow," said he, staying for a moment the plump 
gleaming hand of his barber, who was making a pink 
path through his long, curly whiskers. 

" Thank God," cried Matve, showing by this excla- 
mation that he understood as well as his master the 
significance of this arrival, that it meant that Anna 
Arkadyevna, Prince Stepan's loving sister, might effect 
a reconciliation between husband and wife. 

" Alone, or with her husband ? " asked Matve. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch could not speak, as the barber 
was engaged on his upper lip, but he lifted one finger. 
Matve nodded his head toward the mirror. 

" Alone. Get her room ready ?" 

" Report to Darya Aleksandrovna, and let her decide." 

"To Darya Aleksandrovna? "repeated Matve, rather 
skeptically. 

"Yes! report to her. And here, take the telegram, 
give it to her, and do as she says." 

" You want to try an experiment," was the thought 
in Matve's mind; but he only said, "I will obey!" 

By this time Stepan Arkadyevitch had finished his 
bath and his toilet, and was just putting on his clothes, 
when Matve, stepping slowly with squeaking boots, and 
with the telegram in his hand, returned to the room. 
The barber was no longer there. 

" Darya Aleksandrovna bade me tell you she is going 
away ....do just as he — as you — please about it," 
said Matve, with a smile lurking in his eyes. Thrust- 
ing his hands into his pockets, and bending his head to 
one side, he looked at his master. Stepan Arkadyevitch 
was silent. Then a good-humored and rather pitiful 
smile lighted up his handsome face. 



ANNA KARENINA 7 

" Well, Matve?" he said, shaking his head, 

"It's nothing, sir; she will come to her senses," 
answered Matve. 

"Will come to her senses?" 

"Sure she will!" 

"Do you think so? — Who is there?" asked Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, hearing the rustle of, a woman's dress 
behind the door. 

" It's me" said a powerful and pleasant female voice, 
and in the doorway appeared the severe and pimply 
face of Matriona Filimonovna, the nurse. 

"Well, what -is it, Matriosha?" asked Stepan Ar- 
kadyevitch, going to meet her at the door. 

Notwithstanding the fact that Stepan Arkadyevitch 
was entirely in the wrong as regarded his wife, and he 
himself acknowledged it, still almost every one in the 
house, even the old nurse, Darya Aleksandrovna's chief 
friend, was on his side. 

" Well, what ? " he asked gloomily. 

"You go down, sir, ask her forgiveness, just once. 
Perhaps the Lord will bring it out right. She is tor- 
menting herself grievously, and it is pitiful to see her; 
and everything in the house is going criss-cross. The 
children, sir, you must have pity on them. Ask her 
forgiveness, sir ! What is to be done ? No gains with- 
out pains." .... 

"But you see she won't accept an apology." .... 

" But you do your part. God is merciful, sir; pray to 
God. God is merciful." 

"Very well, then, come on," said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, suddenly turning red in the face. — "Very well, let 
me have my clothes," said he, turning to Matve, and 
resolutely throwing off his dressing-gown. 

Matve had everything all ready for him, and stood 
blowing off something invisible from the shirt stiff as a 
horse-collar, and with evident satisfaction he put it over 
his master's well-groomed body. 



ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER III 

Having dressed, Stepan Arkadyevitch sprinkled 
himself with perfume, straightened the sleeves of his 
shirt, according to his usual routine put into his various 
pockets cigarettes, his letter-case, matches, his watch 
with its double chain and locket, and, shaking out his 
handkerchief, feeling clean, well-perfumed, healthy, and 
physically happy in spite of his unhappiness, went out 
somewhat unsteadily to the dining-room, where his cof- 
fee was already waiting for him, and next the coffee his 
letters and the papers from the court-house. 

He read his letters. One was very disagreeable, — 
from a merchant who was negotiating for the purchase 
of a forest on his wife's estate. It was necessary to sell 
this forest, but now nothing could be done about it until 
a reconciliation was effected with his wife. Most un- 
pleasant it was to think that his pecuniary interests in 
this approaching transaction were complicated with his 
reconciliation to his wife. And the thought that he 
might be influenced by this interest, that his desire for 
a reconciliation with his wife was on account of the sale 
of the forest, this thought mortified him. 

Having finished his letters Stepan Arkadyevitch took 
up the papers from the court-house, rapidly turned over 
the leaves of two deeds, made several notes with a big 
pencil, and then pushing them away, took his coffee. 
While he was drinking it he opened a morning journal 
still damp, and began to read. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch subscribed to a liberal paper, and 
read it It was not extreme in its views, but advocated 
those principles which the majority held. And though 
he was not really interested in science or art or politics, 
he strongly adhered to such views on all these subjects 
as the majority, including his paper, advocated, and he 
changed them only when the majority changed them; 
or more correctly, he did not change them, but they 
themselves imperceptibly changed in him. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch never chose principles or opin- 



ANNA KARENINA 9 

ions, but these principles and opinions came to him, just 
as he never chose the shape of a hat or coat, but took 
those that others wore. And, living as he did in fash- 
ionable society, through the necessity of some mental 
activity, developing generally in a man's best years, it 
was as indispensable for him to have views as to have 
a hat If there was any reason why he preferred 
liberal views rather than the conservative direction which 
many of his circle followed, it was not because he found 
a liberal tendency more rational, but because he found it 
better suited to his mode of life. 

The liberal party declared that everything in Russia 
was wretched; and the fact was that Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch had a good many debts and was decidedly short of 
money. The liberal party said that marriage was a de- 
funct institution and that it needed to be remodeled, and 
in fact domestic life afforded Stepan Arkadyevitch very 
little pleasure, and compelled him to lie, and to pretend 
what was contrary to his nature. The liberal party said, 
or rather took it for granted, that religion is only a curb 
on the barbarous portion of the community, and in fact 
Stepan Arkadyevitch could not bear the shortest prayer 
without pain in his knees, and he could not comprehend 
the necessity of all these awful and high-sounding words 
about the other world when it is so very pleasant to live 
in this. Moreover, Stepan Arkadyevitch, who liked a 
merry jest, was sometimes fond of scandalizing a quiet 
man by saying that any one who was proud of his origin 
ought not to stop at Rurik and deny his earliest ancestor 
— the monkey. 

Thus the liberal tendency had become a habit with 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, and he liked his paper, just as he 
liked his cigar after dinner, because of the slight hazi- 
ness which it caused in his brain. He was now reading 
the leading editorial, which proved that in our day a cry is 
raised, without reason, over the danger that radicalism 
may swallow up all the conservative elements, and that 
government ought to take measures to crush the hydra 
of revolution, and that, on the contrary, " according to 
our opinion, the danger lies not in this imaginary hydra 



io ANNA KARENINA 

of revolution, but in the inertia of traditions which block 
progress," and so on. He read through another article 
on finance which made mention of Bentham and Mill, 
and dropped some sharp hints for the ministry. With 
his peculiar quickness of comprehension he appreciated 
each point, — from whom and against whom and on 
what occasion it was directed ; and this as usual afforded 
him some amusement. But his satisfaction was poisoned 
by the remembrance of Matriona's advice and of the un- 
fortunate state of his domestic affairs. He read also 
that Count von Beust was reported to have gone to 
Wiesbaden, that there was to be no more gray hair ; he 
read about the sale of a light carriage and a young 
woman's advertisement for a place. But these items 
did not afford him quiet, ironical satisfaction as usual. 

Having finished his paper, his second cup of coffee, 
and a buttered roll, he stood up, shook the crumbs of the 
roll from his waistcoat, and, filling his broad chest, 
smiled joyfully, not because there was anything extraor- 
dinarily pleasant in his mind, but the joyful smile was 
caused by good digestion. 

But this joyful smile immediately brought back the 
memory of everything, and he sank into thought. 

The voices of two children — Stepan Arkadyevitch 
knew they were Grisha, his youngest boy, and Tania, 
his eldest daughter — were now heard behind the door. 
They were dragging something and upset it. 

" I told you not to put passengers on top," cried the 
little girl in English. — " Now pick them up." 

" Everything is in confusion," said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch to himself. " Now here the children are, running 
wild ! " And going to the door, he called to them. They 
dropped the little box which served them for a railway- 
train, and ran to their father. 

The little girl, her father's favorite, ran in boldly, 
threw her arms around his neck and laughingly hugged 
him, enjoying as usual the odor which exhaled from his 
whiskers. Then kissing his face, reddened by his bend- 
ing position and beaming with tenderness, the little girl 
unclasped her hands and wanted to runaway again, but 
her father held her back. 



ANNA KARENINA n 

"What is mamma doing?" he asked, caressing his 
daughter's smooth, soft neck. " How are you ? " he 
added, smiling at the boy, who stood saluting him. He 
acknowledged he had less love for the little boy, yet he 
tried to be impartial. But the boy felt the difference, 
and did not smile back in reply to his father's chilling 
smile. 

" Mamma? She 's up," answered the little girl. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch sighed. " Of course she has 
spent another sleepless night," he said to himself. 

"Well, is she cheerful?" 

The little girl knew that there was trouble between 
her father and her mother, and that her mother could 
not be cheerful, and that her father ought to know it, 
and that he was dissembling when he questioned her so 
lightly. And she blushed for her father. He instantly 
perceived it and also turned red. 

" I don't know," she said ; " she told me that we were 
not to have lessons this morning but were to go with 
Miss Hull over to grandmother's." 

"Well, then, run along, Tanchurotchka vioya. — Oh, 
yes, wait," said he, still detaining her and smoothing her 
delicate little hand. 

He took down from the mantelpiece a box of candy 
which he had placed there the day before, and gave 
her two pieces, selecting her favorite chocolate and 
vanilla. 

"For Grisha?" she asked, pointing to the chocolate. 

"Yes, yes ; " and still smoothing her soft shoulder he 
kissed her on the neck and hair, and let her go. 

"The carriage is at the door," said Matve, and he 
added, "A woman is here — a petitioner." 

" Has she been here long ? " demanded Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. 

" Half an hour." 

"How many times have you been told to announce 
visitors instantly ? " 

" I had to get your coffee ready," replied Matve in 
his kind, rough voice, at which it was impossible to take 
offense. 



12 ANNA KARENINA 

"Well, show her in quick!" said Oblonsky, frowning 
with annoyance. 

The petitioner, the wife of Captain Kalanin, asked 
some impossible and nonsensical favor; but Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, according to his custom, gave her a com- 
fortable seat, listened to her story without interrupting, 
and then gave her careful advice to whom and how to 
make her application, and in lively and eloquent style 
wrote, in his big, scrawling, but handsome and legible 
hand, a note to the person who might aid her. Having 
dismissed the captain's wife, Stepan Arkadyevitch took 
his hat and stood for a moment trying to remember 
whether he had forgotten anything. He seemed to 
have forgotten nothing except what he wanted to forget 
— his wife. 

"Ah, yes!" 

He dropped his head, and a gloomy expression came 
over his handsome face. 

"To go or not to go," he said to himself; and an 
inner voice told him that it was not advisable to go, that 
there was no way out of it except through deception, 
that to straighten, to smooth out, their relations was 
impossible, because it was impossible to make her 
attractive and lovable again, or to make him an old man 
insensible to passion. Nothing but deception and lying 
could come of it, and deception and lying were opposed 
to his nature. 

"But it must be done sometime; it can't remain 
so always," he said, striving to gain courage. He 
straightened himself, took out a cigarette, lighted it, 
puffed at it two or three times, threw it into a mother- 
of-pearl-lined ash-tray, went with quick steps through 
the sitting-room, and opened the door into his wife's 
sleeping-room. 



ANNA KARENINA 13 



CHAPTER IV 

Darya Aleksandrovna, surrounded by all sorts of 
things thrown in confusion about the room, was stand- 
ing before an open chiffonnier from which she was 
removing the contents. She had on a dressing-sack, and 
the thin braids of her once luxuriant and beautiful hair 
were pinned back. Her face was thin and sunken, and 
her big eyes, protruding from her pale, worn face, had 
an expression of terror, When she heard her husband's 
steps she stopped in her work and, gazing at the door, 
vainly tried to give her face a stern and forbidding 
expression. She was conscious that she feared him and 
that she dreaded the coming interview. She was in the 
act of doing what she had attempted to do a dozen times 
during those three days : gathering up her own effects 
and those of her children to carry to her mother's 
house ; and again she could not bring herself to do it, yet • 
now, as before, she said to herself that things could not 
remain as they were, that she must take some measures to 
punish him, to put him to shame, to have some revenge 
on him, if only for a small part of the anguish that he 
had caused her. She ctill kept saying that she should 
leave him, but she felt that it was impossible ; it was 
impossible because she could not cease to consider him 
her husband and to love him. Moreover, she confessed 
that if here in her own home she had barely succeeded 
in looking after her five children, it would be far worse 
where shq wag going with them. In the course of these 
three days the youngest child had been made ill by eat- 
ing some poor soup, and the rest had been obliged 
to go almost dinnerless the night before. She felt that 
it was impossible to leave, yet for the sake of deceiving 
herself she was collecting her things and pretending 
that she was going. 

When she saw her husband, she thrust her hands into 
a drawer of the chiffonnier, as if trying to find some- 
thing, and looked at frim only when he came close up 
to her. But her face, to which she had intended to give 



i 4 ANNA KARENINA 

a stern and resolute expression, showed her confusion 
and anguish of mind. 

" Dolly," said he, in a gentle, subdued voice. He 
hung his head and tried to assume a humble and sub- 
missive mien, but nevertheless he was radiant with fresh 
life and health. She gave him a quick glance which 
took in his whole figure from head to foot, radiant with 
life and health. 

"Yes, he is happy and contented," she said to her- 
self, .... " but I ? .... And this good nature which makes 
everybody like him so well and praise him is revolting 
to me ! I hate this good nature of his." 

Her mouth grew firm, the muscles of her right cheek 
contracted, she looked pale and nervous. 

"What do you*want?" she demanded, in a quick, 
unnatural tone. 

" Dolly," he repeated, with a quaver in his voice, 
" Anna is coming to-day." 

" Well, what is that to me ? I cannot receive her," 
she cried. 

" Still, it must be done, Dolly." .... 

" Go away ! go away! go away ! " she cried, without 
looking at him, and as if her words were torn from her 
by physical agony, 

Stepan Arkadyevitch might be calm enough as his 
thoughts turned to his wife, he might have some hope 
that it would all straighten itself out according to Matve's 
prediction, and he might be able tranquilly to read his 
morning paper and drink his coffee ; but when he saw 
her tortured, suffering face, when he heard that resigned 
and hopeless tone of her voice, he breathed hard, some- 
thing rose in his throat, and his eyes filled with tears. 

"My God! What have I done? for God's sake!.... 
See..,." 

He could not say another word for the sobs that 
choked him. 

She shut the drawer violently, and looked at him. 

" Dolly, what can I say ? .... Only one thing : forgive 
me. Just think ! Cannot nine years of my life pay for 
"a single moment, a moment .... " 



ANNA KARENINA 15 

She let her eyes fall, and listened to what he was 
going to say, as if beseeching him in some way to per- 
suade her of his innocence. 

" A single moment of temptation," he ended, and was 
going to continue ; but at that word, Dolly's lips again 
closed tight as if from physical pain, and again the mus- 
cles of her right cheek contracted. 

" Go away, go away from here," she cried still more 
impetuously, "and don't speak to me of your tempta 
tions and your wretched conduct." 

She attempted to leave the room, but she almost fen, 
and was obliged to lean upon a chair for support. 
Oblonsky's face grew melancholy, his lips trembled, 
and his eyes filled with tears. 

" Dolly," said he, almost sobbing, " for God's sake 
think of the children. They are not to blame ; I am 
the one to blame. Punish me ! Tell me how I can 

atone for my fault I am ready to do anything. I 

am guilty ! No words can tell how guilty I am. But, 
Dolly, forgive me ! " 

She sat down. He heard her quick, hard breathing, 
and his soul was filled with pity for her. She tried 
several times to speak, but could not utter a word. He 
waited. 

" You think of the children, because you like to play 
with them ; but I think of them, too, and I know what 
they have lost," said she, repeating one of the phrases 
that during the last three days she had many times 
repeated to herself. 

She had used the familiar tui (thou), and he looked 
at her with gratitude, and made a movement as if to 
take her hand, but she turned from him with abhor- 
rence. 

" I have consideration for my children, and therefore 
I would do all in the world to save them ; but I do not 
myself know how I can best save them : by taking them 
from their father, or by leaving them with a father who 
is a libertine, — yes, a libertine ! .... Now tell me after 
this, — this that has happened, can we live together ? 
Is it possible? Tell me, is it possible?" she demanded, 



16 ANNA KARENINA 

raising her voice. "When my husband, the father of 
my children, has a love-affair with their governess .... " 

".... But what is to be done about it? what is to be 
done?" said he, interrupting with broken voice, not 
knowing what he said, and letting his head sink lower 
and lower. 

"You are revolting to me, you are insulting," she 
cried, with increasing anger, " Your tears are water ! 
You never loved me ; you have no heart, no honor. 
You are abominable, revolting, and henceforth you are 
a stranger to me, — yes, a perfect stranger," and she 
repeated with spiteful anger this word "stranger" which 
was so terrible to her own ears. 

He looked at her, and the anger expressed in her face 
alarmed and surprised him. He had no realizing sense 
that his pity exasperated his wife. She saw that he felt 
sympathy for her, but not love. " No, she hates me, she 
will not forgive me," he said to himself. 

" This is terrible, terrible ! " he cried. 

At this moment one of the children in the next room, 
having apparently had a fall, began to cry. Darya 
Aleksandrovna listened and her face suddenly softened. 
She seemed to collect her thoughts for a few seconds, 
as if she did not know where she was and what was 
happening to her, then, quickly rising, she hastened to 
the door. 

"At any rate she loves my child," thought Oblonsky, 
who had noticed the change in her face as she heard 
the little one's cry. "My child ; how then can she hate 
me?" 

" Dolly ! just one word more," he said, following her. 

"If you follow me, I will call the domestics, the 
children ! Let them all know that you are infamous ! 
I leave this very day, and you may live here with your 
paramour." 

And she went out and slammed the door. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch sighed, wiped his face, and 
softly left the room. 

" Matve says this can be settled ; but how ? I don't 
see the possibility. Akh ! akh ! how terrible ! and 



ANNA KARENINA 17 

how foolishly she shrieked/' said he to himself, as he 
recalled her cry and the words " infamous " and " para- 
mour " ! 

" Perhaps the chambermaids heard her ! horribly 
foolish, horribly ! " 

Stepan Arkadyevitch stood by himself a few seconds, 
rubbed his eyes, sighed, and then, throwing out his 
chest, left the room. 

It was Friday, and in the dining-room the German 
clock-maker was winding the clock. Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch remembered a joke that he had made about 
this punctilious German clock-maker, to the effect that 
" he must have been wound up himself for a lifetime for 
the purpose of winding clocks," and he smiled. Stepan 
Arkadyevitch loved a good joke. "Perhaps it will 
straighten itself out. That 's a good little phrase ! 
straighten itself out," he thought ; " I must tell that." 

"Matve!" he shouted; and when the old servant 
appeared, he said, " Have Marya put the best room in 
order for Anna Arkadyevna." 

"Very well." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch took his fur coat, and started 
down the steps. 

" Shall you dine at home ? " asked Matve, as he 
escorted him down. 

" That depends. Here, take this if you need to spend 
anything," said he, taking out a bill of ten rubles from 
his pocket-book. "That will be enough." 

" Whether it is enough or not, it will have to do," 
said Matve, as he shut the carriage-door and went up 
the steps. 

Meantime, Darya Aleksandrovna, having pacified the 
child, and knowing by the sound of the carriage that he 
was gone, came back to her room. This was her sole 
refuge from the domestic troubles that besieged her as 
soon as she went out. Even during the short time that 
she had been in the nursery, the English maid and 
Matriona Filimonovna asked her all sorts of questions 
demanding immediate attention, questions which she 
alone could answer, — what clothes should they put on 

VOL. I. — 2 



18 ANNA KARENINA 

the children for their walk? should they give them 
milk ? should they send for another cook ? 

" Akh ! leave me alone, leave me alone ! " she cried, 
and, hastening back to the chamber, she sat down in 
the place where she had been talking with her husband. 
Then, clasping her thin hands, on whose fingers the rings 
would scarcely stay, she reviewed the whole conversation. 

"He has gone! But has he broken with her?" she 
asked herself. " Does he still continue to see her ? 
Why did n't I ask him ? No, no, we cannot live together. 
Even if we continue to live in the same house, we are 
only strangers, strangers forever ! " she repeated, with 
a strong emphasis on the word that hurt her so cruelly. 
" How I loved him ! my God, how I loved him ! .... 
How I loved him ! and even now do I not love him ? 
Do I not love him even more than before ? that is the 
most terrible thing," she was beginning to say, but she 
did not finish out her thought, because Matriona Fili- 
monovna put her head in at the door. " Give orders to 
send for my brother," said she ; " he will get dinner. If 
you don't, it will be like yesterday, when the children 
did not have anything to eat for six hours." 

" Very good, I will come and give the order. Have 
you sent for some fresh milk ? " 

And Darya Aleksandrovna entered into her daily 
tasks, and in them forgot her sorrow for the time being. 



CHAPTER V 

Stepan Arkadyevitch had done well at school, by 
reason of his excellent natural gifts, but he was lazy and 
mischievous, and consequently had been at the foot of his 
class ; but, in spite of his irregular habits, his low rank in 
the Service, and his youth, he, nevertheless, held an im- 
portant salaried position as nachalnik, or president of 
one of the courts in Moscow. This place he had secured 
through the good offices of his sister Anna's husband, 
Aleksei Aleksandrovitch Karen in, who occupied one of 
the most influential positions in the ministry of which he 



ANNA KARENINA 19 

was a member. But even if Karenin had not been able 
to get this place for his brother-in-law, a hundred other 
people — brothers, sisters, cousins, second cousins, uncles, 
aunts — would have got it for Stiva Oblonsky, or some 
place as good, together with the six thousand rubles' 
salary which he needed for his establishment, his affairs 
being somewhat out of order in spite of his wife's con- 
siderable fortune. 

Half the people of Moscow and St. Petersburg were 
relatives or friends of Stepan Arkadyevitch ; he was 
born into the society of the rich and powerful of this 
world. A third of the older officials attached to the 
court and in government employ had been friends of his 
father, and had known him from the time when he wore 
petticoats ; a second third addressed him familiarly in 
the second person singular ; the others were " hail fel- 
lows well met." He had, therefore, as his friends, all 
those whose function it is to dispense earthly blessings 
in the shape of places, leases, concessions, and the like, 
and who could not neglect their own. And so Oblonsky 
had no special difficulty in obtaining an excellent place. 
All he had to do was not to shirk, not to be jealous, not 
to be quarrelsome, not to be thin-skinned, and he never 
gave way to these faults, because of his natural good 
temper. It would have seemed ridiculous to him if he 
had been told that he could not have any salaried place 
that he wanted, because it did not seem to him that he 
demanded anything extraordinary. He asked only for 
what his companions were obtaining, and he felt that he 
was as capable as any of them of performing the duties 
of such a position. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch was liked by every one for his 
good and amiable character and his unimpeachable 
honesty. There was moreover something in his brilliant 
and attractive personality, in his bright, sparkling eyes, 
his black brows, his hair, his vivid coloring, which exer- 
cised a strong physical influence as of friendliness and 
gayety on those who came in touch with him. 

"Aha, Stiva! Oblonsky! Here he is!" people 
would generally say, with a smile of pleasure. Even if 



20 ANNA KARENINA 

it happened that the results of meeting him were not 
particularly gratifying, nevertheless people were just as 
glad to meet him the second day and the third. 

After filling for three years the office of nachalnik of 
one of the chief judiciary positions in Moscow, Stepan Ar- 
kadyevitch had gained, not only the friendship, but also 
the respect of his colleagues, both those above and those 
below him in station, as well as of all who had had dealings 
with him. The principal qualities that had gained him 
this universal esteem were, first, his extreme indulgence 
for people, and this was founded on his knowledge of his 
own weaknesses ; secondly, his absolute liberality, which 
was not the liberalism which he read about in the news- 
papers, but that which was in his blood, and caused him 
to be agreeable to every one, in whatever station in life ; 
and thirdly and principally, his perfect indifference to 
the business which he transacted, so that he never lost 
his temper, and therefore never made mistakes. 

As soon as he reached his tribunal, Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, escorted by the solemn Swiss who bore his port- 
folio, went to his little private office, put on his uniform, 
and proceeded to the court-room. The clerks and other 
employees all stood up, bowing eagerly and respectfully. 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, as usual, hastened to his place, 
shook hands with his colleagues, and took his seat. He 
got off some pleasantry and made some remark suitable 
to the occasion, and then opened the session. No one 
better than he understood how far to go within the limits 
of freedom, frankness, and that official dignity which is 
so useful in the expedition of official ' business. A 
clerk came with papers, and, with the free and yet re- 
spectful air common to all who surrounded Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, spoke in the familiarly liberal tone which 
Stepan Arkadyevitch had introduced : — 

" We have at last succeeded in obtaining reports from the 
Government of Penza. Here they are, if you care to ...." 

" So we have them at last," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
touching the document with his finger. " Now, then, 
gentlemen ...." 

And the proceedings began. 



ANNA KARENINA 21 

" If they knew/ 1 he said to himself, as he bent his head 
with an air of importance while the report was read, " how 
much their president, only half an hour since, looked like 
a naughty school-boy ! " and a gleam of amusement came 
into his eyes as he listened to the report. 

The session generally lasted till two o'clock without 
interruption, and was followed by recess and luncheon. 
The clock had not yet struck two, when the great glass 
doors of the court-room were suddenly thrown open, 
and some one entered. All the members, glad of any 
diversion, looked round from where they sat under the 
Emperor's portrait and behind the zertsdlo, or procla- 
mation-table ; but the doorkeeper instantly ejected the 
intruder, and shut the door on him. 

After the business was read through, Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch arose, stretched himself, and in a spirit of sacri- 
fice to the liberalism of the time took out his cigarette, 
while still in the court-room, and then passed into his 
private office. Two of his colleagues, the aged veteran 
Nikitin, and the chamberlain Grinevitch, followed him. 

" There '11 be time enough to finish after luncheon/' 
said Oblonsky. 

"How we are rushing through with it!" replied 
Nikitin. 

"This Famin must be a precious rascal," said Grine- 
vitch, alluding to one of the characters in the affair 
which they had been investigating. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch knitted his brows at Grinevitch's 
words, as if to signify that it was not the right thing to 
form snap judgments, and he made no reply. 

" Who was it came into the court-room ?" he asked of 
the doorkeeper. 

" Some one who entered without permission, your 
excellency, while my back was turned. He asked to 
see you : I said, ' When the court adjourns, then .... ' " 

"Where is he?" 

" Probably in the vestibule ; he .was there ju§t fiow. 
Ah ! there he is," said the doorkeeper, pointing to a 
solidly built, broad-shouldered man with curly beard, 
who, without taking off his sheepskin cap, was lightly 



22 ANNA KARENINA 

and quickly running up the well-worn steps of the stone 
staircase. A lean chinovnik, on his way down, with a 
portfolio under his arm, stopped to look, with some indig- 
nation, at the newcomer's feet, and turned to Oblonsky 
with a glance of inquiry. Stepan Arkadyevitch stood 
at the top of the staircase, and his bright, good-natured 
face, set off by the embroidered collar of his uniform, 
was still more radiant when he recognized the visitor. 

" Here he is ! Levin, at last," he cried, with a friendly, 
ironical smile, as he looked at his approaching friend. 
"What! you got tired of waiting for me, and have 
come to find me in this den ? " he went on to say, not 
satisfied with pressing his hand, but kissing him affec- 
tionately. " Have you been in town long ? " 

" I just got here, and was in a hurry to see you," said 
Levin, looking about him timidly, and at the same time 
with a fierce and anxious expression. 

"Well, come into my office," said Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, who was aware of his visitor's egotistic sensi- 
tiveness, and, taking him by the hand, he led him along 
as if he were conducting him through manifold dangers. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch addressed almost all his acquain- 
tances with the familiar "thou," — old men of three- 
score, young men of twenty, actors and ministers, 
merchants and generals, so that there were very many 
of these familiarly addressed acquaintances from both 
extremes of the social scale, and they would have been 
astonished to know that through Oblonsky they had 
something in common. He thus addressed all with 
whom he had drunk champagne, and he had drunk 
champagne with every one, and so when in the presence 
of his subordinates he met any of his shameful intimates, 
as he jestingly called some of his acquaintances, his 
characteristic tact was sufficient to diminish the dis- 
agreeable impressions that they might have. 

Levin was not one of his shameful intimates, but 
Obl'onsky instinctively felt that Levin might think he 
would not like to make a display of their intimacy be- 
fore his subordinates, and so he hastened to take him 
into his private office. 



ANNA KARENINA 23 

Levin was about the same age as Oblonsky, and their 
intimacy was not based on champagne alone. Levin 
was a friend and companion from early boyhood. In 
spite of the difference in their characters and their 
tastes, they were fond of each other as friends are who 
have grown up together. And yet, as often happens among 
men who have chosen different spheres of activity, each, 
while approving the work of the other, really despised it. 
Each believed his own mode of life to be the only rational 
way of living, while that led by his friend was only illusion. 

At the sight of Levin, Oblonsky could not repress a 
slight ironical smile. How many times had he seen him in 
Moscow just in from the country, where he had been doing 
something, though Oblonsky did not know exactly what 
and scarcely took any interest in it. Levin always came 
to Moscow anxious, hurried, a trifle annoyed, and vexed 
because he was annoyed, and generally bringing with 
him entirely new and unexpected views of things. 
Stepan Arkadyevitch laughed at this and yet liked it. 

In somewhat the same way Levin despised the city 
mode of his friend's life, and his official employment, 
which he considered trifling, and made sport of it. But 
the difference between them lay in this : that Oblonsky, 
doing what every one else was doing, laughed self-con- 
fidently and good-naturedly, while Levin, because he was 
not assured in his own mind, sometimes lost his temper. 

" We have been expecting you for some time," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, as he entered his office, and let 
go his friend's hand to show that the danger was past. 
" I am very, very glad to see you," he continued. " How 
goes it ? how are you ? When did you come ? " 

Levin was silent, and looked at the unknown faces of 
Oblonsky's two colleagues, and especially at the elegant 
Grinevitch's hand, with its long, white fingers and their 
long, yellow, and pointed nails, and his cuffs, with their 
huge, gleaming cuff-buttons. It was evident that his 
hands absorbed all of his attention and allowed him to 
think of nothing else. Oblonsky instantly noticed this, 
and smiled. 

" Ah, yes," said he, " allow me to make you acquainted 



24 ANNA KARENINA 

with my colleagues, Filipp Ivanuitch Nikitin, Mikha'rt 
Stanislavitch Grinevitch ; " then turning to Levin, " A 
landed proprietor, a rising man, a member of the 
zemstsvo, and a gymnast who can lift two hundred 
pounds with one hand, a raiser of cattle, and huntsman, 
and my friend, Konstantin Dmitrievitch Levin, the 
brother of Sergye'f Ivanuitch Koznuishef." 

"Very happy/' said the little old man. " I have the 
honor of knowing your brother, Sergye'f Ivanuitch," 
said Grinevitch, extending his delicate hand with its long 
nails. 

Levin frowned; he coldly shook hands, and turned 
to Oblonsky. Although he had much respect for his 
half-brother, a writer universally known in Russia, it 
was none the less unpleasant for him to be addressed, 
not as Konstantin Levin, but as the brother of the famous 
Koznuishef. 

" No, I am no longer a worker in the zemstsvo. I 
have quarreled with everybody, and I don't go to the 
assemblies," said he to Oblonsky. 

" This is a sudden change," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
with a smile. " But how ? why ? " 

" It is a long story, and I will tell it some other time," 
replied Levin ; but he nevertheless went on to say, " To 
make a long story short, I was convinced that no action 
amounts to anything, or can amount to anything, in 
our provincial assembles." He spoke as if some one had 
insulted him. " On the one hand, they try to play Parlia- 
ment, and I am not young enough and not old enough 
to amuse myself with toys ; and, on the other hand," — 
he hesitated, — " this serves the district ring to make a 
little money. There used to be guardianships, judg- 
ments; but now we have the zemstsvo, not in the way 
of bribes, but in the way of unearned salaries." 

He spoke hotly, as if some one present had attacked 
his views. 

" Aha ! here you are, I see, in a new phase, on the 
conservative side," said Stepan Arkadyevitch. " Well, 
we '11 speak about this by and by." 

"Yes, by and by. But I want to see you particu- 



ANNA KARENINA 25 

larly," said Levin, looking with disgust at Grinevitch's 
hand. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch smiled imperceptibly. " Did n't 
you say that you would never again put on European 
clothes ? " he asked, examining his friend's new suit, 
evidently made by a French tailor. " Indeed, I see ; 
'tis a new phase." 

Levin suddenly grew red, not as grown men grow 
red, without perceiving it, but as boys blush, conscious 
that they are ridiculous by reason of their bashfulness, 
and therefore ashamed and made to turn still redder till 
the tears almost come. It gave his intelligent, manly 
face such a strange appearance that Oblonsky turned 
away and refrained from looking at him. 

" But where can we meet? You see it is very, 
very necessary for me to have a talk with you," said 
Levin. 

Oblonsky seemed to reflect. 

" How is this ? We will go and have luncheon at 
Gurin's, and we can talk there. At three o'clock I 
shall be free." 

" No," answered Levin after a moment's thought; 
" I 've got to take a drive." 

"Well, then, let us dine together." 

" Dine ? But I have nothing very particular to say, 
only two words, to ask a question ; afterward we can 
gossip." 

"In that case, speak your two words now; we will 
chat while we are at dinner." 

" These two words are .... however, it 's nothing very 
important." 

His face suddenly assumed a hard expression, due 
to his efforts in conquering his timidity. " What are 
the Shcherbatskys doing? — just as they used to ?" 

Stepan Arkadyevitch, who had long known that 
Levin was in love with his sister-in-law Kitty, almost 
perceptibly smiled, and his eyes flashed gayly. " You 
said 'two words'; but I cannot answer in two words, 
because .... excuse me a moment." 

The secretary came in at this juncture with his 



26 ANNA KARENINA 

familiar but respectful bearing, and with that modest 
assumption characteristic of all secretaries that he knew 
more about business than his superior. He brought 
some papers to Oblonsky ; and, under the form of a 
question, he attempted to explain some difficulty. With- 
out waiting to hear the end of the explanation, Stepan 
Arkadyevitch laid his hand affectionately on the secre- 
tary's arm. 

"No, do as I asked you to," said he, tempering his 
remark with a smile ; and, having briefly given his own 
explanation of the matter, he pushed away the papers, 
and said, "Do it so, I beg of you, Zakhar Nikititch." 

The secretary went off confused. Levin during this 
scene with the secretary had entirely recovered from 
his embarrassment, and was standing with both arms 
resting on a chair; on his face was an ironical expres- 
sion. 

" I don't understand, I don't understand," said he. 

" What don't you understand ? " asked Oblonsky, 
smiling, and taking out a cigarette. He was expecting 
some sort of strange outbreak from Levin. 

" I don't understand what you are up to," said Levin, 
shrugging his shoulders. " How can you do this sort 
of thing seriously ? " 

"Why not?" 

" Why, because it is doing nothing." 

" You think so? We are overwhelmed with work." 

" On paper ! Well, yes, you have a special gift for 
such things," added Levin. 

" You mean that I .... there is something that I lack?" 

" Perhaps so, yes. However, I cannot help admiring 
your high and mighty ways, and rejoicing that I have 
for a friend a man of such importance. But, you 
did not answer my question," he added, making a des- 
perate effort to look Oblonsky full in the face. 

" Now that 's very good, very good ! Go ahead, and 
you will succeed. 'T is well that you have eight thou- 
sand acres of land in the district of Karazinsk, such 
muscles, and the complexion of a little girl of twelve; 
but you will catch up with us all the same Yes, as to 



ANNA KARENINA 27 

what you asked me/ There is no change, but I am 
sorry that it has been so long since you were in town." 

" Why ? " asked Levin in alarm. 

" Well, it 's nothing," replied Oblonsky; "we will talk 
things over. What has brought you now especially?" 

" Akh ! we will speak also of that by and by," said 
Levin, again reddening to his very ears. 

"Very good. I understand you," said Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch. "You see, I should have taken you home 
with me to dinner, but my wife is not well to-day. If 
you want to see them, you will find them at the Zoologi- 
cal Gardens from four to five. Kitty is skating. You 
go there; I will join you later, and we will get dinner 
together somewhere." 

" Excellent. Da svidanya ! " 

" Look here — you see I know you — you will forget 
all about it, or will suddenly be starting back to your 
home in the country," cried Stepan Arkadyevitch, with 
a laugh. 

" No, truly I won't." 

Levin left the room, and only when he had passed 
the door realized that he had forgotten to salute Oblon- 
sky's colleagues. 

"That must be a gentleman of great energy," said 
Grinevitch, after Levin had taken his departure. 

"Yes, batyushka," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, throw- 
ing his head back. " He is a likely fellow. Eight 
thousand acres in the Karazinsky district ! He has 
a future before him, and how vigorous he is! He is 
not like the rest of us." 

" What have you to complain about, Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch ? " % 

" Well, things are bad, bad," replied Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, sighing heavily. 



28 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER VI 

When Oblonsky asked Levin for what special rea- 
son he had come, Levin grew red in the face, and he 
was angry with himself because he grew red ; but how 
could he have replied, " I have come to ask the hand of 
your sister-in-law " ? Yet he had come for that single 
purpose. 

The Levin and the Shcherbatsky families, belonging 
to the old nobility of Moscow, had always been on inti- 
mate and friendly terms. During Levin's student life 
the bond had grown stronger. He and the young 
Prince Shcherbatsky, the brother of Dolly and Kitty, 
had taken their preparatory studies, and gone through 
the university together. At that time Levin was a fre- 
quent visitor at the Shcherbatskys, and was in love with 
the house. Strange as it may seem, he was in love with 
the house itself, with the family, especially with the femi- 
nine portion. Konstantin Levin could not remember his 
mother, and his only sister was much older than he 
was, so that for the first time he found in the house 
of the Shcherbatskys that charming cultivated life so 
peculiar to the old nobility, and of which the death of 
his parents had deprived him. All the members of 
this family, but especially the ladies, seemed to him 
to be surrounded with a mysterious and poetic halo. 

Not only did he fail to discover any faults in them, but 
underneath this poetic and mysterious halo surrounding 
them, he saw the loftiest sentiments and the most ideal 
perfections. Why these three young ladies were obliged 
to speak French and English every day ; why they had 
to take turns in playing for hours at a time on the piano, 
the sounds of which floated up to their brothers room, 
where the young students were at work ; why professors 
of French literature, of music, of drawing, of dancing, 
came to give them lessons; why the three young 
ladies, at a certain hour, accompanied by Mile. Linon, 
drove out in their carriage to the TverskoT Boulevard, 
wearing satin shubkas, Dolly's very long, Natalie's 



ANNA KARENINA 29 

of half length, and Kitty's very short, showing her 
shapely ankles and close-fitting red stockings ; and why 
when they went to the Tversko'f Boulevard they had to 
be accompanied by a lackey with a gilt cockade on his 
hat, — all these things and many others were absolutely 
incomprehensible to him. But he felt that all that 
took place in this mysterious sphere was beautiful, and 
he was in love especially with this mystery of accom- 
plishment. 

While he was a student he almost fell in love with 
Dolly, the eldest; but she soon married Oblonsky ; then 
he began to be in love with the second. It was as if he 
felt it to be a necessity to love one of the three, only he 
could not decide which one he liked the best. But Na- 
talie entered society, and soon married the diplomat, 
Lvof. Kitty was only a child when Levin left the uni- 
versity. Young Shcherbatsky joined the fleet, and was 
drowned in the Baltic ; and Levin's relations with the 
family became more distant, in spite of his friendship 
with Oblonsky. At the beginning of the winter, how- 
ever, after a year's absence in the country, he had met 
the Shcherbatskys again, and learned for the first time 
which of the three he was destined really to love. 

It would seem as if there could be nothing simpler for 
a young man of thirty-two, of good family, possessed of 
a fair fortune, and likely to be regarded as an eligible 
suitor, than to ask the young Princess Shcherbatskaya 
in marriage, and probably Levin would have been ac- 
cepted as an excellent match. But he was in love, and 
consequently it seemed to him Kitty was a creature so 
accomplished, her superiority was so above everything 
earthly, and he himself was such an earthly insignificant 
being, that he was unwilling to admit, even in thought, 
that others or Kitty herself would regard him as worthy 
of her. 

Having spent two months in Moscow, as in a dream, 
meeting Kitty almost every day in society, which he al- 
lowed himself to frequent on account of her, he suddenly 
concluded that this alliance was impossible, and took his 
departure for the country. Levin's conclusion that it 



3 o ANNA KARENINA 

was impossible was reached by reasoning that in her 
parents' eyes he was not a suitor sufficiently advanta- 
geous or suitable for the beautiful Kitty, and that Kitty, 
herself could not love him. In her parents' eyes, he 
was engaged in no definite line of activity, and at his 
age had no position in the world, while his comrades 
were colonels or staff-officers, distinguished professors, 
bank directors, railway officials, presidents of tribunals 
like Oblonsky ; but he — and he knew very well how he 
was regarded by his friends — was only a pomyeshchik, 
or country proprietor, busy with breeding of cows, 
hunting woodcock, and building farmhouses : in other 
words, he was an incapable youth who had accomplished 
nothing, and who, in the eyes of society, was doing just 
what men do who have made a failure. 

Surely, the mysterious, charming Kitty could not love 
a man so ill-favored, dull, and good-for-nothing as he 
felt that he was. Moreover, his former relations with 
her, consequent upon his friendship with her brother, 
were those of a grown man with a child, and seemed to 
him only an additional obstacle to love. 

It was possible, he thought, for a girl to have a friend- 
ship for a good, homely man, such as he considered 
himself to be ; but if he is to be loved with a love such 
as he felt for Kitty, he must be good-looking, and above 
all, a man of distinction. 

He had heard that women often fall in love with ill- 
favored, stupid men, but he did not believe that such 
would be his own experience, just as he felt that it would 
be impossible for him to love a woman who was not 
beautiful, brilliant, and poetic. 

But, having spent two months in the solitude of the 
country, he became convinced that this was not one of 
his youthful passions, that the state of his feelings al- 
lowed him not a moment of rest, and that he could not 
live without settling this mighty question — whether she 
would, or would not, be his wife ; that his despair arose 
wholly from his imagination, and that he had no absolute 
certainty that she would refuse him. 

He had now returned to Moscow with the firm inten- 



ANNA KARENINA 31 

tion of offering himself and of marrying her if she would 
accept him. If not.... he could not think what would 
become of him. 

CHAPTER VII 

Coming to Moscow by the morning train, Levin had 
stopped at the house of his half-brother, Koznuishef. 
After making his toilet, he went to the library with the 
intention of telling him why he had come, and asking 
his advice; but his brother was not alone. He was 
talking with a famous professor of philosophy who had 
come up from Kharkof expressly to settle a vexed 
question which had arisen between them on some very 
important philosophical subject. The professor was 
waging a bitter war on materialists, and Sergei' Koznui- 
shef followed his argument with interest ; and, having 
read the professor's latest article, he had written him a 
letter expressing some objections. He blamed the pro- 
fessor for having made too large concessions to the 
materialists, and the professor had come on purpose to 
explain what he meant. The conversation turned on 
the question then fashionable : Is there a dividing line 
between the psychical and the physiological phenomena 
of man's action ? and where is it to be found ? 

Sergei Ivanovitch welcomed his brother with the 
same coldly benevolent smile which he bestowed on 
all, and, after introducing him to the professor, con- 
tinued the discussion. 

The professor, a small man with spectacles, and 
narrow forehead, stopped long enough to return Levin's 
bow, and then continued without noticing him further. 
Levin sat down to wait till the professor should go, but 
soon began to feel interested in the discussion. 

He had read in the reviews articles on this subject, but 
he had read them with only that general interest which 
a man who has studied the natural sciences at the uni- 
versity is likely to take in their development; but he 
had never appreciated the connection that exists between 
these learned questions of the origin of man, of reflex 



3 2 ANNA KARENINA 

action, of biology, of sociology, and those touching the 
significance of life and of death for himself, which had 
of late been more and more engaging his attention. 

As he listened to the discussion between his brother 
and the professor, he noticed that they agreed to a cer- 
tain kinship between scientific and psychological ques- 
tions, that several times they almost took up this subject ; 
but each time that they came near what seemed to him 
the most important question of all, they instantly took 
pains to avoid it, and sought refuge in the domain of 
subtile distinctions, explanations, citations, references to 
authorities, and he found it hard to understand what 
they were talking about. 

" I cannot accept the theory of Keis," said SergeX 
Ivanovitch in his characteristically elegant and correct 
diction and expression, " and I cannot at all admit that 
my whole conception of the exterior world is derived 
from my sensations. The most fundamental concept of 
being does not arise from the senses, nor is there any 
special organ by which this conception is produced." 

" Yes; but Wurst and Knaust and Pripasof will reply 
that your consciousness of existence is derived from an 
accumulation of all sensations, that it is only the result 
of sensations. Wurst himself says explicitly that where 
sensation does not exist, there is no consciousness of 
existence/' 

" I will say, on the other hand .... " began Serge* Ivan- 
ovitch 

But here Levin noticed that, just as they were about 
to touch the root of the whole matter, they again steered 
clear of it, and he determined to put the following ques- 
tion to the professor. 

"Suppose my sensations ceased, if my body were 
dead, would further existence be possible?" 

The professor, with some vexation, and, as it were, 
intellectual anger at this interruption, looked at the 
strange questioner as if he took him for a clown 
rather than a philosopher, and turned his eyes to 
Sergei* Ivanovitch as if to ask, "What does this man 
mean ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 33 

But Serge* Ivanovitch, who was not nearly so one- 
sided and zealous a partisan as the professor, and who 
had sufficient health of mind both to answer the pro- 
fessor and to see the simple and natural point of view 
from which the question was asked, smiled and said : — 

"We have not yet gained the right to answer that 
question.".... 

"Our capacities are not sufficient," continued the pro- 
fessor, taking up the thread of his argument. " No, I 
insist upon this, that if, as Pripasof says plainly, sensa- 
tions are based upon impressions, we cannot too closely 
distinguish between the two notions." 

Levin did not listen any longer, and waited until the 
professor took his departure. 



CHAPTER VIII 

When the professor was gone, Serge'f Ivanovitch 
turned to his brother. 

" I am very glad to see you. Shall you stay long ? 
How are things on the estate ? " 

Levin knew that his elder brother took little interest 
in the affairs of the estate, and only asked out of cour- 
tesy ; and so in reply he merely spoke of the sale of 
wheat, and the money he had received. 

It had been his » intention to speak with his brother 
about his marriage project, and to ask his advice; but, 
after the conversation with the professor, and in conse- 
quence of the involuntarily patronizing tone in which his 
brother had asked about their affairs, — for their real estate 
had never been divided and Levin managed it as a whole, 
— he felt that he could not begin to talk about his proj- 
ect of marriage. He had an instinctive feeling that his 
brother would not look upon it as he should wish him to. 

" How is it with the zemstvo ? " asked SergeY Ivan- 
ovitch, who took a lively interest in these provincial 
assemblies, to which he attributed great importance. 

* Fact is, I don't know .... " 

"What! aren't you a member of the assembly?" 
VOL. 1. — 3 



34 ANNA KARENINA 

* "No, I am no longer a member: I have not been 
going and don't intend to go any more," said Levin. 

"It's too bad," murmured Sergei Ivanovitch, frown- 
ing. 

Levin, in justification, described what had taken place 
at the meetings of his district assembly. 

" But it is forever thus," exclaimed Serge* Ivanovitch, 
interrupting. " We Russians are always like this. Pos- 
sibly it is one of our good traits that we are willing to 
see our faults, but we exaggerate them ; we take delight 
in irony, which comes natural to our language. If such 
rights as we have, if our provincial institutions, were 
given to any other people in Europe, — Germans or 
English, — I tell you, they would derive liberty from 
them; but we only turn them into sport." 

"But what is to be done?" asked Levin, penitently. 
" It was my last attempt. I tri6d with all my heart ; I 
cannot do it. I am helpless." 

r "Not helpless!" said Serge* Ivanovitch; "you did 
not look at the matter in the right light." 

" Perhaps not," replied Levin, in a melancholy tone. 

" Do you know, brother Nikolai has been in town 
again ?" 

Nikola* was Konstantin Levin's own brother, and 
Serge* Ivanovitch's half-brother, standing between them 
in age. He was a ruined man, who had wasted the 
larger part of his fortune, had mingled with the strangest 
and most disgraceful society, and had quarreled with 
his brothers. 

"What did you say?" cried Levin, startled. "How 
did you know ? " 
. « " Prokofi saw him in the street." 

" Here in Moscow ? Where is he ? " and Levin stood 
up, as if with the intention of instantly going to find 
him. 

" I am sorry that I told you this," said Serge* Ivan- 
ovitch, shaking his head when he saw his younger 
brother's emotion. " I sent out to find where he was 
staying ; and I sent him his letter of credit on Trubin, 
the amount of which I paid. This is what he wrote me 



ANNA KARENINA 35 

in reply," and Sergei Ivanovitch handed his brother a 
note which he took from a letter-press. 

Levin read the letter, which was written in the 
strange hand which he knew so well : — 

I humbly beg to be left in peace. It is all that I ask from 
my dear brothers. Nikolai Levin. 

Konstantin, without lifting his head, stood motionless 
before his brother with the letter in his hand. 

The desire arose in his heart now to forget his un- 
fortunate brother, and the consciousness that it would 
be wrong. 

" He evidently wants to insult me," continued Serge'f 
Ivanovitch; "but that is impossible. I wish with all 
my soul that I might help him, and yet I know that 
I shall not succeed." 

" Yes, yes," replied Levin. " I understand, and I 
appreciate your treatment of him ; but I am going to 
him." 

" Go, by all means, if it will give you any pleasure," 
said Sergei Ivanovitch ; " but I would not advise it. 
Not on my account, because I fear that he might 
make a quarrel between us, but, on your own account, 
I advise you not to go. He can't be helped. How- 
ever, do as you think best." 

"Perhaps he can't be helped, but I feel especially 

at this moment .... this is quite another reason I 

feel that I could not be contented...." 

"Well, I don't understand you," said Sergei Ivano- 
vitch; "but one thing I do understand," he added: 
"this is a lesson in humility. Since brother Nikola* 
has become the man he is, I look with greater indul- 
gence on what people call ' abjectness/ .... Do you 
know what he has done ? " .... 

" Akh! it is terrible, terrible," replied Levin. 

Having obtained from his brother's servant Nikolai's 
address, Levin set out to find him, but on second thought 
changed his mind, and postponed his visit till evening. 
Before all, he must decide the question that had brought 



36 ANNA KARENINA 

him to Moscow, in order that his mind might be free. 
He had therefore gone directly to Oblonsky; and, 
having learned where he could find the Shcherbatskys, 
he went where he was told that he would meet Kitty. 



CHAPTER IX 

About four o'clock Levin dismissed his izvoshchik 
at the entrance of the Zoological Garden, and with 
beating heart followed the path that led to the ice- 
mountains and the skating-pond, for he knew that he 
should find Kitty there, having seen the Shcherbatskys* 
carriage at the gate. 

It was a clear frosty day. At the entrance of the 
garden were drawn up rows of carriages and sleighs; 
hired drivers and policemen stood on the watch. Hosts 
of fashionable people, with their hats gayly glancing 
in the bright sunlight, were gathered around the doors 
and on the paths cleared of snow, among the pretty 
Russian cottages with their carved balconies. The an- 
cient birch trees of the garden, their thick branches 
all laden with snow, seemed clothed in new and solemn 
chasubles. , 

Levin followed the foot-path, saying to himself : — 

" Be calm ! there is no reason for being agitated ! 
What do you desire ? what ails you ? Be quiet, you fool ! " 

Thus Levin addressed his heart. And the more he 
endeavored to calm his agitation, the more he was over- 
come by it, till at last he could hardly breathe. An 
acquaintance spoke to him as he passed, but Levin did 
not even notice who it was. He drew near the ice- 
mountains, on which creaked the ropes that let down 
the sledges and drew them up again. The sleds flew 
with a rush down the slopes, and there was a tumult 
of happy voices. 

He went a few steps farther, and before him spread 
the skating-ground ; and among the skaters he soon 
discovered her. He knew that he was near her from 
the joy and terror that seized his heart. She was 



ANNA KARENINA 37 

standing at the opposite end of the pond engaged in 
conversation with a lady; and nothing either in her 
toilet or in her position was remarkable, but for Levin 
she stood out from the rest like a rose-bush among 
nettles. Everything was made radiant by her. She 
was the smile that lightened the whole place. 

" Do I dare to go and meet her on the ice ? " he 
asked himself. The place where she was seemed like 
an unapproachable sanctuary, and for a moment he 
almost turned to go away again, so full of awe it was. 
He had to master himself by a supreme effort to think 
that, as she was surrounded by people of every sort, 
he had as much right as the rest to go on there and 
skate. So he went down on the ice, not letting him- 
self look long at her, as if she were the sun ; but he 
saw her, as he saw the sun, even though he did not 
look at her. 

On this day and at this hour, the ice formed a com- 
mon meeting-ground for people of one clique, all of 
whom were well acquainted. There were also masters 
in the art of skating, who came to show off their 
skill ; others were learning to skate by holding on 
chairs, and making awkward and distressing gestures ; 
there were young lads and old men, who skated as a 
gymnastic exercise : all seemed to Levin to be the 
happy children of fortune because they were near 
Kitty. 

And all these skaters, with apparently perfect un- 
concern, glided around her, came close to her, even 
spoke to her, and with absolute indifference to her 
enjoyed themselves, making the most of the good 
skating and splendid weather. 

Nikolai Shcherbatsky, Kitty's cousin, in short jacket 
and knickerbockers, was seated on a bench with his 
skates on, and seeing Levin, he cried : — 

" Ah ! the best skater in Russia ! Have you been 
here long ? The ice is first-rate ! Put on your skates 
quick ! " 

" I have not my skates with me," replied Levin, sur- 
prised at this freedom and audacity in her presence, and 



38 ANNA KARENINA 

not losing her out of his sight a single instant, although 
he did not look at her. He felt that the sun was shin- 
ing nearer to him. She was at one corner and came 
gliding toward him, putting together her slender feet 
in high boots, and evidently feeling a little timid. A 
boy in Russian costume was clumsily trying to get 
ahead of her, desperately waving his arms and bending 
far forward. Kitty herself did not skate with much 
confidence. She had taken her hands out of her little 
muff, suspended by a ribbon, and held them ready to 
grasp the first object that came in her way. Looking 
at Levin, whom she had recognized, she smiled at him 
and at her own timidity. As soon as this evolution 
was finished, she struck out with her elastic little foot, 
and skated up to Shcherbatsky, seized him by the arm, 
and gave Levin a friendly welcome. She was more 
charming even than he had imagined her to be. 

Whenever he thought of her, he could easily recall 
her whole appearance, but especially the charm of her 
small blond head, set so gracefully on her pretty shoul- 
ders, and her expression of childlike frankness and 
goodness. The combination of childlike grace and deli- 
cate beauty of form was her special charm, and Levin 
thoroughly appreciated it. But what struck him like 
something always new and unexpected was the look 
in her sweet eyes, her calm and sincere face, and her 
smile, which transported him to a world of enchantment, 
where he felt at peace and at rest, as he remembered 
occasionally feeling in the days of his early childhood. 

" Have you been here long?" she asked, giving him 
her hand. 

"Thank you," she added, as he picked up her hand- 
kerchief, which had dropped out of her muff. 

"I? No, not long; I came yesterday .... that is, to- 
day," answered Levin, so agitated that at first he did 
not get the drift of her question. " I wanted to call 
upon you," said he; and when he remembered what 
his errand was, he grew red, and was more distressed 
than ever. "I did not know that you skated, and so 
well." 




ANNA KARENINA 39 

She looked at him closely, as if trying to divine the 
reason of his embarrassment. 

" Your praise is precious. A tradition that you are 
the best of skaters is still floating about," said she, 
brushing off with her little hand, in its black glove, the 
pine needles that had fallen on her muff. 

"Yes, I used to be passionately fond of skating. I 
had the ambition to reach perfection. " 

" It seems to me that you do all things passionately," 
said she, with a smile. " I should like to see you skate. 
Put on your skates, and we will skate together." 

" Skate together ? " he thought, as he looked at her. 
"Is it possible?" 

"I will go and put them right on," he said; and he 
hastened to find a pair of skates. 

" It is a long time, sir, since you have been with us," 
said the katalshchik, as he lifted his foot to fit the heel 
to it. " Since your day, we have not had any one who 
deserved to be called a master in the art. Are they 
going to suit you ? " he asked, as he tightened the strap. 

"Excellent, excellent; only please make haste," said 
Levin, unable to hide the smile of joy which, in spite 
of him, irradiated his face. "Yes," said he to himself, 
"this is life, this is happiness. ' We will skate together* 
she said. Shall I speak to her now? But I am afraid 
to speak, because I am happy, happy only in the 
hope .... Yet when ? .... But it must be, it must, it must. 
Down with weakness ! " 

Levin stood up, took off his cloak, and, after making 
his way across the rough ice around the -little house, he 
skated out on the glare surface without effort, hasten- 
ing, shortening, and directing his pace as if - by the 
mere effort of his will. He felt timid about coming up 
to her, but again her smile assured him. 

She gave him her hand, and they skated side by side, 
gradually increasing speed; and the faster they went, 
the closer she held his hand. 

" I should learn very quickly with you," she said. 
"I somehow feel confidence in you." 

"I am confident in myself when you cling to my 



4 o ANNA KARENINA 

hand,"- he answered, and immediately he was startled at 
what he had said, and grew red in the face. In fact, 
he had scarcely uttered the words, when, just as the sun 
goes under a cloud, her face lost all its kindliness, and 
Levin became aware of the well-remembered play of 
her face indicating the force of her thoughts; a slight 
frown wrinkled her smooth brow ! 

" Has anything disagreeable happened to you ? but I 
have no right to ask," he added quickly. 

" Why so ? No, nothing disagreeable has happened 
to me," she said coolly, and immediately continued, 
" Have you seen Mile. Linon yet ? " 

" Not yet." 

'- Go to see her; she is so fond of you." 

" What does this mean ? I have offended her ! Lord ! 
have pity upon me ! " thought Levin, and skated swiftly 
toward the old French governess, with little gray curls, 
who was watching them from a bench. She received 
him like an old friend, smiling, and showing her false 
teeth. ' 

"Yes, but how we have grown up," she said, indicat- 
ing Kitty with her eyes; "and how demure we are! 
Tiny bear has grown large," continued the old gover- 
ness, still smiling ; and she recalled his jest about the 
three young ladies whom he had named after the three 

bears in the English story " Do you remember that 

you used to call them so ? " 

He had entirely forgotten it, but she had laughed at 
this pleasantry for ten years, and still enjoyed it. 
* " Now go, go and skate. Does n't our Kitty take to it 
beautifully?" 

When Levin rejoined Kitty, her face was no longer 
severe ; her eyes had regained their frank and kindly 
expression ; but it seemed to him that her very kindli- 
ness had a peculiar premeditated tone of serenity, and 
he felt troubled. After speaking of the old governess 
and her eccentricities, she asked him about his own life. 
"Is n't it a bore living in the country in the winter?" 
she asked. 

" No, it is not a bore ; I am very busy," he replied, 



ANNA KARENINA 41 

conscious that she was bringing him into the atmosphere 
of serene friendliness from which he could not escape 
now, any more than he could at the beginning of the 
winter. 

" Shall you stay long ? " asked Kitty. 

"•I do not know," he answered, without regard to 
what he was saying. The thought that, if he fell back 
into that tone of calm friendship, he might return home 
without reaching any decision, occurred to him, and he 
resolved to rebel against it. 

" Why don't you know ? " 

"I don't know why. It depends on you," he said, 
and instantly he was horrified at his own words. 

She either did not understand his words, or did not 
want to understand them, for, seeming to stumble once 
or twice, catching her foot, she hurriedly skated away 
from him ; and, having spoken to Mile. Linon, she went 
to the little house, where her skates were removed by 
the waiting-women. 

" My God ! what have I done ? O Lord God ! have 
pity upon me, and come to my aid ! " was Levin's secret 
prayer ; and, feeling the need of taking some violent 
exercise, he began to describe outer and inner curves on 
the ice. 

At this instant a young man, the best among the re- 
cent skaters, came out of the cafe with his skates on, 
and a cigarette in his mouth ; with one spring he slid 
down, slipping and leaping from step to step, and, with- 
out even changing the easy position of his arms, skated 
down and out upon the ice. 1 

"Ah, that is a new trick," said Levin to himself, and 
he climbed up to the top of the bank to try the new trick. 

" Don't you kill yourself! it needs practice," shouted 
Nikolai Shcherbatsky. 

Levin went up to the platform, got as good a start as 
he could, and then flew down the steps preserving his 
balance with his arms ; but at the last step he stumbled, 
made a violent effort to recover himself, regained his 
equilibrium, and with a laugh glided out upon the ice. 

" Charming, glorious fellow," thought Kitty, at this 



42 ANNA KARENINA 

moment coming out of the little house with Mile. Linon, 
and looking at him with a gentle, affectionate smile, as if 
he were a beloved brother. "Is it my fault ? Have I 
done anything very bad? People say, * Coquetry.' I 
know that I don't love him, but it is pleasant to be with 
him, and he is such a splendid fellow. But what made 
him say that?".... 

Seeing Kitty departing with her mother, who had 
come for her, Levin, flushed with his violent exercise, 
stopped and pondered. Then he took off his skates, 
and joined the mother and daughter at the gate. 

"Very glad to see you," said the princess; "we re- 
ceive on Thursdays, as usual." 

"To-day, then?" 

"We shall be very glad to see you," she answered 
coolly. 

This coolness troubled Kitty, and she could not re- 
strain her desire to temper her mother's chilling man- 
ner. She turned her head, and said, with a smile, " We 
shall see you, I hope." l 

At this moment Stepan Arkadyevitch, with hat on 
one side, with animated face and bright eyes, entered 
the garden. But as he came up to his wife's mother, 
he assumed a melancholy and humiliated expression, 
and replied to the questions which she asked about 
Dolly's health. When he had finished speaking in a 
low and broken voice with his mother-in-law, he straight- 
ened himself up, and took Levin's arm. 

" Now, then, shall we go ? I have been thinking of 
you all the time, and I am very glad that you came," 
he said, with a significant look into his eyes. 

" Come on, come on," replied the happy Levin, who 
did not cease to hear the sound of a voice saying, " We 
shall see you, I hope" or to recall the smile that accom- 
panied the words. 

" At the Anglia, or at the Hermitage ? " 

" It 's all the same to me." 

"At the Anglia, then," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
making this choice because he owed more there than at 

1 Simply da svidanya, equivalent to au revoir. 



ANNA KARENINA 43 

the Hermitage, and it seemed unworthy of him, so to 
speak, to avoid this restaurant. "You have an izvosh- 
chik? So much the better, for I sent off my car- 
riage." 

While they were on the way, the friends did not 
exchange a word. Levin was pondering on the mean- 
ing of the change in the expression of Kitty's face, and 
at one moment persuaded himself that there was hope, 
and at the next plunged into despair, and he saw clearly 
that his hope was unreasonable. Nevertheless, he felt 
that he was another man since he had heard those 
words, "We shall see you, I hope," and seen her smile. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch was meantime making out the 
menu for their dinner. 

" You like turbot, don't you ? " were his first words 
on entering the restaurant. 

"What?" exclaimed Levin "Turbot? Yes, I 

am excessively fond of turbot." 



CHAPTER X 

Levin could not help noticing, as they entered the 
restaurant, how Stepan Arkadyevitch's face and whole 
person seemed to shine with restrained happiness. Ob- 
lonsky took off his overcoat, and, with hat over one ear, 
marched toward the dining-room, giving, as he went, his 
orders to the Tatars who in swallow-tails' and with nap- 
kins came hurrying to meet him. Bowing right and left 
to his acquaintances, who here as everywhere seemed 
delighted to see him, he went directly to the bar and 
took some vodka and a little fish, and said 'something 
comical to the barmaid, a pretty, curly-haired French 
girl, painted, and covered with ribbons and lace, so that 
she burst into a peal of laughter. But Levin would not 
drink any vodka simply because the sight of this French 
creature, all made up, apparently, of false hair, rice- 
powder, and vinaigre de toilette was revolting to 'him. 
He turned away from her quickly, with disgust, as from 
some horrid place. His whole soul was filled with 



44 ANNA KARENINA 

memories of Kitty, and his eyes shone with triumph and 
happiness. 

"This way, your excellency; come this way, and 
your excellency will not be disturbed," said a specially 
obsequious old Tatar, whose monstrous hips made the 
tails of his coat stick out behind. * Will you come this 
way, your excellency?" said he to Levin,' as a sign of 
respect for Stepan Arkadyevitch, whose guest he was. 
In a twinkling he had spread a fresh cloth on the round 
table, which, already covered, stood under the bronze 
chandelier; then, bringing two velvet chairs, he stood 
waiting for Stepan Arkadyevitch's orders, holding in 
one hand his napkin, and his order-card in the other. 

"If your excellency would like to have a private 

room, one will be at your service in a few moments 

Prince Galitsuin and a lady. We have just received 
fresh oysters." 

"Ah, oysters!" 

Stepan Arkadyevitch reflected. " Supposing we 
change our plan, Levin," said he, with his finger on 
the bill of fare. His face showed serious hesitation. 

" But are the oysters good ? Pay attention ! " 

"They are from Flensburg, your excellency; there 
are none from Ostend." 

" Flensburg oysters are well enough, but are they 
fresh?" 

" They came yesterday." 

"Very good! What do you say? — to begin with 
oysters, and then to make a complete change in our 
menu ? What say you ? " 

" It 's all the same to me. I 'd like best of all some 
skchi 1 and kasha, 2 but you can't get them here." 

" Kasha a la russe, if you would like to order it," said 
the Tatar, bending over toward Levin as a nurse bends 
toward a child. 

" No. Jesting aside, whatever you wish is good. I 
have been skating and should like something to eat 
Don't imagine," he added, as he saw an expression of 
disappointment on Oblonsky's face, " that I do not 

1 Cabbage soup. 2 Wheat gruel. 



ANNA KARENINA 45 

appreciate your selection. I can eat a good dinner with 
pleasure." 

" It should be more than that ! You should say that 
it is one of the pleasures of life," said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch. " In this case, little brother mine, give us two, 
or.... no, that 's not enough, three dozen oysters, vegetable 
soup.... " 

" Print ani ere" suggested the Tatar. 

But Stepan Arkadyevitch did not allow him the 
pleasure of enumerating the dishes in French, and con- 
tinued : — 

" Vegetable soup, you understand ; then turbot, with 
thick sauce ; then roast beef, but see to it that it 's all 
right. Yes, some capon, and lastly, some preserve." 

The Tatar, remembering Stepan Arkadyevitch's ca- 
price of not calling the dishes by their French names, 
instead of repeating them after him, waited till he had 
finished; then he gave himself the pleasure of repeating 
the order according to the bill of fare : — 

" Potage printaniere, turbot > sauce Beaumarchais y 
poularde a V estragon^ mace'doine de fruits" 

Then instantly, as if moved by a spring, he substi- 
tuted for the bill of fare the wine-list, which he presented 
to Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

"What shall we drink?" 

"Whatever you please, only not much..., champagne," 
suggested Levin. 

"What! at the very beginning? But you may be 
right ; why not ? Do you like the white seal ? 

" Cachet blanc" repeated the Tatar. 

"Well, then, give us that brand with the oysters. 
Then we'll see." 

" It shall be done, sir. And what table wine shall I 
bring you ? " 

"Some Nuits ; no, hold on — give us some classic 
CJiablis." 

" It shall be done, sir ; and will you order some of 
your cheese ? " 

"Yes, some parmesan. Or do you prefer some other 
kind?" 



46 ANNA KARENINA 

" No, it 's all the same to me," replied Levin, who 
could not keep from smiling. 

The Tatar disappeared on the trot, with his coat 
tails flying out behind him. Five minutes later he came 
with a platter of oysters opened and on the shell, and 
with a bottle in his hand. Stepan Arkadyevitch crum- 
pled up his well-starched napkin, tucked it into his 
waistcoat, calmly stretched out his hands, and began 
to attack the oysters. 

" Not bad at all," he said, as he lifted the succulent 
oysters from their shells with a silver fork, and swal- 
lowed them one by one. "Not at all bad," he repeated, 
looking from Levin to the Tatar, his eyes gleaming 
with satisfaction. 

Levin also ate his oysters, although he would have 
preferred white bread and cheese; but he could not 
help admiring Oblonsky. Even the Tatar, after un- 
corking the bottle and pouring the sparkling wine into 
wide, delicate glass cups, looked at Stepan Arkadyevitch 
with a noticeable smile of satisfaction while he adjusted 
his white necktie. 

"You are not very fond of oysters, are you ? " asked 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, draining his glass. " Or you are 
preoccupied ? Hey ? " 

He wanted Levin to be in good spirits, but Levin was 
anxious, if he was not downcast. His heart being so 
full, he found himself out of his element in this restau- 
rant, amid the confusion of guests coming and going, 
surrounded by the private rooms where men and women 
were dining together ; everything was repugnant to his 
feelings, — the whole outfit of bronzes and mirrors, the 
gas and the Tatars. He feared that the sentiment 
that occupied his soul would be defiled. 

" I ? Yes, I am a little absent-minded ; but besides, 
everything here confuses me. You can't imagine," he 
said, "how strange all these surroundings seem to a 
countryman like myself. It 's like the finger-nails of 
that gentleman whom I met at your office." .... 

" Yes, I noticed that poor Grinevitch's finger-nails inter- 
ested you greatly," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, laughing. 



ANNA KARENINA 47 

" It is of no use," replied Levin. " Suppose you come 
to me and try the standpoint of a man accustomed to 
living in the country. We in the country try to have 
hands suitable to work with; therefore we cut off our 
finger-nails, and oftentimes we even turn back our 
sleeves. But here men let their nails grow as long as 
possible, and so as to be sure of not being able to do 
any work with their hands, they fasten their sleeves with 
plates for buttons." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch smiled gayly : — 

"That is a sign that he has no need of manual labor; 
it is brain-work.... " 

" Perhaps so. Yet it seems strange to me, no less 
than this that we are doing here. In the country we 
make haste to get through our meals so as to be at work 
again ; but here you and I are doing our best to eat as 
long as possible without getting satisfied, and so we are 
eating oysters. " .... 

" Well, there 's something in that," replied Stepan 
Arkadyevitch ; " but the aim of civilization is to trans- 
late everything into enjoyment.'* 

" If that is its aim, I should prefer to be untamed." 

" And you are untamed ! All you Levins are un- 
tamed." 

Levin sighed. He thought of his brother Nikolar, 
and felt mortified and saddened, and his face grew 
dark ; but Oblonsky introduced a topic which had the 
immediate effect of diverting him. 

" Very well, come this evening to our house. I mean 
to the Shcherbatskys'," said he, pushing away the 
empty oyster-shells, drawing the cheese toward him, 
and flashing his eyes significantly. 

"Yes, I will surely come," replied Levin; "though 
it did not seem that the princess was very cordial in her 
invitation." 

"What rubbish ! It was only her manner Come, 

friend, bring us the soup It was only her grana f e. dame 

manner," replied Stepan Arkadyevitch. "I shall come 
there immediately after "a rehearsal at .the Countess 
Bonina's How can we help calling you untamed ? 



48 ANNA KARENINA 

How can you explain your flight from Moscow ? The 
Shcherbatskys have kept asking me about you, as if I 
were likely to know ! I only know one thing, that you 
are always likely to do things that no one else did/* 

" Yes," replied Levin, slowly, and with emotion ; " you 
are right, I am untamed ; yet it was not that I went, 
but that I have come back proves me so ! I have come 
now .../J 

" Oh, what a lucky fellow you are ! " interrupted 
Oblonsky, looking into Levin's eyes. 

"Why?" 

" I know fiery horses by their brand, and I know 
young people who are in love by their eyes," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, dramatically ; " everything is be- 
fore you ! " 

" And yourself, — is'everything behind you ? " 

" No, not altogether, but you have the future ; and I 
have the present, and this present is between the devil 
and the deep sea ! " 

"What is the matter?" 

" Nothing good. But I don't want to talk about my- 
self, especially as I cannot explain the circumstances," 
replied Stepan Arkadyevitch. " What did you come to 
Moscow for ?.... Here! clear off the things!" he cried 
to the Tatar. 

" Can't you" imagine ? " answered Levin, not taking 
his glowing eyes from Oblonsky's face. 

" I can imagine, but it is not for me to be the first to 
speak about it. By this you can tell whether I am 
right in my conjecture," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
looking at Levin with a sly smile. 

" Well, what have you to tell me ? " asked Levin, 
with a trembling voice, and feeling all the muscles of 
his face quiver. " How do you look at this ? " 

Stepan Arkadyevitch slowly drank his glass of Chablis 
while 'he looked steadily at Levin. 

" I ? " said Stepan Arkadyevitch. "There is nothing 
that I should like so much — nothing. It is the best 
thing that could possibly be ! " 

" But are. n't you mistaken ? Do you know what we 



ANNA KARENINA 49 

are talking about?" murmured Levin, with his eyes fixed 
on his companion. "Do you believe that this is possible ? " 

" I think it is possible. Why should n't it be ? 7 

" No, do you really think that it is possible ? No ! 
tell me what you really think. If.... if she should refuse 
me.... and I am almost certain that.... " 

" Why should you be ? " asked Stepan Arkady evitch, 
smiling at this emotion. 

"It is my intuition. It would be terrible for me and 
for her." 

" Oh ! in any case, I can't see that it would be very 
terrible for her ; a young girl is always flattered to be 
asked in marriage." 

"Young girls in general, perhaps, not she." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch smiled ; he perfectly under- 
stood Levin's feeling, knew that for him all the young 
girls in the universe were divided into two categories : 
in the one, all the young girls in existence except her — 
and these girls had all the faults common to humanity, 
in other words, ordinary girls ; in the other, she alone, 
without any faults, and placed above the rest of 
humanity. 

" Hold on ! take some gravy," said he, stopping 
Levin's hand, who was pushing away the gravy. 

Levin took the gravy in all humility, but he did not 
give Oblonsky a chance to eat. 

" No, just wait, wait," said he ; " you understand 
this is for me a question of life and death. I have 
never spoken to any one else about it, and I cannot 
speak to "any one else but you. I know we are very 
different from each other, have different tastes, views, 
everything ; but I know also that you love me, and 
that you understand me, and that 's the reason I am so 
fond of you. Now, for God's sake, be perfectly sincere 
with me." 

"I will tell you "what I think," said Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, smiling. " But I will tell you more : my wife 
— a most extraordinary woman " — and Stepan Ar- 
kadyevitch sighed, as he remembered his relations with 
his wife — then after a moment's silence he proceeded 
VOL. 1. — 4 



5 o ANNA KARENINA 

— "she has a gift of second sight, and sees through 
people, but that is nothing ! she knows what is going to 
happen, especially when there is a question of marriage. 
Thus, she predicted that Brenteln would marry Sha- 
khovskaya ; no one would believe it, and yet it came to 
pass. Well, my wife is on your side." 

" What do you mean ? " 

" I mean that she likes you ; she says that Kitty will 
be your wife/* 

As he heard these words, Levin's face suddenly 
lighted up with a smile which was near to tears of 
emotion. 

" She said that ! " he cried. " I always said that your 
wife was charming. But enough, enough of this sort of 
talk," he added, and rose from the table. 

" Good ! but sit a little while longer." 

But Levin could not sit down. He strode two or 
three times up and down the little square room, wink- 
ing his eyes to hide the tears, and then he sat down 
again at the table. 

" Understand me," he said ; " this is not love. I have 
been in love, but this is not the same thing. This is 
more than a sentiment ; it is an inward power that con- 
trols me. You see, I went away because I had made 
up my mind that such happiness could not exist, that 
such good fortune could not be on earth. But after a 
struggle with myself, I find that I cannot live without 
this. This question must be decided...." 

" But why did you go away ? " 

" Akh ! wait ! Akh ! so many things to think about ! 
so much to ask ! Listen, you cannot imagine what your 
words have done for me ! I am so happy that I have 
already grown detestable ! I am forgetting everything ; 
and yet this very day I heard that my brother Nikolar — 
you know — he is here, and I had entirely forgotten him. 
It seems to me that he, too, ought to be happy. But this 
is like a fit of madness. But one thing seems terrible to 

me You are married ; you ought to know this feeling. 

It is terrible that we who are already getting old .... with a 
past behind us .... not of love but of wickedness .... suddenly 



ANNA KARENINA 51 

come into close relations with a pure and innocent 
being. This is disgusting, and so I cannot help feeling 
that I am unworthy." 

" Well ! you have not much wickedness to answer 
for!" 

" Akh ! " said Levin ; " and yet, 'as I look with dis- 
gust on ?ny life, I tremble and curse and mourn bitte7'ly? 
....yes!" 

" But what can you do ? the world is thus constituted," 
said Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

" There, is only one consolation, and that is in the 
prayer that I have always loved : 'Pardon nie not accord- 
ing to my deserts, but according to Thy loving-kindness' 
Thus only can she forgive me." 



CHAPTER XI 

Levin drained his glass, and they were silent. 

" I ought to tell you one thing, though. Do you know 
Vronsky?" asked Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

" No, I don't know him; why do you ask ? " 

" Bring us another bottle," said Oblonsky to the 
Tatar, who was refilling their glasses and was hover- 
ing about them, especially when he was not needed. 
" You must know that Vronsky is one of your rivals." 

"Who is this Vronsky ? " asked Levin, and his face, 
a moment since beaming with the youthful enthusiasm 
which Oblonsky so much admired, suddenly took on a 
disagreeable expression of anger. 

"Vronsky — he is one of Count Kirill Ivanovitch 
Vronsky's sons, and one of the finest examples of the 
gilded youth of Petersburg. I used to know him at 
Tver when I was on duty there ; he came there for re- 
cruiting service. He is immensely rich, handsome, with 
excellent connections, one of the emperor's aides, and, 
moreover, a capital good fellow. From what I have 
seen of him, he is more than a 'good fellow'; he is 
well educated and bright, he is a rising man." 

Levin scowlqd, and said nothing. 



5i ANNA KARENINA 

" Well, then ! he put in an appearance soon after you 
left ; and, as I understand, he fell over ears in love with 
Kitty. You understand that her mother.... " 

" Excuse me, but I don't understand at all," inter- 
rupted Levin, scowling still more fiercely. And sud- 
denly he remembered his brother Nikolat, and how ugly 
it was in him to forget him. 

"Just wait, wait," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, laying 
his hand on Levin's arm with a smile. " I have told 
you all that I know ; but I repeat, that, in my humble 
opinion, the chances in this delicate affair are on your 
side." 

Levin leaned back in his chair ; his face was pale. 

" But I advise you to settle the matter as quickly as 
possible," suggested Oblonsky, filling up his glass. 

" No, thank you : I cannot drink any more," said 

Levin, pushing away the glass. "I shall be tipsy 

Well, how are you feeling?" he added, desiring to 
change the conversation. 

"One word more: in any case I advise you to settle 
the question quickly. I advise you to speak immedi- 
ately," said Stepan Arkadyevitch. "Go to-morrow 
morning, make your proposal in classic style, and God 
bless you.".... 

"Why haven't you ever come to hunt with me as 
you promised to do ? Come this spring," said Levin. 

He now repented with all his heart that he had en- 
tered upon this conversation with Stepan Arkadyevitch : 
his deepest feelings were wounded by what he had just 
learned of the pretensions of his rival, the young officer 
from Petersburg, as well as by the advice and insinua- 
tions of Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch smiled. He perceived what 
was taking place in Levin's heart. 

"I will come some day," he said. "Yes, brother, 
woman's the spring that moves everything. My own 
trouble is bad, very bad. And all on account of women. 
Give me your advice," said he, taking a cigar, and still 
holding his glass in his hand. "Tell me frankly what 
you think." 



ANNA KARENINA $3 

"But what about?" 

" Listen : suppose you were married, that you loved 
your wife, but had been drawn away by another 
woman.... " 

" Excuse me. I really can't imagine any such thing. 
As it looks to me, it would be as if in coming out from 
dinner, I should steal a loaf of bread from a bakery." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch's eyes sparkled more than usual. 
"Why not? Bread sometimes smells so good, that one 
cannot resist the temptation : — 

" Himmlisch isfs y wenn ich bezwiingen 
Meine irdische Begier : 
Aber dock wenns's nicht gelungen, 
HaW ich attch recht hitbsch Plaisir" 1 

As he repeated these lines, Oblonsky smiled. 

Levin could not refrain from smiling also. 

" But a truce to pleasantries," continued Oblonsky. 
"Imagine a woman, a charming, modest, loving crea- 
ture, poor, and alone in the world, who had sacrificed 
everything for you. Now, imagine, after the thing is 
done, is it necessary to give her up ? We '11 allow that 
it is necessary to break with her, so as not to disturb 
the peace of the family ; but ought we not to pity her, 
to make provision for her, to soften the blow ? " 

" Pardon me ; but you know that for me all women are 
divided into two classes, .... no, that is, .... there are women, 
and there are .... But I never yet have seen or expect 
to see beautiful fallen women, beautiful repentant Mag- 
dalens ; and such women as that painted French creature 
at the bar, with her false curls, fill me with disgust, and 
all fallen women are the same ! " 

" But the woman in the New Testament ? " 

" Akh ! hold your peace. Never would Christ have 
said those words if he had known to what bad use they 
would be put. Out of the whole Gospel, only those 

1 It was heavenly when I gained 
What my heart desired on earth : 
Yet if not all were attained, 
Still I had my share of mirth. 



54 ANNA KARENINA 

words are taken. However, I don't say what I think, 
but what I feel. You feel a disgust for spiders and 
I for these reptiles. You see you did not have to study 
spiders, and you know nothing about their natures. 
So it is with me." 

" It is well for you to say so ; it is a very convenient 
way to do as the character in Dickens did, and throw 
all embarrassing questions over his right shoulder with 
his left hand. But to deny a fact is not to answer it. 
Now, what is to be done ? tell me ! what is to be done ? 
Your wife grows old and you are full of life. Before 
you are aware of it you realize that you do not love your 
wife, however much you may respect her. And then 
suddenly you fall in love with some one and you fall, 
you fall! " said Stepan Arkadyevitch, with a melancholy 
despair. 

Levin laughed. 

"Yes, you fall!" repeated Oblonsky. "Then what 
is to be done ? " 

" Don't steal fresh bread." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch burst out laughing. 

" O moralist ! but please appreciate the situation. 
Here are two women : one insists only on her rights, 
and her rights mean your love which you cannot give ; 
the other has sacrificed everything for you and demands 
nothing. What can one do ? How can one proceed ? 
Here is a terrible tragedy! " 

" If you wish my judgment concerning this tragedy, 
I will tell you that I don't believe in this tragedy, and 
this is why. In my opinion, Love — the two Loves 
which Plato describes in his ' Symposium/ you remem- 
ber, serve as the touchstone for men. Some people 
understand only one of them ; others understand the 
other. Those who comprehend only the Platonic love 
have no right to speak of this tragedy now. In this 
sort of love there can be no tragedy. / thank you 
humbly for the pleasure ; and therein consists the whole 
drama. But for Platonic love there can be no tragedy 
because it is bright and pure, and because.... " 

At this moment Levin remembered his own short- 



ANNA KARENINA 55 

comings and the inward struggles which he had under- 
gone, and he unexpectedly added, " However, you may 
be right. It is quite possible .... I know nothing — abso- 
lutely nothing — about it." 

"Do you see," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, "you are 
a very perfect man ? Your great virtue is your only 
fault. You are a very perfect character and you desire 
that all the factors of life should also be perfect ; but this 
cannot be. Here you scorn the service of the state, 
because, according to your idea, every action should 
correspond to an exact end ; but this cannot be. You 
require also that the activity of every man should always 
have an object, that conjugal life and love be one and 
the same ; but this cannot be. All the variety, all the 
charm, all the beauty, of life consists in lights and shades." 

Levin sighed, and did not answer ; he was absorbed 
in his own thoughts and did not even listen. 

And suddenly both of them felt that, though they were 
good friends, though they had been dining together and 
drinking wine, yet each was thinking only of his own 
affairs and cared nothing for the affairs of the other. 
Oblonsky had more than once had this experience after 
dining with a friend, and he knew what had to be done 
when, instead of coming into closer sympathy, the dis- 
tance between seemed widened. 

" The account," he cried, and went into the next room, 
where he met an aide whom he knew, and with whom 
he began to talk about an actress and her lover. This 
conversation amused and rested Oblonsky after his con- 
versation with Levin, who always kept his mind on too 
great an intellectual and moral strain. 

When the Tatar brought the account, amounting to 
twenty-six rubles and odd kopeks, and something more 
for his fee, Levin, who at any other time, as a country- 
man, would have been shocked at the size of the bill, 
paid the fourteen rubles of his share without noticing, 
and went to his lodgings' to dress for the reception at 
the Shcherbatskys', where his fate would be decided. 



56 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XII 

The Princess Kitty Shcherbatskaya was eighteen years 
old. She was making her first appearance in society 
this winter, and her triumphs had been more brilliant 
than her elder sisters, more than even her mother, had 
expected. Not only were almost all the young men 
who danced at balls in Moscow in love with Kitty, 
but, moreover, there were two who, during this first 
winter, were serious aspirants to her hand, — Levin, 
and, soon after his departure, Count Vronsky. 

Levin's appearance at the beginning of the winter, 
his frequent calls and his unconcealed love for Kitty, 
were the first subjects that gave cause for serious con- 
versation between her father and mother in regard to 
her future and for disputes between the prince and 
princess. The prince was on Levin's side, and declared 
that he could not desire a better match for Kitty. But 
the princess, with the skill which women have for avoid- 
ing a question, insisted that Kitty was too young, that 
Levin did not seem to be serious in his attentions, and 
that she did not show great partiality for him; but 
she did not express what was in the bottom of her 
heart, — that she was ambitious for a more brilliant 
marriage, that Levin did not appeal to her sympathies, 
and that she did not understand him. And when Levin 
took a sudden leave she was glad and said 3 with an air 
of triumph, to her husband : — 

" You see, I was right." 

When Vronsky appeared on the scene, she was still 
more glad, being confirmed in her opinion that Kitty 
ought to make, not merely a good, but a brilliant match. 

For the princess there was no comparison between 
Vronsky and Levin as suitors. The mother disliked 
Levin and his strange and harsh judgments, his awk- 
wardness in society, which she attributed to his pride and 
what she called his savage life in the country, occupied 
with his cattle and peasants. Nor did she like it at all 
that Levin, though he was in love with her daughter, and 



ANNA KARENINA . 57 

had been a frequent visitor at their house for six weeks, 
had appeared like a man who was hesitating, watching, 
and questioning whether, if he should offer himself, the 
honor which he conferred on them would not be too 
great, and that he did not seem to understand that when 
a man comes assiduously to a house where there is a 
marriageable daughter, it is proper for him to declare 
his intentions. And then he suddenly departed with- 
out any explanation ! 

"It is fortunate,*' the mother thought, "that he is so 
unattractive, and that Kitty has not fallen in love with 
him." 

Vronsky satisfied all her requirements : he was very 
rich, intelligent, of good birth, with a brilliant career 
at court or in the army before him, and, moreover, he 
was charming. Nothing better could be desired. Vron- 
sky was devoted to Kitty at the balls, danced with her, 
and called upon her parents ; there could be no doubt 
that his intentions were serious. But, notwithstanding 
this, the mother had passed this whole winter full of 
doubts and perplexities. 

The princess herself had been married thirty years 
before, through the match-making of an aunt. Her 
suitor, who was well known by reputation, came, saw 
the young lady, and was seen by the family ; the aunt 
who served as intermediary gave and received the re- 
port of the impression produced on both sides ; the 
impression was favorable. Then on a designated day 
the expected proposal was made on the parents, and 
granted. Everything had passed off very easily and 
simply. At least, so it seemed to the princess. But in 
the case of her own daughters, she learned by experi- 
ence how difficult and complicated this apparently 
simple matter of getting girls married really was. How 
many fears she had to go through ! How many things 
had to be thought over, how much money had to be 
lavished, how many collisions with her husband, when 
the time came for Darya and Natali to be married ! 
And now that the youngest was in the matrimonial 
market, she was obliged to suffer from the same anxi- 



5 8 ANNA KARENINA 

eties, the same doubts, and even more bitter quarrels 
with her husband. 

The old prince, like all fathers, was excessively punc- 
tilious about everything concerning the honor and 
purity of his daughters, he was distressingly jealous re- 
garding them, especially Kitty, who was his favorite, 
and at every step he accused his wife of compromising 
his daughter. The princess had become accustomed to 
these scenes from the days of her elder daughters, but 
now she felt that her husband's strictness had more 
justification. She saw that in these later days many of 
the practices of society had undergone a change, so 
that the duties of mothers were becoming more and 
more difficult. She saw how Kitty's young girl friends 
formed a sort of clique, went to races, freely mingled 
with men, went out driving alone ; that many of them 
no longer made courtesies ; and, what was more serious, 
all of them were firmly convinced that the choice of 
husbands was their affair and not their parents'. 

" Marriages aren't made as they used to be," thought 
and said all these young ladies, and even some of the 
older people. 

" But how are marriages made nowadays?" This ques- 
tion the princess could not get any one to answer. 

The French custom, where the parents decide the 
fate of their children, was not accepted, was even bitterly 
criticized. The English custom, which allows the girls 
absolute liberty, was also not accepted, and was not pos- 
sible in Russian spciety. The Russian custom of em- 
ploying a match-maker was regarded as bad form ; 
every one ridiculed it, even the princess herself. But 
no one seemed to know what course to take in regard to 
courtship. Every one with whom the princess talked 
said the same thing. 

" For goodness' sake, it is time for us to renounce 
those exploded notions ; it is the young folks, and not 
their parents, who get married, and, therefore, it is for 
young folks to make their arrangements in accordance 
with their own ideas." 

It was well enough for those without daughters to 



ANNA KARENINA 59 

say this; but the princess knew well that in this familiar 
intercourse her daughter might fall in love, and fall in 
love with some one who would not dream of marrying 
her, or would not make her a good husband. However 
earnestly they suggested to the princess that in our 
time young people ought to settle their own destinies, 
she found it impossible to agree with them any more 
than she could believe in. the advisability of allowing the 
four-year-old children of our time to have loaded pistols 
as their favorite toys. And so the princess felt much 
more solicitude about Kitty than she had felt about 
either of her other daughters. 

She feared now that Vronsky would content himself 
with playing the gallant. She saw that Kitty was 
already in love with him, but she consoled herself with 
the thought that he was a man of honor and would not 
do so ; but, at the same time, she knew how easy it was, 
with the new freedom allowed in society, to turn a young 
girl T s head, and how lightly men as a general thing 
regarded this. 

The week before Kitty had told her mother of a con- 
versation which she had held with Vronsky during a 
mazurka. This conversation had partially relieved the 
princess's mind, though it did not absolutely satisfy her. 
Vronsky told Kitty that he and his brother were both so 
used to letting their mother decide things for them, that 
they never undertook anything of importance without 
consulting her. 

" And now I am looking for my mother's arrival from 
Petersburg as a great piece of good fortune," he had said. 

Kitty reported these words without attaching any im- 
portance to them, but her mother understood them very 
differently. She knew that the old countess was ex- 
pected from day to day ; she knew that the old countess 
would be satisfied with her son's choice; and it was 
strange to her that he had not offered himself, as if he 
feared to offend his mother. However, she herself was 
so anxious for this match, and above all for relief from 
her anxieties, that she gave a' favorable interpretation to 
these words. Bitterly as she felt the unhappiness of her 



60 ANNA KARENINA 

oldest daughter, Dolly, who was thinking of leaving her 
husband, agitation regarding the decision of her young- 
est daughter's fate completely absorbed her thoughts. 

Levin's arrival to-day gave her a new anxiety. She 
feared lest her daughter, who, as she thought, had at one 
time felt drawn toward Levin, might, out of excessive 
delicacy, refuse Vronsky, and she feared more than 
anything else that his arrival would complicate every- 
thing and postpone a long-desired consummation. 

" Has he been here long?" asked the princess of her 
daughter, when they reached home after their meeting 
with Levin. 

"Since yesterday, maman" 

" I have one thing that I want to say to you ..,." the 
princess began, and, at the sight of her serious and agi- 
tated face, Kitty knew what was coming. 

" Mamma," said she, blushing, and turning quickly to 
her, " please, please don't speak about this. I know, I 
know all ! " 

She wished the same thing that her mother wished, 
but the motives of her mother's desires were repugnant 
to her. 

" I only wish to say that as you have given hope to 
one...." 

" Mamma, galnbchik} don't speak. It 's so terrible 
to speak about this." 

" I will not," replied her mother, seeing the tears in 
her daughter's eyes; "only one word, moya dusha 2 : 
you have promised to have no secrets from me. Have 
you any ? " 

" Never, mamma, not one ! " replied Kitty, looking 
her mother full in the face and blushing ; " but I have 
nothing to tell now. I .... I .... even if I wanted to, I 
don't know what to say and how.... I don't know ...." 

" No, with those eyes she cannot speak a falsehood," 
said the mother to herself, smiling at her emotion and 
happiness. The princess smiled to think how momen- 
tous appeared to the poor girl what was passing in her 
heart. 

1 Little dove. 2 My soul. 



ANNA KARENINA 61 



CHAPTER XIII 

After dinner, and during the first part of the even- 
ing, Kitty felt as* a young man feels before a battle. 
Her heart beat violently, and she could not concentrate 
her thoughts. 

She felt that this evening, when they two should meet 
for the first time, would decide her fate. She kept see- 
ing them in her imagination, sometimes together, some- 
times separately. When she thought of the past, 
pleasure, almost tenderness, filled her heart at the 
remembrance of her relations with Levin. The recol- 
lections of her childhood and of his friendship with 
her departed brother imparted a certain poetic charm 
to her relations with him. His love for her, of which 
she was certain, was flattering and agreeable to her, 
and she found it easy to think about Levin. In her 
thoughts about Vronsky there was something that 
made her uneasy, though he was a man to the highest 
degree polished and self-possessed ; there seemed to be 
something false, not in him, — for he was very simple 
and good, — but in herself, while all was clear and 
simple in her relations with Levin. But while Vronsky 
seemed to offer her dazzling promises and a brilliant 
future, the future with Levin seemed enveloped in 
mist. 

When she went up-stairs to dress for the evening and 
looked into the mirror, she noticed with delight that she was 
looking her loveliest, and that she was in full possession 
of all her powers, and what was most important on this 
occasion, that she felt at ease and entirely self-possessed. 

At half-past seven, as she was going into the drawing- 
room, the lackey announced, " Konstantin Dmitritch 
Levin." The princess was still in her room ; the prince 
had not yet come down. " It has come at last," thought 
Kitty, and all the blood rushed to her heart. As she 
glanced into a mirror, she was startled to see how pale 
she looked. 

She knew now, for a certainty, that he had come early, 



62 ANNA KARENINA 

so as to find her alone and offer himself. And instantly 
the situation appeared to her for the first time in a new, 
strange light. Then only she realized that the question 
did not concern herself alone, nor who would make her 
happy, nor whom she loved, but that she should have to 
wound a man whom she liked, and to wound him cruelly 
.... why, why was it that such a charming man loved 
her ? Why had he fallen in love with her ? But it was 
too late to mend matters ; it was fated to be so. 

" Merciful Heaven ! is it possible that I myself must 
tell him," she thought, — "I must tell him that I don't 
love him ? That is not true ! But what can I say ? 
That I love another? No, that is impossible. I will 
run away, I will run away ! " 

She had already reached the door, when she heard his 
step. " No, it is not honorable. What have I to fear ? 
I have done nothing wrong. Let come what will, I will 
tell the truth ! I shall not be ill at ease with him. Ah, 
here he is ! " she said to herself, as she saw his strong 
but timid countenance, with his brilliant eyes fixed upon 
her. She looked him full in the face, with an air which 
seemed to implore his protection, and extended her 
hand. 

" I am rather early, too early, I am afraid," said he, 
casting a glance about the empty room ; and when he 
saw that his hope was fulfilled, and that nothing would 
prevent him from speaking, his face grew solemn. 

" Oh, no ! " said Kitty, sitting down near a table. 

" But it is exactly what I wanted, so that I might find 
you alone," he began, without sitting, and without look- 
ing at her, lest he should lose his courage. 

" Mamma will be here in a moment. She was very- 
tired to-day. To-day .... " 

She spoke without knowing what her lips said, and 
did not take her imploring and gentle gaze from his 
face. 

Levin gazed at her ; she blushed, and stopped speak- 
ing. 

" I told you to-day that I did not know how long I 
should stay.... that it depended on you .... " 



ANNA KARENINA 63 

Kitty drooped her head lower and lower, not know- 
ing how she should reply to the words that he was going 
to speak. 

"That it depended upon you," he repeated. "I 
meant .... T meant .... I came for this, that .... be my wife," 
he murmured, not knowing what he had said; but, feel- 
ing that he had got through the worst of the difficulty, 
he stopped and looked at her. 

She felt almost suffocated ; she did not raise her head. 
She felt a sort of ecstasy. Her heart was full of happi- 
ness. Never could she have believed that the declara- 
tion of his love would make such a deep impression 
upon her. But this impression lasted only a moment. 
She remembered Vronsky. She raised her sincere and 
liquid eyes to Levin, and, seeing his agitated face, said 
hastily : — 

" This cannot be ! .... Forgive me ! " 

How near to him, a moment since, she had been, and 
how necessary to his life ! and now how far away and 
strange she suddenly seemed to be ! 

" It could not have been otherwise," he said, without 
looking at her. 

He bowed and was about to leave the room. 



CHAPTER XIV 

At this instant the princess entered. Apprehension 
was pictured on her face when she saw their agitated 
faces and that they had been alone. Levin bowed low, 
and did not speak. Kitty was silent, and did not raise 
her eyes. " Thank God, she has refused him ! " thought 
the mother; and her face lighted up with the smile with 
which she always received her Thursday guests. She 
sat down, and began to ask Levin questions about his 
life in the country. He also sat down, hoping to escape 
unobserved when the guests began to arrive. 

Five minutes later, one of Kitty's friends, who had 
been married the winter before, was announced, — the 



64 ANNA KARENINA 

Countess Nordstone. She was a dried-up, sallow, ner- 
vous, sickly woman, with brilliant black eyes. She was 
fond of Kitty, and her affection, like that of every mar- 
ried woman for a young girl, was expressed by a keen 
desire to have her married in accordance with her own 
ideal of conjugal happiness. She wanted to marry her 
to Vronsky. Levin, whom she had often met at the 
Shcherbatskys' the first of the winter, was always dis- 
tasteful to her, and her favorite occupation, after she 
had met him in society, was to make sport of him. 

"I am enchanted," she said, "when he looks down 
on me from his loftiness ; either he fails to honor me 
with his learned conversation because I am too silly 
for him, or else he treats me condescendingly. I like 
this ; condescending to me ! I am very glad that he 
cannot endure me." 

She was right, because the fact was that Levin could 
not endure her, and he despised her for being proud of 
what she regarded as a merit, — ■ her nervous tempera- 
ment, her indifference and delicate scorn for all that 
seemed to her gross. and material. 

The relationship between Levin and the Countess 
Nordstone was such as is often met with in society 
where two persons, friends in outward appearance, 
despise each other to such a degree that they cannot 
hold a serious conversation, or even clash with each 
other. 

The Countess Nordstone instantly addressed herself 
to Levin : — 

" Ah, Konstantin Dmitrievitch ! are you back again 
in our abominable Babylon ? " said she, giving him her 
little yellow hand, and recalling his owit words at the 
beginning of the winter when he said Moscow was a 
Babylon. " Is Babylon converted, or have you been 
corrupted ? " she added, with a mocking smile in Kitty's 
direction. 

" I am greatly flattered, countess, that you remember 
my words so well," replied Levin, who, having had time 
to collect his thoughts, instantly entered into the face- 
tiously hostile tone peculiar to his relations with the 



ANNA KARENINA 65 

Countess Nordstone. " It seems that they have made 
a very deep impression on you." 

"Akh! how so? But I always make notes. Well! 
how is it, Kitty, have you been skating to-day?".,.. 

And she began to talk with her young friend. 

Awkward as it was in him to take his departure now, 
Levin preferred to commit this breach of etiquette 
rather than remain through the evening, and to see 
Kitty, who occasionally looked at him, though she 
avoided his eyes. He attempted to get up; but the 
princess, noticing that he had nothing to say; addressed 
him directly : — 

" Do you intend to remain long in Moscow ? You 
are justice of the peace in your district, are you not? 
and I suppose that will prevent you from making a 
long stay." ' 

"No, princess, I have resigned that office," he % said. 
" I have come to stay several days." 

"Something has happened to him," thought the 
Countess Nordstone, as she saw Levin's stern and seri- 
ous face, " because he does not launch out into his usual 
tirades; but I '11 soon draw him out. Nothing amuses 
me more than to make him ridiculous before Kitty, and 
I '11 do it." 

"Konstantin Dmitritch," she said to him, "explain 
to me, please, what this means, for you know all about 
it : at our estate in Kaluga all the muzhiks and their 
wives have drunk up everything they had, and don't 
pay what they owe us. You are always praising the 
muzhiks ; what does this mean ? " 

At this moment another lady came in, and Levin arose. 

" Excuse me, countess, I know nothing at all about 
it, and I cannot answer your question," said he, look- 
ing at an officer who entered at the same time with the 
lady. 

"That must be Vronsky," he thought, and to confirm 
his surmise he glanced at Kitty. She had alreaBy had 
time to perceive Vronsky, and she was looking at Levin. 
When he saw the young girl's involuntarily brightening 
eyes, Levin saw that she loved that man, he saw s it -as 
vol. 1. — 5 



66 ANNA KARENINA 

clearly as if she herself had confessed it to him. But 
what sort of a man was he ? 

Now — '- whether it was wise or foolish — Levin could 
not- help remaining; he must find out for himself what 
sort of a man it was that she loved. 

There are men who, on meeting a fortunate rival, are 
immediately disposed to deny that there is any good in 
him and see only evil in him ; others, on the contrary, 
endeavor to discover nothing but the merits that have 
won him his success, and with sore hearts to attribute 
to him nothing but good. Levin belonged to the latter 
class. It was not hard for him to* discover what amiable 
and attractive qualities Vronsky possessed. They were 
apparent at a glance. He was dark, of medium stature, 
and well proportioned ; his face was handsome, calm, 
and friendly; everything about his person, from his 
black, short-cut hair, and his freshly shaven chin, to his 
new, well-fitting uniform, was simple and perfectly ele- 
gant. Vronsky allowed the lady to pass before him, 
then he approached the princess, and finally came to 
Kittyi As he drew near her, his beautiful eyes shone 
with deeper tenderness, and with a smile expressive of 
joy mingled with triumph, — so it seemed to Levin, — 
he bowed respectfully and with dignity and offered her 
his small, wide hand. After greeting them all and speak- 
ing a few words, he. sat down without having seen Levin, 
who never once took his eyes from him. 

"Allow me to make you acquainted," said the prin- 
cess, turning to Levin : " Konstantin Dmitrievitch Levin, 
Count Aleksel Kirillovitch Vronsky." 

Vronsky arose, and, with a friendly look into Levin's 
eyes, shook hands with him. 

" It seems," said he, with his frank and pleasant 
smile, " that I was to have had the honor of dining with 
you this winter ; but you went off unexpectedly to the 
country." 

"Konstantin Dmitritch despises and shuns the city, 
and us, its denizens," said the Countess Nordstone. 

"It must be that my words impress you deeply, since 
you remember them so well," said Levin; and, perceiv- 









ANNA KARENINA 67 

ing that he had already made this remark, he grew red 
in the face. 

Vronsky looked at Levin and the countess, and smiled. 

* So, then, you always live in the country ? " he asked. 
" I should think it would be tiresome in winter." 

" Not if one has enough to do ; besides,' one does not 
get tired of himself," said Levin, sharply. 

"I like the country," said Vronsky, noticing Levin's 
tone and appearing not to notice it. 

" But, count, I hope you would not consent to live 
always in the country/' said the Countess Nordstone. 

" I don't know ; I never made a long stay, but I'once 
felt a strange sensation," he added. " Never have I so 
eagerly longed for the country, the real Russian country 
with its bast shoes and its muzhiks, as during the winter 
that I spent at Nice with my mother. Nice, you know, 
is melancholy anyway ; and Naples, Sorrento, are pleas- 
ant only for a short time. There it is that one remembers 
Russia most tenderly, and especially the country. They 
are almost as .... " 

He spoke, now addressing Kitty, now Levin, turning 
his calm and friendly eyes from one to the other, and he 
evidently said whatever came into his head! 

Noticing that the Countess Nordstone wanted to say 
something, he stopped, without finishing his phrase, and 
began to listen to her attentively. 

The conversation did not languish a single instant, so 
that the old princess, who always had in reserve two 
heavy guns, in case there needed to be a change in the 
conversation, — namely, classic and scientific education, 
and the general compulsory conscription, — had no need 
to bring them out, and the Countess Nordstone did not 
even have a chance to rally Levin. *' ; * 

Levin wanted to join in the general conversation, but 
was unable. He kept saying to himself, " Now, I '11 
go ; " and still he waited as if he expected something. 

The conversation turned on table-tipping and spirits ; 
and the Countess Nordstone, who was a believer in 
spiritism, began to relate the marvels that she had 
seen. 



68 ANNA KARENINA 

\ " Akh, countess! in the name of Heaven, take me to 
see them. I never yet saw anything extraordinary, 
anxious as I have always been," said Vronsky, smiling. 

" Good ; next Saturday," replied the countess. '* But 
you, Konstantin Dmitritch, do you believe in it?" she 
asked of Levin. 

" Why do you ask me ? You know perfectly well* what 
I" shall say." 

" Because I wanted to hear your opinion." 

"My opinion, is simply this," replied Levin: " that 
table-tipping proves that .so-called cultivated society is 
scarcely more advanced than the muzhiks ; they believe 
in the evil eye, in casting lots, in sorceries, while we .... " 

" That means that you don't believe in it ? " 

" I cannot believe in it, countess." 

" ; But, if, I myself have seen these things ? " 

" The peasant women also say that they have seen the 
Domovo'f. 1 , 
, "Then, you think that I do not tell the truth? " 

And she broke into an unpleasant laugh. 

"But no, Masha. , Konstantin Dmitritch simply says 
that he cannot believe in spiritism," said Kitty, blushing 
for Levin; and Levin understood her, and, growing still 
more irritated, was about to reply ; but Vronsky instantly 
came to the rescue, and with a gentle smile brought 
back the conversation, which threatened to go beyond 
the bounds of politeness. 

"Do not you admit at all the possibility of its being 
true?" he asked, f "Why not? We willingly admit the 
existence of electricity, which we do not understand. 
Why should there not exist a new force, as yet unknown, 
which;... " . , / , > \ .. 

" When electricity was discovered," interrupted Levin, 
eagerly; " only its phenomena had- been seen, and it was 
not known what produced them, or whence .they arose; 
and centuries passed before people dreamed of making 
application of it* Spiritualists, on the other hand, have 

1 The DomovoT is the house-spirit, like the latin far, who lives behind 
the stove, and when propitiated by cream and colored eggs is beneficent 
but if offended may play disagreeable tricks, — Tr. 



ANNA KARENINA 6 9 

begun by making tables write, &nd by summoning spirits 
to them, and it is only afterward they began to say it is 
an unknown force." 

Vronsky listened attentively, as he always listened, and 
was evidently interested in Levin's words. 

"Yes; but the spiritualists say, ' We do not yet know 
what this force is, but it is a force, and acts under certain 
conditions/ Let the scientists find out" what it is. I 
don't see why it may not be a new force if it .... " 

" Because," interrupted Levin again, " every time you 
rub resin with wool, you produce a certain and invariable 
electrical phenomenon ; while spiritism brings no such 
invariable result, and so it cannot be a natural phe- 
nomenon." 

Vronsky, evidently perceiving that the conversation 
was growing too serious for a reception, made no reply ; 
and, in order to make a diversion, smiled gayly, and ad- 
dressing the ladies said : — 

" Countess, let us make the experiment now ? " 

But Levin wanted to finish saying what -was in his 
mind : — 

"I think," he continued, "that the attempts made by 
spiritual mediums to explain their miracles by a new 
force is most abortive. They claim that it is a super- 
natural force, and yet they want to submit it to a material 
test." 

All were waiting for him to come to an end, and he 
felt it. 

" And I think that you would be a capital medium," 
said the Countess Nordstone. "There is something 1 so 
enthusiastic about you ! " ' 

Levin opened his mouth to speak, but he said nothing, 
and turned red. 

"Come, let us give the tables a trial," said Vronsky; 
"with your permission, princess." And Vronsky rose, 
and looked for a small table. 

Kitty was standing by a table, and her eyes met 
Levin's. Her whole soul pitied him, because she felt 
that she was the cause of his pain. Her look said, 
" Forgive me, if you can, I am so happy." 



7 o ANNA KARENINA 

And his look replied, " I hate the whole world, — you 
and myself." And he took up his hat. 

But it was not his fate to go. The guests were just 
taking their places around the table, and he was on the 
point of starting, when the old prince entered, and, after 
greeting the ladies, went straight to Levin. 

" Ah! " he cried joyfully. " What a stranger ! I did 
not know that you were here. Very glad to see you ! " 

In speaking to Levin the prince sometimes used the 
familiar tui> thou, and sometimes the formal vui> you. 
He took him by the arm, and, while conversing with him, 
gave no notice to Vronsky, who stood waiting patiently 
for the prince to speak to him. 

Kitty felt that her father's friendliness must be hard 
for Levin after what had happened. She also noticed 
how coldly her father at last acknowledged Vronsky's 
bow, and how Vronsky looked at her father, with good- 
humored perplexity striving in vain to make out what 
this icy reception meant, and she blushed. 

''Prince, let us have Konstantin Dmitritch," said the 
Countess Nordstone. " We want to try an experiment." 

"What sort of an experiment? table-tipping? Well! 
excuse me, ladies and gentlemen, but, in my opinion, 
grace-hoops * would be a better game," said the prince, 
looking at Vronsky, whom he took to be the originator 
of this sport " At least there's some sense in grace- 
hoops." > 

Vronsky, astonished, turned his steady eyes upon the 
old prince, and, slightly smiling, began to talk with the 
Countess Nordstone about the arrangements for a great 
ball to be given the following week. 

"I hope that you will be there," said he, turning to 
Kitty. 

As soon as the old prince turned from him Levin 
made his escape; and the last impression which he bore 
away from this reception was Kitty's happy, smiling 
face, answering Vronsky's question in regard to the 
ball. 

1 Kaletchki. 



ANNA KARENINA 71 



CHAPTER XV 

After the guests had gone, Kitty told her mother of 
her conversation with Levin; and, in spite of all the 
pain that she had caused him, the thought that he had 
asked her to marry him flattered her. She had no 
doubt that she had acted properly, but it was long be- 
fore she could go to sleep. One memory constantly 
arose in her mind: it was Levin's face as, with con- 
tracted brow, he stood listening to her father, looking 
at her and Vronsky with his gloomy, melancholy, kind 
eyes. She felt so sorry for him that she could not keep 
back the tears. But, as she thought of him who had 
replaced Levin in her regards, she saw vividly his 
handsome, strong, and manly face, his aristocratic self- 
possession, his universal kindness to every one; she re- 
called his love for her, and how she loved him, and joy 
came back to her heart. She laid her head on the pil- 
low, and smiled with happiness. 

" It is too bad, too bad; but what can I do? It is not 
my fault," she said to herself, although an inward voice 
whispered the contrary. She did not know whether she 
ought to reproach herself for having been attracted to 
Levin, or for having refused him; but her happiness 
was not alloyed with doubts. " Lord, have mercy upon 
me! Lord, have mercy upon me! Lord, have mercy 
upon me! " she repeated until she went to sleep. 

Meantime, down-stairs, in the. prince's little library, 
there was going on one of those scenes which fre- 
quently occurred between the parents in regard to their 
favorite daughter. , 

"What? This is w*hat!" cried the prince, waving his 
arms and immediately wrapping around him his squirrel- 
skin khalat. "You have neither pride nor dignity; you 
are ruining your daughter with this low and ridiculous 
manner of husband-hunting." 

" But in the name Of Heaven, prince, what have I 
done? " said the princess, almost ready to cry. 



72 ANNA KARENINA 

She had come as usual to say good-night to her hus- 
band, feeling very happy and satisfied over her con- 
versation with her daughter ; and, though she had not 
ventured to breathe a word of Levin's proposal and 
Kitty's rejection of him, she allowed herself to hint to 
her husband that she thought the affair with Vronsky 
was settled, that it would be decided as soon as the 
countess should arrive. At these words the prince had 
fallen into a passion, and had addressed her with un- 
pleasant reproaches: — - 

"What have you done? This is what: In the first 
place you have decoyed a husband for her; and all 
Moscow will say so, and with justice. If you want to 
give receptions, give them, by all means, but invite 
every one, and not suitors of your own choice. Invite 
all these mashers," — thus the prince called the young 
men of Moscow, — "have somebody to play and let 'em 
dance; but not like to-night, inviting only suitors! It 
seems to me shameful, shameful, the way you've pushed ! 
You have turned the girl's head. Levin is a thousand 
times the better man. And as to this Petersburg dandy, 
he 's one- of those turned out by machinery, they are all 
on one pattern, and all trash! My daughter has no 
need of going out of her way, even for a prince of the 
blood." 

"But what have I done? " 

"Why, this..:. " cried the prince, angrily. 

" I know well enough that, if I listen to you," inter- 
rupted the princess, "we shall never see our daughter 
married; and, in that case, we might just as well go 
into the country." 
-' "We'd better go!" 

" Now wait ! Have I made any advances ? No, I 
have not. " But a young man, and a very handsome 
young, man, is in love with her; and she, it seems...." 

" Yes, so it seems to you. But suppose she should 
be in love with him, and he have as much intention 
of getting married as I myself ? Okh ! Have n't I 
eyes to see? 'Akh, spiritism! akh, Nicel akh, the 
ball ! ' " .... Here the prince, attempting to imitate his 



ANNA KARENINA 73 

wife, made a courtesy at every word. " We shall be 
very proud when we have made our Kationka unhappy, 
and when she really takes it into her head ...." 

" But what makes you think so ? " 

" I don't think so, I know so ; and that 's why we 
have eyes, and you mothers have n't. I see a man 
who has serious intentions, — Levin; and I see a fine 
bird, like this good-for-nothing, who is merely amusing 
himself." 

" Well ! now you have taken it into your head .... " 

" You will remember what I have said, but too late, 
as you did with Dashenka." 

" Very well, very well, we will not say anything more 
about it," said the princess, who was cut short by the 
remembrance of Dolly's unhappiness. 

* So much the better, and good-night." 

The husband and wife, as they separated, kissed 
each other good-night, making the sign of the cross, 
but with the consciousness that each remained un- 
changed in opinion. 

The princess had at first been firmly convinced that 
Kitty's fate was decided by the events of the evening, 
and that there could be no doubt of Vronsky's designs ; 
but her husband's words troubled her. On her return 
to her room, as she thought in terror- of the unknown 
future, she did just as Kitty had done, and prayed from 
the bottom of her heart, " Lord, have mercy ! Lord, 
have mercy ! Lord, have mercy ! " 



CHAPTER XVI 

Vronsky had never known anything of family life. 
His mother, in her youth, had been a very brilliant 
society woman, who, in her husband's lifetime and 
after his death, had engaged in many love-affairs that 
had made talk. Vronsky scarcely remembered his father, 
and he had been educated in" the School of Pages. 

Graduating very young and with brilliancy as an 
officer, he immediately began to follow the course of 



74 ANNA KARENINA 

wealthy military men of Petersburg. Though he oc- 
casionally went into general society, all his love-affairs 
were with a different class. 

At Moscow, after the luxurious, dissipated life of 
Petersburg, he for the first time felt the charm of 
familiar intercourse with a lovely, innocent society 
girl, who was evidently in love with him. It never 
occurred to him that there might be anything wrong 
in his relations with Kitty. At balls he preferred to 
dance with her, he called on her, talked with her as 
people generally talk in society : all sorts of trifles, 
but trifles to which he involuntarily attributed a differ- 
ent meaning when spoken to her. Although he never 
said anything to her which he would not have said in 
the hearing of others, he was conscious that she kept 
growing more and more dependent on him ; and, the 
more he felt this consciousness, the pleasanter it was 
to him, and his feeling toward her grew warmer and 
warmer. He did not know that his behavior toward 
Kitty had a definite name, that this way of leading 
on young girls without any intention of marriage is 
one of the most dishonorable tricks practised among 
the members of the brilliant circles of society in which 
he moved. He simply imagined that he had discovered 
a new pleasure, and he enjoyed his discovery. 

Could he have heard the conversation between Kitty's 
parents that, evening, could he have taken the family 
point of view and realized that Kitty would be made 
unhappy if he did not propose to her, he would have 
been amazed and would not have believed it. He 
would not have believed that what gave him and her 
such a great delight could be wrong, still less that it 
brought any obligation to marry. 

He had never considered the possibility of his getting 
married. Not only was family life distasteful to him, 
but, from his view as a bachelor, the family, and espe- 
cially the husband, belonged to a strange, hostile, and, 
worst of all, ridiculous world. But though Vronsky had 
not the slightest suspicion of the conversation of which 
he had been the subject, he left the Shcherbatskys' with 



ANNA KARENINA 75 

the feeling that the mysterious bond that attached him 
to Kitty was closer than ever, so close, indeed, that he 
felt that he must do something. But what he ought 
to do or could do he could not imagine. 

" How charming ! " he thought, as he went to his 
rooms, feeling, as he always felt when he left the 
Shcherbatskys', a deep impression of purity and fresh- 
ness, arising partly from the fact that he had not 
smoked all the evening, and a new sensation of ten- 
derness caused by her love for him. " How charming 
that, without either of us saying anything, we under- 
stand each other so perfectly through this mute lan- 
guage of glances and tones, so that to-day more than 
ever before she told me that she loves me ! And how 
lovely, natural, and, above all, confidential, she was ! 
I feel that I myself am better, purer. I feel that I 
have a heart, and that there is something good in me. 
Those gentle, lovely eyes! When she said.... Well! 
what did she say ? .... Nothing much, but it was pleas- 
ant for me, and pleasant for her. ,, 

And he reflected how he could best finish up the 
evening. He passed in review the places where he 
might go: "The 'club/ a hand of bezique and some 
champagne with Ignatof ? No, not there. The Chateau 
des Fleurs i to find Oblonsky, songs, and the cancan? 
No, it *s a bore. And this is just why I like the Shcher- 
batskys, — because I feel better for having been there. 
I '11 go home! " 

He went to his room at Dusseaux's, ordered supper, 
and then, having undressed, he had scarcely touched his 
head to the pillow before he was sound asleep. 



CHAPTER XVII 

The next morning, about eleven o'clock, Vronsky went 
to the station to meet his mother on the Petersburg train ; 
and the first person he saw on the grand staircase was 
Oblonsky, who was expecting his sister on the same 
train 



76 ANNA KARENINA 

"Ah! your excellency," cried Oblonsky, "are you 
expecting some one ? " 

* My matushka," replied Vronsky, with the smile with 
which people always met Oblonsky. And, after shak- 
ing hands, they mounted the staircase side by side, 
" She was to come from Petersburg to-day." 

" I waited for you till two o'clock this morning. 
Where did you go after leaving the Shcherbatskys' ? " 

"Home," replied Vronsky. "To tell the truth, after 
such a pleasant evening at the Shcherbatskys', I did not 
feel like going anywhere." 

" I know fiery horses by their brand, and young people 
who are in love by their eyes," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
in the same dramatic tone in which he had spoken to 
Levin the afternoon before. 

Vronsky smiled, as much as to say that he did not 
deny it; but he hastened to change the conversation. 

" And whom have you to meet ? " he asked. 

" I ? a very pretty woman," said Oblonsky. 

"Ah! indeed!" 

" Honi soit qui mal y pense ! My sister Anna ! " 

" Akh ! Madame Karenina ! " exclaimed Vronsky. 

" Do you know her, then ? " 

"It seems to me that I do. Or, no .... the truth is, I 
don't think I do," replied Vronsky, somewhat confused. 
The name Karenin dimly brought to his mind a tiresome 
and conceited person. 

" But Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, my celebrated brother- 
in-law, you must know him ! Every one knows him." 

" That is, I know him by reputation, and by sight. I 
know that he is talented, learned, and rather adorable 
....but you know that he is not.... not in my line, 1 ' said 
Vronsky in English. 

" Yes ; he is a very remarkable man, somewhat con- 
servative, but a splendid man," replied Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch. " A splendid man." 

"Well! so much the better for him," said Vronsky, 
smiling. "Ah! here you are," he cried, seeing his 
mother's old lackey standing at the door. " Come this 
way," he added. 



ANNA KARENINA 77 

Vronsky, besides experiencing the pleasure that every- 
body felt in seeing Stepan Arkadyevitch, had felt espe- 
cially drawn to him, because, in a certain way, it brought 
him closer to Kitty. 

"Well, now, what do you say to giving the diva a 
supper Sunday ? " said he, with a smile, taking him by 
the arm. 

"Certainly; I will pay my share. Oh, tell me, did 
you meet my friend Levin last evening ?" asked Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. 

"Yes, but he went away very early." 

" He is a glorious young fellow," said Oblonsky, " is n't 
he ? " 

"I don't know why it is," replied Vronsky, "but all 
the Muscovites, present company excepted," he added 
jestingly, " have something sharp about them. They 
all seem to be high-strung, fiery tempered, as if they all 
wanted to make you understand.... " 

"That is true enough; there is...." replied Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, smiling pleasantly. 

"Is the train on time?" asked Vronsky of an em- 
ployee. 

" It will be here directly," replied the employee. 

The increasing bustle in the station, the coming and 
going of porters, the appearance of policemen and offi- 
cials, the arrival of expectant friends, all indicated the 
approach of the train. Through the frosty steam, work- 
men could be seen passing in their soft blouses and felt 
boots amid the network of rails. The whistle of the 
coming engine was heard, and the approach of some- 
thing heavy. 

" No," continued Stepan Arkadyevitch, who was anx- 
ious to inform Vronsky of Levin's intentions in regard 
to Kitty. " No, you are really unjust to my friend Levin. 
He is a very nervous man, and sometimes he can be dis- 
agreeable ; but, on the other hand, he can be very charm- 
ing. He is such an upright, genuine nature, true gold ! 
Last evening there were special reasons," continued 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, with a significant smile, and en- 
tirely forgetting his genuine sympathy, which the even- 



78 ANNA KARENINA 

ing before he had felt for his old friend, and now 
experiencing the same sympathy for Vronsky. " Yes, 
there was a reason why he should have been either 
very happy or very unhappy." 

Vronsky stopped short, and asked point-blank : — 

" What was it ? Do you mean that he proposed yes- 
terday evening to your sister-in-law ? " 

" Possibly," replied Stepan Arkadyevitch. "Something 
like that seemed probable last evening. Yes, if he 
went off so early, and was in such bad spirits, then it 

is so He has been in love with her for so long, and 

I am very sorry for him." 

" Ah, indeed ! .... I thought that she might, however, 
have aspirations for a better match," said Vronsky, and, 
filling out his chest, he began to walk up and down again. 
Then he added : " However, I don't know him ; yes, 
this promises to be a painful situation. That is why the 
majority of men prefer to consort with their Claras. 
There, lack of success shows that you have n't money 
enough ; but here you stand on your own merits. But 
here is the train." 

In fact, the engine was now whistling some distance 
away. But in a few minutes the platform shook, and 
the locomotive, puffing out the steam condensed by the 
cold air, came rolling into the station, with the lever 
of the central wheel slowly and rhythmically rising and 
falling, and the engineer well muffled and covered with 
frost. Next the tender came the baggage-car, still more 
violently shaking the platform ; a dog in its cage was 
yelping piteously ; finally appeared the passenger-cars, 
which jolted together as the train came to a stop. 

The vigorous-looking conductor sprang down from the 
car and whistled ; and behind him came the more impa- 
tient of the travelers, — an officer of the Guard, straight 
and imperious, a nimble little merchant, gayly smiling, 
with his gripsack, and a muzhik, with his bundle over 
his shoulder. 

Vronsky, standing near Oblonsky, watched the cars 
and the passengers, and completely forgot his mother. 
What he had just heard about Kitty caused him emotion 



ANNA KARENINA 79 

and joy; he involuntarily straightened himself; his eyes 
glistened ; he felt that he had won a victory. 

" The Countess Vronskaya is in that compartment," 
said the vigorous conductor, approaching him. These 
words awoke him from his reverie, and brought his 
thoughts back to his mother and their approaching 
meeting. In his soul he did not respect his mother, and, 
without ever having confessed as much to 'himself, he 
did not love her. But his education and the usages of 
the society in which he lived did not allow him to admit 
that there could be in his relations with her the 
slightest want of consideration. But the more he ex- 
aggerated the bare outside forms, the less he felt in his 
heart that he respected or loved her. 



CHAPTER XVIII 

Vronsky followed the conductor, and, as he was 
about to enter the railway-carriage, he stood aside to 
allow a lady to pass him. 

With the instant intuition of a man of the world, he 
saw, by a single glance at this lady's exterior, that she 
belonged to the very best society. Begging her pardon, 
he was about to enter the door, but involuntarily he 
turned to give another look at the lady, not because she 
was very beautiful, not because of that elegance and that 
unassuming grace which were expressed in her whole 
person, but because the expression of her lovely face, as 
she passed, seemed to him so gentle and sweet. 

Just as he looked back at her, she also turned her 
head. Her brilliant gray eyes, looking almost black 
under the long lashes, rested on his face with a friendly ; 
attentive look, as if she recognized him ; and instantly 
she turned to seek some one in the throng. 

Quick as this glance was, Vronsky had time to per- 
ceive the dignified vivacity which played in her face^» ^. 
and fluttered between her shining eyes, and the scarcely?* /^r^ 
perceptible smile parting her rosy lips. There seemed ^Mh^ 
to be in her whole person such a superfluity of life ' 



80 ANNA KARENIKA 

that, in spite of her will, it expressed itself now in the 
lightning of her eyes, now in her smile. She demurely 
veiled the light in her eyes, but it shone against her will 
in her scarcely perceptible smile. 

Vronsky went into the carriage. His mother, a dried- 
up old lady with black eyes and little curls, screwed up her 
face as she looked at him with a slight smile on her thin 
lips. Getting up from her chair, and handing her bag 
to her maid, she extended her little thin hand to her son, 
and, pushing his head from her, kissed him on the brow. 

" You received my telegram ? You are well? Thank 
the Lord ! " 

" Did you have a comfortable journey ? " said the son, 
sitting down near her, and yet involuntarily listening to 
a woman's voice just outside the door. He knew that 
it was the voice of the lady whom he had met. 

" However, I don't agree with you," said the lady's 
voice. 

ut It is the Petersburg way of looking at it, madam." 

" Not at all, but simply a woman's," was her reply. 

"Well! allow me to kiss your hand." 

" Good-by, Ivan Petrovitch. Now look and see if my 
brother is here, and send him to me," said the lady, at 
the very door, and reentering the compartment. 

" Have you found your brother ? " asked the Countess 
Vronskaya, addressing the lady. 

Vronsky now knew that it was Karenin's wife. 

"Your brother is here," he said, rising. "Excuse 
me ; I did not recognize you ; but our acquaintance was 
so short," he added with a bow, "that you naturally did 
not remember me either." 

"Oh, yes, I did! " she said. " I should have known 
you because your matushka and I have been talking 
about you all the way." And at last she* permitted the 
animation which had been striving to break forth to 
express itself in a smile. " But my brother has not 
come yet." 

" Go and call him, Alyosha," said the old countess, 

Vronsky went out on the platform and called : — 

"Oblonsky! here!" 



ANNA KARENINA 81 

But Karenin's wife did not wait for her brother ; as 
soon as she saw him she ran lightly out of the carriage/ 
went straight to him, and, with a gesture which struck 
Vronsky by its grace and energy, threw her left arm 
around his neck and kissed him affectionately. 

Vronsky could not keep his eyes from her face, and 
smiled, without knowing why. But, remembering that 
his mother was waiting for him, he went back into the 
carriage. 

"Very charming, isn't she?" said the countess, re- 
ferring to Madame Karenina. " Her husband put her 
in my charge, and I was very glad. She and I talked 
together all the way. Well ! and you ? They say 
you are desperately in love. So much the better, my 
dear, so much the better." 

" I don't know what you allude to, maman ," replied 
the son, coldly. " Come, maman^ let us go." 

At this moment Madame Karenina came back to take 
leave of the countess. 

"Well, countess ! you have found your son, and I my 
brother," she said gayly; "and I have exhausted my 
whole fund of stories. I should n't have had anything 
more to talk about. " 

"Ah! not so," said the countess, taking her hand. 
" I should not object to travel round the world with 
you. You are one of those agreeable women with whom 
either speech or silence is pleasant. As to your son, 
I beg of you, don't think about him : we must have 
separations in this world," 

. Madame Karenina stood motionless, holding herself 
very erect, and her eyes smiled. 

"Anna Arkadyevna has a little boy about eight years 
old," said the countess, in explanation to her son; "she 
has never been separated from him before, and it troubles 
her to leave him." 

"Yes, we have talked about our children all the time, 
— the countess of her son, I of mine," said Madame 
Karenina, turning to Vronsky; and again the smile 
lighted up her face, the caressing smile which beamed 
upon him. 



8a ANNA KARENINA 

"That must have been very tiresome to you," said he, 
instantly catching on the rebound the ball of coquetry 
which she had tossed to him. But she evidently did 
not care to continue her conversation in the same tone, 
but turned to the old countess : — 

" Thank you very much. I don't see where the time 
has gone. Good-by, countess." 

" Farewell, my dear," replied the countess. " Let 
me kiss your pretty little face. I tell you frankly, as it 
is permitted an old lady, that I am in love with you." 

Hackneyed as this expression was, Madame Karenina 
evidently believed thoroughly in its sincerity, and was 
pleased with it. She blushed, bowed slightly, and bent 
her face down to the old countess's lips. Then, straight- 
ening herself up, she gave her hand to Vronsky with 
the smile that seemed to belong as much to her eyes as 
to her lips. He pressed her little hand, and, as if it 
were something unusual, was delighted with the energetic 
firmness with which she frankly and fearlessly shook his 
hand. 

Madame Karenina went out with light and rapid 
step, carrying her rather plump person with remarkable 
elasticity. 

" Very charming," said the old lady again. 

Her son was - of the same opinion; and again his eyes 
followed her graceful figure till she was out of sight, and 
a smile rested on his face. Through the window he saw 
her join her brother, take his arm, and engage him in 
lively conversation, evidently about some subject with 
which Vronsky had no connection, and this seemed to - 
him annoying. 

"Well! are you enjoying perfectly good health, 
maman ?" he asked, turning to his mother. 

"Very well, indeed, splendid. Alexandre has been 
charming, and Marie has been very good. She is very 
interesting." 

Arid again she began to speak of what was especially 
interesting to her heart, — the baptism of her grandson, 
for which she had come to Moscow, and the special 
favor shown her eldest son by the emperor. 



ANNA KARENINA 83 

" And here is Lavronty," said Vronsky, looking out of 
the window. " Now let us go, if you are ready." 

The old steward who had come with the countess 
now appeared at the door to report that everything was 
ready, and she arose to go. 

" Come, there are only a few people about now," said 
Vronsky. 

The maid took the bag and the little dog ; the stew- 
ard and a porter carried the other luggage; Vronsky 
offered his mother his arm, but, just as they stepped 
down from the carriage, a number of men with fright- 
ened faces ran hastily by them. The station-master 
followed in his curiously colored furazhka or uniform-cap. 
Evidently something unusual had happened. The peo- 
ple who had left the train were coming back again. 

"What is it?".... "What is it ?".... "Where ?" .... 
" He was thrown down ! " ...." He was crushed to death ! " 
were the 'exclamations heard among those hurrying by. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch with his sister on his arm had 
returned with the others, and were standing with fright- 
ened faces near the train to avoid the crush. 

The ladies went back into the carriage, and Vronsky 
with Stepan Arkadyevitch went with the crowd to learn 
the particulars of the accident. 

A train-hand, either from drunkenness, or because he 
was too closely muffled against the intense cold, had not 
heard the noise of a train that was backing out, and had 
been crushed. 

The ladies had already learned about the accident 
from the steward before Vronsky and Oblonsky came 
back. Both of them had seen the disfigured body. 
Oblonsky was deeply moved ; he frowned, and seemed 
ready to shed tears. 

"Akh, how horrible! Akh, Anna, if you had only 
seen it ! Akh, how horrible ! ■ ' he repeated. 

Vronsky said nothing ; his handsome face was serious, 
but perfectly calm. 

"Akh, if you had only seen it, countess! " continued 

Stepan Arkadyevitch, — "and his wife is there It 

was terrible to see her .... she threw herself on his body. 



84 ANNA KARENINA 

They say that . he was the only support of a large 
family. How terrible ! " 

" Could anything be done for her ? " said Madame 
Karenina, in an agitated whisper. 

Vronsky looked at her, and immediately left the car- 
riage. 

" I will be right back, maman" said he, turning round 
at the door. ? 

When he came back, at the end of a few minutes, 
Stepan Arkady evitch was talking with the countess 
about a new singer, and she was impatiently watching 
the door for her son. 

" Now let us go," said Vronsky, 

They all .went out together, Vronsky walking ahead 
with his mother, Madame Karenina and her brother 
side by side. At the door the station-master overtook 
them, and said to Vronsky : — 

" You have given my assistant two hundred rubles. 
Will you kindly indicate the disposition that we shall 
make of them? " r 

" For his widow," said Vronsky, shrugging his should 
ders, " I don't see why you should have asked me." 

" Did you give that? " asked Oblonsky ; and, pressing 
his sister's arm, he said, " Very kind, very kind. Glo- 
rious fellow, is n't he ? My best wishes, countess." 

He and his sister delayed, looking for her maid. 
When they left the station, the Vronskys' carriage had 
already gone. People on all sides were talking about 
what had happened. 

f What a horrible way of dying! " said a gentleman, 
passing near them. " They say he was cut in two." 

" It seems to me, on the contrary," replied another, 
" that it was a very easy way ; de^th was instan- 
taneous," / 

" Why were n't there any precautions taken ? " asked 
a third. 

Madame Karenina sat down in the carriage ; and 
Stepan Arkadyevitch noticed, with astonishment, that 
her lips trembled, and that she could hardly keep back 
the tears. 



ANNA KAREN1NA 85 

"What is the matter, Antia ? " he asked, when they- 
had gone a little distance. 

"It is an evil omen," she answered. 

"What nonsense! " said Stepan Arkadyevitch. " You 
have come .... that is the main thhi£. You cannot ifnag* 
ine how much I hope from your visit." 

" Have you known Vrorisky long ? " she asked. 

"Yes. You know we hope that he will marry 
Kitty." 

"Really," said Anna, gentiy. "Well! now let us 
talk about yourself," she added, shaking her head as if 
she wanted to drive away something that troubled and 
pained her physically. " Let us speak about your 
affairs. I received your letter, and here I am." 

"Yes, all my hope is in you," said Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch. 

" Well, then ! tell me all." 

And Stepan Arkadyevitch began his story. 

When they reached the house he helped his sister 
from the carriage, sighed, shook hands with her, and 
went to the court-house. 



CHAPTER XIX 

When Anna entered, Dolly was sitting in her little 
reception-room, with a plump light-haired lad, the image 
of his father, who was learning a lesson from a French 
reading-book. The boy was reading aloud, and at the 
same time twisting and trying to pull from his jacket 
a button which was hanging loos6. His mother had 
many times reproved him, but the plump little hand 
kept returning to the button. At last she had to take 
the button off, and put it in her pocket. 

"Keep your hands still, Grisha," said she, and again 
took up the bed-quilt on which she had been long at 
work, and which always came handy at trying moments. 
She worked nervously, jerking her fingers and counting 
the stitches. Though she had sent word to her hus- 
band, the day before, that his sister's arrival made rib 



86 ANNA KARENINA 

difference to her, nevertheless, she was ready to receive 
her, and was waiting for her impatiently. 

Dolly was absorbed by her woes, — absolutely swal- 
lowed up by them. But she did not forget that her 
sister-in-law, Anna, was the wife of one of the impor- 
tant personages of Petersburg, — a Petersburg grande 
dame. And, owing to this fact, she did not carry out 
what she had said to her husband ; in other words, she 
did not forget that her sister was coming. 

"After all, Anna is not to blame," she said to her- 
self. " I know nothing about her that is not good, and 
our relations have always been good and friendly." 

To be sure, as far as she could recall the impressions 
made on her by the Karenins, at Petersburg, their home 
did not seem to her entirely pleasant ; there was some- 
thing false in the whole manner of their family life. 

" But why should I not receive her ? Provided, only, 
that she does not take it into her head to console me," 
thought Dolly. " I know what these Christian exhor- 
tations, consolations, and justifications mean ; I have 
gone over them all a thousand times, and they amount to 
nothing." 

Dolly had spent these last days alone with her chil- 
dren. She did not care to speak to any one about her 
sorrow, and under the load of it she could not talk 
about indifferent matters. She knew that some way or 
other she should have to open her heart to Anna, and 
at one moment the thought that she could open her 
heart delighted her; and then again she was angry 
because she must speak of her humiliations before his 
sister, and listen to her ready-made phrases of exhorta- 
tion and consolation. 

She had been expecting every moment to see her 
sister-in-law appear, and had been watching the clock ; 
but, as often happens in such cases, she became so ab- 
sorbed in her thoughts that she did not hear the door- 
bell. Hearing light steps and the rustling of a gown, 
she looked up, and involuntarily her jaded face expressed, 
not pleasure, but surprise. She arose, and threw her 
arms round her sister-in-law. 



ANNA KARENINA 87 

"Why ! have you come already?'' she cried, kissing her. 

" Dolly, how glad I am. to see you ! " 

"And I am glad to see you," replied Dolly, with a 
faint smile, and trying to read, by the expression of 
Anna's face, how much she knew. " She knows all," 
was her thought, as she saw the look of compassion on 
her features. " Well ! let us go up-stairs ; I will show 
you to your room," she went on to say, trying to post- 
pone, as long as possible, the time for explanations. 

" Is this Grisha ? Heavens ! how he has grown ! " 
said Anna, kissing him. Then, not taking her eyes 
from Dolly, she added, with a blush, " No, please let us 
not go yet." 

She took off her handkerchief and her hat, and when 
it caught in the locks of her dark curly hair she shook 
her head and released it. 

" How brilliantly happy and healthy you look," said 
Dolly, almost enviously. 

" I ? " .... exclaimed Anna. " Ah ! .... Heavens ! Tania! 
is that you, the playmate of my little Serozha ? " said 
she, speaking to a little girl who came running in. 
She took her by the hand, and kissed her. "What a 
charming little girl ! Charming ! But you must show 
them all to me." 

She recalled not only the name, the year, and the 
month of each, but their characteristics and their little 
ailments, and Dolly could not help feeling touched. 

"Come! let us go and see them," said she; "but 
Vasya is having her nap now ; it 's too bad." 

After they had seen the children, they came back to 
the sitting-room alone for coffee. Anna drew the tray 
toward her, and then she pushed it away, 

" Dolly," said she, "he has told me." 

Dolly looked at Anna coldly. She now expected 
some expression of hypocritical sympathy, but Anna 
said nothing of the kind. 

"Dolly, my dear," she said, " I do not intend to 
speak to you in defense of him, nor to console you ; it 
is impossible. But, dushenka, dear heart, I am sorry, 
sorry for you with all my soul ! " 



88 ANNA KARENINA 

Under her long lashes her brilliant eyes suddenly filled 
with tears. She drew closer, and with her energetic 
little hand seized the hand of her sister-in-law. Dolly 
did not repulse her, but her face still preserved its 
forlorn expression. 

"It is impossible to console me. After what has 
happened, all is over for me, all is lost." 

And she had hardly said these words ere her face 
suddenly softened a little. Anna lifted to her lips the 
thin, dry hand that she held, and kissed it. 

" But, Dolly, what is to be done ? what is to be done ? 
What is the best way to act in this frightful condition 
of things? We must think about it." 

" All is over! Nothing can be done 1 " Dolly replied. 
"And, what is worse than all, you must understand it, 
is that I cannot leave him! the children! I am chained 
to him ! and I cannot live with him ! It is torture to see 
him ! " 

"Dolly, galubchik, he has told me; but I should like 
to hear your side of the story. Tell me all." 

Dolly looked at her with a questioning expression. 
Sympathy and the sincerest affection were depicted in 
Anna's face. 

" I should like to," she suddenly said. " But I shall 
tell you everything from the very beginning. You know 
how I was married. With the education that maman 
gave me, I was not only innocent, I was stupid. I did 
not know anything. I know they said husbands told 
their wives all about their past lives; but Stiva" — 
she corrected herself, — " Stepan Arkadyevitch never 
told me anything. You would not believe it, but, up to 
the present time, I supposed that I was the only woman 
with whom he was acquainted. Thus I lived eight years. 
You see, I not only never suspected him of being un- 
faithful to me, but I believed such a thing to be impossi- 
ble. And with such ideas, imagine how I suffered when 
I suddenly learned all this horror — all this dastardliness. 
.... Understand me. To believe absolutely in his honor" .... 
continued Dolly, struggling to keep back her sobs, 
"and suddenly to find a letter.... a letter from him to 



ANNA KARENINA 89 

his mistress, to the governess of my children. No ; this 
is too cruel ! " She hastily took out her handkerchief, and 
hid her face in it " I might have been able to admit a 
moment of temptation," she continued, after a moment's 
pause ; " but this hypocrisy, this continual attempt to de- 
ceive me .... and for whom ? .... To continue to be my hus- 
band, and yet have her.;., It is frightful; you cannot 
comprehend...." 

"Oh, yes! I comprehend; I Comprehend, my dear 
Dolly," Said Anna, Squeezing her hand. 

"And do you imagine that he appreciates all the 
horror of my situation ? " continued Dolly. " Certainly 
not ; he is happy and Contented." 

" Oh, no ! " interrupted Anna, Warmly. " He is thor- 
oughly repentant; he is overwhelmed with remorse.... " 

M Is he capable of remorse ? " demanded Dolly, scru- 
tinizing her sister-in-law's face. 

"Yes ; I know him. I could not look at him without 
feeling sorry for him. We both of us know him. He 
is kind ; but he is proud, and now he is so humiliated ! 
What touched me most" — Anna knew well enough that 
this would touch Dolly also — "are the two things that 
pained him : In the first place, he Was ashamed for the 
children; and secondly, because, loving you ....yes, yes, 
loving you more than any one else in the World," — ^she 
added vehemently, to prevent Dolly from interrupting 
her, — " he has wounded you grievously, has almost 
killed you. ' No, no, she will never fofgivt toe ! ' he 
keeps saying all the time." 

Dolly looked straight beyond her sister as she lis- 
tened. 

"Yes, I understand that his position is terrible. The 
guilty suffers more than the innocent, *— if he knows' 
that he is the cause of all the unhappiness. But how 
can I forgive him ? HoW can I be his wife again after 
she has .... For me to live with him henceforth would 
be torment all the more because I still love what I Used 
to love in him.... " 

And the sobs prevented her from speaking. 

But as if on purpose, each time, after she had become 



9 o ANNA KARENINA 

a little calmer, she began again to speak of what hurt 
her most cruelly. 

" She is young, you see, she is pretty," she went on 
to say. " Do you realize, Anna, for whom I have sacri- 
ficed my youth, my beauty ? For him and his children ! 
I have worn myself out in his service, I have given him 
the best that I had; and now, of course, some one 
younger and fresher than I am is more pleasing to him. 
They have, certainly, discussed me between them, — 
or, worse, have insulted me with their silence, do you 
understand ? " 

And again her jealousy flamed up in her eyes. 

"And after this he will tell me.... What! could I 
believe it ? No, never ! it is all over, all that gave me 

recompense for my sufferings, for my sorrows 

Would you believe it ? just now I was teaching Grisha. 
It used to be a pleasure to me; now it is a torment. 
Why should I take the trouble ? Why have I children ? 
It is terrible, because my whole soul is in revolt ; instead 
of love, tenderness, I am filled with nothing but hate, 
yes, hate ! I could kill him and .... " 

" Dushenka ! Dolly ! I understand you ; but don't 
torment yourself so ! You are too excited, too angry, to 
see things in their right light" 

Dolly grew calmer, and for a few moments neither 
spoke. 

"What is to be done, Anna ? Consider and help me. 
I have thought of everything, but I cannot see any way 
out of it." 

Anna herself did not see any, but her heart responded 
to every word, to every expression in her sister-in-law's 
face. 

"I will tell you one thing," said she at last "I am 
his sister ; I know his character, his peculiarity of for- 
getting everything," — she touched her forehead, — "this 
peculiarity of his which is so conducive to sudden temp- 
tation, but also to repentance. At the present moment, 
he does not understand how it was possible for him to 
have done what he did." 

"Not so! He does understand and he did under- 



ANNA KARENINA 91 

stand/' interrupted Dolly. "But I .... you forget me; 
.... does that make the pain less for me ? " 

" Wait ! when he made his confession to me, I ac- 
knowledge that I did not appreciate the whole horror 
of your position. I saw only him and the fact that the 
family was broken up. I was sorry for him; but now 
that I have been talking with you, I, as a woman, look 
on it in a different light. I see your suffering, and I 
cannot tell you how sorry I am. But, Dolly, dushenka, 
while I fully appreciate your misfortune, there is one 
thing which I do not know: I do not know.... I do not 
know to what degree you still love him. You alone can 
tell whether you love him enough to forgive him. If 
you do, then forgive him. ,, 

"No," began Dolly; but Anna interrupted her, kiss- 
ing her hand again. 

" I know the world better than you do," she said. 
" I know how such men as Stiva look on these things. 
You say that they have discussed you between them. 
Don't you believe it. These men can be unfaithful to 
their marriage vows, but their homes and their wives 
remain no less sacred in their eyes. Between these 
women and their families, they draw a line of demar- 
cation which is never crossed. I cannot understand how 
it can be, but so it is." 

" Yes, but he has kissed her.... " 

" Wait, Dolly, dushenka ! I saw Stiva when he was 
in love with you. I remember the time when he used 
to come to me and talk about you with tears in his eyes. 
I know to what a poetic height he raised you, and I 
know that the longer he lived with you the more he 
admired you. We always have smiled at his habit of 
saying at every opportunity, 'Dolly is an extraordinary 
woman' You have been, and you always will be, an 
object of adoration in his eyes, and this passion is not 
a defection of his heart .... " 

" But supposing this defection should be repeated ? " 

" It is impossible, as I think .... " 

" Yes, but would you have forgiven him ? " 

"I don't know; I can't say Yes, I could," said 



9 a ANNA KARENINA 

Anna, after a moment's* thought, apprehending the 
gravity of the situation and weighing it in her mental 
scales. " I could, I could, 1 could ! Yes, I could for- 
give him, but I should n6t be the Same ; but I should 
forgive nirtt, aild I Should forgive him iri sUCh a way 
as to show that the past Was fofgotten, absolutely for- 
gotten." .... 

"Well ! of course," interrupted Dolly, impetuously, as 
if she Was saying wh&t she had said many times to her- 
self -— " otherwise it Would not be forgiveness. If you 
forgive, it must be absolutely, absolutely. -— Well I let 
me show you to your room," said she, rising, and throw- 
ing her arm around her sister-inJaw. 

" My dear, how glad I am that you came. My heart 
is already lighter, much lighter." 



CHAPTER XX 

Anna spent the whole day at home, that is to say, 
at the Oblonskys', and refused to see any callers, al- 
though some of her friends, having learned of her 
arrival, carrie to see her. The whole morning was 
given to Dolly and the children. She sent a note to 
her brother that he must dine at home. 

" Come, God is, merciful," she wrote. 

Oblonsky accordingly dined at home. The conver- 
sation Was general, and his wife, when she spoke to 
him, called him tut (thou), which had not been the case 
before. The relations between husband and wife re- 
mained cool, but nothing more was said about a separa- 
tion, and Stepan Arkadyevitch saw the possibility of a 
reconciliation. 

Kitty came in soon after dinner. Her acquaintance 
with Anna Arkadyevna was very slight, and she was 
not without solicitude as to the welcome which she 
would receive from this great Petersburg lady, whose 
praise was in everybody's mouth. But she made a 
pleasing impression on Anna Arkadyevna ; this she 
immediately realized. Anna evidently admired her 



ANNA KARENINA 93 

youth and beauty, and Kitty was not slow in realizing 
a sense of being, not only undqr her influence, but of 
being in love with her, and immediately fell in love 
with her, as young girls often fall in love with married 
women older than themselves. Anna was not like a 
society woman, or the mother of an eight-year-old son ; 
but, by her vivacity of movement, by the freshness and 
animation of her face, expressed in her smile and in her 
eyes, she would have been taken rather for a young 
girl of twenty, had it not been for a serious and some- 
times almost melancholy look, which struck and at- 
tracted Kitty. 

Kitty felt that she was perfectly natural and sincere, 
but that there was something about her that suggested 
a whole world of complicated and poetic interests far 
beyond her comprehension. 

After dinner, when Dolly had gone to her room, 
Anna went eagerly to her brother, who was smoking 
a cigar. 

" Stiva," said she, giving him a joyous wink, making 
the sign of the cross, and glancing toward the door, 
"go, and God help you." 

He understood her, and, throwing away his cigar, 
disappeared behind the door. 

As soon as he had gone, Anna sat down upon a divan, 
surrounded by the children, 

Either because they saw that their mamma loved this 
aunt, or because they themselves felt a special attraction 
toward her, the two eldest, and therefore the younger, 
as often happens with children, had taken ppssession 
of her even before dinner, and could not leave her 
alone, And now they were having something like a 
game, in which each tried to get next to her, to hold 
her little hand, to kiss her, to play with her rings, or 
even to cling to the flounces of her gown. 

" There ! there ! let us sit as we were before," said 
Anna, sitting down in her place. 

And Grisha, proud and delighted, thrust his head 
under his aunt's arm, and nestled up close to her. 

"And when is the ball ? " she asked of Kitty. 



94 ANNA KARENINA 

" Next week ! it will be a lovely ball — one of those 
balls where one always has a good time." 

" Then there are places where one always has a good 
time ? " asked Anna, in a tone of gentle irony. 

" Strange, but it is so. We always enjoy ourselves 
at the Bobrishchefs' and at the Nikitins', but at the Mezh- 
kofs' it is always dull. Have n't you ever noticed that ? " 

" No, dusha moya, no ball could be amusing to me," 
said Anna; and again Kitty saw in her eyes that un- 
known world, which had not yet been revealed to her. 
"For me they are all more or less tiresome," 

" How could yon find a ball tiresome ? " 

" And why should / not find a ball tiresome ? " 

Kitty perceived that Anna foresaw what her answer 
would be : — 

" Because you are always the loveliest of all ! " 

Anna blushed easily ; she blushed now, and said : — 

" In the first place, that is not true ; and in the second, 
if it were, it would not make any difference." 

" Won't you go to this ball ? " asked Kitty. 

"I think that I would rather not go. Here ! take it," 
said she to Tanya, who was drawing off a loose ring 
from her delicate white finger. 

" I should be delighted if you would go ; I should so 
like to see you at a ball." 

" Well, if I have to go, I shall console myself with 

the thought that I am making you happy Grisha, 

don't pull my hair down ! it is disorderly enough now," 
said she, putting back the rebellious lock with which the 
lad was playing. 

* I can imagine you at a ball dressed in violet." 

"Why in violet? " asked Anna, smiling. "Now, chil- 
dren, run away, run away. Don't you hear ? Miss 
Hull is calling you to tea," said she, freeing herself 
from the children, and sending them out to. the dining- 
room. 

" I know why you want me to go to the ball. You 
expect something wonderful to happen at this ball, and 
you are anxious for us all to be there so as to share in 
your happiness." 



ANNA KARENINA 95 

" How did you know ? You are right ! " 

" Oh, what a lovely age is yours! " continued Anna. 
* I remember well, and know this purple haze like that 
which you see hanging over the mountains in Switzer- 
land. This haze covers everything in that delicious time 
when childhood ends, and from out this immense circle, 
so joyous, so gay, grows a footpath ever narrower and 
narrower, and leads gayly and painfully into that laby- 
rinth, and yet it seems so bright and so beautiful 

Who has not passed through it?" 

Kitty listened and smiled. " How did she pass through 
it ? How I should like to know the whole romance of 
her life ! " thought Kitty, remembering the unpoetic 
appearance of her husband, Aleksei" Aleksandrovitch. 

"I know a thing or two," continued Anna. " Stiva 
told me, and I congratulate you ; he pleased me very 
much. I met Vronsky at the station." 

V Akh ! was he there? " asked Kitty, blushing. "What 
did Stiva tell you?" 

it Stiva told me the whole story ; and I should be de- 
lighted ! I came from Petersburg with Vronsky's 
mother," she continued; "and his mother never ceased 
to speak of him. He is her favorite. I know how 
partial mothers are, but...." 

" What did his mother tell you ? " 

"Akh ! many things ; and I know that he is her favor- 
ite. But still it is evident he has a chivalrous nature. 
— Well, for example, she told me how he wanted to give 
up his whole fortune to his brother ; how he did some- 
thing still more wonderful when he was a boy — saved 
a woman from drowning. In a word, he is a hero!" 
said Anna, smiling, and remembering the two hundred 
rubles which he had given at the station. 

But she did not tell about the two hundred rubles. 
Somehow it was not pleasant for her to remember that. 
She felt that there was something in it that concerned 
herself too closely, and ought not to have been. 

" The countess urged me to come to see her," con- 
tinued Anna, " and I should be very happy to meet 
her again, and I will go to-morrow. — Thank the Lord, 



9 6 ANNA KARENINA 

Stiva remains a long time with Dolly in the library/' she 
added, changing the subject, and, as Kitty perceived, 
looking a little annoyed. 

" I '11 be the first,... " " No, I," cried the children, who 
had just finished their supper, and came running to their 
Aunt Anna. 

"All together," she said, laughing, and running to 
meet them, She seized them and piled them in a heap, 
struggling and screaming with delight. 



CHAPTER XXI 

At tea-time Dolly came out of her room. Stepan 
Arkadyevitch was not with her; he had left his wife's 
chamber by the rear door. 

"I am afraid you will be cold up-stairs," remarked 
Dolly, addressing Anna. " I should like to have you 
come down and be near me." 

" Akh ! please don't worry about me," replied Anna, 
trying to divine by Dolly's face if there had been a 
reconciliation. 

" Perhaps it would be too light for you here," said her 
sister-in-law. 

" I assure you, I sleep anywhere and everywhere as 
sound as a woodchuck." 

" What is it ? ".asked Stepan Arkadyevitch, coming in 
from his library, and addressing his wife. 

By the tone of his voice, both Kitty and Anna knew 
that the reconciliation had taken place. 

" I wanted to install Anna down-stairs, but we should 
have to put up some curtains. No one knows how to do 
it, and so I must," said Dolly, in reply to her husband's 
question. 

" God knows if they have wholly made it up," thought 
Anna, as she noticed Dolly's cold and even tone. 

" Akh ! don't, Dolly, don't make difficulties ! Well ! if 
you like, I will fix everything." .... 

"Yes," thought Anna, "they must have had a recon* 
ciliation." 



ANNA KARENINA 97 

" I know how you do everything," said Dolly; "yon 
give Matve an order which it is impossible to carry out, 
and then you go away, and . he gets everything intc- a 
tangle." 

And her customary mocking smile wrinkled the cor- 
ners of Dolly's lips as she said that. 

"Complete, complete reconciliation, complete," thought 
Anna. " Thank God ! " and, rejoicing that she had been 
the cause of it, she went to Dolly and kissed her. ' 

" Not by any means. Why have you such scorn for 
Matve and me ? " said Stepan Arkadyevitch to his wife, 
with an almost imperceptible smile. 

Throughout the evening Dolly, as usual, was lightly 
ironical toward her husband, and Stepan Arkadyevitch 
was happy and gay, but within bounds, and as if he 
wanted to make it evident that though he had obtained 
pardon he had not forgotten his offense, 

About half-past nine a particularly animated and 
pleasant confidential conversation, which was going on 
at the tea-table, was interrupted by an incident appar- 
ently of the slightest importance, but this simple inci- 
dent seemed to each member of the family to be very 
strange. 

They were talking about one* of their Petersburg 
acquaintances when Anna suddenly arose; — 

" I have her picture in my album," she said ; " and at 
the same time I will show you my little Serozha," she 
added, with a smile of maternal pride. , , 1 

It was usually about ten o'clock when she bade her 
son good-night. Often she herself put him to bed 
before she went out to parties, and now she felt a sen- 
sation of sadness to be so far from him. No matter 
what people were speaking about, her thoughts reverted 
always to her little curly-haired Serozha, and the desire 
seized her to go and look at his picture, and to talk 
about him. Using this first pretext, she, with her light, 
decided step, started to fetch her album. The stairs to 
her room started from the landing-place in the large 
staircase, which led from the heated hall. Just as she 
was leaving the drawing-room the front door-bell rang. 
VOL. 1. — 7 



98 ANNA KARENINA 

"Who can that be?" said Dolly. 

" It is too early to come after me, and too late for a 
call," remarked Kitty. 

" Doubtless somebody with papers for me," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

As Anna was passing the staircase she saw the ser- 
vant going up to announce a caller, but the caller stood 
in the light of the hall lamp, and was waiting. Anna 
glancing down saw that it was Vronsky, and a strange 
sensation of joy, mixed with terror, suddenly seized her 
heart. He was standing with his coat on, and was tak- 
ing something out of his pocket. At the moment Anna 
reached the center of the staircase, he lifted his eyes, 
and saw her, and his face assumed an expression of 
humility and confusion. She bowed her head slightly in 
salutation ; and as she went on her way she heard Stepan 
Arkady evitch's loud voice calling him to come in, and then 
Vronsky's low, soft, and tranquil voice excusing himself. 

When Anna reached the room with the album, he had 
gone, and Stepan Arkadyevitch was telling how he came 
to see about a dinner which they were going to give the 
next day in honor of some celebrity who was in town. 

" And nothing would induce him to come in. What 
a queer fellow!" said Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

Kitty blushed. She thought that she alone understood 
what he had come for, and why he would not come in. 
" He must have been at our house," she thought, "and, 
not finding me, have supposed that I was here ; but he 
did not come in because' it was late and Anna here." 

They all exchanged glances, but nothing was said, 
and they began to examine Anna's album. 

There was nothing extraordinary or strange in a man 
calling at half-past nine o'clock in the evening to inquire 
of a friend about the details of a proposed dinner and 
not coming in ; yet to everybody it seemed strange, and 
it seemed more strange and unpleasant to Anna than to 
any one else. 



ANNA KARENINA 99 



CHAPTER XXII 

The ball was just beginning when Kitty and her 
mother mounted the grand staircase, brilliantly lighted 
and adorned with flowers and with powdered lackeys in 
red kaftans. In the ball-rooms there was an incessant 
bustle of movement, which sounded like the humming of 
a beehive, and, as they stopped to give the last touches 
to their hair and gowns, before a mirror hung on the 
tree-decorated landing, they heard the scraping of violins 
as the orchestra was tuning up for the first waltz. 

A little old man, a civilian, who was smoothing his 
white locks at another mirror, and who exhaled a pene- 
trating odor of perfumes, brushed against them on the 
stairway and stood aside, evidently impressed by Kitty's 
youth and beauty. A beardless young man, such as the 
old Prince Shcherbatsky would have reckoned among the 
" mashers," wearing a very low-cut waistcoat and a white 
necktie which he adjusted as he walked, bowed to them, 
and after he had passed them turned back to ask Kitty 
for a quadrille. The first quadrille was already promised 
to Vronsky, and so she was obliged to content the young 
man with the second. An officer buttoning his gloves 
was standing near the door of the ball-room ; he cast a 
glance of admiration at the blooming Kitty, and caressed 
his mustache. 

Although Kitty had taken great pains and spent much 
labor on her toilet, her gown, and all the preparations 
for this ball, yet now she. entered the ball-room, in 
her complicated robe of tulle with its rose-colored over- 
dress, as easily and naturally as if all these rosettes and 
laces, all the requirements of her toilet, had not caused 
her or her people a moment's attention, as if she had 
been born in this lace-trimmed ball-dress, and with a 
rose and two ribbons placed on thq top of her grace- 
ful head. When the old princess, her mother, just be- 
fore they entered the ball-room, was about to readjust 
her broad sash-ribbon, Kitty gently declined. She felt 
that everything about her must surely be right and 



ioo ANNA KARENINA 

graceful, and that to readjust anything about her was 
unnecessary. 

Kitty was looking her prettiest. Her gown was not 
too tight anywhere ; her lace fichu did not slip down, 
her rosettes did not crush, and did not pull off; her 
rose-colored slippers with their high heels did not pinch 
her, but were agreeable to her feet. The thick braids 
of her fair hair kept perfectly in place on her graceful 
little head. All the three buttons on her long gloves, 
which enveloped, without changing, the pretty shape of 
her hands, fastened easily, and did not tear. The black 
velvet ribbon, attached to a medallion, was thrown 
daintily about her neck. This ribbon was charming; 
and at home, as she saw it in her mirror, adorning her 
neck, Kitty felt that this ribbon spoke. Everything 
else might be dubious, but this ribbon was charming. 
Kitty smiled, even there at the ball, as she saw it in the 
mirror. In her bare shoulders and arms Kitty felt a 
sensation of marble coolness, a sensation which she 
especially enjoyed. Her eyes shone and her rosy lips 
could not refrain from smiling with the consciousness 
of how fascinating she was. 

She had scarcely entered the ball-room and joined a 
group of tulle-, ribbon-, lace-, and flower-decorated ladies, 
who were waiting for partners, — Kitty never remained 
long in that category, — when she was invited to waltz 
with the best dancer, the principal cavalier in the whole 
hierarchy of the ball-room, the celebrated leader of the 
mazurka, the master of ceremonies, the handsome, ele- 
gant Yegorushka Korsunsky, a married man and a 
civilian. He had just left the Countess Bonina, with 
whom he had been taking the first turns of the waltz, 
and, while looking round over his domain, in other 
words, over the few couples who were venturing out on 
the floor, he perceived Kitty, made his way to her in 
that easy manner peculiar to leaders of the mazurka, 
bowed, and without even asking her permission put his 
arm around the young girl's slender waist. She looked 
for some one to whom to confide her fan ; and the mis- 
tress of the mansion, smiling on her, took charge of it 



ANNA KARENINA -101 

" How good of you to come early," said Korsunsky, 
as he put his arm around her waist. "I don't like the 
fashion of being late." 

Kitty placed her left hand on her partner's shoulder, 
and her little feet, shod in rose-colored bashmaks, glided 
swiftly, lightly, and rhythmically over the polished floor. 

" It is restful to dance with you," said he, as he fell 
into the slow measures of the waltz : " charming ! such 
lightness ! such precision ! " 

That was what he said to almost all his ' dancing 
acquaintances. 

She smiled at his flattery, and continued to study the 
ball-room across her partner's shoulder. She was not 
such a novice in society as to find all faces blending in 
one magic sensation ; she had not been so assiduous in 
her attendance at balls as to know every one present, 
and be tired of seeing them. But she was in that happy 
condition between these two extremes, she was exhilarated 
and at the same time she was sufficiently self-possessed 
to be able to look around and observe. 

She noticed a group that had gathered in the left-hand 
corner of the ball-room, composed* of the very flower of 
society. Korsunsky's wife, Lidi, a beauty in an ex- 
tremely low-cut corsage, was there ; the mistress of the 
mansion was there; there shone Krivin's bald head, 
always to be seen where the flower of society was 
gathered. Young men were looking at this group, and 
not venturing to join it. Then her eyes fell on Stiva, 
who was also there, and then she saw Anna's elegant 
figure dressed in black velvet. And he was there. 
Kitty had not seen him since the evening when she 
refused Levin. Kitty's keen eyes instantly recognized 
him across the room, and saw that he was looking at 
her. 

" Shall we have one more turn ? You are not fatigued ? " 
asked Korsunsky, slightly out of breath. 
' "No, thank you." 

" Where shall I leave you ? " 

"I think Madame Karenina is here ;.... take me to 
her." 



102 ANNA KARENINA 

"Anywhere that you please." 

And Korsunsky, still' waltzing with Kitty but with a 
slower step, made his way toward the group on the left, 
saying as he went, " Pardon, mesdames ; pardon, pardon, 
mesdames ;" and steering skilfully through the sea of 
laces, tulle, and ribbons, without catching a feather, placed 
her in a chair after a final turn, which gave a glimpse of 
her slender ankles in dainty blue stockings, while her 
train spread out like a fan and covered Krivin's knees. 

Korsunsky bowed, then straightened himself up, and 
offered Kitty his arm to conduct he^to Anna Arkadyevna. 
Kitty, blushing a. little, fcm^ Krivin. from the folds of 
her train, and, just a trifle* dizzy, looked around in search 
of Anria^"" Anr\a was ri©t dressed in violet, as Kitty had 
hoped, but in a low-cut black velvet gown, which showed 
her plump shoulders and bosom smooth as ivory, her 
beautiful round arms, and her delicate slender wrists. 
Her robe was adorned with Venetian guipure ; on her 
head, gracefully set on her dark loc ks, was a little gar- 
land of heartsease 2 ; and a similar bouquet was fastened 
in her black ribbon-belt in the midst of white lace. Her 
hair, which was all her own, was dressed very simply ; 
there was nothing remarkable about it except the abun- 
dance of little natural curls, which strayed in fascinating 
disorder about her neck and temples. She wore a string 
of pearls about her firm round throat. 

Kitty had seen Anna every day, and had fallen in 
love -with her; but now that she saw her dressed in 
black, instead of the violet which she had expected, she 
was conscious that she had never before appreciated 
her full beauty. She saw her in a new and unexpected 
light. Now she realized that violet would not have been 
becoming to her, and that her charm consisted entirely 
in her independence of toilet ; that her toilet was only 
an accessory, and her black gown with the magnificent 
laces was only an accessory, was only a frame for her, 
and nothing else was to be thought of but herself in all 
her simplicity, naturalness, elegance, and at the same 
time her gayety and animation. 

* Viola tricolor, called in Russian anyutini gldzki f or Anna's eyes. 



ANNA KARENINA 103 

When Kitty joined her she was standing in her usual 
erect attitude, talking with the master of the house, her 
head slightly bent toward him. 

" No, I would not cast the first stone, though I don't 
understand about it," she was saying to him, slightly 
shrugging her shoulders ; and then, perceiving Kitty, 
she turned to her with an affectionate and reassuring 
smile. With a woman's quick intuition she saw all the 
beauty of the young girl's toilet, and gave her an appre- 
ciative nod, which Kitty understood. 

"You even dance into the ball-room," she said. 

" She is the most faithful of. my aids," said Korsunsky, 
addressing Anna Arkadyevna, whom he had not as yet 
seen. " The princess helps to make any ball-room gay 
and delightful. Anna Arkadyevna, will you take a 
turn?" he asked, with a bow. 

" Ah ! you are acquainted ? " said the host. 

" Who is it we don't know ? My wife and I are like 
white wolves, — everybody knows us," replied Korsun- 
sky. " A little waltz, Anna Arkadyevna ?" 

"I don't dance when I can help it," she replied. 

"But you can't help it to-night," said Korsunsky. At 
this moment Vronsky joined them. 

"Well! if I can't help dancing, let us dance," said 
she, placing her hand on Korsunsky's shoulder, and not 
replying to Vronsky's salutation. 

" Why is she vexed with him ? " thought Kitty, notic- 
ing that Anna purposely paid no attention to Vronsky's 
bow. Vronsky joined Kitty, reminded her that she was 
engaged to him for the first quadrille, and expressed 
regret that he had not seen her for so long. Kitty, 
while she was looking with admiration at Anna as she 
waltzed, listened to Vronsky. She expected that he 
would invite her; but he did nothing of the sort, and 
she looked at him with astonishment. A flush came 
into his face, and he hastily suggested that they should ' 
waltz ; but he had scarcely put his arm around her 
slender waist and taken the first step, when suddenly 
the music stopped. Kitty looked into his face, which 
was close to her own, and for many a long day, even 



io 4 ANNA KARENINA 

after years had passed, the loving look which she gave 
him and which he did* not return tore her heart with 
cruel shame. 

" Pardon ! pardon ! A waltz! a waltz ! " cried Kor- 
sunsky at the other end of the ball-room, and, seizing 
the first young lady at hand, he began once more to 
dance. 

CHAPTER XXIII 

Vronsky took a few turns with Kitty, then she joined 
her mother ; but she had time for only a few words with 
the Countess Nordstone, ere Vronsky came back to get 
her for the first quadrille. During the quadrille nothing 
of importance was said : their conversation was first on 
Korsunsky and his wife, whom Vronsky described very 
amusingly as amiable children of forty years, then on 
some private theatricals ; and only once did his words 
give her a keen pang, — when he asked if Levin were 
there, and added that he liked him very much. 

But Kitty counted little on the quadrille : she waited 
for the mazurka with, a violent beating of the heart. 
She had a feeling that during the mazurka all would 
surely ~be settled. The fact that Vronsky did not ask 
her during the quadrille did not disturb her. She felt 
sure that she should be selected as his partner for the 
mazurka as in all preceding balls, and she refused five 
invitations, saying that she was engaged. 

This whole ball, even to the last quadrille, seemed to 
Kitty like a magical dream, full of flowers, of joyous 
sounds, of movement ; she did not cease to dance until 
her strength began to fail, and then she begged to rest 
a moment. But in dancing the last quadrille with one 
of those tiresome men whom she found it impossible to 
refuse, she found herself in the same set with Vronsky 
and Anna. Kitty had not fallen in with Anna since the 
beginning of the ball, and now again she suddenly saw 
her in another new and unexpected light. She seemed 
laboring under an excitement such as Kitty herself had 
experienced — that of success. She saw that Anna 



ANNA KARENINA 105 

was excited and intoxicated with the wine of admiration. 
Kitty knew the sensation, knew the symptoms and 
recognized them in Anna — she saw the feverish brill- 
iancy of her, and the smile of happiness and excitement 
involuntarily parting her lips, and the harmony/ precis- 
ion, and grace of her movements. 

* Who has caused it ? " she asked herself. " All, or 
one?". J 

She would not help her tormented partner in the 
conversation, the thread of which he had dropped and 
could not pick up again ; and though she submitted 
with apparent good grace to the loud orders of Kor- 
sunsky, shouting " Ladies' chain" and "All hands 
around," she watched her closely, and her heart op- 
pressed her more and more. 

" No, it is not the approval of the crowd that has so 
intoxicated her, but the admiration of the one. And 
that one? — Can it be he? v 

Every time Vronsky spoke to Anna, her eyes spar- 
kled with pleasure, and a smile of happiness parted her 
rosy lips. She seemed to make an effort not to exhibit 
any signs of this joy, but nevertheless happiness was 
painted on her face. 

" Can it be he? " thought Kitty. 

She looked at him, and was horror-struck. The senti- 
ments that were reflected on Anna's face as in a mirror 
were also visible on his. • Where were his coolness, his 
calm dignity, the repose which always marked his face ? 
Now, as he addressed his partner, his head bent as 
if he were ready to worship her, and his look ex- 
pressed at once humility and passion, as if it said, '/ 
would not offend you. I would save myself^ and how 
can I?' 

Such was the expression of his face, and she had 
never before seen it in him. 

They talked about their mutual acquaintances, their 
conversation was made up of trifles, and yet Kitty felt 
that every word they spoke decided her fate. Strange 
as it might seem, although they really remarked how 
ridiculous Ivan Ivanuitch was in his efforts to speak 



io6 ANNA KARENINA • 

French, and how Miss Fletskaya might have found a 
better match, nevertheless these words had for them a 
peculiar meaning, and they understood it just as well as 
Kitty did. 

In Kitty's mind, the whole ball, the whole evening, 
everything, seemed enveloped in mist. Only the stern 
school of her education, serving her well, sustained her, 
and enabled her to do what was required of her, that is 
to, say, to dance, to answer questions, to talk, even to 
smile. 

But even before the mazurka began, while they were 
arranging the chairs and a few couples were already 
starting to go from the smaller rooms into the great 
ball-room, a sudden attack of despair and terror seized 
her. She had refused five invitations, and now she had 
no partner ; and now there was no hope at all that she 
would be invited again, for the very reason that her 
social success would make it unlikely to occur to any 
one that she would be without a partner. She would 
have to tell her mother that she was not feeling well, 
and go home, but even this seemed impossible. She 
felt overwhelmed. 

She went into the farthest end of a small parlor, and 
threw herself into an arm-chair. The airy skirts of her 
robe enveloped her delicate figure as in a cloud. One 
bare arm, as yet a little thin, but pretty, fell without 
energy, and lay in the folds of her rose-colored skirt ; 
with the other she held her fan, and with quick, sharp 
motions tried to cool her heated face. But while she 
looked like a lovely butterfly caught amid grasses, and 
ready to spread its rainbow-tinted wings, a horrible 
despair oppressed her heart. 

" But perhaps I am mistaken : perhaps it is not so." 

And again she recalled what she had seen. 

" Kitty, what does* this mean?" said the Countess 
Nordstone, coming to her with noiseless steps. 

Kitty's lower lip quivered ; she hastily arose. 

" Kitty, are n't you dancing the mazurka ? " 

" No .... no/' she replied, with trembling voice, almost 
in tears. 



ANNA KARENINA 107 

"I heard him invite her for the mazurka," said the 
countess, knowing that Kitty would know whom she 
meant. "She said, * What! are ri t you going to dance 
%vith the Princess Shcherbatskaya?" 

" Akh ! it 's all one to me/' said Kitty. 

No one besides herself realized her position. No one 
knew that she had refused a man whom perhaps she 
loved, — refused him because she preferred some one 
else. 

The Countess Nordstone went in search of Korsun- 
sky, who was her partner for the mazurka, and sent him 
to invite Kitty. 

Kitty danced in the first figure, and fortunately was 
not required to talk, because Korsunsky was obliged to 
be ubiquitous, making his arrangements in his little king- 
dom. Vronsky and Anna were sitting nearly opposite 
to her : she saw them sometimes near, sometimes at a 
distance, as their turn brought them into the figures ; 
and as she watched them, she felt more and more cer- 
tain that her unhappiness was complete. She saw that 
they felt themselves alone even in the midst of the 
crowded ball-room ; and on Vronsky's face, usually so 
impassive and calm, she remarked that mingled expres- 
sion of humility and fear, which strikes one in an intel- 
ligent dog, conscious of having done wrong. 

If Anna smiled, his smile replied ; if she became 
thoughtful, he looked serious. An almost supernatural 
power seemed to attract Kitty's gaze to Anna's face. 
She was charming in her simple black velvet ; charming 
were her round arms, clasped by bracelets ; charming 
her firm neck, encircled with pearls ; charming Jier dark, 
curly locks breaking from restraint ; charming the slow 
and graceful movements of her small feet and hands ; 
charming her lovely face, full of animation ; but in all 
this charm there was something terrible and cruel. . 

Kitty admired her more than ever, and ever more and 
more her pain increased. She felt crushed, and her face 
told the story. When Vronsky passed her, in some fig- 
ure of the mazurka, he hardly knew her, so much had 
she changed. 



108 ANNA KARENINA 

"Lovely ball," he said, so as to say something. 

" Yes," was her reply. 

Toward, the middle of the mazurka, in going through 
a complicated figure recently -invented by Korsunsky, 
Anna went to the center of the circle, and called out 
two gentlemen and two ladies ; Kitty was one. As she 
approached Anna, she looked at her in dismay. Anna, 
half shutting, her eyes, looked at her with a smile, and 
pressed her hand ; then noticing that Kitty's face, reply- 
ing to her smile, wore an expression of despair and 
amazement, she turned from her and began to talk to 
the other lady in animated tones. 

. " Yes, there is some terrible, almost infernal attrac- 
tion about her," said Kitty to herself. 

Anna did not wish to remain to supper, but the host 
insisted. 

"Do stay, Anna Arkadyevna," said Korsunsky, as 
she stood with her bare arm resting on the sleeve of his 
coat. " Such a cotillion I have in mind ! Un bijou / " 

And the master of the house, looking on with a smile, 
encouraged his efforts to detain her. 

" No, I cannot stay," said Anna, also smiling ; but in 
spite of her smile the two men understood by the deter- 
mination in her voice that she would not stay. 

" No, for I have danced here in Moscow at this single 
ball more than all winter in Petersburg," said she, 
looking at Vronsky, who was standing near her; "one 
must rest before a journey." 

"And so you are really going back to-morrow ?" he 
asked. 

" Yes ; I think so," replied Anna, as if surprised at 
the boldness of his question. But as she said this to 
him, the brilliancy of her eyes and of her smile set his 
heart on fire. 

Anna Arkadyevna did not stay for supper, but took 
her departure. 



ANNA KARENINA 109 



CHAPTER XXIV 

"Yes, there must be something repellent, even re- 
pulsive, about me," thought Levin, as he left the Shcher- 
batskys', and went on foot in search of his brother. " I 
am not popular with men. They say it is pride. No, 
I am not proud ; if I had been proud, I should not have 
put myself in my present situation. " ? 

And he imagined himself Vronsky, happy, popular, 
calm, witty, who had apparently never put himself in 
such a terrible position as he was in on that evening. 

"Yes, she naturally chose him, and I have no right 
to complain about any one or any thing. I myself am 
to blame. What right had I to think that she would 
ever unite her life with mine ? Who am I ? and what 
am I ? A man useful to no one — a good-for-nothing." 

Then the memory of his brother Nikolai came back 
to him. 

" Was he not right in saying that everything in the 
world was miserable and wretched ? Have we been, 
and are we, just in our judgment of brother Nikola*? 
Of course, from the point of view of Prokofi, who saw 
him drunk and in ragged clothes, he is a miserable crea- 
ture ; but I judge him differently. I know his heart, 
and I know that we are alike. And I, instead of going 
to find him, have been out dining, and to this reception ! " 

Levin went to a street-lamp and read his brother's 
address, which was written on. a slip of paper, and called 
an izvoshchik. All the long way he vividly recalled one 
by one the well-known incidents of his brother Nikolai's 
life. He remembered how at, the university, and for a 
year after his graduation, he had lived like a monk not- 
withstanding the ridicule of his comrades, strictly de- 
voted to all forms of religion, services, fasts, turning 
his back on all pleasures, and especially women ; and 
then how he had suddenly turned around, and fallen 
into the company of people of the lowest lives, and 
entered upon a course of dissipation and debauchery. 
He remembered his conduct toward a lad whom he 



no ANNA KARENINA 

had taken from the country to bring up, and whom he 
whipped so severely in a fit of anger that he narrowly 
escaped being transported for mayhem. He remem- 
bered his conduct toward a swindler to whom he owed 
a gambling debt and in payment of it had given him his 
note, and whom he had caused to be arrested on the 
charge of cheating him ; this was, in fact, money that 
Serge'f Ivanuitch had just paid. Then he remembered 
the night spent by NikolaY at the station-house on 
account of a spree. He remembered the scandalous 
lawsuit against his brother SergeY Ivanuitch, because 
SergeY had refused to pay his share of their mother's 
estate ; and finally he recalled his last adventure, when, 
after he had gone to take a position at the Western fron- 
tier, he was dismissed for assaulting a superior 

All this was detestable, but it did not seem nearly so 
odious to Levin as it would have been to those who did 
not know Nikolaif, did not know his history, did not 
know his heart. 

Levin remembered how at the time when NikolaY was 
occupied with his devotions, his fastings, his priests, his 
ecclesiastical observances, when he was seeking to curb 
his passionate nature by religion, no one had aided him, 
but, on the contrary, every one, even himself, had made 
sport of him ; they had mocked him, nicknamed him 
Noah, the monk ! Then, when he had fallen, no one 
had helped him, but all had turned from him with hor- 
ror and disgust. Levin felt that his brother NikolaY at 
the bottom of his heart, in spite of all the deformity of 
his life, was not so very much worse than those who 
despised him. He was not to blame for having been 
born with his unrestrainable character and his peculi- 
arities of intellect. He had always had good impulses. 

" I will tell him everything, and I will make him tell 
me everything, and show him that I love him and there- 
fore understand him/' said Levin to himself, and about 
eleven o'clock in the evening he bade the driver take 
him to the hotel indicated on the address. 

"Upstairs, No. 12 and 13, "said the Swiss, in reply to 
Levin's question. 



ANNA KARENINA in 

"Is he at home i" 

"Probably." 

The door of No. 12 was half open, and from the room 
came the dense fumes of cheap, poor tobacco, and a 
voice unknown to Levin was heard speaking ; but Levin 
instantly knew his brother was there; he recognized 
his cough. 

When he reached the door, the unknown voice was 
saying : — 

" All depends on whether the affair is conducted in a 
proper and rational manner." 

Konstantin Levin glanced through the doorway, and 
saw that the speaker was a young man, in a peasant's 
sleeveless coat, and with an enormous mop of hair on 
his head. On the divan was sitting a young woman, 
with pock-marked face, and dressed in a woolen gown 
without collar or cuffs. His brother was not to be seen. 
A pain shot through Konstantin's heart to think of the 
strange people with whom his brother associated. No 
one heard him ; and, while he was removing his galoshes, 
he listened to what the man in the sleeveless coat was 
saying. He was speaking of some enterprise. 

"Well! the Devil take the privileged classes !" said 
his brother's voice, after a fit of coughing. " Masha, 
see if you can't get us something to eat, and bring some 
wine if there 's any left ; if not, go for some." 

The woman arose, and as she came out from behind 
the screen she saw Konstantin. 

"A gentleman here, Nikolai' Dmitritch," she cried. 

"What is wanted?" said the voice of NikolaY Levin, 
angrily. 

"It's I," replied Konstantin, appearing at the door. 

"Who's I?" repeated Nikolai's voice, still more 
angrily. 

Then he was heard quickly rising and stumbling 
against something, and Konstantin saw before him at 
the door his brother's well-known figure, still remark- 
able by reason of his shyness and ill health — infirm, 
tall, thin, and bent, with great startled eyes. 

He was still thinner than when Konstantin had last 



ii2 ANNA KARENINA 

seen him, three years before. He wore a short over, 
coat. His hands and his bony frame seemed to him 
more colossal than ever. His hair had grown thinner, 
but the same stiff mustaches hid his lips, the same eyes 
glared at his visitor uncannily and natvely. 

"'Ah, Kostia ! " he suddenly cried, recognizing his 
brother, and his eyes shone with joy. But the same 
instant he fixed his eyes on the younger man, and made 
a quick, convulsive motion of his head and neck, as if 
his cravat choked him, a gesture well known to Kon- 
stantin ; and an entirely different expression, wild, and 
bitter, and expressive of martyrdom, came into his 
sunken face. 

" I wrote both to you and to Serger Ivanuitch that I 
do not know you, nor wish to know you. What do you 
want ; what does either of you want ? " 

He was not at all as Konstantin had imagined him. 
The hardest and vilest elements of his character, which 
had made any relations with him difficult, had faded 
from Konstantin Levin's memory whenever he thought 
about him ; and now, when he saw his face and the 
characteristic convulsive motions of his head, he remem- 
bered it all. 

"But*I wanted nothing of you except to see you," he 
replied timidly. "I only came to see you." 

His brother's diffidence apparently disarmed NikolaY. 
His lips relaxed. 

" Ah ! did you ? " said he. " Well ! come in, sit down. 
Do you want some supper ? Masha, bring enough for 
three. No, hold on 1 Do you know who this is?" he 
asked his brother, pointing to the young man in the 
peasant's coat. "This gentleman is Mr. Kritsky, a 
friend of mine from Kief, a very remarkable man. It 
seems the police are after him, because he is not a 
coward." ' 

And he looked, as his habit was, at all who were in 
the room. Then, seeing that the woman, who stood at 
the door, was about to leave, he shouted : — 

"Wait, I tell you." 

Then, in his extravagant, incoherent manner of 



ANNA KARENINA 113 

speech, which Konstantin knew so well, he began to 
tell his brother the whole story of Kritsky's life ; how 
he had been driven from the university, because he had 
tried to found an aid society and Sunday-schools among 
the students ; how afterwards he had been appointed 
teacher in one of the public schools, only to be dis- 
missed.,; and how finally he had been tried for something 
or other. 

"Were you at the University of Kief?" asked Kon- 
stantin of Kritsky, in order to break the awkward silence 
that followed. 

" Yes, I was at Kief," replied Kritsky, curtly, with a 
frown. 

"And this woman/' cried Nikolai' Levin, pointing to 
the girl, "is the companion of my life, Marya Niko- 
layevna. I took her from a house/' — he said, stretch- 
ing out his neck, — "but I love her, and I esteem her; 
and all who want to know me/' he added, raising his 
voice and scowling, "must love her and esteem her. 
She, is just the same as my wife, just the same. So 
now you know with whom you have to do. And if you 
think that you lower yourself, there 's the door ! " J And 
again his eyes looked at them all questioningly. 

"I do not understand how I should lower myself/' 

"All right,, Masha, bring us up enough for. three, — 

some vodka and wine No, wait ; .,.. no matter, though ; 

....go!- 

CHAPTER XXV t 

"As you see/' continued Nikolai* Levin, frowning, and 
speaking with effort. It was evidently hard for him to 
make up his mind what to do or say. "But do you 

see?" and he pointed to the corner of the room, 

where lay some iron bars attached to straps. "Do you 
see that ? That is the beginning of a new work which 

1 He quotes the riming phrase : Tak vot Bog a vot porog (or, vot tcbyi 
Bog, a vot tebye porog) which expauded may mean, " Stay if you like and 
God be with you, but yonder is the threshold ! " 

VOL. I. — 8 



1 1 4 ANNA KARENINA 

we are undertaking. This work belongs to a productive 
labor association." .... 

Konstantin scarcely listened : he was looking at his 
brother's' sick, consumptive face, and he grew more and 
more sorry for him, and he could not compel himself to ■ 
listen to what his brother was saying about the labor 
association. He saw that the labor association was only 
an anchor of safety to keep him from absolute self- 
abasement. NikolaX went on to say : — 

"You know that capital is crushing the laborer : with 
us the laboring classes, the muzhiks, bear the whole 
weight of toil ; and no matter how they exert them- 
selves, they can never get above their cattle-like condi- 
tion. r All the profits created by their productive labor, 
by which they could better their lot and procure for them- 
selves leisure, and therefore instruction, all their super- 
fluous profits are swallowed up by the capitalists. And 
society is so constituted that, the harder they work, the 
more the proprietors and the merchants fatten at their 
expense, while they remain beasts of burden still. And 
this order of things must be changed," said he, in con- 
clusion, and looked questioningly at his brother. 

"Yes, of course," replied Konstantin, looking at the 
pink spots which burned in his brother's hollow cheeks. 

"And now we are organizing an artel of ' locksmiths 
where all will be in common, — work, profits, and even 
the tools." 

" Where will this artel be situated ? ,J asked Kon- 
stantin. 

"In the village of Vozdremo, government of Kazan/' 

" Yes ; but why in a village ? In the villages, it seems 
to me, there is plenty of work: why associated lock- 
smiths in a village ? " 

" Because the muzhiks are serfs, just as much as they 
ever were, and you and Serge'f Ivanuitch don't like it 
because we want to free them from this slavery," replied 
NikolaY, vexed by his brother's question. 

While he spoke, Konstantin was looking about the 
melancholy, dirty room ; he sighed, and his sigh seemed 
to make Nikola* still more angry. 



ANNA KARENINA 115 

"I know the aristocratic prejudices of such men as 
you and Sergef Ivanuitch. I know that he is spending 
all the strength of his mind in defense of the evils that 
crush us. M 

" No ! but why do you speak of Serge* Ivanuitch ? " 
asked Levin, smiling. > j 

" Sergei Ivanuitch ? This is why ! " cried Nikolaf, at 
the mention of Serget Ivanuitch — "this is why!.... 
yet what is the good ? tell me this — what did you come 
here for ? You despise all this ; very good ! Go away, 
for God's sake," he cried, rising from his chair, — "go 
away ! go away !' ,M 

" 1 don't despise anything," said Konstantin, gently ; 
" I only refrain from discussing." 

At this moment Marya Nikolayevna came in. Niko- 
la* looked at her angrily, but she quickly stepped up to 
him and whispered a few words in his ear. 

"I am not well, I easily become irritable," he ex- 
plained, growing calmer, and breathing with difficulty, 
"and you just spoke to me about Serge'f Ivanuitch and 
his article. It is so rubbishy, so idle, so full of error. 
How can a man, who knows nothing about justice, 
write about it? Have you read his article?" said he, 
turning to Kritsky, and then, going to the table, he 
brushed off the half-rolled cigarettes so as to clear away 
a little space. 

" I have not read it," replied Kritsky, gloomily, evi- 
dently not wishing to take part in the conversation. 

"Why?" cried NikolaY, irritably, still addressing 
Kritsky. 

u Because I don't consider it necessary to waste my 
time on it." 

" That is, excuse me — how do you know that it would 
be a waste of time ? For many people this article is 
inaccessible, because it is above them. But I find i'; 
different ; I see the thoughts through and through, and 
know wherein it is weak." 

No one replied. Kritsky slowly arose, and took his hat 

"Won't you take some lunch? Well, good-by ! 
Come to-morrow with the locksmith." 



n6 ANNA KARENINA 

Kritsky had hardly left the room, when Nikolai smiled 
and winked. 

".He is to be pitied ; but I see ...." 

Just at that instant Kritsky, calling at the door, inter- 
rupted him. 

" What do you want ? " he asked, joining him in the 
corridor: 

Left alone with Marya Nikolayevna, Levin said to 
her : — 

"Have you been long with my brother ?" 

" This is the second year. His health has become 
very feeble ; he drinks a great deal," she said. 

"What do you mean?" 

"He drinks vodka, and it is bad for him/' 

" Does he drink too much ? " 

"Yes," said she, looking timidly toward the door 
where Nikolai Levin was just entering. 

" What were you talking about ?" he demanded, with 
a scowl, and looking from one to the other with angry 
eyes. "Tell me." 

" Oh ! nothing," replied Konstantin, in confusion. 

" You don't want to answer ? all right ! don't. But 
you have no business to be talking with her ; she is a 
girl, you a gentleman," he shouted, craning out his neck. 
"I see that you have understood everything, and judged 
everything, and that you look with grief on the errors 
of my ways." . 

He went on speaking, raising his voice. 

" NikolaY Dmitritch ! Nikolai Dmitritch ! " whispered 
Marya Nikolayevna, coming close to him. 

"Well ! very good, very good Supper, then ? ah ! 

here it is," he said, seeing a servant entering with a 
platter. 

"Here! put it here!" he said crossly; then, taking 
the vodka, he poured out a glass, and drank it eagerly. 

"Will you have a drink?" he asked his brother, im- 
mediately growing lively. 

" Well ! no more about Serge* Ivanuitch ! I am very 
glad to see you. No matter what people say, we are no 
longer strangers. Come now ! drink ! Tell me what 



ANNA KARENINA 117 

you are doing," he said, greedily munching a piece of 
bread, and pouring out a second glass. " How are you 
living?" 

" I live alone in the country, as I always have, and 
busy myself with farming," replied Konstantin, looking 
with terror at the eagerness with which his brother ate 
and drank, and trying to hide his impressions. 

" Why don't you get married t" 

" I have not come to that yet," replied Konstantin, 
turning red. 

"Why so? For me — it's all over! I have wasted 
my life ! This I have said, and always shall say, that, 
if they had given me my share of the estate when I 
needed it, my whole life would have been different." 

Konstantin hastened to change the conversation. 

" Did you know that your Vanyuskka 1 is with me at 
Pokrovskoye as book-keeper ? " he said. 

Nikolai craned out his neck and wondered. 

" Yes, tell me what is doing at Pokrovskoye. Is the 
house just the same ? and the birch trees and our study- 
room ? Is Filipp, the gardener, still alive ? How I re- 
member the summer-house and the divan!.... Just look 
here ! don't let anything in the house be changed, but 
hurry up and get married and begin to live as you used 
to. Then I will come to visit you if your wife will be 
kind." 

"Then come back with me now," said Konstantin. 
" How well we should get on together ! " 

"I would come if I knew I should not meet Sergei 
Ivanuitch." 

" You would not meet him ; I live absolutely indepen- 
dent of him." 

"Yes; but, whatever you say, you must choose be- 
tween him and me," said Nikola*, looking timorously in 
his brother's eyes. 

This timidity touched Konstantin. 

" If you want to hear my whole confession as to this 
matter, I will tell you that I take sides neither with you 
nor with him in your quarrel. You are both in the 
1 Vanyushka is the diminutive of Ivan, as Jack is of John. 



u8 ANNA KARENINA 

wrong ; but in your case the wrong is external, while in 
his the wrong is inward." 

" Ha, ha ! Do you understand it ? do you understand 
it? " cried Nikola'i, with an expression of joy. 

"But if you would like to know, personally I value 
your friendship higher because. ..." 

" Why ? why ? " 

Konstantin could not say that it was because Nikolai 
was wretched, and needed his friendship; but Nikolai 
understood that that was the very thing he meant, and, 
frowning darkly, he betook himself to the vodka. 

" Enough, NikolaT Dmitritch ! " cried Marya Nikola- 
yevna, laying her great pudgy hand pn the decanter. 

" Let me alone ! don't bother me, or I '11 strike you, M 
he cried. 

Marya Nikolayevna smiled with her gentle and good- 
natured smile, which pacified NikolaY, and she took the 
vodka. 

"There ! Do you think that she does not understand 
things?" said NikolaY. "She understands this thing 
better than all of you. Is n't there something about her 
good and gentle ? " 

" Have n't you ever been in Moscow before ? " said 
Konstantin, in order to say something to her. 

"There now, don't say via [you] to her. It frightens 
her. No one said vui to her except the justice of the 
peace, when they had her up because she wanted to 
escape from the house of ill-fame where she was. My 
God ! how senseless everything is in this world ! " he 
suddenly exclaimed. "These new institutions, these 
justices of the peace, the zemstro, what abominations!" 

And he began to relate his experiences with the new 
institutions. 

Konstantin listened to him ; and the criticisms on the 
absurdity of the new institutions, which he had himself 
often expressed, now that he heard them from his 
brother's lips, seemed disagreeable to him. 

"We shall^understand it all in the next world," he 
said jestingly. 

" In the next world ? Och ! I don't like your next 



ANNA KARENINA 119 

world ; I don't like it," he repeated, fixing his timid, 
haggard eyes on his brother's face. "And yet it would 
seem good to go from these abominations, these entan- 
glements, from this unnatural state of things, from my- 
self ; but I am afraid of death, horribly afraid of death ! " 
He shuddered. " There ! drink something ! Would you 
like some champagne ? or would you rather go out some- 
where ? Let 's go and see the gipsies. You know I am 
very fond of gipsies and Russian songs." 

His speech had begun to grow thick, and he hurried 
from one subject to another. Konstantin, with Masha's 
aid, persuaded him to stay at home ; and they put him 
on his bed completely drunk. 

Masha promised to write Konstantin in case of need, 
and to persuade Nikola'f Levin to come and live with his 
brother. 



CHAPTER XXVI 

The next forenoon Levin left Moscow, and toward 
evening was at home. On the journey he talked with 
those near him in the train about politics, about the new 
railroads ; and, just as in Moscow, he was overcome by 
the chaos of conflicting opinions, self-dissatisfaction, and 
a sense of shame. But when he got out at his station, 
and perceived his one-eyed coachman, Ignat, with his 
kaftan collar turned up; when he saw, in the dim light 
that fell through the station windows, his covered sledge 
and his horses with their tied-up tails, and their harness 
with its rings and fringes ; when Ignat, as he was tuck- 
ing in the robes, told him all the news of the village, 
about the coming of the contractor, and how Pava the 
cow had calved, — then it seemed to him that the chaos 
resolved itself a little, and his shame and dissatisfaction 
passed away. This he felt at the very sight of Ignat 
and his horses ; but, as soon as he had put on his sheep- 
skin tulup, which he found in the sleigh, and took his 
seat in the sleigh comfortably wrapped up, and drove 
off thinking what arrangement he should have to make 



wo ANNA KARENINA 

in the village, and at the same time examining the off 
horse, Donskaya, which used to be his saddle-horse, a 
jaded but mettlesome steed, he began to view his expe- 
riences' in an absolutely different light. 

He felt himself again, and no longer wished to be a 
different person. He only wistied to be better than he 
had ever been before. In the first place, he resolved 
from that day forth that he would never expect extraor- 
dinary joys, such as marriage had promised to bring to 
him, and therefore he would never again despise the 
present ; and, in the second place, he would never allow 
himself to be led away by low passion, the remem- 
brances of which so tortured him while he was deciding 
to make his proposal. And lastly, as he thought of his 
brother Nikola?, he resolved that he would never again 
forget him, but that he would keep track of him and not 
let him out of sight, so that he might be in readiness to 
aid him whenever the evil moment arrived, and that 
seemed likely to be very soon. 

Then the conversation about communism, which he 
had so lightly* treated with his brother, came back to 
him, and made him reflect. A reform of economic con- 
ditions seemed to him nonsense, but he always felt the 
unfair difference between his own superfluity and the 
poverty of the people, and in order that he might feel 
perfectly right, he now vowed that though hitherto he 
had worked hard, and lived economically, he would in 
the future work still harder, and permit himself even less 
luxury than ever. And all this seemed to him so easy 
to accomplish that, throughout the drive from the sta- 
tion, he "was the subject of the pleasantest illusions. 
With a hearty feeling of hope for a new and better life, 
he reached home just as the clock was striking ten. 

From the windows of the room occupied by his old 
nurse^ Agafya Mikha'flovna, who fulfilled the functions 
of housekeeper, the light fell on the snow-covered walk 
before his house. She was not yet asleep. Kuzma, 
wakened by her* hurried down, barefooted and sleepy, 
to open the door. Laska, the setter, almost knocking 
Kuzma down in her desire to get ahead of him, ran to 



ANNA KARENINA 121 

meet her master, and jumped upon him, trying to place 
her fore paws on his breast. 

"You are back very soon, batyushka," said Agafya 
Mikha'flovna. 

" I wa3 bored, Agafya Mikhatlovna ; 't is good to go 
visiting, but it's better at home," said he. And he 
went into his library. 

The library slowly grew light as the candle that was 
brought burnt up. The familiar details little by little 
came into sight — the great antlers, the shelves lined 
with books, the mirror, the stove with a hole which ought 
long ago to have been repaired, the ancestral divan, 
the great table, and on the table an open book, a broken 
ash-tray, a note-book filled with his writing. 

As he saw all these things, for a moment the doubt 
arose in his mind if it would be possible to bring about 
this new life which he had dreamed of during his journey. 
All these signs of his past seemed to say to him, ( No, 
thou shalt not leave us ! thou shalt not become another; 
but thou shalt still be as thou hast always been, — with 
thy doubts, thy everlasting self-dissatisfaction, thy idle 
efforts at reform, thy failures, and thy perpetual striv- 
ing for a happiness which will never be thine.' 

But while these external objects spoke to him thus, 
a different voice whispered to his soul, bidding him cease 
to be a slave to his past, and declaring that a man has 
every possibility within him. And, listening to this 
voice, he went to one side of the room, where he found 
two forty-pound dumb-bells. And he began to practise 
his gymnastic exercises with them, endeavoring to bring 
himself into a condition of vigor. At the door there was 
a noise of steps. He hastily put down the dumb-bells. 

The intendant 1 came in and said that, thanks to 
God, everything was all right, but he confessed that 
the buckwheat in the new drying-room had got burnt. 
This provoked Levin. This new drying-room he had 
himself built, and partially invented. But the inten- 
dant had been entirely opposed to it, and now he an- 
nounced with ill-concealed triumph that the buckwheat 

1 Prikaskchik. 



122 ANNA KARENINA 

was burnt. Levin was sure that it was because he had 
neglected the precautions a hundred times suggested. 
He grew angry, and reprimanded the intendant. 

But there was one fortunate and important event : 
Pava, his best, his most beautiful cow, which he had 
bought at the cattle-show, had calved. 

" Kuzma, give me my tulup. And you," said he to 
the intendant, "get a lantern. I will go and see her/' 

The stable for the cattle was immediately behind the 
house. Crossing the courtyard, where the snow was 
headed under the lilac bushes, he stepped up to the 
stable. As he opened the frosty door, he was met by 
the warm fumes of manure, and the cows, astonished at 
the unwonted light of the lantern, stirred on their fresh 
straw. The light fell on the broad black back of his 
piebald Holland cow. Berkut, the bull, with a ring in 
his nose, tried to get to his feet, but changed his mind, 
and only snorted as they passed by. 

The beautiful Pava, huge as a hippopotamus, was ly- 
ing near her calf, snuffing at it, and protecting it against 
those who would come too close. 

Levin entered the stall, examined Pava, and lifted the 
calf, spotted with red and white, on its long, awkward 
legs. Pava began to low with anxiety, but was re- 
assured when the calf was restored to her, and began 
to lick it with her rough tongue. The calf hid its nose 
under its mother's side, and frisked its tail. 

" Bring the light this way, Feodor, this way," said 
Levin, examining the calf. " Like its mother, but its 
color is like the sire's, very pretty ! long hair and 
prettily spotted. Vasili Feodorovitch, is n't it a beauty ? " 
he said, turning to his intendant, forgetting, in his joy 
over the new-born calf, the grief caused by the burning 
of his wheat. 

" Why should it be homely ? But Semyon the con- 
tractor was here the day after you left. It will be 
necessary to come to terms with him, Konstantin 
Dmitritch," replied the intendant. " I have already 
spoken to you about the machine." 

This single phrase brought Levin back to all the de- 



ANNA KARENINA 123 

tails of his enterprise, which was great and complicated ; 
and from the stable he went directly to the office, and 
after a long conversation with the intendant and Semyon 
the contractor, he went back to the house, and marched 
straight up into the drawing-room. 



CHAPTER XXVII 

Levin's house was old and large, but, though he lived 
there alone, he occupied and warmed the whole of it. 
He knew that this was ridiculous ; he knew that it was 
bad, and contrary to his new plans ; but this house was 
a world in itself to him. It was a world where his father 
and mother had lived and died. They had lived a life 
which, for Levin, seemed the ideal of all perfection, and 
which he dreamed of renewing with his own wife, with 
his own family. 

Levin scarcely remembered his mother. But this 
remembrance was sacred ; and his future wife, as he 
imagined her, was to be the counterpart of the ideally 
charming and adorable woman, his mother. For him, 
love for a woman could not exist outside of marriage ; 
but he imagined the family relationship first, and only 
afterwards the woman who would be the center of the 
family. His ideas about marriage were therefore es- 
sentially different from those held by the majority of 
his friends, for whom it was only one of innumerable 
social affairs ; for Levin it was the most important act 
of his life, whereon all his happiness depended, and now 
he must renounce it ! 

When he entered the little parlor where he always 
took tea, and threw himself into his arm-chair with a 
book, while Agafya Mikhailovna brought him his cup, 
and sat down near the window, saying as usual, "Well, 
I'll sit down, batyushka," — then he felt, strangely 
enough, that he had not renounced his day-dreams, and 
that he could not live without them. Were it Kitty or 
another, still it would be. He read his book, had his 
mind on what he was reading, pausing occasionally to 



i2 4 ANNA KARENINA 

listen to Agafya Mikhallovna's unceasing prattle, but 
his imagination was all the time filled with those varied 
pictures of family happiness which hovered before him. 
He felt that in the depths of his soul some change, some 
modification, some crystallization, was taking place. 

He listened while Agafya Mikhaflovna told how Pro- 
khor had forgotten God, and, instead of buying a horse 
with the money which Levin had given him, had taken 
it and gone on a spree, and beaten his wife almost to 
death ; and while he listened he read his book, and again 
caught the thread of his thoughts, awakened by his 
reading. It was a book by Tyndall, on heat. He re- 
membered his criticisms on Tynclall's self-satisfaction in 
the cleverness of his management of his experiments 
and on his lack of philosophical views, and suddenly a 
happy thought crossed his mind : — 

" In two years I shall have two Holland cows ; per- 
haps Pava herself will still be alive, and possibly a dozen 
of Berkut's daughters will have been added to the herd, 
just from these three ! Splendid ! " 

And again he picked up his book. 

" Well ! very good : electricity and heat are one and 
the same thing; but could one quantity take the place 
of the other in the equations used to settle this problem ? 
No. What then ? The bond between all the forces of na- 
ture is felt, like instinct When Pava's daughter grows 

into a cow with red and white spots, what a herd I shall 
have with those three ! Admirable ! And my wife and I 
will go out with our guests to see the herd come in ;.... 
and my wife will say, ' Kostia and I have brought this 
calf up just like a child.' — ' How can this interest you 
so?' the guests will say. 'All that interests him 
interests me also/.... But who will she be?" and he 
began to think of what had happened in Moscow. — 
"Well! What is to be done about it?.... I am not to 
blame. But now everything will be different. It is 
foolishness to let one's past life dominate the present. 
One must struggle to live better — much better.".... 

He raised his head, and sank into thought. Old 
Laska, who had not yet got over her delight at her 



ANNA KARENINA 125 

master's return, had been barking up and down the 
courtyard. She came into the room, wagging her tail, 
and bringing the freshness of the open air, and thrust 
her head under his hand, and begged for a caress, whin- 
ing plaintively. 

" She almost talks," said Agafya Mikha'ilovna; "she 
is only a dog, but she knows just as well that her master 
has come home, and is sad." 

"Why sad?" 

"Da! don't I see it, batyushka? It's time I knew 
how to read my masters. Grew up with my masters 
since they were children! No matter, batyushka; your 
health is good and your conscience pure." 

Levin looked at her earnestly, in astonishment that 
she so divined his thoughts. 

"And shall I give you some more tea?" said she; 
and taking the cup, she went out. 

Laska continued to nestle her head in her .master's 
hand. He caressed her, and then she curled herself up 
around his feet, like a ring, laying her head on one of 
her hind paws ; and, as a proof that all was arranged to 
suit her, she opened her mouth a little, let her tongue* 
slip out between her aged teeth, and, with a gentle puff- 
ing of her lips, gave herself up to beatific repose. Levin 
followed all of her movements. 

"So will I ! " he said to himself; "so will I! no mat- 
ter! all will be well!" 



CHAPTER XXVIII 

Early on the morning after the ball, Anna Arka- 
dyevna sent her husband a telegram, announcing that 
she was going to leave Moscow that day. 

" No, I must, I must go," she said to her sister-in-law, 
in explanation of her change of plan, and her tone signi- 
fied that she had just remembered something that de- 
manded her instant attention. "No, it would be much 
better if I could go this morning." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch did not dine at home, but he 



126 ANNA KARENINA 

agreed to be back at seven o'clock to escort his sister to 
the train. 

Kitty did not put in an appearance, but sent word 
that she had a headache. Dolly and Anna dined alone 
with the children and the English governess. Either 
the children were fickle or they were very sensitive and 
felt that Anna was not at all as she had been on the 
day when they had taken so kindly to her, that she no 
longer cared for them, for they suddenly ceased playing 
with their aunt, seemed to lose their affection for her, 
and cared very little that she was going away. 

Anna spent the whole morning in making the prep- 
arations for her departure. She wrote a few notes to 
her Moscow acquaintances, settled her accounts, and 
packed. To Dolly especially it seemed that she was not 
in a happy frame of mind, but in that state of mental agi- 
tation which Dolly knew from experience arose, not with- 
out excellent reason, from dissatisfaction with herself. 

After dinner Anna went to her room to dress, and 
Dolly followed her. 

" How strange you are to-day ! " said Dolly. 

" I? Do you think so? I am not strange, but I am 
cross. This is common with me. I should like to have 
a good cry. It is very silly, but it will pass away," said 
Anna, speaking quickly, and hiding her blushing face in 
a little bag where she was packing her toilet articles and 
her handkerchiefs. Her eyes shone with tears which she 
could hardly keep back. "I was so loath to come away 
from Petersburg, and now I don't want to go back! 1 ' 

"You came here and you did a lovely thing," said 
Dolly, attentively observing her. 

Anna looked at her with eyes wet with tears. 

"Don't say that, Dolly. I have done nothing, and 
could do nothing. I often ask myself why people say 
things to spoil me. What have I done ? What could I 
do ? You found that your heart had enough love left to 
forgive." .... 

" Without you, .God knows what would have been ! 
How fortunate you are, Anna!" said Dolly. "All is 
serene and pure in your soul." 



ANNA KARENINA 127 

" Every one has a skeleton in his closet, as the English 
say." 

" What skeleton have you, pray ? In you everything 
is so serene." 

" I have mine ! " cried Anna, suddenly ; and an unex- 
pected, crafty, mocking smile hovered over her lips in 
spite of her tears. 

" Well ! in your case the skeleton must be a droll one, 
and not grievous," replied Dolly, with a smile. 

" No ; it is grievous ! Do you know why I go to-day, 
and not to-morrow ? This is a confession which weighs 
me down, but I wish to make it," said Anna, decidedly, 
sitting down in an arm-chair, and looking Dolly straight 
in the eyes. 

And to her astonishment she saw that Anna was 
blushing, even to her ears, even to the dark curls that 
played about the back of her neck. 

" Yes ! " Anna proceeded. " Do you know why Kitty 
did not come to dinner ? She is jealous of me. I spoiled 
.... it was through me that the ball last night was a tor- 
ment and not a joy to her. But truly, truly, I was not 
to blame, — or not much to blame," said she, with a 
special accent on the word ncmnozhko — not much. 

" Oh, how exactly you said that like Stiva ! " remarked 
Dolly, laughing. 

Anna was vexed. 

" Oh, no ! Oh, no ! I am not like Stiva," said she, 
frowning. " I have told you this simply because I do 
not allow myself, for an instant, to doubt myself." 

But the very moment that she said these words, she 
perceived how untrue they were ; she not only doubted 
herself, but she felt such emotion at the thought of 
Vronsky that she took her departure sooner than she 
otherwise would, so that she might not meet him again. 

"Yes, Stiva told me that you danced the mazurka 
with him, and that he...." 

" You cannot imagine how ridiculously it turned out. 
I thought only to help along the match, and suddenly it 
went exactly opposite. Perhaps against my will, I ...." 

She blushed, and did not finish her sentence. 



128 ANNA KARENINA 

"Oh ! these things are felt instantly," said Dolly. 

" I should be in despair if I felt that there was any. 
thing seripus on his part," interrupted Anna; "but 1 
am convinced that all this will be quickly forgotten, 
and that Kitty will not long be angry with me." 

" In the first place, Anna, to tell the truth, I should 
not be very sorry if this marriage fell through. It would 
be vastly better for it to stop right here if Vronsky can 
fall in love with you in a single day." 

" Oh heavens ! that would be so idiotic ! " said Anna, 
and again an intense blush of satisfaction overspread 
her face at hearing the thought that occupied her ex- 
pressed in words. "And that is why I go away, after 
making an enemy of Kitty, whom I loved so dearly. 
Akh ! how sweet she is ! But you will arrange that, 
Dolly ? Won't you ? " 

Dolly could hardly refrain from smiling. She loved 
Anna, but it was pleasant to her to discover that she 
also had her weaknesses. 

"An enemy ? That cannot be ! " 

" And I should have been so glad to have you all love 
me as I love you ; but now I love you all more than 
ever," said Anna, with tears in her eyes. "Akh! how 
absurd I am to-day ! " 

She passed her handkerchief over her eyes, and began 
to get ready. 

At the very moment of her departure came Stepan 
Arkadyevitch with rosy, happy face, and an odor of wine 
and cigars. 

Anna's tender-heartedness had communicated itself 
to Dolly, and, when she kissed her for the last time, she 
whispered : — 

"Think, Anna ! what you have done for me ! I shall 
never forget. And remember that I love you, and al- 
ways shall love you as my best friend ! " 

" I don't understand why," replied Anna, kissing her, 
and struggling with her tears. 

"You have understood me, and you do understand 
me. Farewell, my dearest ! " 1 

1 Proshchaiy moy a pretest ! 



ANNA KARENINA 129 



CHAPTER XXIX 

" Well ! all is over, and thank the Lord ! " was Anna's 
first thought after she had said good-by to her brother, 
who had blocked up the entrance to the railway-carriage, 
even after the third bell had rung. She sat down on 
the divanchik next Annushka, her maid, and began to 
examine the feebly lighted compartment. "Thank the 
Lord ! to-morrow I shall see Serozha and Aleksef Alek- 
sandrovitch, and my good and commonplace life will 
begin again as of old." 

With the same mental preoccupation that had pos- 
sessed her all that day, Anna found a satisfaction in 
attending minutely to the arrangements for the journey. 
With her skilful little hands she opened her red bag, 
and took out a cushion, placed it on her knees, wrapped 
her feet warmly, and composed herself comfortably. 

A lady, who seemed to be an invalid, had already 
gone to sleep. Two other ladies entered into converse 
tion with Anna ; and a fat, elderly dame, well wrapped 
up, expressed her opinion on the temperature. Anna 
exchanged a few words with the ladies, but, not taking 
any interest in their conversation, asked Annushka for 
her traveling-lamp, placed it on the back of her seat, 
and took from her bag a paper-cutter and an English 
novel. At first she could not read ; the going and com- 
ing and the general bustle disturbed her; when once 
the train had started, she could not help listening to 
the noises : the snow striking against the window, and 
sticking to the glass ; the conductor, as he passed with 
the snowflakes melting on his coat ; the remarks about 
the terrible storm, — all distracted her attention. 

Afterwards it became more monotonous : always the 
same jolting and jarring, the same snow on the window, 
the same sudden changes from warmth to cold, and back 
to warmth again, the same faces in the dim light, and 
the same voices. And Anna began to read, and to fol- 
low what she was reading. 

Annushka was already asleep, holding the little red 
vol. 1. — 9 



130 ANNA KARENINA 

bag on her knees with great, clumsy hands, clad in 
gloves, one of which was torn. 

Anna read, and understood what she read ; but it 
was not pleasant to her to read, in other words to enter 
into the lives of other people. She had too keen a 
desire to live herself. If she read how the heroine of 
her story took care of the sick, she would have liked 
to go with noiseless steps into the sick-room. If she 
read how a member of Parliament made a speech, she 
would have liked to make that speech. If she read how 
Lady Mary rode after the hounds, and made sport of 
her sister-in-law, and astonished every one by her au- 
dacity, she would have liked to do the same. But she 
could do nothing ; and with her little hands she clutched 
the paper-cutter, and forced herself to read calmly. 

The hero of her novel had reached the summit of his 
English ambition, — a baronetcy and an estate; and 
Anna felt a desire to go with him to this estate, when 
suddenly it seemed to her that he ought to feel a sense 
of shame, and that she ought to share it. But why should 
he feel ashamed ? " Why should I feel ashamed ? " she 
asked herself with astonishment and discontent. She 
closed the book, and, leaning back against the chair, 
held the paper-cutter tightly in both hands. 

There was nothing to be ashamed of : she reviewed 
all her memories of her visit to Moscow; they were all 
pleasant and good. She remembered the ball, she 
remembered Vronsky and his humble and passionate 
face, she recalled all her relations with him ; there was 
nothing to be ashamed of. But at the same time in 
these reminiscences the sense of shame kept growing 
stronger and stronger ; and it seemed to her that in- 
ward voice, whenever she thought of Vronsky, seemed 
to say, "Warmly, very warmly, passionately." .... 

"Well! what is this?" she asked herself resolutely, 
as she changed her position in the seat. " What does 
this mean ? Am I afraid to face these memories ? Well ! 
what is it ? Is there, can there be, any relationship 
between that boy-officer and me beyond what exists 
between all acquaintances?" 



ANNA KARENINA 131 

She smiled disdainfully, and again took up her book ; 
but now she really could not any longer comprehend 
what she was reading. She rubbed her paper-cutter 
over the pane, and then pressed its cool, smooth surface 
to her cheek, and then she almost laughed out loud with 
the joy that unreasonably took possession of her. She 
felt her nerves grow more and more tense like the 
strings on some musical instrument screwed up to the 
last degree ; she felt her eyes open wider and wider, 
her fingers and her toes twitched nervously, something 
seemed to choke her, and all objects and sounds in the 
wavering semi-darkness surprised her by their exag- 
gerated proportions. She kept having moments of 
doubt as to whether they were going backwards or 
forwards, or if the train had come to a stop. Was it 
Annushka there, sitting next her, or was it a stranger ? 

"What is that on the hook? — my fur shuba or an 
animal? And what am I doing here? Am I myself, 
or some one else ? " 

It was terrible to her to yield to these hallucinations; 
but something kept attracting her to them and she could 
by her own will either yield to them or withdraw from 
them. In order to regain possession of herself, Anna 
arose, took off her plaid and laid aside her pelerine of 
thick cloth. For a moment she thought that she had con- 
quered herself, for when a tall, thin muzhik, dressed in 
a long nankeen overcoat, which lacked a button, came 
in, she recognized in him the stove-tender. She saw 
him look at the thermometer, and noticed how the wind 
and, the snow came blowing in as he opened the door; 
and then everything became confused again. 

The tall peasant began to draw fantastic figures on 
the wall ; the old lady seemed to siretch out her legs, 
and fill the whole carriage as with a black cloud ; then 
she thought she heard a terrible thumping and rapping, 
a noise like something tearing ; then a red and blinding 
fire flashed in her eyes, and then all vanished in dark- 
ness. Anna felt as if she was falling. But this was 
not at all alarming, but rather pleasant. 

The voice of a man all wrapped up, and covered with 



132 ANNA KARENINA 

snow, shouted something in her ear. She started up, 
recovered her wits, and perceived that they were ap. 
proaching a station, and the man was the conductor. 
She bade Annushka give her the pelerine which she had 
laid aside and her handkerchief, and, having put them 
on, she went to the door. 
, "Do you wish to go out ? " asked Annushka. 

" Yes ; I want to get a breath of fresh air. It is very 
hot here." 

And she opened the door. The snow-storm and the 
wind rushed in to meet her and disputed the door with 
her. And this seemed to her very jolly. The storm 
seemed to be waiting for her, it gayly whistled and was 
eager to carry her away ; but she clung to the cold rail- 
ing with one hand, and, holding her dress, she stepped 
out on the platform, and left the car. The wind was 
fierce on the steps, but on the platform, under the shel- 
ter of the station, it was calmer, and she found a genuine 
pleasure in filling her lungs with the frosty air. Stand- 
ing near the car she watched the platform and the sta- 
tion gleaming with lights. 



CHAPTER XXX 

A furious snow-storm was raging, and whistling 
among the wheels of the carriages, around the columns, 
and into the corners of the station. The carriages, the 
pillars, the people, everything visible, were covered, on 
one side with snow, and it was increasing momently. 
Once in a while there would be a lull, but then again it 
blew with such gusts that it seemed impossible to make 
way against it. Meantime a few people were running 
hither and thither, talking gayly, opening and shutting 
the great doors of the station, and making the platform 
planks creak under their feet. The flitting shadow of a 
man passed rapidly by her feet, and she heard the blows 
of a hammer falling on the iron. 

"Send off the telegram," cried an angry voice on the 



ANNA KARENINA 133 

other side of the track in the midst of the drifting 
storm. 

"This way, please, No. 28," cried other voices, and 
several people covered with snow hurried by. Two # 
gentlemen, with lighted cigarettes in their mouths, 
passed near Anna. She was just about to reenter the 
carriage, after getting one more breath of fresh air, and 
had already taken her hand from her muff, to lay hold 
of the railing, when the flickering light from the reflector 
was cut off by a man in a military coat, who came close 
to her. She looked up, and that instant recognized 
Vronsky's face. 

Raising his hand to his vizor he bowed low, and asked 
if she needed anything, if he might not be of service to 
her. 

She looked at him for a considerable time without 
replying, and although he was in the shadow, she saw, 
or thought she saw, the expression of his face and even 
of his eyes. It was a repetition of that respectful ad- 
miration which had so impressed her on the evening 
of the ball. More than once that day she had said to 
herself that Vronsky, for her, was only one of the 
hundred young men whom one meets in society, that 
she would never permit herself to give him a second 
thought ! but now, on the first instant of seeing him 
again, a sensation of pride and joy seized her. She 
had no need to ask why he was there. She knew, as 
truly as if he had told her, that he was there so as to be 
where she was. 

"I did not know that you were going to Petersburg. 
Why are you going ? " said she, letting her hand fall 
from the railing. A joy which she could not restrain 
shone in her face. 

"Why am I going?" he repeated, looking straight 
into her eyes. "You know that I came simply for this, 
— to be where you are," he said. "I could not do 
otherwise." 

And at this instant the wind, as if it had conquered 
every obstacle, blew the snow from the roofs of the 
carriages, and whirled away a piece of sheet-iron 



134 ANNA KARENINA 

which it had torn off, and at the same time the deep 
whistle of the locomotive gave a melancholy, mournful 
cry. Never had the horror of a tempest appeared to 
her more beautiful than now. He had said what her 
heart longed to hear but what her better judgment con- 
demned. She made no reply, but he perceived by her 
face how she fought against herself. 

" Forgive me if what I said displeases you/' he mur- 
mured humbly. 

He spoke respectfully, courteously, but in such a reso- 
lute, decided tone, that for some time she was unable to 
reply. 

" What you said was wrong ; and I beg of you, if you 
are a gentleman, to forget it, as I shall forget it," said 
she at last. 

" I shall never forget, and I shall never be able to 
forget any of your words, any of your gestures .... " 

/'Enough, enough ! " she cried, vainly endeavoring to 
give an expression of severity to her face, at which 
Vronsky was passionately gazing. And grasping the 
cold railing she mounted the steps, and quickly entered 
the vestibule of the carriage. But she stopped in the 
little. vestibule, and tried to recall to her imagination 
what had taken place. But though she found it impos- 
sible to remember either her own words or his, she in- 
stinctively felt that this brief conversation had brought 
them frightfully close together, and she was at once 
alarmed and delighted. After she had stood there a 
few seconds, she went back into the carriage and sat 
down in her place. 

The nervous strain which had been tormenting her not 
only returned, but became more intense, until she began 
to fear every moment that something would snap her 
brain. She did not sleep all night ; but in this nervous 
tension, and in the fantasies which filled her imagina- 
tion, there was nothing disagreeable or painful ; on the 
contrary, it was joyous, burning excitement. 

Toward morning, Anna dozed as she sat in her arm- 
chair; and when she awoke it was broad daylight, and 
the train was approaching Petersburg. Instantly the 



ANNA KARENINA 135 

thought of her home, her husband, her son, and all the 
labors of the day and the coming days, filled her mind. 

The train had hardly reached the station at Peters- 
burg, when Anna stepped out on the platform ; and the 
first person that she saw was her husband waiting for 
her. 

" Oh, good heavens ! Why do his ears stand out so ! " 
she thought, as she looked at his reserved and portly 
figure and especially at his stiff cartilaginous ears, which, 
as they propped up the rim of his round hat, struck her 
for the first time. When he saw her, he came to meet 
her at the carriage, compressing his lips into his habitual 
smile of irony, looking straight at her with his great, 
weary eyes. A disagreeable thought made her heart 
sink when she saw his stubborn, weary look ; she felt 
that she had expected to find him different. Especially 
was she astounded by the feeling of self-dissatisfaction 
which she experienced on meeting him. This feeling 
was associated with her home, akin to the state of hypoc- 
risy which she recognized in her relations with her hus- 
band. This feeling was not novel ; she had felt it before 
without heeding it, but now she realized it clearly and 
painfully. 

"There! you see, I 'm a tender husband, tender as 
the first year of our marriage ; I was burning with desire 
to see you," said he, in his slow, deliberate voice, and 
with the light tone of raillery that he generally used in 
speaking to her, a tone of ridicule of any one who 
should really say such things. 

" Is Serozha well ? " she asked. 

"And is this all the reward," he said, "for my ardor? 
He is well, very well.".... 



CHAPTER XXXI 

Vronsky also had not even attempted to sleep all that 
night. He sat in his arm-chair, now gazing straight for- 
ward, now looking at those who came in and went out, 
and if before he had impressed strangers and irritated 



i 3 6 ANNA KARENINA 

them by his imperturbable dignity, now he would have 
seemed to them far more haughty and self-contained 
He looked at men as if they were things. A nervous 
young man, employed in the district court, was sitting 
opposite him in the carriage, and came to hate him on 
account of this aspect. The young man asked for a 
light, and spoke to him, and even touched him, in order 
to make him perceive that he was not a thing but a 
man ; yet Vronsky looked at him exactly as he looked 
at the carriage-lamp. And the young man made a 
grimace, feeling that he should lose command of him- 
self to be so scorned by a man. 

Vronsky saw nothing, saw no one. He felt as if he 
were a tsar, not because he believed that he had made 
an impression upon Anna, — he did not fully realize 
that, as yet, — but because the impression which she 
had made on him filled him with happiness and pride. 

What would be the outcome of all this he did not 
know, and did not even consider ; but he felt that all 
his hitherto dissipated and scattered powers were now 
concentrating and converging with frightful rapidity 
toward one beatific focus. And he was happy in 
this thought. He knew only that he had told her the 
truth when he said he was going where she was, that 
all the happiness of life, the sole significance of life, he 
found now in seeing and hearing her. And when he left 
his compartment at Bologovo to get a glass of seltzer, 
and he saw Anna, involuntarily his first word told her 
what he thought. And he was glad that he had spoken 
as he did ; glad that she knew all now, and was thinking 
about it. He did not sleep all night. Returning to his 
carriage he did not cease recalling all his memories of 
her, the words that she had spoken, and in his imagina- 
tion glowed the pictures of a possible future which over- 
whelmed his heart. 

When, on reaching Petersburg, he left the carriage, 
after his sleepless night he felt as fresh and vigorous as 
if he had just had a cold bath. He stood near his car- 
riage, waiting to see her pass. " Once more I shall see 
her," he said to himself, with a smile. " I shall see her 



ANNA KARENINA 137 

graceful bearing, her face ; she will speak a word to me, 
will turn her head, will look at me, perhaps she will 
smile on me." 

But it was her husband whom first he saw, politely 
escorted through the crowd by the station-master. 

" Oh, yes ! the husband ! " 

And then Vronsky for the first time clearly realized 
that the husband was an important factor in Anna's life. 
He knew that she had a husband, but he had not realized 
his existence, and he now fully realized it only as he saw 
his head and shoulders, and his legs clothed in black 
trowsers, and especially when he saw this husband un- 
concernedly take her hand with an air of proprietorship. 

When he saw Aleksel* Aleksandrovitch with his 
Petersburgish-fresh face, and his solid, self-confident 
figure, his round hat, and his slightly stooping shoul- 
ders, he began to believe in his existence, and he expe- 
rienced an unpleasant sensation such as a man tormented 
by thirst might experience, who should discover a foun- 
tain, but find that a dog, a sheep, or a pig has been 
drinking and fouling the water. 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's stiff and heavy gait was 
exceedingly distasteful to Vronsky. He would not ac- 
knowledge that any one besides himself had the right 
to love Anna. But she was still the same and the sight 
of her had still the same effect on him, physically kind- 
ling him, stirring him, and filling his heart with joy. 
He ordered his German body-servant, who came hurry- 
ing up to him from the second-class carriage, to see to 
the baggage and to go home ; and he himself went to 
her. Thus he witnessed the first meeting between 
husband and wife, and with a lover's intuition, perceived 
the shade of constraint with which Anna spoke to her 
husband. 

"No, she does not love him, and she cannot love 
him," was his mental judgment. 

Even as he came up to Anna Arkadyevna from behind, 
he noticed with joy that she felt him near her and 
looked round, and having recognized him, she went on 
talking with her husband. 



138 ANNA KARENINA 

"Did you pass a good night ?" he inquired, bowing 
to her and her husband and allowing Alekse'f Aleksan- 
drovitch the opportunity to accept the honor of the salu- 
tation and recognize him or not recognize him as it might 
seem good to him. 

" Thank you, very good," she replied. 

Her face expressed weariness, lacked that spark of 
animation which was generally hovering now in her 
eyes, now in her smile ; but, for a single instant, at the 
sight of Vronsky, something flashed into her eyes, and, 
notwithstanding the fact that the fire instantly died 
away, he was overjoyed even at this. She raised her 
eyes to her husband, to see whether he knew Vronsky. 
AlekseY Aleksandrovitch looked at him with displeasure, 
vaguely remembering who he was. Vronsky's calm 
self-assurance struck upon Alekself Aleksandrovitch's 
cool superciliousness as a scythe strikes a rock. 

" Count Vronsky," said Anna. 

"Ah! We have met before, it seems to me," said 
Alekself Aleksandrovitch with indifference, extending 
his hand. "Went with the mother, and came home 
with the son," said he, speaking with precision, as if 
his words were worth a ruble apiece. " I presume you 
are returning from a furlough ? " And without waiting 
for an answer, he turned to his wife, in his ironical tone, 
"Did they shed, many tears in Moscow on your leaving 
them ? " 

By thus addressing his wife he intended to give 
Vronsky to understand that he desired to be left alone, 
and again bowing to him he touched his hat ; but Vron- 
sky had one more word to say to Anna. 

" I hope to have the honor of calling on you," said 
he. 

Alekself Aleksandrovitch, with weary eyes, looked at 
Vronsky. 

"Very happy," he said coldly; "we receive on Mon- 
days." 

Then, leaving Vronsky entirely, he said to his wife, 
still in a jesting tone : — 

" And how fortunate that I happened to have a spare 



ANNA KARENINA 139 

half-hour to come to meet you, and show you my affec- 
tion." 

"You emphasize your affection too much for me to 
appreciate it," she replied, in the same spirit of raillery, 
involuntarily listening to Vronsky's steps behind them. 
" But what is that to me ? " she asked herself in thought. 
Then she began to ask her husband how Serozha had 
got along during her absence. 

" Oh ! excellently. Mariette says that he has been 
very good, and ....I am sorry to mortify you .... he did 
not seem to miss you — not so much as your husband 
did. But again, merci, my dear, that you came a day 
earlier. . Our dear Samovar will be delighted." 

He called the celebrated Countess Lidya Ivanovna 
by the nickname of the Samovar, because, like a tea- 
urn, she was always and everywhere bubbling and boil- 
ing. " She has kept asking after you ; and do you 
know, if I make bold to advise you, you would do well 
to go to see her to-day. You see, her heart is always 
sore about something. At present, besides her usual 
cares, she is greatly concerned about the reconciliation 
of the Oblonskys." 

The Countess Lidya Ivanovna was a friend of Anna's 
husband, and the center of a certain clique in Peters- 
burg society, to which Anna on her husband's account, 
rather than for any other reason, belonged. 

" Yes ! But did n't I write her ? " 

" She must have all the details. Go to her, my love, 
if you are not too tired. Well ! Kondratu will call 
your carriage, and I am going to a committee-meeting. 
I shall not have to dine alone to-day," continued Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch, not in jest this time. "You cannot 
imagine how used I am to.... " 

And with a peculiar smile, giving her a long pressure 
of the hand, he conducted her to the carriage. 



i 4 o ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XXXII 

The first person to meet Anna when she reached 
home was her son. He darted down-stairs; in spite of 
his governess's reproof, and with wild delight cried, 
" Mamma ! mamma ! " Rushing up to her he threw 
his arms round her neck. 

" I told you it was mamma ! " he shouted to the gov- 
erness. " I knew it was ! " 

But the son, no less than the husband, awakened in 
Anna a feeling like disillusion. She imagined him bet- 
ter than he was in reality. She was obliged to descend 
to the reality in order to look on him as he was. But in 
fact, he was lovely, with his fair curls, his blue eyes, and 
his pretty plump legs in their neatly fitting stockings. 
She felt an almost physical satisfaction in feeling him 
near her, and in his caresses, and a moral calm in looking 
into his tender, confiding, loving eyes, and in hearing 
his innocent questions. She unpacked the gifts sent 
him by Dolly's children, and told him how there was 
a little girl in Moscow, named Tanya, and how this 
Tanya knew how to read, and was teaching the other 
children to read. 

" Am I not as good as she ? " asked Serozha. 

" For me, you are worth all the rest of the world." 

" I know it," said Serozha, smiling. 

Anna had not finished drinking her coffee, when the 
Countess Lidya Ivanovna was announced. The Coun- 
tess Lidya Ivanovna was a tall, stout woman, with an 
unhealthy, sallow complexion, and handsome, dreamy 
black eyes. Anna liked her, but to-day, as if for the 
first time, she saw her with all her faults. 

" Well ! my dear, did you carry the olive-branch ? " 
demanded the Countess Lidya Ivanovna, as she entered 
the room. 

"Yes, it is all made up," replied Anna; "but it was 
not so bad as we thought. As a general thing, my 
sister-in-law is too peremptory." 

But the Countess Lidya, who was interested in every- 



ANNA KARENINA 141 

thing that did not specially concern herself, had the habit 
of sometimes not heeding what did interest her. She 
interrupted Anna : — 

"Well! This world is full of woes and tribulations, 
and I am all worn out to-day." 

"What is it?" asked Anna, striving to repress a 
smile. 

" I am beginning to weary of the ineffectual attempts 
to get at the truth, and sometimes I am utterly discour- 
aged. The work of the Little Sisters " — this was a phil- 
anthropic and religiously patriotic institution — "used 
to get along splendidly, but there is nothing to be done 
with these men," added the Countess Lidya Ivanovna, 
with an air of ironical resignation to fate. " They got 
hold of the idea, they mutilated it, and then they judge 
it so meanly, so wretchedly. Two or three men, your 
husband among them, understand all the significance of 
this work ; but the others only discredit it. Yesterday 
I had a letter from Pravdin .... " 

Pravdin was a famous Panslavist, who lived abroad, 
and the Countess Lidya Ivanovna related what he had 
said in his letter. 

Then she went on to describe the troubles and snares 
that blocked the work of uniting the churches, and 
finally departed in haste, because it was the day for her 
to be present at the meeting of some society or other, 
and at the sitting of the Slavonic Committee. 

"All this is just as it has been, but why did I never 
notice it before ? " said Anna to herself. " Was she very 
irritable to-day ? But at any rate, it is ridiculous : her 
aims are charitable, she is a Christian, and yet she is 
angry with every one, and every one is her enemy ; and 
yet all h6r enemies are working for Christianity and 
charity." 

After the departure of the Countess Lidya Ivanovna, 
came a friend, the wife of a director, who told her all 
the news of the city. At three o'clock she went out, 
promising to be back in time for dinner. AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch was at the meeting of the ministry. The 
hour before dinner, which Anna spent alone, she em- 



i 4 2 . ANNA KARENINA 

ployed sitting with her son, — who had his dinner by 
himself, — in arranging her things, and in reading and 
answering the letters and notes heaped up on her writ- 
ing-table. 

The sensation of causeless shame, and the agitation 
from which she had suffered so strangely during her 
journey, now completely disappeared. Under the con- 
ditions of her ordinary every-day life, she felt calm, and 
free from reproach, and she was filled with wonder as 
she recalled her condition of the night before. 

" What was it ? Nothing. Vronsky said a foolish 
thing; it is easy to put an end to such nonsense, and I 
answered him exactly right. To speak of it to my hus- 
band is unnecessary and impossible. To speak about 
it would seem to attach importance to what has none." 

And she recalled how, when a young subordinate of 
her husband's in Petersburg had almost made her a 
declaration and she had told him about it, Alekse'f Alek- 
sandrovitch answered that as she went into society, she, 
like all society women, might expect such experiences, 
but that he had perfect confidence in her tact, and never 
would permit himself to humiliate her or him by jealousy. 
" Why tell, then ? Besides, thank God, there is nothing 
to tell." 



CHAPTER XXXIII 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch returned from the min- 
istry about four o'clock; but, as often happened, he 
found no time to speak to Anna. He went directly to 
his private room to give audience to some petitioners 
who were waiting for him, and to sign some papers 
brought him by his chief secretary. 

The Karenins always had at least three visitors to 
dine with them ; and that day there came an old lady, 
a cousin of Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch's, a department di- 
rector with his wife, and a young man recommended to 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch for employment. Anna came 
to the drawing-room to receive them at five o'clock pre- 



ANNA KARENINA 143 

cisely. The great bronze clock, of the time of Peter the 
Great, had not yet finished its fifth stroke, when Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch, in white cravat, and with two decora- 
tions on his dress-coat, left his dressing-room ; he had 
an engagement immediately after dinner. Every mo- 
ment of Alekself Aleksandrovitch's life was counted and 
occupied ; and in order to accomplish what he had to do 
every day, he was forced to use the strictest punctuality. 
" Without haste, and without rest/' was his motto. He 
entered the dining-room, bowed to his guests, and, giv- 
ing his wife a smile, hastily sat down. 

"Yes, my solitude is over! You can't believe how 
irksome," — he laid a special stress on the word nelovko, 
irksome, — " it is to dine alone ! " 

During the dinner he talked with his wife about mat- . 
ters in Moscow, and, with his mocking smile, inquired 
especially about Stepan Arkadyevitch ; but the conver- 
sation dwelt for the most part on common subjects, 
about official and social matters in Petersburg. After 
dinner he spent a half-hour with his guests, and then, 
giving his wife another smile, and pressing her hand, he 
left the room and went to the council. 

Anna did not go out that evening either to the Prin- 
cess Betsy Tverskaya's, who, having heard of her arri- 
val, had sent her an invitation ; or to the theater, where 
she just now had a box. She did not go out principally 
because the gown on which she had counted was not 
finished. After the departure of her guests, Anna took 
a general survey of her wardrobe, and was very angry. 
She was extremely clever in dressing at small expense, 
and just before she went to Moscow she had given 
three gowns to her dressmaker to make over. These 
gowns required to be made over in such a way that no 
one would recognize them, and they should have been 
ready three days before. Two of the gowns proved 
to be absolutely unfinished, and one was not made over 
in a way which Anna liked. The dressmaker sought 
to explain what she had done, declaring that her way 
was best ; and Anna reprimanded her so severely that 
afterwards she felt ashamed of herself. To calm her 



i 4 4 ANNA KARENINA 

agitation, she went to the nursery, and spent the whole 
evening with her son, put him to bed herself, made the 
sign of the cross over him, and tucked the quilt about 
him. She was glad that she had not gone out, and 
that she had spent such a happy evening. It was so 
quiet and restful, and now she saw clearly that all that 
had seemed so important during her railway journey 
was only one of the ordinary insignificant events of 
social life, — that she had nothing of which to be 
ashamed, either in her own eyes, or in the eyes of 
others. She sat down in front of the fireplace with her 
English novel, and waited for her husband. At half- 
past ten exactly his ring was heard at the door, and he 
.came into the room. 

"Here you are, at last," she said, giving him her 
hand. He kissed her hand, and sat down near her. 

"Your journey, I see, was on the whole very success- 
ful," said he. 

"Yes, very," she replied; and she began to relate all 
the details from the beginning — her journey with the 
Countess Vronskaya, her arrival, the accident at the 
station, the pity which she had felt, first for her brother, 
and afterwards for Dolly. 

" I do not see how it is possible to pardon such a 
man, even though he is your brother," said Alekse* 
Aleksandrovitch, severely. 

Anna smiled. She appreciated that he said this to 
show that not even kinship could bend him from the 
strictness of his honest judgment. She knew this trait 
in her husband's character, and liked it. 

" I am glad that all ended so satisfactorily, and that 
you have come home again," he continued. " Well ! 
what do they say there about the new measures that 
I introduced in the council ? " 

Anna had heard nothing said about this new measure, 
and she was confused because she had so easily forgotten 
something which to him was so important. 

" Here, on the contrary, it has made a great sensa- 
tion," said he, with a self-satisfied smile. 

She saw that Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch wanted to tell 



ANNA KARENINA 145 

her something very flattering to himself about this 
affair, and, by means of questions, she led him up to 
the story. And he, with the same self-satisfied smile, 
began to tell her of the congratulations which he had 
received on account of this measure, which, had been 
passed. 

" I was very, very glad. This proves that at last 
reasonable and serious views about this question are 
beginning to be formed among us," . 

After he had taken his second glass of tea, with cream 
and bread, Aleksei Aleksandrovitch arose to go to his 
library. 

" But you did not go out ; was it very tiresome for 
you ? " he said. 

" Oh, no ! " she replied, rising with her husband, and 
going with him through the hall to the library. 

" What are you reading now ? " she asked. 

"Just now I am reading the Due de Lille— -Pofcie 
des enfers" he replied, "a very remarkable book." 

Anna smiled, as one smiles at the weaknesses of those 
we love, and, passing her arm through her husband's, 
accompanied him to the library door. She knew that 
his habit of reading in the evening had become inex- 
orable, and that, notwithstanding his absorbing duties, 
which took so much of his time at the council, he felt 
it his duty to follow all that seemed remarkable in the 
sphere of literature. She also knew that while he felt 
a special interest in works on political economy, philoso- 
phy, and religion, art was quite foreign to his nature ; 
and notwithstanding this, or better, for that very reason, 
Aleksei Aleksandrovitch allowed nothing that was at- 
tracting attention in that field to escape his notice, but 
considered it his duty to read everything. She knew 
that in the province of political economy, philosophy, 
religion, AlekseY Aleksandrovitch had doubts, and tried 
to solve them ; but in questions of art or poetry, par- 
ticularly in music, the comprehension of which was 
utterly beyond him, he had the most precise and defi- 
nite opinions. He loved to talk of Shakespeare, Raphael, 
and Beethoven ; of the importance of the new school 

VOL. 1. — IO 



146 ANNA KARENINA 

of music and poetry, — all of. whom were classed by 
him according to the most rigorous logic. 

"Well ! God be with you," she said, as they reached 
the door of the library. Near her husband's arm-chair 
were standing, as usual, the shade-lamp already lighted, 
and a carafe with water. " And I am going to write to 
Moscow." 

Again he pressed her hand, and kissed it. 

"Taken all in all, he is a good man ; upright, excel- 
lent, remarkable in his sphere," said Anna to herself, 
on r her way to her room, as if she was defending him 
from some one who accused him of not being lov- 
able. 

" But why do his ears stick out so ? Or does he cut 
his hair too short ? " 

It was just midnight, and Anna was still sitting at 
her writing-table finishing a letter to Dolly, when meas- 
ured' steps in slippers were heard ; and Alekse'f Alek- 
sandrovitch, who had washed his face and brushed his 
hair, came in with his book under his arm. 

'! Late, late," said he, with his usual smile, and passed 
on to his sleeping-room. 

" And what right had he to look at him so ? " thought 
Anna, recalling Vronsky's expression when he saw Alek- 
seY Aleksandrovitch. Having undressed, she went to 
her room ; but in her face there was none of that ani- 
mation that shone in her eyes and in her smile at Mos- 
cow. On the contrary, the fire had either died away, 
or was somewhere far away and out of sight. 



CHAPTER XXXIV 

On leaving Petersburg, Vronsky had installed his 
beloved friend and comrade, Petritsky, in his ample 
quarters on the Morskaya. 

Petritsky was a young lieutenant, not particularly dis- 
tinguished, and not only not rich, but over ears in debt. 
Every evening he came home tipsy, and he spent much 
of his time at the police courts, in search of strange 






ANNA KARENINA 147 

or amusing or scandalous stories ; but in spite of all 
he was a favorite with his comrades and his chiefs. 

About eleven o'clock in the morning, when Vronsky 
reached his rooms after his journey, he saw at the en- 
trance an izvoshchik's carriage, which he knew very 
well. From the door, when he rang, he heard men's 
laughter and the lisping of a woman's voice, and Petrit- 
sky shouting : — 

" If it 's any of those villains, don't let 'em in." 

Vronsky, not allowing his denshchik to announce his 
presence, quietly entered the anteroom. The Baroness 
Shilton, a friend of Petritsky's, shining in a lilac satin 
robe, and with her little pink face, was making • coffee 
before a round table, and, like a canary-bird, was filling 
the room with her Parisian slang. Petritsky in his 
overcoat, and Captain Kamerovsky in full uniform,- ap- 
parently just from duty, were sitting near her. 

"Bravo, Vronsky!" cried Petritsky, leaping up and 
overturning the chair. " The master himself. Baron- 
ess, coffee for him from the new coffee-pot ! We. did 
not expect you. I hope that you are pleased with the 
new ornament in your library," he said, pointing to the 
baroness. " You are acquainted, are n't you ? " 

"I should think so!" said Vronsky, smiling gayly, 
and squeezing the baroness's dainty little hand. " We 're 
old friends." * - r . 

" Are you back from a journey ? " asked the baroness. 
" Then I 'm off. Akh ! I am going this minute if I am 
in the way." 

"You are at home wherever you are, baroness," said 
Vronsky. " How are you, Kamerovsky ? " coolly shak- 
ing hands with the captain. 

" There now ! you would never think of saying such 
lovely things as that," said the baroness to Petritsky. 

" No ? Why not ? After dinner I could say better 
things!" 

"Yes, after dinner there's no more merit in them. 
Well ! I will make your coffee while you go and wash 
your hands and brush off the dust," said the baroness, 
again sitting down, and industriously turning the screw 



148 ANNA KARENINA 

of the new coffee-pot. " Pierre, bring some more coffee," 
said she to Petritsky, whom she called Pierre, after his 
family name, making no concealment of her intimacy 
with him. "I will add it." 
' " You will spoil it." 

"No! I won't spoil it. Well! and your wife?" said 
the baroness/ suddenly interrupting Vronsky's remarks 
to his companions. " We have been marrying you off. 
Did you bring your wife ? V 

" "No, 'baroness. I was born a Bohemian, and I shall 
die. a Bohemian." 

"So much the better, so much the better; give us 
your hand ! " 

And the baroness, without letting him go, began to 
talk with him, developing her various plans of life, and 
asking his advice with many jests* 

" He will never be willing to let me have a divorce. 
Well! what am I to do ? \He was her husband.] I now 
mean to institute a lawsuit. What should you think of 
it ? .... Kamerovsky, just watch the coffee ! It 's boiling 
over. .'... You see how well I understand business ! I 
mean to begin a lawsuit to get control of my fortune. 
Do you understand this nonsense ? Under the pretext 
that I have been unfaithful," said she, in a scornful tone, 
"he means to get possession of my estate." 

Vronsky listened with amusement to this gay prattle 
of the pretty woman, approved of what she said, gave 
her half*jesting advice, and assumed the tone he usually 
affected with women of her character. In his Peters- 
burg" world, humanity was divided into two absolutely 
distinct categories, — the one of a low order, trivial, 
stupid, and above all ridiculous people, who declared 
that one" husband ought to live with one wedded wife, 
that girls should be virtuous, women chaste, men brave, 
temperate, and upright,*occupied in bringing up their 
children decently, in earning their bread, and paying 
their debts, and other such absurdities. People of this 
kind were old-fashioned and ridiculous. 

But there was another and vastly superior class, to 
which he. and his .friends belonged, and in this the chief 



ANNA KARENINA 149 

requirement was that its members should be elegant, 
generous, bold, gay, unblushingly given over to every 
passion, and scornful of all the rest. 

Only for the first moment was Vronsky bewildered 
under the impressions which he had brought back from 
Moscow, of an entirely different world. But soon, and 
as naturally as one puts on old slippers, be got into the 
spirit of his former gay and jovial life. 

The coffee was never served; it boiled over, spattered 
them all, and wet a costly' table-cloth and the baroness's 
dress; but it served the end that was' desired, for it 
gave rise to many jests and merry peals of laughter. 

" Well, now, good-by, for you will never get dressed, 
and I shall have on my conscience the worst crime that 
a decent man can commit, —that Of not taking, a bath. 
.... So you advise me to put the knife to his throat? 7 

"By all means, and in such a way that your -little 
hand will come near his 'lips. He will kiss your little 
hand, and all will end to everybody's satisfaction, M said 
Vronsky. 

"This evening at the Theatre Fmncais" and she took 
her departure with her rustling train. , n /i 

Kamerovsky likewise arose, but Vronsky, .without 
waiting for him to go, shook hands with him,; and went 
to his dressing-room. While he, was taking his bath, 
Petritsky sketched for him in a few lines his situation, 
and how it had changed during Vronsky's absence, — 
no money at all ; his father declaring that he would not 
give him any more, or "pay a single debt. One tailor 
determined to have him arrested, and a second no lqss 
determined. His colonel insisted that> if these scandals 
continued, he should leave the regiment. The baroness 
was as annoying to him as a bitter radish, principally 
because she was always wanting to squander money,; 
" but she is a daisy, a charmer," he assured Vronsky, 
" in the strict Oriental style, ~your servant Rebecca 
kind, you know." He had been having a quarrel with 
Berkoshef, and he wanted to send him his seconds, but 
he imagined nothing would come of it. As for the rest, 
everything was getting along particularly jolly, 



150 ANNA KARENINA 

And then, without leaving Vronsky time to realize 
the minutiae of his situation, Petritsky began to retail 
the news of the day. As he listened to Petritsky's well- 
known gossip, in the familiar environment of his quar- 
ters where he had lived for three years, Vronsky ex- 
perienced the pleasant sensation of his return to his 
gay and idle Petersburg life. 

" It cannot be ! " he cried, as he turned the faucet of 
his wash-stand and let the water stream over his red, 
healthy neck; "it cannot be!" he cried, referring to 
the report that Laura had taken up with Mileef and 
thrown Fertinghof over. "And is he as stupid and 
as conceited as ever ?.... Well, and how about Buzulu- 
kof?" 

"Akh! Buzulukof! here 's a good story, fascinating ! " 
said Petritsky. " You know his passion, — balls ; and 
he never misses one at court. At the last one he went 
in a new helmet. Have you seen the new helmets ? 
Very handsome, .... light. Well, he was standing.... 
No ; but listen." 

" Yes, I am listening," replied Vronsky, rubbing his 
face with a towel. 

"The grand duchess was just going by on the arm 
of some foreign ambassador or other, and unfortunately 
for him their conversation turned on the new helmets. 
The grand duchess wanted to point out one of the new 
helmets, and, seeing our galubchik standing there," — 
here Petritsky showed how he stood in his helmet, — 
"she begged him to show her his helmet. He did not 
budge. What does it mean ? The fellows wink at him, 
make signs, scowl at him. ' Give it to her.' .... He does 
not stir. He is like a dead man. You can imagine the 
scene!.... Now ....as he.... then they attempt to take it 

off He won't let it go ! .... At last he himself takes it 

off, and hands it to the grand duchess. 

" * Here, this is the new kind,' said the grand duch- 
ess. But, as she turned it over, — you can imagine it 
— out came, bukh ! pears, bonbons,.. ..two pounds of 
bonbons ! .... He had been to market, galubchik!" 

Vronsky burst out laughing; and long afterwards, 



ANNA KARENINA 151 

even when speaking of other things, the memory of 
the unfortunate helmet caused him to break out into 
a good-natured laugh which showed his handsome, regu- 
lar teeth. 

Having learned all the news, Vronsky donned his uni- 
form with the aid of his valet, and went out to report 
himself. After he had reported, he determined to go 
to his brother's, to Betsy's, and to make a few calls, so 
as to secure an entry into the society where he should 
be likely to see Madame Karenina ; and in accordance 
with the usual custom at Petersburg, he left his rooms, 
expecting to return only when it was very late at night. 



PART SECOND 



CHAPTER I 

TOWARD the end of the winter the Shcherbatskys 
held a consultation of physicians in order to find out 
what was the state of Kitty's health, and what measures 
were to be taken to restore her strength ; she was ill, 
and the approach of spring only increased her ailment. 
The family doctor had ordered cod-liver oil, then iron, 
and last of all, nitrate of silver ; but as none of these 
remedies did any good, and as he advised them to take 
her abroad, it was then resolved to consult a celebrated 
specialist. 

This celebrated doctor, still a young man, and very 
neat in his appearance, insisted on a careful investiga- 
tion of the trouble. He with especial satisfaction, as it 
seemed, insisted that maidenly modesty is only a relic 
of barbarism, and that nothing is more natural than that 
a young man should make examination of a girl in un- 
dress. He found this natural because he did it every 
day, and he was conscious of no impropriety in it, as 
far as he could see ; and, therefore, any sense of shame 
on the part of the girl he considered not only a relic of 
barbarism, but also an insult to himself. 

It was necessary to submit, since, notwithstanding the 
fact that all the other doctors were taught in the same 
school and studied the same books, and notwithstanding 
the fact that certain persons declared that this celebrated 
doctor was a bad doctor, yet in the princess's house and 
in her circle of friends it was admitted somehow that 
this celebrated doctor was the only one known who had 
the special knowledge, and was the only one who could 
save Kitty's life. After a careful examination and a 
prolonged thumping on the lungs of the poor sick girl, 

152 



ANNA KARENINA 153 

trembling with mortification, the celebrated physician 
carefully washed his hands, and returned to the draw- 
ing-room, and gave his report to the prince. 

The prince, with a little cough, listened to what he 
had to say, and frowned. He was a man of experience 
and brains, was in good health, and he had no faith in 
medicine. He was all the more angry at this comedy, 
because possibly he alone understood what ailed his 
daughter. 

"A regular humbug," 1 thought the old prince, as he 
listened to the doctor's loquacity concerning the symp- 
toms of his daughter's illness, mentally applying to the 
celebrated doctor a term from the vocabulary of hunting. 

The doctor, on his part, with difficulty disguised his 
disdain, with difficulty stooped to the low level of his 
intelligence, for this old gentleman. It seemed to him 
scarcely necessary to speak to the old man, since, in his 
eyes, the head of the house was the princess. He was 
ready to pour out before her all the floods of his elo- 
quence. At this moment she came in with the family 
doctor. The prince left the room, so as not to show 
too clearly how ridiculous this whole comedy seemed 
to him. The princess was troubled, and did not know 
what course to take. She felt a little guilty in regard 
to Kitty, 

" Well ! Doctor, decide on our fate," said the prin- 
cess ; "tell me all." 

She wanted to say, " Is there any hope ? " but her 
lips trembled, and she could not put this question to 
him. "Well, doctor?" 

"In a moment, princess, I shall be at your service, 
after I have conferred with my colleague. I shall then 
have the honor of giving you my opinion." 

"Do you wish to be alone?" 

"Just as you please." 

The princess sighed, and left the room. 

When the doctors were left alone, the family physi- 
cian began timidly to express his opinion about her 

1 Piistobrekh, empty barker, signifying one who has had no luck, but 
comes home with large stories.- — Tr. 



i 54 ANNA KARENINA 

condition, and gave his reasons for thinking that it was 
the beginning of tubercular disease, but .... 

The celebrated physician listened, and in the midst of 
his diagnosis took out his great gold watch. 

"Yes," said he, "but':..." 

The family physician stopped respectfully. 

"You know that we can hardly decide when tubercu- 
lar disease first begins. In the present case, apparently 
there is as yet no decided lesion. We can only surmise. 
And the symptoms are : indigestion, nervousness, and 
others. The question, therefore, stands thus : What is 
to be done, granting that a tubercular development is to 
be feared, in order to superinduce improved alimenta- 
tion ?" 

" But you know well, in such cases there are always 
some moral or spiritual causes," said the family doctor, 
with a cunning smile. 

"Of course," replied the celebrated doctor, looking 
at his watch again. "Excuse me, but do you know 
whether the bridge over the Ya'usa is finished yet, 
or whether one has to go around? Oh, it is finished, 
is it ? Well ! Then I have twenty minutes left. — 
We were just saying that the question remains thus : 
to improve the digestion, and strengthen the nerves ; 
the one is connected with the other, and it is necessary 
to act on both halves of the circle." 

" But the journey abroad ? " 

" I am opposed to these journeys abroad. I beg you 
to follow my reasoning. If tubercular development has 
already set in, which we are not yet in a condition to 
prove, then a journey abroad would do no good. The 
main thing is to discover a means of promoting good 
digestion." 

And the celebrated doctor began to develop his plan 
for a cure by means of Soden water, the principal merits 
of which were, in his eyes, their absolutely inoffensive 
character. 

The family doctor listened with attention and re- 
spect. 

" But I should urge in favor of a journey abroad the 



ANNA KARENINA 155 

change of her habits and dissociation from the con 
ditions that serve to recall unhappy thoughts. And 
finally, her mother wants her to go," 

" Ah, well, in that case let them go, provided always 
that those German charlatans do not aggravate her 
disease They must follow.... Yes ! let them travel." 

And again he looked at his watch. 

" It is time for me to go ; " and he started for the 
door. 

The celebrated doctor explained to the princess that 
he wished to see the invalid once more — a sense of 
propriety dictated this. 

"What ! have another examination ?" cried the prin- 
cess, with horror. 

" Oh, no ! only a few minor points, princess." 

"Then come in, I beg of you." 

And the mother ushered the doctor into the drawing- 
room where Kitty was. Emaciated and flushed, with a 
peculiar gleam in her eyes, the result of the mortifica- 
tion she had borne, Kitty was standing in the middle of 
the room. When the doctor came in her eyes filled 
with tears, and she turned crimson. Her whole illness 
and the medical treatment seemed to her such stupid, 
even ridiculous nonsense. The medical treatment of her 
case seemed to her as absurd as to gather up the frag- 
ments of a broken vase. Her heart was broken, and 
could it be healed by pills and powders ? But it was 
impossible to wound her mother's feelings, the more be- 
cause her mother felt that she had been to blame. 

"Will you sit down, princess?" said the celebrated 
doctor. 

With a smile he sat down in front of her, felt her 
pulse, and with a smile began a series of wearisome 
questions. At first she replied to them, then suddenly 
arose impatiently. 

"Excuse me, doctor; but, indeed, this all leads to 
nothing. This is the third time that you have asked 
me the same question." 

The celebrated doctor took no offense. 

"It is -her nervous irritability," he remarked to the 



156 ANNA KARENINA 

princess when Kitty had gone from the room. " How- 
ever, I had finished." .... 

And the celebrated doctor explained the young prin- 
cess's condition to her mother, treating her as a woman 
of remarkable intelligence, and concluded with direc- 
tions how to drink those waters which were valueless. 

On the question, *t Is it best to take her abroad ? " the 
doctor pondered deeply, as if he were deciding a diffi- 
cult problem. The decision was at last expressed : * Go, 
but put no faith in charlatans, and consult him in every- 
thing. 1 

After the doctor's departure, everybody felt as if 
something jolly had happened. The mother, in much 
better spirits, rejoined her daughter, and Kitty declared 
that she was better already. Often, almost all the time, 
of late, she felt obliged to pretend. 

" Truly, I am well, matnan, but if you desire it, let us 
go," said she;- and in her endeavor to show that she 
was interested in the journey, she began to speak of 
their preparations. 



CHAPTER II 

Shortly after the doctor went, Dolly came. She 
knew that the consultation was to take place that day ; 
and though she was as yet scarcely able to go out, hav- 
ing had a little daughter toward the end of the winter, 
and although she had many trials and cares of her own, 
she left her nursing baby and one of the little girls who 
was ailing, and came to learn what Kitty's fate should be. 

"Well ! how is it ? " she said, as she came into the 
drawing-room with her hat on. "You are all happy! 
Then all is well?" 

They endeavored to tell her what the doctor had 
said; but it seemed that, although the doctor had 
spoken very fluently and lengthily, no one was able to 
tell what he had said. The only interesting point was 
the decision in regard to the journey abroad. 

Dolly sighed involuntarily. Her sister, -her best 




ANNA KARENINA 157 

friend, was going away ; and life for her was not joy- 
ous. Her relations with Stepan Arkadyevitch since 
the reconciliation had become humiliating; the union 
brought about by Anna had not been of long duration, 
and the family concord had broken down in the same 
place. There was nothing definite, but Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch was scarcely ever at home, there was scarcely 
ever any money in the house, and suspicions of his 
unfaithfulness constantly tormented Dolly, but she kept 
driving them away in terror of the unhappiness which 
jealousy caused her. The first explosion of jealousy, 
having been lived down, could not indeed be experi- 
enced again ; and even the discovery of his unfaithful- 
ness could not have such an effect on her as it had the 
first time. Such a discovery now would only break up the 
family, and she preferred to shut her eyes to his decep- 
tion, despising him, and above all herself, because of this 
weakness. Moreover, the cares of a numerous family 
constantly annoyed her ; first the nursing of her baby 
was unsatisfactory, then the nurse went off, and now one 
of the children was ill. 

" And how are the children ? " asked the princess. 

"Akh , maman / we have so many tribulations. Lili 
is ill in bed, and I am afraid it is the scarlatina. I 
came out now to see how you were, for there'll be no 
getting out for me after this, if it is scarlatina — which 
God forbid I " 

The old prince also, after the doctor's departure, came 
out from his library, presented his cheek to Dolly, ex- 
changed a few words with her, and then turned to his 
wife : — 

" What decision have you come to ? Shall you go ? 
Well ! and what are you going to do with me ? " 

"I think, Aleksandr, that you had better stay at 
home." 

" Just as you please." 

u Maman, why doesn't papa come with us?" said 
Kitty. " It would be gayer for him and for us." 

The old prince got up and smoothed Kitty's hair with 
his hand ; she raised her head, and with an effort smiled 



158 ANNA KARENINA 

as she looked at him ; it always seemed to her that he 
understood her better than any one else in the family, 
though he did not say much. She was the youngest, 
and therefore her father's favorite daughter, and it 
seemed to her that his love made him clairvoyant. 
When she saw his kind blue eyes steadily fixed on her, 
it seemed to her that he read her very soul, and saw all 
the evil that was working there. She blushed, and bent 
toward him, expecting a kiss ; but he only pulled her 
hair, saying: — 

"These stupid chignons! one never gets down to 
the real daughter, but you caress the hair of departed 
females. Well ! Dolinka," turning to his eldest daugh- 
ter, " what is that trump of yours doing ? " 

"Nothing, papa," said Dolly, perceiving that her 
father referred to her husband ; " he is always away 
from home, and I scarcely ever see him," she could not 
refrain from adding, with an ironical smile. 

" Has he not gone yet to the country to sell his 
wood ? " 

" No ; he is always putting.it off." 

"Truly," said the old prince, "is he taking after me ? 
— I hear you," he said in reply to his wife, and sitting 
down. "And as for you, Katya," he said, addressing his 
youngest daughter, "do you know what you ought to 
do? Sometime, some fine morning, wake up and say, 
' There ! I am perfectly well and happy, papa, and we 
must go for our early morning walk in the cold,' ha ? " 

What her father said seemed very simple, but at his 
words Kitty felt confused and disconcerted like a con- 
victed criminal. "Yes, he knows all, he understands 
all, and these words mean that I ought to overcome my 
humiliation, however great it has been." 

She could not summon up the courage to reply. She 
began to say something, but suddenly burst into tears, 
and ran from the room. 

"Just like your tricks!" said the princess to her 
husband, angrily. " You always .... " and she began one 
of her tirades. 

The prince listened for some time to her reproaches, 



ANNA KARENINA 159 

and made no reply, but his face kept growing darker 
and darker. 

" She is so sensitive, poor little thing, so sensitive ! 
and you don't understand how she suffers at the slight- 
est allusion to the cause of her suffering. Akh ! how 
mistaken we are in people ! " said the princess. 

And by the change in the inflection of her voice, 
Dolly and the prince perceived that she had reference 
to Vronsky. 

"I don't understand why there are not any laws to 
punish such vile, such ignoble men." 

"Akh! do hear her," said the prince with a frown, 
getting up from his chair and evidently anxious to make 
his escape, but halting on the threshold : — 

"There are laws, matushka; and if you force me to 
this, I will tell you who is to blame in all this trouble. 
You, you alone ! There are laws against such young 
fops, and there always will be ; and if things had not 
been as they ought never to have been, old man that I 
am, I should have put that dandy on the fence. Yes, 
and now to cure her, you bring in these quacks." 

The prince would have had still more to say, but as 
soon as the princess heard his tone she immediately 
became humble and repentant, as always happened when 
important questions came up. 

"Alexandre! Alexandre!" she murmured, going up 
to him, and weeping. 

The prince held his peace when he saw her tears. 
He went to meet her : — 

"Well, let it go, let it go. I know that it is hard for 
you also. What is to be done? There is no great 

harm. God is merciful Thank you!" said he, not 

knowing what he said, and replying to the princess's 
damp kiss which he felt on his hand. Then the prince 
left the room. 

As soon as Kitty, weeping, had left the room, Dolly, 
with her maternal domestic instinct, perceived that this 
was an affair which required a woman's management, 
and she was preparing to follow her. She took her hat 
and morally tucking up her sleeves, prepared to act 



160 ANNA KARENINA 

But when her mother began to attack her father, she 
tried to restrain her, as far as her filial respect allowed. 
When the prince's outburst occurred, she said nothing ; 
she was ashamed for her mother and she felt a deep 
affection because of the instant return of his good- 
nature ; but when he went out, she determined to do 
the chief thing that was necessary — to go to Kitty 
and calm hen 

" I have long wanted to tell you, maman; did you 
know that when Levin was here the last time, he in- 
tended to offer himself to Kitty? He told Stiva." 

"What is that ? I do not understand .... " 

" Then perhaps Kitty refused him ? .... Did n't she tell 
you?" 

"No, she did not say anything to me about either of 
them ; she is too proud. But I know that all this comes 
from...." 

" Yes ; but think, if she refused Levin. I know 
that she would not, have done so if it had not been for 
the other one.*., and then he deceived her so abom- 
inably." 

•It was terrible to the princess to think how blame- 
worthy she had been toward her daughter, and she grew 
angry. 

" Akh ! I don't know anything about it. Nowadays 
every girl wants to live as she pleases, and not to say 
anything to her mother, and so it comes that .... "' 

"Maman, I am going to see her." 

" Go ! I will not prevent you," said her mother. 



CHAPTER III 

As she entered Kitty's pretty little rosy boudoir, with 
figurines in vieux saxe, a room as youthful, as rosy, as 
gay as Kitty herself hid been two months before, 
Dolly remembered with what pleasure and interest the 
two had decorated it the year before ; how happy and 
gay they were then! She felt a chill at her heart as 
she saw her sister sitting on a low chair near the door, 



ANNA KARENINA 161 

her motionless eyes fixed' on a corner of the carpet. 
Kitty glanced up at her sister, but the cold and rather 
stern expression of her face underwent no change. 

" I am going now, and I may be confined at home, 
and it will be impossible for you to see me," said Darya 
Aleksandrovna, sitting down near her sister; "I wanted 
to have a little talk with you." 

" What about ? " asked Kitty, quickly raising her head 
in alarm. 

" What else than about your sorrow ? " 

"I have no sorrow." 

"That'll do, Kitty. "Do you really imagine that I 
don't know? I know everything; and believe me, this 
is such a trifle.... All of us have been through this." 

Kitty said nothing, and her face resumed its severe 
expression, 

"He is not worth the trouble that you have given 
yourself because of him," continued Darya Aleksan- 
drovna, coming right to the point. 

"Yes ! because he jilted me! " murmured Kitty, with 
trembling voice. "Don't speak of it, please don't 
speak of it ! " 

"But who said that to you? No one said such a 
thing ! I am sure that he was in love with you, — that 
he is still in love with you ; but .... " 

"Ah! nothing exasperates me so as compassion," 
cried Kitty, in a sudden rage. She turned around in 
her chair, flushed scarlet, and moved her belt-buckle 
back and forth from one hand to the other, clutching 
it in her fingers. 

Dolly well knew this habit of her sister when she was 
provoked. She knew that she was capable of forgetting 
herself, and saying harsh and cruel things in moments 
of. petulance, and she tried to calm her; but it was too 
late. 

" What, what do you wish me to understand ? what is 
it ? " cried Kitty, talking fast : — "that I was in love with 
a man who did not care for me, and that I am dying 
of love for him ? And it is my sister who says this to 
me! — my sister who thinks that .... that.... that .... she 

VOL. I. — II 



16a ANNA KARENINA 

is showing me her sympathy'! .... I hate such sympathy 
and such hypocrisy ! " 

" Kitty, you are unjust," 

"Why do you torment me?" 

a Why, on the contrary .... I saw that you were sad ...." 

Kitty in her anger did not heed her. 

"I have nothing to break my heart over, and need no 
consolation. I am too proud ever to love a man who 
does not love me." 

"Well ! I do not say .... I say only one thing .... Tell 
me the truth," added Darya Aleksandrovna, taking her 
hand. "Tell me, did Levin speak to you ? ".... 

At the name of Levin, Kitty lost all control of her- 
self ; she sprang up from her chair, threw the buckle on 
the floor, and with quick, indignant gestures cried : — 

" Why do you speak to me of Levin ? I don't see 
why you need to torment me. I have already said, and 
I repeat it, that I am proud, and never, never would I do 
what you have done, — go back to a man who had been 
false to me, who had made love to another woman. I 
do not understand this ; you can, but I cannot ! '.' 

As she said these words, she looked at her sister, and 
seeing that Dolly bent her head sadly without answering, 
she sat down near the door again, and hid her face in 
her handkerchief instead of leaving the room as she had 
intended to do. 

The silence lasted several minutes. Dolly was think- 
ing of herself. Her humiliation, of which she was always 
conscious, appeared to her more cruel than ever, thus 
recalled by her sister. , She did not expect such bitter- 
ness from her sister, and it made her angry. But sud- 
denly she heard the rustling of a dress, a broken sob, 
and some one's arms were thrown around her neck. 
Kitty was on her knees before her. 

" Dolinka, I am so unhappy ! " she murmured in ex- 
culpation ; and her pretty face, wet with tears, was hid 
in Dolly's skirt. 

Those tears were evidently the indispensable lubricant 
without which the machinery of mutual communion 
between the two sisters could not work. At all events, 



ANNA KARENINA 163 

after a good cry, they spoke no more on the subject 
which interested them both, but even while they were 
talking about irrelevant topics they understood each, 
other. Kitty knew that the cruel words that she had 
uttered in her anger, about the husband's unfaithfulness 
— the unfaithfulness of Dolly's husband — and her hu- 
miliation, struck deep into her poor sister's heart, but 
that she forgave her. Dolly, on her side, knew all that 
she wanted to know, she was convinced that her suspi- 
cions were correct, that the pain Kitty felt, the irremedia- 
ble pain, lay in the fact that Levin had offered himself to 
her, and that she had refused him, and that Vronsky had 
played her false, and that she was ready to love Levin 
and to hate Vronsky. Kitty said not a word about this; 
she spoke only of the general state of her soul. 

" I have no sorrow," she said, regaining her calmness 
a little ; " but you cannot imagine how wretched, disgust- 
ing, and vulgar everything seems to me — above all my- 
self. You cannot imagine what evil thoughts come 
into my mind." 

" Yes, but what evil thoughts can you have?" asked 
Dolly, with a smile. 

"The most abominable, the most repulsive. I can- 
not describe them to you. It is not melancholy, and it 
is not ennui. It is much worse. It is as if all the good 
that was in me had disappeared, and only the evil was 
left. Now how can that be, I tell you?" she asked, 
looking in perplexity into her sister's eyes. "Papa 

began to say something to me a few minutes ago It 

seems to me he thinks that all I need is a husband. 
Mamma takes me to the ball. It seems to me that she 
takes me there for the sole purpose of getting rid of me, 
of getting me married as soon as possible. I know that 
it is not true, and yet I cannot drive away these ideas. 
So-called marriageable young men are unendurable to 
me. It always seems to me that they are taking my 
measure. A short time ago, to go anywhere in a ball 
gown was a simple delight to me ; I admired myself, I 
enjoyed it ; now it is a bore to me, and I feel ill at ease. 
Now, what do you think ? .... The doctor .... well .... " 



1 64 ANNA KARENINA 

Kitty stopped ; she wanted to say further that, since 
she had felt this great change in herself, Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch had become unendurably distasteful to her, 
that she could not see him without the most repulsive 
and unbecoming conjectures arising in her mind. 

"Indeed, everything takes the most repulsive, dis- 
gusting aspect in my sight," she continued. " It is a 
disease, — perhaps it will pass away." 

" But don't for a moment think...." 

" I cannot help it. I do not feel at ease except with 
you and the children." 

"What a pity that you can't come home with me 
now!" 

" Well, I will go. I have had scarlatina. I will per- 
suade maman." 

Kitty insisted so eagerly, that she was allowed to go 
to her sister's, and throughout the course of the disease, 
— which proved to be the scarlatina, — she looked after 
the children. The two sisters successfully nursed all 
the six children ; but Kitty's health did not improve, 
and at Lent the Shcherbatskys went abroad. 



CHAPTER IV 

The highest Petersburg society is remarkably united. 
Every one knows every one else, and every one exchanges 
visits. But in this great circle there are subdivisions. 
Anna Arkadyevna Karenina had friends and close re- 
lations with three different circles. One was the official 
circle, to which her husband belonged, composed of his 
colleagues and subordinates, bound together, or even 
further subdivided, by the most varied, and often the 
most capricious, social relations. It was now difficult 
for Anna to call back the sentiment of almost religious 
respect which at first she felt for all these personages. 
Now she knew them all, as one knows people in a pro- 
vincial city. She knew what habits and weaknesses 
were characteristic of each, and what feet the shoe 
pinched. She knew what were their relations among 



ANNA KARENINA 165 

themselves, and to the official center. She knew how 
this one agreed with that and on what grounds, and how 
another disagreed with still another, and wherefore. 
But this administrative clique, to which her husband 
belonged, could never interest her, in spite of the Coun- 
tess Lidya Ivanovna's suggestions, and she avoided it. 

The second circle in which Anna moved was that 
which had helped Alekse* Aleksandrovitch in his career. 
The center of this circle was the Countess Lidya Iva- 
novna ; it was composed of aged, ugly, charitable, and 
devout women, and intelligent, learned, and ambitious 
men. One of the clever men who belonged to this cir- 
cle had called it the "conscience of Petersburg society." 
Karenin was very much devoted to this circle ; and 
Anna, who had the faculty of getting along with all peo- 
ple, had, during the early days of her life in Petersburg, 
made friends in its number. After her return from 
Moscow, this set of people seemed to her insupportable ; 
it seemed as if she herself, as well as all the rest of 
them, were hypocritical, and she felt depressed and ill 
at ease in this society. She saw the Countess Lidya as 
infrequently as she possibly could. 

Finally, the third circle in which Anna had connec- 
tions was Society, properly speaking, the fashionable 
society of balls, dinner-parties, brilliant toilets — the 
society which with one hand lays fast hold of 'the court 
lest it descend to the level of the demi-monde, which the 
members of this circle affect to despise, and yet whose 
tastes are not only similar, but the same. The bond 
that united her to this society was the Princess Betsy 
Tverskaya, the wife of one of her cousins, who enjoyed 
an income of a hundred and twenty thousand rubles, 
and who had taken a great fancy to Anna as soon as 
she came to Petersburg, flattered her, introduced her 
among her friends, and made ridicule of the Countess 
Lidya's friends. 

" When I am old and ugly, I will do the same," said 
Betsy ; " but a young and pretty woman like yourself 
has as yet no place in such an asylum." 

Anna at first had avoided as far as possible the society 



166 ANNA KARENINA 

to which the Princess Betsy Tverskaya belonged, as it 
called for expenses beyond her means, and in her heart 
she preferred the first-mentioned coterie ; but after her 
visit to Moscow all this was changed. She neglected her 
worthy old friends, and cared to go only into grand soci- 
ety. There she met Vronsky, and experienced tumultu- 
ous pleasure in these meetings. They met with especial 
frequency at the house of Betsy, who was a Vronskaya 
before her marriage, and was an own cousin of the count. 
Vronsky went everywhere that he was likely to meet 
Anna, and, if possible, spoke to her of his love. She 
gave him no encouragement ; but every time she met 
him, there flamed up in her soul the same sense of ani- 
mation which had seized her the moment that they met, 
for the first time, on the' train at Moscow; she herself 
was conscious that at the sight of him this joy shone in 
her eyes, in her smile, but she had not the power to 
hide it. 

Anna at first sincerely believed that she was angry 
because he persisted in following her ; but one evening, 
not long after her return from Moscow, when she was 
present at a house where she expected to meet him, 
and he failed to come, she perceived clearly, by the 
pang that went through her heart, that she was deceiv- 
ing herself, that this insistence of his not only was not 
disagreeable to her but that it formed the ruling passion 
of her life. 

A famous diva was singing for the second time, and 
all the high society of Petersburg was at the theater. 
Vronsky, from his seat in the first row saw his cousin 
there, and without waiting for the entr'acte, left to visit 
her box. 

" Why did n't you come to dinner ? " she asked ; and 
then with a smile she added, so as to be heard only by 
him, " I admire this clairvoyance of lovers ; she was not 
there. But come to my house after the opera." 

Vronsky looked at her questioningly. She nodded. 
He thanked her with a smile and sat down by her side. 

"But how I miss your pleasantries; what have be- 




ANNA KARENINA 167 

come of them ? " continued the Princess Betsy, who fol- 
lowed with keen pleasure the progress of this passion, 
" You are in the toils, my dear ! " 

"That is all that I ask for," he replied, with his calm, 
good-natured smile, " to be in the toils. If I complain, 
it is not because I am too little in the toils if the truth 
must be told. I am beginning to lose hope." 

"What hope could you have?" asked Betsy, taking 
the part of her friend. " Let us have a clear under- 
standing." But the fire in her eyes told with sufficient 
clearness that she understood as well as he did what his 
hope meant. 

"None," replied Vronsky, laughing, and showing his 
regular white teeth. " Excuse me," he added, taking 
the opera-glasses from his cousin's hand, in order to 
direct it across her bare shoulder at one of the opposite 
boxes. " I fear I am becoming ridiculous." 

He knew very well that in Betsy's eyes, and in those 
of her world, he ran no risk of being ridiculous ; he 
knew very well that in the eyes of such people the role 
of an unsuccessful lover of a young girl or an unmarried 
woman might be ridiculous ; but not so the role of a 
man who pursues a married woman and at any price 
makes it his aim to lead her into committing adultery. 
This role is something beautiful and majestic and can 
never be ridiculous, and therefore Vronsky, as he handed 
back the opera-glasses, looked at his cousin with a smile 
of pride and joy lurking under his mustache. 

"And why didn't you come to dinner?" she asked 
again, unable to refrain from admiration of him. 

" I must tell you ; I was busy.... and what about ? I 
will give you one guess out of a hundred — out of a thou- 
sand .... you would never hit it. I have been reconciling 
a husband with his wife's persecutor. Yes, fact ! " 

" What ! and you reconciled them ? " 

"Pretty nearly." 

"You must tell me all about it," said Betsy, rising. 
"Come during the next entracte." 

" Impossible ; I am going to the French Theater." 

"From Nilsson?" said Betsy, with horror, though 



x68 ANNA KARENINA 

she could not have distinguished Nilsson from the poor- 
est chorus-singer. 

" But what can I do ? I have made an appointment 
in order to finish my act of peacemaking." 

"Blessed are the peacemakers, for they shall be 
saved," said Betsy, remembering that she had heard 
somewhere some such quotation. "Well, then, sit down 
and tell me all about it." 

And she resumed her seat. 



CHAPTER V 

" It 's a little improper, but so amusing, that I wanted 
awfully to tell you about it," said Vronsky, looking at 
her with sparkling eyes. " However, I will not mention 
any names." 

" But I can guess ? so much the better I " 
" Listen, then. Two gay young men were dining...." 
"Officers of your regiment, of course ...." 
"I did not say that they were officers, but simply 
young men, who had dined well ...." 
"Translated, tipsy!" 

"Possibly. They went to dine with a comrade, in 
most excellent spirits. They saw a pretty young woman 
. passing them in a hired carriage ; she turns around, and, 
as it seems to them, nods to them and laughs. Of course 
they follow her. They gallop like mad. To their 
amazement their beauty stops at the entrance of the 
very house where they are going; she mounts to the 
upper floor, and they see nothing but a pair of rosy lips 
under a short veil, and a pair of pretty little feet." 

" You describe the scene with so much feeling that 
you make me believe that you were in the party." 

"Why do you accuse me so soon? Well! the two 
young men climb up to their comrade's room, where 
there is to be a farewell dinner, and there they drink, 
perhaps, more than is good for them, as is usually the 
case at farewell dinners. And at dinner they ask who 
lives on the top story of that house. No one knows any- 



ANNA KARENINA 169 

thing about it ; only their friend's valet, to their ques- 
tions,- ' Do any mamselles live on the top floor ? ' replies 
that there are a good many. After dinner the two 
young men go into their friend's library and write a 
letter to the unknown. They write a passionate letter, 
a declaration ; they themselves carry up the letter, in 
order to explain whatever in the letter might not be 
perfectly understood." 

" But why do you tell me such horrible things ? 
Well?" 

" They ring. A girl comes to the door ; they give 
her the letter, telling her they are so desperately in love 
that they are ready to die, there at the door. The girl 
is in doubt and parleys with them. Suddenly a gentle- 
man appears, red as a lobster and with side-whiskers like 
sausages, declares that there is no one there except his 
wife, and unceremoniously puts them out of the door." 

" How did you know that his side-whiskers were like 
sausages ? " 

"But now listen. I have just made peace between 
them." 

" Well ! what came of it ? " 

"This is the most interesting part of the affair. The 
happy couple prove to be a titular counselor and his 
wife. The titular counselor brings a complaint, and I 
am obliged to serve as peacemaker. What a peace- 
maker !.... I assure you Talleyrand compared to me 
was nobody." 

" What were your difficulties ? " 

u Here now ! Listen ! .... We make excuses as in duty 
bound, as : ' We are desperately sorry/ we said ; ' we beg 
you to pardon us for this unfortunate misunderstanding.' 
The titular counselor with the sausage-whiskers seemed 
to be thawing ; but he felt it necessary to express his 
feelings, and as soon as he began to express his feelings 
he began to get wrathy, and to say harsh things, and 
again I was obliged to bring all my diplomatic talents 
into requisition : *I agree that their conduct was repre- 
hensible, but please take into consideration that there 
was a misunderstanding; they were young, and had just 



t 7 o ANNA KARENINA 

come from a good dinner. You understand ! Now they 
are sorry from the bottom of their hearts, and beg you 
to forgive them their fault/ The titular counselor soft- 
ened still more: 'I agree with you, count, and I am 
ready to pardon them ; but you perceive that my wife, 
my wife, a virtuous woman, has been exposed to insult, 
to persecution, to the impudence of good-for-nothing 
young scound....' And the impudent, good-for-noth- 
ing young fellows being present, I had to exert myself 
to calm them down ; again I put my diplomacy to work, 
and every time I seem on the point of success my titular 
counselor gets wrathy again, and his face gets red, and 
his sausages begin to wag up and down, and I find my- 
self drowned in the waves of diplomatic subtleties." 

" Akh ! we must tell you all about this," said Betsy to 
a lady who at this moment came into her box. " It has 
amused me much ! " 

" Well, good luck go with you," she added, giving 
Vronsky one of her ringers, as she held her fan ; and 
then, shrugging her shoulders so as to keep the waist 
of her gown from coming up, so that she might be as 
naked as possible when she should go to the front of 
the box, and sit down in the full blaze of gas and in the 
eyes of all. 

Vronsky went to the French Theater, where he really 
had to meet his regimental commander, who never failed 
to be present at a single representation. He wished to 
speak with him in regard to his business as peacemaker 
which had occupied and amused him for three days. 
Petritsky, whom he liked, was involved in this affair, and 
the other one was a charming, a glorious fellow, young 
Prince Kerdrof, who had lately joined their regiment. 
But the principal point was that the affair concerned 
the interests of his regiment. 

Both the young men belonged to Vronsky's company. 
Venden, the titular counselor, had come to the regi- 
mental commander with a complaint that the officers 
had insulted his wife. His young wife — Venden said he 
had been married only half a year — had been to church 
with her mother, and, feeling indisposed, owing to her 



ANNA KARENINA 171 

delicate condition, so that she could not stand any longer, 
had engaged the first decent izvoshchik at hand. The 
officers had chased her; she was frightened and, feeling 
still more ill, had run up the stairs. Venden himself, 
who had just returned from his office, heard the 
sound of a bell and voices. He came out, and, seeing 
drunken officers with a letter, he had put them out. He 
demanded that they should be severely punished. 

"No, it's all very well to talk," said the regimental 
commander to Vronsky, whom he had asked to join 
him, " but Petritsky is becoming unbearable. Not a 
week passes by without some scandal. This chinovnik 
will not stop here, he will go farther." 

Vronsky saw all the unpleasantness of this affair, and 
he felt that a duel should be avoided, and that every- 
thing should be done to make the titular counselor re- 
lent and smooth over the scandal. The regimental 
commander had summoned him because he knew he 
was a shrewd and gentlemanly man, and zealous for the 
interests of the regiment. They had talked the matter 
over and decided that Vronsky, accompanied by Petrit- 
sky and Kerdrof, should go to make their excuses to 
the titular counselor. The regimental commander and 
Vronsky both realized that Vronsky's name and his 
flugel-adjutant's monogram ought to have a great effect 
in soothing the titular counselor. In reality these two 
influences proved partially efficacious, but the results 
of the reconciliation remained in doubt, as Vronsky 
said. 

When he reached the French Theater, Vronsky took 
the regimental commander into the lobby, and told him 
of his success, or rather lack of success. After reflec- 
tion the regimental commander decided to leave the 
matter in abeyance ; but afterward he began to ques- 
tion Vronsky regarding the details of the interview, and 
he could not help laughing as he heard Vronsky tell how 
the titular counselor kept suddenly flaming out in wrath 
as he recalled the particulars of the affair, and how 
Vronsky, veering round at the last mention of reconcili- 
ation, had withdrawn, pushing Petritsky before him, and 



172 



ANNA KARENINA 



his repeated attempts to bring him into a suitable frame 
of mind. 

"It is a wretched piece of business, but comical 
enough. Kerdrof cannot fight with this gentleman. 
Was he so horribly angry ? " he asked, laughing. " And 
how do you like Claire this evening? — charming !" 
said he, referring to a new French actress. " One can't 
see her too often ; she is always new. Only the French 
can do that ! " 



CHAPTER VI 

The Princess Betsy left the theater without waiting 
for the end of the last act. She had scarcely had more 
than time enough, after reaching home, to go into her 
dressing-room, and scatter a Jlittle rice-powcler over her 
long, pale face, rearrange her toilet, and order tea to be 
served in the large drawing-room, when the carriages 
began one after another to arrive at her enormous house 
on the Bolshaya Morskaya. The guests came up to the 
wide entrance, and a portly Swiss who during the morn- 
ing read the newspaper for the edification of passers-by, 
as he sat behind the glass door, now kept noiselessly 
opening this great door and admitting the visitors. 
They came in by one door almost at the same instant 
that by another came the mistress of the mansion, with 
renewed color, and hair rearranged. The walls of the 
great drawing-room were hung with somber draperies, 
and on the floor were thick rugs. On the table, which 
was covered with a cloth of dazzling whiteness, shining in 
the light of numberless candles, stood a silver samovar 
and a tea-service of transparent porcelain. 

The princess took her place behind the samovar and 
drew off her gloves. With the help of attentive servants, 
the guests brought up chairs and took their places, 
dividing into two camps, the one around the princess, 
the other at the opposite end of the drawing-room 
around the wife of a foreign ambassador, a handsome 
lady, dressed in black velvet, and with black, well- 



ANNA KARENINA 173 

defined eyebrows. The conversation, as usual at the 
beginning of a reception, was desultory, being inter- 
rupted by the arrival of newcomers, offers of tea, and 
the exchange of salutations, and seemed to be endeavor- 
ing to find a common subject of interest. 

" She is remarkably handsome for an actress ; you 
can see that she has studied Kaulbach," said a diploma- 
tist in the group around the ambassador's wife. " Did 
you notice how she fell ? " .... 

"Akh ! please let us not speak of Nilsson. Nothing 
new can be said about her," said a great fat lady, with 
light complexion, without either eyebrows or chignon, 
and dressed in an old silk gown. This was the Princess 
Miagkaya, famous for her simplicity and frightful man- 
ners, and surnamed the E?ifa?it terrible. Princess Miag- 
kaya was seated between the two groups, listening to 
what was said on both sides of her, and taking impartial 
interest in both. "This very day, three people have 
made that same remark about Kaulbach. It must be 
fashionable. I don't see why that phrase should be so 
successful." 

The conversation was cut short by this remark, and 
a new theme had to be started. 

"Tell us something amusing, but don't let it be 
naughty," said the ambassador's wife, who was a mis- 
tress of the art of conversation called, by the English, 
small talk. She was addressing the diplomatist, who 
was at a loss -what topic to start. 

"They say this is very hard, that only naughty things 
are amusing," replied the diplomatist, with a smile. 
"However, I will do my best. Give me a theme. 
Everything depends upon the theme. When you get 
that for a background, you can easily fill it in with em- 
broidery. I often think that the celebrated talkers of 
the past would be exceedingly embarrassed if they were 
alive now; everything intellectual is considered so 
dull.".... 

"That was said long ago," remarked the ambassa- 
dor's wife, interrupting him with a smile. 

The conversation began amiably, and for the very 



i 7 4 ANNA KARENINA 

reason that it was too amiable, it languished again. It 
was necessary to have recourse to an unfailing, never 
changing subject — gossip. 

"Don't you think that there is something Louis XV. 
about Tushkievitch ?" asked he, indicating a handsome, 
light-haired young man, who was standing near the 
table. 

" Oh, yes ! he 's quite in the style of the drawing- 
room, and that is why he is here so often." 

This subject sustained the conversation, since it 
consisted wholly of hints regarding something which 
could not be treated openly in that drawing-room, in 
other words, Tushkievitch's relations with the Princess 
Betsy. 

Around the samovar, the conversation hesitated for 
some time upon three inevitable subjects, — the news 
of the day, the theater, and a lawsuit which was to be 
tried the next day. At last the same subject arose that 
was occupying the other group — gossip. 

"Have you heard that Maltishcheva — that is, the 
mother, not the daughter — has had a costume in (lia- 
ble rose?" 

" Is it possible ? No ! That is delicious." 

" I am astonished that with her sense, — for she is 
certainly not stupid, — she does not perceive how ridic- 
ulous she is." 

Every one found something in which to criticize and 
tear to pieces the unfortunate Madame Maltishcheva; 
and the conversation grew lively, brilliant, and gay, 
like a flaming pyre. 

The Princess Betsy's husband, a tall, good-natured 
man, a passionate collector of engravings, hearing that 
his wife had guests, came into the drawing-room before 
going to his club, and desired to show himself in her 
circle. Noiselessly, on the thick carpet, he approached 
the Princess Miagkaya. 

" How did you like Nilsson ? " he asked. 

" Akh ! Do you steal in upon a body that way ? 
How you startled me!" she cried. "Don't speak to 
me about the opera, I beg of you ; you don't know any- 



ANNA KARENINA 175 

thing about music. I prefer to descend to your level 
and talk with you about your engravings and majolicas. 
Well ! What treasures have you discovered lately ? n 

" If you would like, I will show them to you ; but you 
are no judge of them." 

" Show them to me all the same. I am getting my 
education among these — bankers, as you call them. 
They have lovely engravings. They like to show 
them." 

"Have you been at the Schiitzburgs' ? " asked the 
mistress of the house, from her place by the samovar. 

" Certainly, ma chtre. They invited my husband and 
me to dinner, and they told me that the sauce at this 
dinner cost a thousand rubles/' replied the Princess 
Miagkaya, in a loud voice, conscious that all were lis- 
tening to her ; " and it was a very poor sauce, too, — 
something green. I had to return the compliment, 
and I got them up a sauce that cost eighty-five kopeks, 1 
and all were satisfied. I can't make thousand-ruble 
sauces ! " 

" She is unique," said the hostess. 

"Astonishing/' said another. 

The Princess Miagkaya never failed of making her 
speeches effective, and the secret of their effectiveness 
lay in the fact that, although she did not always select 
suitable occasions, as was the case at the present time, 
yet she spoke simply and sensibly. In the society 
where she moved, what she said gave the effect of the 
most subtle wit. She could not comprehend why it 
had such an effect, but she recognized the fact, and 
took advantage of it. 

While the Princess Miagkaya was speaking, all lis- 
tened to her, and the conversation around the ambas- 
sador's wife stopped ; so the hostess, wishing to make 
the conversation more united, turned to the ambassa- 
dor's wife and said : — 

" Are you sure that you will not have some tea ? 
Then please join us." 

" No ; we are very well where we are, in this corner/ 

1 One ruble, or one hundred kopeks, is worth eighty cents. 



i 7 6 ANNA KARENINA 

replied the ambassador's wife, with a smile, resuming the 
thread of a conversation which interested her very deeply. 

They were criticizing Karenin and his wife. 

" Anna is very much changed since her return from 
Moscow. There is something strange about her," said 
one of her friends. 

"The change is due to the fact that she brought 
back in her train the shadow of Aleksef Vronsky," said 
the ambassador's wife. 

" What is that ? There 's a story in Grimm — a man 
without a shadow — a man deprived of his shadow. It 
was a punishment for something or other. I cannot see 
where the punishment lies, but it must be disagreeable 
for a woman to be without her shadow." 

"Yes, but the women who have shadows generally 
come to some bad end," said Anna's friend. 

" Hold your tongues ! " 2 cried the Princess Miagkaya, 
as she heard these words. "Madame Karenina is a 
charming woman ; I don't like her husband, but I like her." 

"Why don't you like her husband?" asked the am- 
bassador's wife. " He is such a remarkable man. My 
husband says there are few statesmen in Europe equal 
to him." 

" My husband says the same thing, but I don't be- 
lieve it," replied the Princess Miagkaya. "If our hus- 
bands had not had this idea, we should have seen Aleksef 
Aleksandrovitch as he really is ; and, in my opinion, he 

is a blockhead. I only say this in a whisper Is it 

not true how everything comes out clearly? Formerly 
when I was told that he was clever I used to try to dis- 
cover it, and I came to the conclusion that I was stupid 
because I could not see wherein he was clever ; but as 
soon as I said to myself, — under my breath, — he is 
stupid, all was explained. Is n't that so ? " 

" How severe you are to-night ! "■ 

" Not at all, I have no other alternative. One of us 
two is stupid. Now you know that one can never say 
such a thing of oneself." 

1 Tipun vam na yazuik! A slang expression, meaning literally, 
" May your tongue have the pip 1 " 



ANNA KARENINA 177 

" No one is satisfied with his circumstances, and every 
one is satisfied with his brain," said a diplomat, quoting 
a French couplet. 

" There, that is the very thing/* exclaimed the Prin- 
cess Miagkaya turning to him, J* but I make an exception 
of Anna. She is so lovely and good. Is it her fault 
if all men fall in love with her and follow her like 
shadows ? " 

"Well! I do not allow myself to judge her," said 
Anna's friend, justifying herself. 

"Because no one follows us like a shadow, it does 
not prove that we have the right to judge." 

Having thus appropriately disposed of Anna's friend, 
the Princess Miagkaya arose, and with the ambassador's 
wife drew up to the table, and joined in the general 
conversation about some trifle. 1 

"Whom have you been gossiping about?" asked 
Betsy. 

"About the Karenins. The princess has been pictur- 
ing Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch," replied the ambassador's 
wife, sitting down near the table, with a smile. 

" Shame that we could not have heard it," said Betsy, 
looking toward the door. "Ah ! here you are at last," 
said she, turning to Vronsky, who at that moment 
came in. 

Vronsky knew, and met every day, all the people 
whom he found collected in his cousin's drawing-room ; 
therefore he came in with the calmness of a man who 
rejoins friends from whom he has only just parted. 

"Where have I come from ?" said he, in reply to a 
question from the ambassador's wife. " What can I do ? 
I must confess, — from Les Bouffes. ' Tis for the hun- 
dredth time, and always with a new pleasure. It is 
charming. It is humiliating, I know, but I get sleepy at 
the opera ; but at Les Boiiffes I sit it out up to the very 
last minute and enjoy it. To-night .... " 

He mentioned a French actress, and was going to tell 
some story about her, but the ambassador's wife stopped 
him with an expression of mock terror. 

1 Literally, " about the king of Prussia." 

VOL. I. — 12 



i 7 8 ANNA KARENINA 

" Please don't speak to us of that fright ! " 

"Well ! I will not, and the more willingly because you 

all know these frights." 

"And you would all go there if it were as fashionable 

as the opera/' added the Princess Miagkaya. 



CHAPTER VII > 

Steps were heard near the door, and the Princess 
Betsy, knowing that it was Madame Karenina, looked 
at Vronsky. He was looking toward the door, and his face 
had a strange, new expression. Joyfully, expectantly, 
and almost timidly he gazed at Anna as she entered, 
and he rose slowly. Anna came into the drawing-room, 
as always holding herself very erect and looking neither 
to right nor to left. She crossed the short distance be- 
tween her and the hostess, with that rapid, light, but 
decided step which distinguished her from all the other 
women of this circle. She went directly up to Betsy, 
and shook hands with a smile, and with the same smile 
she looked at Vronsky. He bowed low and offered her 
a chair. 

She responded only by bending her head a little, and 
blushed, and frowned. But instantly she was nodding 
to- her acquaintances and shaking hands; then she 
turned to Betsy : — 

" I have been at the Countess Lidya's ; I wanted to 
get away earlier, but I was detained. Sir John was 
there. He is very interesting." 

"Oh, that missionary?" 

"Yes; he related many very curious things about 
life in India." 

The conversation, which Anna's entrance had inter- 
rupted, again wavered, like the flame of a lamp in a 
draught. 

"Sir John! yes, Sir John! I have seen him. He 
speaks well. The Vlasieva is actually in love with 
him ! " 



ANNA KAREN1NA 179 

■' Is it true that the youngest Vlasieva is going to 
marry Topof ? " 

"Yes ; people say that'it is fully decided." 

" I am astonished at her parents. They say that it is 
a love-match." 

" A love-match ? What antediluvian ideas you have ! 
Who speaks of love in our days ? " said the ambassador's 
wife. 

" What is to be done about it ? That foolish old cus- 
tom has not entirely gone out of date," said Vronsky. 

" So much the worse for those who adhere to it; the 
only happy marriages that I know about are those of 
reason." 

" Yes ; but how often it happens that these marriages 
of reason break like ropes of sand, precisely because of 
this love which you affect to scorn ! " said Vronsky. 

"But what we call a marriage of reason is where both 
parties take an equal risk. It is like scarlatina, through 
which we all must pass." 

" In that case it would be wise to find an artificial 
means of inoculation for love, as for small-pox." 

" When I was young I fell in love with a sacristan ; I 
should like to know what good that did me ! " said the 
Princess Miagkaya. 

" No ; but, jesting aside, I believe that to know what 
love really is, one must have been deceived once, and 
then been set right," said the Princess Betsy. 

" Even after marriage ?/' asked the ambassador's wife, 
laughing: 

" It is never too late to mend," said the diplomatist, 
quoting the English proverb. 

"But really," interrupted Betsy, "you must be de- 
ceived, so as afterwards to get into the right path. 
What do you think about this?" said she, addressing 
Anna, who was listening silently to* the conversation 
with a scarcely perceptible smile on her firm lips. 

" I think," said Anna, playing with her glove, which 
she had removed, "I think ....if there are as many 
opinions as there are heads, then there are as many 
ways of loving as there are hearts." 



180 ANNA KARENINA 

Vronsky looked at her, and with a violent beating of 
the heart waited for her answer ; after she had spoken 
those words he drew a deep breath, as if he had escaped 
some danger. 

She turned suddenly to Vronsky. 

"Thave just had a letter from Moscow. They write 
me that Kitty Shcherbatskaya is very ill." 

"Really," said Vronsky, with a frown. 

Anna looked at him with a severe expression. 

" Does n't that interest you ? " . ? :\ 

" It certainly does. I am very sorry. Exactly what 
didthey write you, if I may be permitted to inquire ?" 

Anna arose and went to Betsy. 

"Will you give me a cup of tea?" she said, standing 
behind her chair. While Betsy was pouring the tea, 
Vronsky went to Anna. 

" What did they write you ? " 

"I often think that men do not know what nobility 
means, though they are all the time talking about it," 
said Anna, not answering his question. 

" I have been wanting to tell you for a long time," 
she added, and taking a few steps she sat down at a 
corner table laden with albums. 

" I don't quite know what your words mean," he said, 
offering her a cup of tea. 

She glanced at the divan near her, and he instantly 
sat down on it. 

"Yes, I have been wanting ^o tell you," she con- 
tinued, without looking at him. "You have acted 
badly, — very badly." 

"Don't I know that I have? But whose fault was 
it?" 

"Why do you say that to me?" said she, with a 
severe look. 

"You know why," he replied boldly and joyously, 
meeting her gaze, and without dropping his eyes. 

She, not he, felt confused. 

"This simply proves that you have no heart," said 
she. But her eyes told the story, that she knew that 
he had a heart, and that therefore she feared him. 



ANNA KARENINA 181 

"What you were talking about just now was error, 
not love." 

" Remember that I have forbidden you to speak that 
word, that hateful word," said Anna, trembling; and 
instantly she felt that by the use of that one word 
"forbidden," she recognized a certain jurisdiction over 
him, and thus encouraged him to speak of love. " For 
a long time I have been wanting to say this to you," 
she continued, looking steadily into his eyes, and all 
aflame with the color that burned in her face. " I have 
come to-night on purpose, knowing that I should find 
you here ; I have come to tell you this must come to an 
end. I have never had to blush before any one before, 
and you somehow cause me to feel guilty in my own 
eyes." 

He looked at her, and was struck with the new spiri- 
tual beauty of her face. 

"What do you want me to do?" said he, simply and 
gravely. 

" I want you to go to Moscow, and beg Kitty's 
pardon." 

" You do not want that," said he. 

He saw that she was compelling herself to say one 
thing, while she really desired something else. 

" If you love me, as you say you do," she murmured, 
"then do what will give me peace ! " 

Vronsky's face lighted up. 

" Don't you know that you are my life ? But I don't 
know what peace means, and I can't give it to you. 
Myself, my love, I can give — yes, I cannot think of you 
and of myself separately. For me, you and I are one. 
I see no hope of peace for you or for me in the future. 
I see the possibility of despair, of misfortune, — unless I 
see the possibility of happiness, and what happiness ! ..., 
Is it really impossible ? " he murmured, with his lips only, 
but she heard him. 

She directed all the forces of her mind to say what 
she ought ; but, instead of that, she looked at him with 
love in her eyes, and said nothing. 

" Ah ! " he thought, with rapture, "at the very moment 



182 ANNA KARENINA- 

when I was in despair, when it seemed I should never 
succeed, it has come ! She loves me ! She confesses it." 

"Then do this for me, and never speak to me in this 
way again ; let us be good friends," said her words : her 
eyes told a totally different story. 

"We can never be mere friends; you yourself know 
it. Shall we be the most miserable, or the happiest, of 
human beings ? It is for you to decide." 

She began to speak, but he interrupted her. 

"You see I ask only one thing, the right of hoping 
and suffering, as I do now ; if it is impossible, order me 
to disappear, and I will disappear; you shall not see me 
if my presence is painful to you." 

"I do not wish to drive you away." 

"Then change nothing; let things go as they are," 
said he, with trembling voice, / " Here is your husband ! " 

Indeed, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch at that instant was 
entering the drawing-room, with his calm face and awk- 
ward gait. 

Glancing at this wife and Vronsky, he went first to the 
hostess, and then he sat down with a cup of tea, and in 
his slow and well-modulated voice, in his habitual tone 
of persiflage, which seemed always to deride some one 
or something, he said, as he glanced around at the 
assembly : — 

"Your Rambouillet is complete, — the Graces and 
the Muses!" 

But the Princess Betsy could not endure this "sneer- 
ing" tone of his, as she called it, — and, like a clever 
hostess, quickly brought him round to a serious discus- 
sion of the forced conscription. Alekser Aleksandro- 
vitch immediately entered into it, and began gravely to 
defend the new ukase against Betsy's attacks. 

Vronsky and Anna still'sat near their little table. 

"That is getting rather pronounced," said a lady, in a 
whisper, indicating with her eyes Karenin, Anna, and 
Vronsky. 

"What did I tell you ?" said Anna's friend. 

Not only these ladies, but nearly all who were in the 
drawing-room, even the. Princess Miagkaya and Betsy 



ANNA KARENINA 183 

herself, glanced more than once at them sitting apart 
from the general company, as if it disturbed the'm. 
Only Aleksef Aleksandrovitch never once looked in 
their direction, and was not diverted from the interest- 
ing conversation on which he had started. 

Betsy, perceiving the disagreeable impression that all 
felt, substituted some one else in her place to listen to 
Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, and crossed over to Anna. 

" I always admire your husband's clear and explicit lan- 
guage," she said. "The most transcendental thoughts 
seem within my reach when he speaks." 

" Oh, yes ! " said Anna, with a radiant smile of joy, 
and not understanding a word that Betsy had said. 
Then she went. over to the large table, and joined in 
the general conversation. 

After he had stayed half an hour Aleksei Aleksandro- 
vitch spoke to his wife and proposed to her that they 
should go home together; but she answered, without 
booking at him, that she wished to remain to supper. 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch took leave of the company and 
departed. 

Madame Karenina's coachman, a portly old Tatar, 
in his lacquered leather coat, was having some difficulty 
in restraining his left-hand gray, which was excited with 
the cold. A lackey stood holding open the carriage 
door. The Swiss was standing ready to open the outer 
door ; Anna, Arkadyevna was listening with ecstasy to 
what Vronsky whispered, while she was freeing, with 
nervous fingers, the lace of her sleeve, which had caught 
on the hook of her fur cloak. 

"You have said nothing, let us admit, and I make no 
claim," Vronsky was saying, as he accompanied her 
down, " but you know that it is not friendship that I 
ask ft>r ; for me, the only possible happiness of my life 
is contained in that word that you do not like .... 
love." 

" Love ...." she repeated slowly, as if she had spoken, 
to herself; then suddenly, as she disentangled her lace, 
she said, " I do not like this word, because it means too 



i8 4 ANNA KARENINA 

much, far more than you can imagine," and she looked 
him full in the face. " Da svidanya i " 1 

She reached him her hand, and, with a quick elastic 
step, passed the Swiss, and disappeared in her carriage. 

Her look, her pressure of his hand, filled Vronsky 
with passion. He kissed the palm on the place which 
she had touched, and went home with the happy convic- 
tion that that evening had brought him nearer to the 
goal of which he dreamed, than all the two months past. 

CHAPTER VIII 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch found nothing unusual 
or improper in the fact that his wife and Vronsky had 
been sitting by themselves and having a rather lively 
talk together ; he noticed that to others in the drawing- 
room it seemed unusual and improper, and therefore it 
seemed to him also improper. He decided that he 
ought to speak about it to his wife. 

When he reached home, Aleksejf Aleksandrovitch, ac- 
cording to his usual custom, went to his library, threw 
himself into his arm-chair, and opened his book at the 
place marked by a paper-cutter, in an article on Papistry, 
and read till the clock struck one, as he usually did. 
From time to time he passed his hand across his high 
forehead, and shook his head, as if to drive away an im- 
portunate thought. At his usual hour he arose and he 
prepared to go to bed. Anna Arkadyevna had not yet 
returned. With his book under his arm, he went up- 
stairs ; but that evening, instead of pursuing his usual 
train of reflections and thinking over his governmental 
duties, his mind was occupied with his wife and the dis- 
agreeable impression which her behavior had caused him. 
Contrary to his habit, instead of going to bed he walked 
up and down the rooms with his arms behind his tack. 
He could not go to bed because he felt that first it was 
incumbent on him to ponder anew over the exigency 
that had arisen. 

1 Da svidanya, like au revoir or auj 'wiedersthen, has no equivalent in 
English. 



ANNA KARENINA 185 

When Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch made up his mind 
that he must have a talk with his wife, it seemed 
to him very simple and natural ; but now, as he re- 
flected, it occurred to him that the matter was com- 
plicated and perplexing. 

Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch was not jealous. Jealousy 
in his opinion was insulting to a wife, and a husband 
should trust in her. But he did not ask himself why 
one should trust her, that is to say, why a man should 
expect a young wife always to love him. 

But he had not felt any lack of confidence simply 
because he trusted her, and said to himself that it was 
the proper thing to do. But now, although it was his 
conviction that jealousy is a disgusting state of mind, 
and that it was his duty to trust his wife and that his 
faith was still intact, yet he felt that he was placed in 
an illogical and ridiculous position, and he knew not 
what he ought to do. 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch was now standing face to 
face with life, with the possibility that his wife was in 
love with some one else besides him, and this seemed 
to him very senseless and incomprehensible, because 
it was life itself. All his life he had lived and labored 
in a round of official duties concerned with the reflec- 
tions of life. And whenever he came in contact with 
life itself he was revolted by it. Now he experienced 
a sensation such as a man feels, who, passing calmly 
over a bridge above a precipice, suddenly discovers that 
the arch is broken, and that the abyss yawns beneath his 
feet. 

This abyss was actual life ; the bridge — the artifi- 
cial life which he had been living. The idea that his 
wife could love another man occurred to him for the 
first time, and filled him with terror. 

Without undressing, he kept walking back and forth 
with regular steps : over the echoing parquetry floor of the 
dining-room lighted with a single burner ; over the carpet 
of the dark drawing-room, where the light fell on his 
recently painted full-length portrait, over the divan ; and 
then through his wife's boudoir, where two candles were 



i86 ANNA KARENINA 

burning, lighting up the portraits of parents and friends, 
and the pretty trinkets upon her writing-table, so long 
familiar to him. When he reached the door of her bed- 
room he turned and went back. 

At the end of each turn in his pacing back and forth, 
and especially on the hard-wood floor of his brightly 
lighted dining-room, he would stop and say to himself: — 

"Yes, this must certainly be cut short; it must be 
decided ; I must tell her my way of looking at it ! " 

And then he would turn back again. 

" But what can I say ? what decision can I make ? " 
he would ask himself by the time he reached the draw- 
ing-room, and find no answer. 

"But, after all," he would say, as he turned in the 
library, "what has been done? Nothing. She had a 
long talk with him. What of that ? But whom does 
not a society woman talk with? To be jealous is de-. 
grading both her and me," he would say to himself as 
he reached her boudoir. But this reasoning, which had 
hitherto had such weight, had now lost its cogency. 

From the door of her sleeping-room he returned again 
to the hall, but, as he crossed fhe dark drawing-room, 
he thought he heard a voice saying to him, " It is not 
so ! the fact that the others noticed this signifies that 
there must be something in it." — And by the time he 
reached the dining-room again he was saying, " Yes, the 
thing must be decided, and broken short off." And 
once more in the drawing-room, just before he turned 
about, he would ask himself : — 

" How can I decide ? How can I tell her ? " 

And then he would ask himself, "What had hap- 
pened?" and reply, "Nothing," and remember that 
jealousy is a feeling degrading to a woman ; but again 
in the drawing-room he would feel persuaded that some- 
thing had happened. 

His thoughts, like his steps, followed the same circle, 
and he struck no new idea. He recognized this, rubbed 
his forehead, and sat down in ,her boudoir. 

There, as he looked at her table, with its malachite- 
writing-tablet, and a letter unfinished, his thoughts took 



ANNA KARENINA 187 

another direction ; he began to think of her, and how 
she would feel. His imagination vividly showed him 
her personal life, her thoughts, and her desires ; and the 
idea that she might, that she must, have her individual 
life apart from his, seemed to him so terrible, that he 
hastened to put it out of his mind. 

This was the abyss which it was so dreadful for him 
to gaze into. To penetrate by thought and feeling into 
the soul of another was a psychical effort strange to 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch. He considered it a pernicious 
and dangerous mental habit. 

"And what is most terrible/' he said to himself, "is 
that this senseless uncertainty comes on me just as I 
am about to bring my work to completion," — he re- 
ferred to a scheme which he was at that time managing, 
— " and when I need perfect freedom from agitation 
and all my mental powers. What is to be done ? I am 
not one of those men who can endure agitation and 
annoyance and have the strength of mind to face them. 1 ' 

'- 1 must reflect ; I must take some stand and get rid 
of this annoyance," he added aloud. "I do not admit 
that I have any right to probe into her feelings, or to 
scrutinize what is going on in her heart ; that belongs 
to her conscience, and comes into the domain of relig- 
ion," he said to himself, feeling some consolation that 
he had found a domain of law applicable to the circum- 
stances that had arisen. 

" So," he continued, " the questions relating to her 
feelings and the like are questions of conscience, in 
which I have no concern. My duty lies clearly before 
me. As head of my family, I am bound to guide her, 
and therefore, to a certain degree, I am responsible. I 
must point out the danger which I see ; I must watch 
over her, and even use my powers. I must speak to her." 

And Aleksel Aleksandrovitch formulated in his mind 
everything that, he should say to his wife. While he. 
was thinking it over he regretted the necessity of wast- 
ing his time and his intellectual powers in family matters. 
But, in spite of him, his plan assumed, in his thought, 
the clear, precise, and logical form of a report : — ' >: 



1 88 ANNA KARENINA 

" I must make her understand as follows : First, The 
meaning and importance of public opinion and deco- 
rum ; Secondly, The religious significance of marriage ; 
Thirdly, if necessary, The unhappiness which it might 
cause her son ; Fourthly, The unhappiness which might 
befall herself." 

And Aleksejf Aleksandrovitch twisted his fingers to- 
gether, palms down, and made the joints crack. 

This gesture, of joining his hands and stretching his 
finger-joints, — a bad habit, — calmed him, and conduced 
to the precision of which he now stood in such need.* 

A carriage was heard driving up to the house. Alek- 
seT Aleksandrovitch stopped in the middle of the hall. 
He heard his wife's step on the stairway. Aleksel 
Aleksandrovitch had his sermon all ready ; but still he 
stood there, squeezing his crossed fingers and trying to 
make the joints crack. One joint cracked. 

Even as he heard her light steps on the stairs he was 
conscious of her presence, and, though he was satisfied 
with his sermon, he dreaded the explanation that was 
imminent 



CHAPTER IX 

Anna entered with bent head, playing with the tas- 
sels of her bashluik or Turkish hood. Her face shone 
with a bright glow, but this bright glow did not betoken 
joy ; it reminded one of the terrible glow of a confla- 
gration against a midnight sky. When she saw her 
husband, she raised her head and smiled, as if she had 
awakened from a dream. 

"You are not abed yet? what a miracle !" she said, 
taking off her bashluik ; and, without pausing, she went 
into her dressing-room, crying, "It is late, Aleksel 
Aleksandrovitch," as 'she got to the door. 

" Anna, I must have a talk with you." 

"With me?" she said, in astonishment, coming out 
intb the hall, and looking at him. " What is it ? What 
about?" she asked, and sat down. "Well, let us talk, 



ANNA KARENINA 189 

then, if it is so necessary ; but I would much rather go 
to sleep." 

Anna said what came to her tongue, and was aston- 
ished to hear herself, astonished at her own facility at 
telling a lie. How perfectly natural her words sounded, 
and how probable that she wanted to go to sleep ; she 
felt herself clad in an impenetrable armor of falsehood. 
She felt that some invisible power assisted her and sus- 
tained her. 

" Anna, I must give you a warning." 

" A warning ? " she exclaimed ; " why ? " 

She looked at him so innocently, so'gayly, that any 
one who did not know her as her husband did would 
have noticed nothing unnatural either in the tone of her 
voice or in the meaning of what she said. But for him, 
who knew her, who knew that when he was five minutes 
later than usual she always remarked on it, and asked 
the reason, for him who knew that her first impulse was 
always to tell him of her pleasures and her sorrows, for 
him now to see the fact that Anna took special pains 
not to observe his agitation, that she took special pains 
not to say a word about herself, all this was very sig- 
nificant. He saw that the depths of her soul, hitherto 
always opened to his gaze, were now shut away from him. 
Moreover, by her tone he perceived that she was not 
confused by this ; but as it were she said openly and with- 
out dissimulation, " Yes, I am a sealed book, and so it 
must be, and will be from henceforth." 

He felt as a man would who should come home and 
find his house barricaded against him. 

" Perhaps the key will yet be found," thought Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch. 

"I want to warn you," said he, in a gentle voice, 
"lest by your imprudence and your thoughtlessness 
you give people cause to talk about you. Your rather 
too lively conversation this evening with Count Vronsky " 
— he pronounced this name slowly and distinctly — 
"attracted attention." 

He finished speaking, and looked at Anna's laughing 
eyes, now terrible to him because they were so impene- 



190 ANNA KARENINA 

trable, and he saw all the idleness and uselessness of 
his words. 

"You are always like this," she said, as if she had 
not understood him, and intentionally had understood 
only the last part of what he said. " Sometimes you 
don't like it because I am bored, and sometimes you 
don't like it because I have a good time. I was not 
bored this evening ; does that disturb you ? " 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch trembled ; again he stretched 
his fingers till the knuckles cracked. 

"Akh! I beg of you, don't crack your fingers, I 
detest it so," said she. 

"Anna, is this you?" said Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, 
trying to control himself, and stopping the movement 
of his hands. 

" Yes ! but what is it ? " she asked, with a sincere 
and almost comic astonishment. " What do you want 
of me?" 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch was silent, and passed his 
hand across his brow and over his eyes. He felt that, 
instead of having done as he intended, that is, instead 
of having warned his wife of her errors in the sight 
of the world, he was agitated at what concerned her 
conscience, and was perhaps striking some imaginary 
wall. 

"This is what I wanted to say," he continued, 
coldly and calmly, " and I beg you to listen to me until 
I have done. As you know, I regard jealousy as an 
insulting and degrading sentiment, and I never allow 
myself to be led away by it ; but there are certain laws 
of propriety which one cannot cross with impunity. 
This evening, judging by the impression which you 
made, — I am not the only one that noticed it, all did, 
— you did not conduct yourself at all in a proper 
manner." 

"Decidedly I do not understand at all," said Anna, 
shrugging her shoulders. "He does not really care," 
she thought; "all that he fears is the opinion of the 
world." — " You are not well, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch," 
she added, rising, and starting to go to her room. 



ANNA KARENINA 191 

But he stepped in front of her as if to prevent her from 
going. Never had Anna seen his face so displeased 
and ugly ; she remained standing, tipping her head to 
one side, while with quick fingers she began to pull out 
the hair-pins. 

" Well! I will hear what- you have to say," she said, 
in a calm, bantering tone ; " I shall even listen with 
interest, because I should like to know what it is all 
about." 

She herself was astonished at the assurance and calm 
naturalness with which she spoke, as well as at her 
choice of words. 

" I have no right to examine your feelings. I think 
it is useless and even dangerous," Aleksei Aleksandro- 
vitch began. " If we probe too deeply into our hearts, 
we run the risk of touching on what we ought not to 
perceive. Your feelings concern' your conscience. But 
in presence of yourself, of me, and of God, I am in 
duty bound to remind you of your obligations. Our lives 
are united, not by men, but by God. Only by crime 
can this bond be broken, and such a crime brings its 
own punishment. " 

" I don't understand at all. Oh, heavens, how sleepy 
I am ! " said Anna, swiftly running her hand over her 
hair, and taking out the last pin. 

"Anna! in the name of Heaven, don't speak so/' 
said he, gently. " Maybe I am mistaken ; but believe 
me, what I say to you is as much for your advantage as 
for mine ; I am your husband, and I love you." 

Anna's face for an instant grew troubled, and the 
mocking fire disappeared from her eyes ; but the word 
" love " irritated her. " Love ! " she thought ; " does he 
know what it means ? If he had never heard that there 
was such a thing as love, he would never have used that 
word." 

" AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, truly, I don't know what 
you mean," she said. "They say you find...." 

" Allow me to finish. I love you, but I am not speak- 
ing for myself ; those who are chiefly interested are our 
son and yourself. It is quite possible, I repeat, that my 



i 9 a ANNA KARENINA 

words may seem idle and ill-judged ; possibly they are 
the result of mistake on my part. In that case, I beg 
you to forgive me ; but if you yourself feel that there 
is the least foundation for my remarks, then I earnestly 
urge you to reflect, and, if your heart inclines you, tOj 
confide in me.".... • ' 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, without noticing the fact, 
had spoken a very different discourse from the one that 
he had prepared. 

" I have nothing to say." And she i added in a 
sprightly tone, scarcely hiding a smile, " Truly, it is time 
to go to bed." 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch sighed, and, without speak- 
ing further, went to their chamber. 

When she reached the room, he was already in bed. 
His lips were sternly set, and he did not look at her. 
Anna got into bed, every moment expecting that he 
would speak to her again ; she both feared it and desired 
it, but he said nothing. 

She waited long without moving, and then forgot all 
about him. She was -thinking of some one else ; she saw 
him and was conscious of her heart throbbing with emo- 
tion and with guilty joy. Suddenly she heard a slow 
and regular sound of snoring. Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch 
at first seemed to be startled himself, and stopped ; but 
at the end of a second the snoring began again with 
monotonous regularity. 

" Too late ! too late ! " she whispered, with a smile. 
She lay for a long time thus, motionless, with open 
eyes, the shining of which it seemed to her she herself 
could see in the darkness. 



CHAPTER X 

From this time began a new life for Alekse'f Aleksan- 
drovitch and his wife. Nothing unusual happened. 
Anna continued to go into society, and was especially 
often at the Princess Betsy's ; and everywhere she met 
Vronsky. Aleksei Aleksandrovitch saw it, but was 



ANNA KARENINA 193 

powerless to prevent it. Whenever he tried to bring 
about an explanation, she raised up against him an 
impenetrable wall of humorous perplexity. 

Outwardly, everything was the same, but their rela- 
tions had completely changed. Alekse'f Aleksandro- 
vitch, a remarkably strong man in matters requiring 
statesmanship, here found himself powerless. Like an 
ox, submissively lowering its head, he waited the -blow 
of the ax which he felt was lifted against him. When- 
ever he began to think about it, he felt that once more 
he must try by gentleness, tenderness, reason, to save 
Anna, and bring her back to him. Every day he made 
up his mind to speak ; but as soon as he made the 
attempt, that evil spirit of falsehood which possessed 
her seemed to lay hold of him also, and he spoke not at 
all in the tone in which he meant to speak. Involun- 
tarily, what he, said was spoken in his tone of raillery, 
which seemed to cast ridicule on those who would speak 
as he did. And this tone was not at all suitable for the 
expression of the thoughts that he wished to express. 



CHAPTER XI 

What had been for nearly a whole* year the sole de- 
sire of Vronsky's life, changing all his former desires — 
what Anna had looked upon as an impossible, a terrible, 
and, therefore, the more a fascinating, dream of bliss, was 
at last realized. Pale, with quivering lower jaw, he 
stood over her, begging her to be calm, himself not 
knowing how or why. 

"Anna! Anna!" he said, with trembling voice. 
"Anna! for God's sake!' 1 .... 

But the more intensely he spoke the lower she hung 
her once proud, joyous, but now humiliated head, and 
she crouched all down, and dropped from the divan, 
where she had been sitting, to the floor at his feet. 
She would have fallen on the carpet had he not held her. 

"My God! forgive me!" she sobbed, pressing his 
vol. 1. — 13 



i 9 4 ANNA KARENINA 

hands to her breast She felt that she was such a sinner 
and criminal that nothing remained for her except to 
crouch down and beg for forgiveness ; now there was 
nothing else for her in life but him, so that to him alone 
she turned her prayer for forgiveness. As she looked 
at him she felt her humiliation physically, and she could 
say no more. 

But he felt exactly as a murderer must feel when he 
sees the lifeless body of his victim. This lifeless body 
was their love — the first epoch of their love. There 
was something horrible and repulsive in the recollection 
of the terrible price that they had paid for this shame. 
The shame in the presence of their spiritual nakedness 
oppressed her and took hold of him. But in spite of all 
the horror felt by the murderer in presence of the body 
of his victim, he must cut it in pieces, must bury it, must 
take advantage of his crime. 

And, as with fury and passion the murderer throws 
himself on the dead body and drags it and cuts it, so he 
covered her face and shoulders with kisses. She held 
his hand and did not stir. 

"Yes, these kisses were what had been bought with 
this shame ! Yes, and this hand, which will always be 
mine, is the hand of my accomplice." 

She raised his hand and kissed it. He fell on his 
knees, and tried to look into her face ; but she hid it 
and said nothing. At last, as if trying to control her- 
self, she made an effort to rise, and pushed him away. 
Her face was still as beautiful as ever; even so much 
the more was it pitiful. 

"All is ended," said she; "I have nothing but thee, 
remember that." 

" I cannot help remembering it, since it is my life. A 
moment before this happiness.... " 

"What happiness?" she cried, with contempt and 
horror. And horror involuntarily seized him also. 
"For God's sake, not a word, not a word more." 

She quickly got up and moved away from him, and 
with a strange expression of hopeless despair, such as he 
had never seen before, on her face, she stood aloof from 



ANNA KARENINA 195 

him. She felt that at that moment she could not ex- 
press in words the sense of shame, rapture, and horror 
at this entrance into a new life, and she did not wish to 
speak about it or vulgarize the feeling with definite words. 

But even afterward, on the next day, on the third 
day, not only did she fail to find words in which to 
express the complication of these feelings, but she 
could not even find thoughts by which to formulate to 
herself all that was in her soul. 

She said to herself: — 

" No, I cannot now think about this ; by and by, when 
I am calmer." 

But this calmness never came. Every time when the 
questions arose: "What had she done ? and what would 
become of her ? and what ought she to do ? " she was 
filled with horror, and she compelled herself not to think 
about them. 

"By and by, by and by," she repeated, "when I am 
calmer." 

On the other hand, during sleep, when she had no 
control of her thoughts, her situation appeared in its 
ugly nakedness. One dream almost every night haunted 
her. She dreamed that she was the wife both of Vron- 
sky and of Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, and that both lav- 
ished their caresses on her. Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch 
kissed her hands, and said, weeping, " How happy we are 
now ! " Aleksei Vronsky, also, was there, and he was 
her husband. She was amazed that she had ever be- 
lieved such a thing impossible ; and she laughed as she 
explained to them that this was far simpler, that both 
would henceforth be satisfied and happy. But this 
dream weighed on her like a nightmare, and she always 
awoke in fright. 

CHAPTER XII 

Even in the first weeks after Levin returned from 
Moscow, every time that with flushed cheeks and a 
trembling in his limbs he remembered the shame of hii* 
rejection, he would say to himself: — 



i 9 6 ANNA KARENINA 

"I blushed and trembled like this, and I felt that all 
was lost, when I got one in physics, and had to go into 
the second class ; and I thought myself irretrievably 
ruined when I bungled in my sister's affairs, which were 
confided to me. And now ? Now the years have gone 
by, and I look back and wonder how it could disturb 
my mind. It will be just the same with my disap- 
pointment this time. Time will pass, and I shall grow 
callous.'' 

But three months passed away and. the callousness 
did not come, and it was as painful for him to remember 
it as on the first day. He could not reconcile himself 
to the fact that, after dreaming so long of family life, 
after being, as he thought, so well prepared for it, not 
only was he not married, but found himself farther than 
ever from marriage. He felt painfully, as all those 
around him felt, that it is not good for a man of his age 
to live alone. He remembered that before his departure 
for Moscow he had once said to his cowherd, Nikolai*, a 
simple-hearted muzhik with whom he liked to talk :— *- 

,"Do you know, Nikolaif, I am thinking of getting 
married ? " whereupon Nikolai had instantly replied, as 
if there could not be the slightest doubt about it : — 

"This ought to have been long ago, Konstantin 
Dmitritch." 

And now marriage was farther off than even The 
place was taken ; and when, exercising his imagination, 
he put into that place some young girl of his acquain- 
tance, he felt that it was perfectly impossible. Moreover, 
the recollection of how Kitty refused him and of the 
part which he played still tormented him with morti- 
fication. It was idle to say that he was not to blame in 
this ; this recollection, taken together with other mortify- 
ing experiences of the same sort, made him quiver and 
grow red in the face. He had on his conscience, as 
every man has, the remembrance of evil deeds for which 
he should have repented ; but the remembrance of these 
evil deeds did not trouble him nearly so much as the 
feeling of his humiliation, slight as it really was. It was 
a wound that refused to heal. He could not keep out 



ANNA KARENINA 197 

of his mind his rejection, and the miserable position in 
which he must have been placed in the eyes of others. 

Time and labor, however, brought their balm ; the 
painful impressions little by little began to fade in pres- 
ence of the events of the country life, important in 
reality, in spite of their apparent insignificance. Each 
week his thoughts turned to Kitty with less frequency. 
He even began to await with impatience the news that 
she was married, or was going to be married, hoping that 
this event would bring healing in the same way as the 
pulling of a tooth may. 

Meantime spring came, beautiful, friendly, without 
treachery or false promises, — a spring such as fills 
plants and animals, no less than men, with joy. This 
splendid season gave Levin new zeal, and confirmed his 
resolution to tear himself from the past so as to reorgan- 
ize his solitary life on conditions of permanence and 
independence. Although many of the plans that he 
had formed on his return to the country had not been 
put into effect, yet the most essential one — that his life 
should be kept pure -7- had been realized. He expe- 
rienced none of that sense of shame which ordinarily 
tormented him after a fall ; and he could look fearlessly 
into men's eyes. 

In February he had received a letter from Marya 
Nikolayevna, who informed him that his brother's health 
was failing, and that he would not use any remedies. 
In consequence of this letter he had immediately gone 
to* Moscow, where he persuaded Nikolai to consult a 
physician, and then to go abroad for the baths. He 
succeeded so well in persuading his brother and in lend- 
ing him money for the journey, without exasperating 
him, that he felt quite satisfied with himself. 

Besides his farm-labors, which especially occupied his 
attention that spring, and his ordinary reading, Levin 
was deeply engaged in writing a work on rural economy, 
which he had begun during the winter. His theory was 
that in farming the laborer's temperament is a factor as 
important as climate or the soil, and that consequently 
ail the deductions of agronomic science arc drawn, not 



198 ANNA KARENINA 

from the premises of soil and climate alone, but from 
the • soil, the climate, and the certain unchangeable 
character of the laborer. 

Thus, notwithstanding his loneliness or in conse- 
quence of his loneliness, his life, therefore, was very busy 
and full ; only occasionally he felt the need of some one 
besides Agafya MikhaYlovna with whom to communi- 
cate the ideas that came into his head. However, he 
brought himself to discuss with her about physics, the 
theories of rural economy, and, above all, philosophy. 
Philosophy was Agafya Mikha'flovna's favorite subject. 

The spring opened late. During the last weeks of 
Lent the weather was clear but cold. During the day 
the snow melted in the sun, but at night the mercury 
went down to seven degrees; the crust on the snow was 
so thick that carts could go anywhere across the fields. 

It snowed on Easter Sunday. Then suddenly, on the 
following day, a warm wind blew, the clouds drifted 
over, and for three days and three nights a warm and 
heavy rain fell ceaselessly. On Thursday the wind went 
down, and then over the earth was spread a thick gray 
fog, as if to conceal the mysteries that were accomplish- 
ing in nature ; under this fog, the fields were covered 
with water, the ice was melting and disappearing, the 
brooks ran more swiftly, foaming and muddy. Toward 
evening the Krasnaya Gorka, or Red Hill, began to show 
through the fog, the clouds scattered like snipe, and 
spring in reality was there in all her brilliancy. 

The next morning the sun rose bright and quickly 
melted away the thin sheet of ice that still covered 
the ponds, and the warm atmosphere grew moist with 
the vapors rising from the earth ; the old grass and the 
young blades peeping from the sod, with its tiny needles, 
the buds on the snow-ball trees, the currant bushes, and 
the sticky sappy birch trees, grew green, swelled, and 
on their branches, powdered with golden bloom, swarms 
of honey-bees buzzed in the sun. Invisible larks trilled 
their songs over the velvet of the green and the prairies 
freed from snow; the lapwings lamented for their hol- 
lows and marshes, submerged by the stormy waters; 



ANNA KARENINA 199 

the wild swans and geese flew high in the air, with their 
calls of spring. The cattle, with rough hair and spots 
worn bare, lowed as they went out to pasture ; the 
bandy-legged lambs gamboled around the bleating ewes^ 
soon to lose their wool ; swift-footed children ran bare- 
foot over the wet paths, where their footprints were left 
like fossils ; the peasant-women gossiped gayly around 
the edge of the pond, where they were bleaching their 
linen ; and in the yards resounded the axes of the mu- 
zhiks, repairing their plows and their wagons. 
Spring had really come. 



CHAPTER XIII 

Levin put on his heavy boots, and, for the first time, 
his sleeveless cloth coat instead of his fur shuba, and 
went out to look over his estate, tramping through the 
brooklets which dazzled his eyes as they glanced in the sun, 
and stepping, now on a cake of ice, and now in sticky mud. 

Spring is the epoch of plans and projects. Levin, as 
he went out into his court, no more definitely knew what 
he would first take in hand in his beloved farming than 
the tree in early spring knows how and why his young 
sprouts and branches grow out from their enveloping 
buds ; but he felt that he was going to originate the 
most charming projects and the most sensible plans. 

Pie went first to see his cattle. The cows had been 
let out into the yard, and with their smooth new coats 
of hair glistening as they warmed themselves in the 
sun, they were lowing as if to beg permission to go out 
to pasture. Levin knew them all, even to the minutest 
particulars. He contemplated them with satisfaction, 
and gave orders to take them to pasture, and to let the 
calves out into the yard. The cow-boy gayly started to 
drive them out into the field. The milkmaids, gather- 
ing up their petticoats, and splashing through the mud 
with bare feet, white as yet, and free from tan, chased 
the bellowing calves, silly with the rapture of spring, and 
with switches kept them from escaping from the yard. 



2oo ANNA KARENINA 

Admiring the young cattle which the year had 
brought, for they were uncommonly beautiful, — the 
oldest already as large as a peasants' cow, and Pava's 
daughter, three months old, as big as a yearling, — 
Levin ordered the trough to be brought out for them, 
and their hay to be given them behind gratings. 1 He 
found, however, that these gratings, which had been 
made in the autumn, but were not used during the 
winter, were out of repair. He sent for the carpenter, 
who was supposed to be busy repairing the threshing- 
machine ; but it seemed that the carpenter was not 
there. He was repairing the harrows, which should 
have been repaired during Lent. This made Levin 
very indignant. He was indignant at this everlasting 
repetition of such slovenliness, against which he had so 
many years struggled with all his might. The gratings, 
as he soon learned, not having been in use during the 
winter, had been carried to the stable, where, as they 
were of light construction, and meant only for calves, 
they had been broken. 

Moreover, it appeared that nothing had been done to 
the harrows and other agricultural implements, which 
should have been inspected and put in order during the 
winter months, and for this purpose especially he had 
hired three carpenters. The harrows were needed im- 
mediately for work in the fields. Levin summoned the 
overseer, 2 then he himself went in search of him. 
The overseer, as radiant as everything else was that 
day, came from the threshing-floor dressed in a lined 
lambskin coat. 3 He was twisting a straw between his 
fingers. 

" Why is n't the carpenter at work on the threshing- 
machine ? " 

"Oh, yes ; that is what I meant to tell you last even- 
ing : the harrows had to be repaired ! We 've got to 
plow." 

" Yes ; but what have you been doing this winter ? " 

"Yes ; but why do you hire such a carpenter ? " 

1 Reshotki) a sort of portable palisade. 

2 Prikashchik. 3 Tulupchik. 



ANNA KARENINA aoi 

" Where are the gratings for the calves ? H 

" I ordered them to be put in place. You can't do 
anything with such people," replied the overseer, wav- 
ing his hands. 

" Not such people, but such an overseer ! V said Levin, 
getting still more angry. ¥ Well, what do I keep you 
for ? " he shouted ; but, recollecting that shouts did not 
do any good, he stopped in the middle of his remark 
and only sighed. "Well, can you get the seed in yet i" 
he asked, after a silence. 

"Back of Turkino we might to-morrow, or the day 
after." 

" And the clover ? " 

" I sent Vasili and Mishka to sow it, but I don't know 
whether they succeeded ; it 's muddy." 

" On how many acres ? " 

" Sixteen acres." 1 

"Why not the whole?" cried Levin. 

He was still more indignant because they had sowed 
only sixteen acres instead of fifty-four : he knew by his 
own experience, as well as by theory, the need of sowing 
the clover-seed as early as possible, almost in the snow, 
and Levin never could get this done. 

"Not enough people. What can you do with these 
men ? The three hired men did not come ; and then 
Semyon .... " 

"Well, you would better have taken them away from 
the straw." 

" Yes ; I did that very thing." 

" Where are all the people ?" 

"There are five at the compote [he meant to say com* 
post] ; four are moving the oats, so that they should not 
spoil, Konstantin Dmitritch." 

Levin knew very well that these words, " So that they 
should not spoil" meant that his English oats saved for 
seed were already ruined. Again they had not done 
what he had ordered. 

" Yes ! But did I not tell you during Lent to put in 
the ventilating-chimneys ? " he cried. 

1 Six desyatins ; a desyatina is 2.7 acres. 



202 ANNA KARENINA 

"Don't you be troubled; we will do all in good 
time." 

Levin angrily waved his hand, and went to examine 
his oats in the granary; then he went to the stables. 
The grain was not yet spoiled, but the workmen were 
stirring it up with shovels when they might have let it 
down from one story to the other. After he had 
straightened this matter and sent two hands to sow 
the clover, Levin calmed down in regard to his over- 
seer. It was such a lovely day that one could not keep 
angry. 

" Ignat," he cried to his coachman, who, with upturned 
sleeves, was washing the carriage near the pump, " sad- 
dle me a horse." 

"Which one?" 

"Well, Kolpik." 

"I will do so." 

While he was saddling the horse, Levin again called 
the overseer, who was busying himself in his vicinity, 
hoping to be restored to favor, and began to speak with 
him about the work that he wanted done during the 
spring, and about his plans for carrying on the estate. 

He wanted the compost spread as soon as possible, 
so as to have this work done before the first mowing ; 
then he wanted the farthest field plowed, so that it 
might be left fallow. All the fields — not half of them 
— should be attended to with the laborers. 

The overseer listened attentively, doing his best evi- 
dently to approve of his master's plans. But never- 
theless his face wore that vexatiously hopeless and 
melancholy expression which Levin knew so well. 
This expression seemed to say, "This is all very well 
and good, but as God shall give." 

Nothing exasperated Levin so much as this tone, but 
it was common to all the overseers that had ever been 
in his service. They all received his projects with the 
same dejected air ; and so he now refrained from getting 
angry, but he was exasperated and felt himself still more 
stimulated for the struggle against this, as it were ele- 
mental, force which he could not help calling "As God 



ANNA KARENINA 203 

shall givey' and which constantly opposed him every- 
where. 

"If we have time, Konstantin Dmitritch," said the 
overseer. 

" Why shall we not have time ? " 

" We absolutely ought to hire fifteen more workmen, 
but they can't be had. Some came to-day who asked 
seventy rubles for the summer." 

Levin did not speak. Again the opposing force ! 
He knew that, however he might exert himself, he never 
could hire more than forty, thirty-seven, or thirty-eight, 
laborers at a reasonable price ; he had succeeded in get- 
ting forty, never more ; but nevertheless he could not 
give up vanquished. 

" Send to Suri, to Chefirovka ; if they don't come, we 
must go for them." 

" I 'm going to go/' said Vasili Feodorovitch, gloomily. 
"But then the horses are very feeble." 

" Buy some more ; but then I know," he added, with 
a laugh, V that you will do as little and as badly as you 
can. However, I warn you that I will not let you do as 
you please this year. I shall take the reins in my own 
hands." 

" Yes ! but even as it is you get too little sleep, it 
seems to me. We are very happy to be under our mas- 
ter's eyes.... " 

" Now, have the clover put in on the Berezof Bottom, 
and I shall come myself to inspect it," said he, 
mounting his little horsef Kolpik, which the coachman 
brought up. 

"Don't go across the brooks, Konstantin Dmitritch," 
cried the coachman. 

" Well, then, by the woods." 

And on his little, lively, easy-going ambler, which 
whinnied as it came to the pools, and which pulled on 
the bridle, having been too long in the stable, Levin rode 
out of the muddy courtyard, and across the open fields. 

Happy as Levin had felt in his cow-yard and cattle- 
pen, he felt still happier out in the field. Rhythmically 
swaying on his easy-going, gentle pony, drinking in the 



2o 4 ANNA KARENINA 

warm air, freshened by the snow as he rode through the 
forest where the snow still lay here and there rapidly 
melting in the tracks, he took keen delight in every 
'one of his trees, with greening moss and swelling buds. 
As he came out from the forest, before him lay a vast 
stretch of fields ; they seemed like an immense carpet of 
velvet where there was not a bare spot or a marsh, only 
here and there in the hollows marked with patches of 
melting snow. The sight of a peasant's mare and colt 
treading down his fields did not anger him, but he 
ordered a passing muzhik to drive them out. With the 
same gentleness he received the sarcastic and impudent 
answer of the muzhik Ipat, whom he met and asked, 
"Ipat, shall we put in the seed before very long?" 
And Ipat replied, "We must plow first, Konstantin 
Dmitritch." 

The farther he went, the more his good-humor in- 
creased, and each of his plans for improving his estate 
seemed to surpass the other : to protect the fields on 
the south by lines of trees so as to prevent the snow 
from staying too long; to divide his arable fields into 
nine parts, six of which should be well dressed, and the 
other three sown down to grass ; to build a cow-yard in 
the farthest corner of one field, and have a pond dug; 
to have portable inclosures for the cattle, so as to util- 
ize the manure; and thus to cultivate three hundred 
desyatins of wheat, a hundred dcsyatins of potatoes, and 
one hundred and fifty of clover, without exhausting the 
soil. 

Full of these reflections, he picked his way carefully 
along so. as not to tread down his fields, till at last he 
reached the place where the laborers were sowing the 
clover. The cart, loaded with seed, instead of being left 
on the edge of the field, had been driven into the 
plowed land, and his winter wheat was crushed by 
the wheels and trampled down by the horse. The two 
laborers were sitting by the edge of the field, evidently 
smoking a mutual pipe. The earth in the cart, mixed 
together with the seed, had not been worked over, but 
was full of harcj or frozen lumps. 



ANNA KARENINA 205 

When he saw the master, the laborer Vasili started 
toward the cart, and Mishka began to sow. This was 
all wrong, but Levin rarely got angry with his laborers. 
When Vasili came up to him, Levin ordered him to lead 
the horse to the side of the field. 

" It won't do any harm, sir ; it will spring up 
again." 

" Please not discuss it," replied Levin, " but do what 
I say." 

" I will obey," said Vasili, taking the horse by the 
head. "What splendid seed, Konstantin Dmitritch," 
he added, to regain favor. " Best kind ! But it is 
frightful going! You drag a pud on each, foot." 

" But why was n't the earth sifted ? " asked Levin. 

" Oh ! it '11 come out all right," replied Vasili, taking 
up some seed, and crushing the lump in his palm. 

It was not Vasili's fault that they were scattering the 
unsifted soil ; but it was vexatious, nevertheless. Hav- 
ing more than once to his advantage made use of a 
well-known means of wreaking his vexation, which 
always seemed to him foolish, Levin now determined to 
try it and see if he could recover his good temper. He 
noticed how Mishka strode along dragging huge clods 
of clay which stuck to each of his feet ; so, dismounting, 
he took the seed-cod from Vasili and began to scatter 
the seed. 

" Where did you stop ? " 

Vasili touched the spot with his foot, and Levin went 
on as best he could, scattering the earth with the seed. 
But it was as hard as wading through a marsh, and after 
he had gone a row he stopped all in a sweat, and returned 
the seed-cod. 

"Well, barin, if that row doesn't come out well next 
summer, don't blame me for it! " said Vasili. 

" Indeed I won't," replied Levin, gayly, already feel- 
ing the efficacy of the means he had employed. 

" But just look at the summer we 're going to have ! 
'Twill be magnificent ! If you '11 notice, that 's where I 
sowed last spring. How well I planted it ! Why, Kon- 
stantin Dmitritch, I work as if I were working for my 



206 ANNA KARENINA 

own father ! Well, I don't like to do slack work. What 
is good for the master is good for us. And look yon- 
der at that field," continued Vasili, pointing to the field, 
"it delights my heart" 

"It is a fine spring, Vasili." 

" Yes ! it is such a spring as our old men can't re- 
member. I was at home, and our elder has already 
sowed an acre 1 of wheat ; as he says he can hardly tell 
it from rye." 

" But how long have you been sowing wheat ? " 

" Why, you yourself taught us how to sow it year be- 
fore last. You spared me two measures. It gave eight 
bushels and w,e sowed an acre with it." 

" Well ! look here, see that you break up the earth 
well!" said Levin, as he started for his ambler, "look 
after Mishka ; and if the seed comes up well, you shall 
have fifty kopeks a desyatin." 

"We thank you humbly: we should be content even 
without that." 

Levin mounted his horse, and rode off to visit his 
last year's clover-field, and then to the field which was 
already plowed ready for the summer wheat. 

The crop of clover in the stubble-field was miraculous. 
It had all survived, and was covering with a mantle of 
green all the ground where the preceding fall the roots 
of the wheat had been left. 

The horse sank up to the fetlock, and each foot made 
a sucking noise as he pulled it out of the half-thawed 
soil. It was entirely impossible to cross the plowed 
land. Only where there was ice would it hold, but in 
the thawed furrows the horse's leg sank above the fet-. 
lock. The plowed field was excellent. In two days 
the harrowing and sowing could be done. Everything 
was beautiful, everything was gay ! 

Levin rode back by way of the brooks, hoping to find 
the water lower; in fact, he found that he could get 

1 Tri osminnika ; in the government of Tula an osminnik H an eighth of 
a desyatin. One chetvert (about eight bushels) plants three of these eighths, 
or an acre. Levin promises an equivalent of about forty cents for 2.7 
acres. 



ANNA KARENINA 207 

across ; and, as he waded through, he scared up a couple 
of wild ducks. 

"There ought to be snipe, also," he thought; and a 
forest guard whom he met on his way to the house 
confirmed his supposition. 

He immediately spurred up his horse, so as to get 
back in time for dinner, and to prepare his gun for 
the evening. 



CHAPTER XIV 

Just as Levin reached home, in the best humor in 
the world, he heard the jingling of bells at the side 
entrance. 

"There, now! some one from the railroad station," 
was his first thought; "it's time for the Moscow train. 
— Who can have come? brother Nikolai? Did he not 
say that instead of going abroad he might perhaps 
come to see me ?" 

For a moment it occurred to him disagreeably that 
his brother Nikolai's presence might spoil his pleasant 
plans- for the spring ; but, disgusted at the selfishness 
of this thought, his mind, so to speak, instantly received 
his brother with open arms, and he began to hope, with 
affectionate joy, that it was really he. 

He hurried his horse, and as he came out from behind 
the acacia, he saw a hired troika from the railway station 
and a traveler dressed in a shuba. 

It was not his brother. 

"Akh ! if only it is some agreeable man to talk with," 
he thought. 

"Ah!" he cried, lifting up both arms as he recog- 
nized Stepan Arkadyevitch, "here is the most delecta- 
ble of guests ! Akh ! how glad I am to see you ! — 
I shall certainly learn from him if she is married or 
when she 's going to be," he added to himself. 

This splendid spring morning he felt that the memory 
of Kitty was not at all painful. 

" You scarcely expected me, I suppose," said Stepan 



208 ANNA KARENINA 

Arkadyevitch, leaping out of the sledge, with spots ot 
mud on the bridge of his nose, on his cheeks, and on 
his forehead, but radiant with health and pleasure. " I 
am come, first, to see you," he cried, throwing his arms 
around Levin and kissing him ; "secondly, to shoot a few 
birds ; and thirdly, to sell the forest at Yergushovo." 

" Perfect, is n't it ? What do you think of this spring? 
But how could you have got here in a sledge ? " 

"Traveling is far worse with a telyega, Konstantin 
Dmitritch," replied the postilion, who was an acquain- 
tance. 

" Well ! Indeed, I am delighted to see you again/' 
said Levin, with a genuine smile of boyish joy. 

He conducted his guest to the room kept in readi- 
ness for visitors, and had Stepan Arkadyevitch's things 
brought up, — a gripsack, a gun in its case, and a box 
of cigars, and then, leaving him to wash and dress him- 
self, he went down to his office to speak about the clover 
and the plowing, 

Agafya Mikhaflovna, who had very much at heart the 
honor of the mansion, met him in the vestibule with 
questions about dinner. 

"Do just as you please," replied Levin, as he went 
out; "only make haste about it," said he, and went to 
the overseer. 

When he returned, Stepan Arkadyevitch, who had 
washed, and combed his hair, was just coming out of 
his room with a radiant smile, and together they went 
up-stairs. 

"Well, I am very happy to have got out to your 
house at last. I shall now learn the mystery of your 
existence here. Truly, I envy you. What a house! 
How convenient everything is ! how bright and delight- 
ful ! " said Stepan Arkadyevitch, forgetting that bright 
days and the springtime were not always there. "And 
your old nurse, — what a charming old soul ! All that 's 
lacking is a pretty little chambermaid with an apron on, 
— but that does not suit your severe and monastic style ; 
but this is very good." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch had much interesting news to 



ANNA KARENINA 209 

tell : especially interesting to Levin was the tidings that 
his brother Sergye! Ivanovitch expected to come into 
the country this summer; but not one word did Stepan 
Arkadyevitch say about Kitty or any of the Shcherbat- 
skys, he simply transmitted his wife's greeting. Levin 
was grateful to him for this delicacy. As usual, he 
had stored up during his hours of solitude a throng of 
ideas and impressions which he could not share with 
any of his domestics, and now he poured into Oblon- 
sky's ears his poetical spring joys, his failures and plans 
and farming projects, his thoughts and his observations 
on the books which he had read, and above all the idea 
of his treatise, the scheme of which consisted — though 
he himself had not noticed it — of a critique on all for- 
mer works on farming. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch, amiable, and always ready to 
grasp a point, snowed unusual cordiality ; and Levin 
even thought that he noticed a certain flattering con- 
sideration and an undertone of tenderness in- his treat- 
ment of him. 

The efforts of Agafya Mikhailovna and the cook to 
get up an especially good dinner resulted in the two 
friends, who were half starved, betaking themselves to 
the zakuskci) or lunch-table, and devouring bread and 
butter, cold chicken and salted mushrooms, and finally 
in Levin calling for the soup without the little pasties 
which the cook had made in the hope of surprising the 
guest. 

But Stepan Arkadyevitch, though he was used to dif- 
ferent kinds of dinners, found everything excellent, the 
travnik, or herb-beer, the bread, the butter, and especially 
the cold chicken, the mushrooms, the shchi y or cabbage- 
soup, the fowl with white sauce, and the white Krimean 
wine, — everything was admirable, wonderful ! 

" Perfect ! perfect ! " he cried, as he Jit a big cigarette 
after the roast. " I feel as if I had escaped the shocks 
and noise of a ship, and had landed on a peaceful shore. 
And so you say that the element represented by the 
working-man ought to be studied above all others, and 
be taken as a guide in the choice of economy expe- 

VOL. I.— 14 



aio ANNA KARENINA 

dients. You see I am a profanus in these questions, 
but if seems to me that this theory and its applications 
would have an influence on the working-man ...." 

"Yes; but hold on. I am not speaking of political 
economy, but of rural economy considered as a science. 
You must study the premises, the phenomena, just the 
same as in the natural sciences ; and the working-man, 
from the economical and ethnographical point of view.... 11 

But here Agafya MikhaYlovna entered with the des- 
sert of preserves. 

"Well, now! accept my compliments, Agafya Mi- 
kharlovna, ,, said Stepan Arkadyevitch, kissing the ends 
of his hairy fingers. " What nice baked chicken ! 
What delicious beer ! — Well, Kostia, is n't it time to 
go ? " he added. 

Levin looked out of the window toward the sun, 
which was sinking behind the tree-tops, still bare and 
leafless. 

"It is time. Kuzma, have the horses hitched up," 
he cried, as he went down-stairs. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch followed him, and carefully re- 
moved the canvas covering from the lacquered case, and, 
having opened it, proceeded to take out his costly gun, 
which was of the newest pattern. 

Kuzma, already scenting a generous fee, gave him 
assiduous attention, and helped him put on his stock- 
ings and his hunting-boots ; .and Stepan Arkadyevitch 
accepted his aid complacently. 

" If the merchant Rabinin comes while we are gone, 
Kostia, — I told him to be here to-day, — do me the favor 
to have him kept till we get back." .... 

" Are you going to sell your wood to Rabinin ? M 

" Yes. Why, do you know him ? " 

"Oh! certainly I know him. I have done business 
with him, 'positively and finally.'" 

Stepan Arkadyevitch burst into a laugh. "Posi- 
tively and finally " were the favorite words of the mer- 
chant. 

"Yes; he is very droll in his speech! — She knows 
where her master is going," he added, patting Laska, 



ANNA KARENINA 211 

who was jumping and barking around Levin, licking 
now his hand, now his boots and gun. 

A dolgushdy or hunting-wagon, was waiting at the 
steps as they came out. 

" I had the horses put in, although we have but a 
little distance to go," said Levin ; " but would you rather 
walk?" 

"No, I prefer to ride," replied Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
as he mounted the wagon. He sat down, tucking round 
his legs a striped plaid, and lighted a cigar. "How 
can you get along without smoking, Kostia? A cigar 
....it is not only a pleasure, it is the very crown and 
sign of delight. This is life indeed. How delightful ! 
I should like to live like this ! " 

"What 's to prevent ?" asked Levin, with a smile. 

"Yes; but you are a fortunate man, for you have 
everything that you like. * You like horses, you have 
them ; dogs, you have them ; hunting, here it is ; an 
estate, here it is ! " 

"Perhaps it is because I enjoy what I have, and 
don't covet what I have not," replied Levin, with Kitty 
in his mind. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch understood, and looked at him 
without speaking. 

Levin was grateful to Oblonsky because he avoided 
speaking about the Shcherbatskys, with his usual tact 
perceiving that Levin dreaded to speak about them ; 
but now he felt anxious'to find out how matters stood, 
but he did not dare to inquire. 

" Well, how go your affairs ? " asked Levin, realizing 
how selfish it was in him to think only of himself. < 

Oblonsky's eyes glistened with gayety. 

"You will not admit that one can want hot rolls when 
he has his monthly rations ; in your eyes it is a crime : 
but for me, I cannot admit the possibility of living with- 
out love," he replied, construing Levin's question in his 
own fashion. " What 's to be done about it ? I am so 
constituted. And it is a fact; it does so little. harm to 
any one else, and gives one so much pleasure...." . 

"What! there is a new one, is there?" askecl Levin. 



212 ANNA KARENINA 

"There is, brother! You know the type of the 
women in Ossian ?.... these women that you see in 
dreams ? .... But they really exist, and are terrible. 
Woman, you see, is an inexhaustible theme ; you can 
never cease studying her, — she always presents some 
new phase." 

"So much the better not to study her, then." 

"Not at all. Some mathematician has said that hap- 
piness consisted in searching for truth and never find- 
ing it." 

Levin listened, and said no more ; and, notwithstanding 
all the efforts which he made, he could not in the least 
enter into his friend's soul, and understand his feelings 
and the charm of studying such women. 



CHAPTER XV 

i 

The place where the birds collected was not far 
away, by a small stream, flowing through an aspen 
grove. Levin got out and took Oblonsky to a nook in 
a mossy, somewhat marshy meadow, where the snow 
had already melted. He himself went to the opposite 
side, near a double birch, rested his gun on the fork of 
a dead -branch, took off his kaftan, clasped a belt about 
his waist, and insured the free motion of his arms. 

Old gray Laska, following him step by step, sat down 
cautiously in front of him, and pricked up her ears. 
The sun was setting behind the great forest, and against 
the bright sky the young birches and aspens stood out 
distinctly, with their bending branches and their swell- 
ing buds. 

In the forest, where the snow still lay, the low rip- 
pling sound of waters could be heard running in their 
narrow channels ; little birds were chirping, and flying 
from tree to tree. In the intervals of perfect silence 
one could hear the rustling of the last year's leaves, 
moved by the thawing earth or the pushing herbs. 

" Why, one really can hear and see the grass grow ! " 
said Levin to himself; as he saw a moist and slate-col- 



ANNA KARENINA 213 

ored aspen leaf raised by the blade of a young herb start- 
ing from the sod. 

He stood, listening and looking, now at the damp 
moss-covered ground, now at the watchful Laska, now 
at the bare tree-tops of the forest, which swept like a sea to 
the foot of the hill, and now at the darkening sky, where 
floated little white bits of cloud. A hawk flew aloft, 
slowly flapping his broad wings above the distant forest ; 
another took the same direction and disappeared. In 
the thicket the birds were chirping louder and more 
gayly than ever. Not far away, an owl lifted his voice, 
and Laska pricked up her ears again, took two or three 
cautious steps, and bent her head to listen. On the 
other side of the stream a cuckoo sang. Twice it uttered 
its customary cry, and then its voice grew hoarse, it 
flew away, and was heard no more. # 

" Why, the cuckoo has come ! " said Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, coming out from behind his thicket. 

" Yes, I hear," said Levin, disgusted that the silence 
of the forest was broken, by the sound even of his own 
voice. "You won't have to wait long now." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch returned to his place behind his 
thicket, and Levin saw only the flash of a match and 
the red glow of his cigarette and a light bluish smoke. 

Tchik! tchik / Stepan Arkadyevitch .cocked his gun. 

"What was that making that noise ?" he asked of 
his companion, attracting his attention to a protracted 
humming as if a colt was neighing with a very slender 
voice. 

"Don't you know what that is? That is the buck 
rabbit. Don't speak any more. Listen, there is a 
bird ! " cried Levin, cocking his gun. 

A slender distant whistle was heard, with that rhyth- 
mic regularity which the huntsman knows so well ; then 
a moment or two later it was repeated nearer, and sud- 
denly changed into a hoarse little cry. 

Levin turned his eyes to the right, to the left, and 
finally saw, just above his head, against the fading blue 
of the sky, above the gently waving aspens, a bird fly- 
ing. It flew straight toward him ; its cry, like the noise 



2i 4 ANNA KARENINA 

made by tearing stiff cloth, rang in his ears ; then he 
distinguished the long bill and the long neck of the 
bird, but hardly had he caught sight of it when a red 
flash shone out from behind Oblonsky's bush. The 
bird darted off like an arrow and rose into the air again ; 
but again the light flashed and a report was heard, and 
the bird, vainly striving to rise, flapped .its wings for a 
second, and fell heavily to the wet earth. 

" Did I miss ? " asked Stepan Arkadyevitch, who 
could see nothing through the smoke. 

" Here she is," cried Levin, pointing to Laska, who, 
with one ear erect, and waving the tip end of her hairy 
tail, slowly, as if to lengthen out the pleasure, came back 
with the bird in her mouth, seeming almost to smile as 
she laid the game down at her master's feet. 

"Well now, I am glad you succeeded," said Levin, 
though 'he felt a slight sensation of envy, because he 
himself had not killed this snipe. 

" The right barrel missed, curse it ! " replied Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, reloading his gun. f f Sk /.... Here 's an- 
other...." 

In fact, the whistles came thicker and thicker, rapid 
and sharp. Two snipe flew over the hunters, playing, 
chasing each other, and only whistling, not clucking.. 
Four shots rang out ; and the snipe, making a sudden 
turn like swallows, disappeared from sight. 



The sport was excellent. Stepan Arkadyevitch killed 
two others, and Levin also two, one of which was lost. 
It grew darker and darker. Venus, with silvery light, 
shone out low in the west from behind the birches; 
and high in the east, Arcturus gleamed, with his somber, 
reddish, fire. Above his head, Levin found and lost the 
stars of the Great Bear. The snipe had now ceased to 
fly, but Levin resolved to wait until Venus, which was 
visible above the birch trees, should stand clear above 
the lower branches, and till all the stars of the Great 
Bear should be entirely visible. The star had passed 
beyond the birch trees, and the wain of the Bear with 



ANNA KARENINA 215 

its pole was shining out clear in the dark blue sky, and 
he was still waiting. 

" Is n't it getting late ? " asked Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

All was calm in the forest ; not a bird moved. 

" Let us wait a little longer/' replied Levin. 

"Just as you please." 

At this moment they were not fifteen paces apart. 

" Stiva/' cried Levin, suddenly, "you have not told 
me whether your sister-in-law is married yet, or whether 
she is to be married soon." 

He felt so calm, his mind was so thoroughly made 
up, that nothing, he thought, could move him. But 
what Stepan Arkadyevitch answered was wholly un- 
expected. 

"She is not married, and she is not thinking of 
marriage. She is very ill, and the doctors have sent 
her abroad. They even fear for her life." 

"What did you say?" cried Levin. "Very ill? 
What is the matter? How did she.... " 

While they were talking thus, Laska, with ears erect, 
was gazing at the sky above her head, and looking at 
them reproachfully. 

"This is not the time to talk," thought Laska. "Ah ! 
Here comes one — there he goes; they will miss him." 

At the same instant a sharp whistle pierced the ears 
of the two huntsmen, and both, leveling their guns, 
shot at once ; the two reports, the two flashes, were . 
simultaneous. The snipe, flying high, folded his wings, 
drew up his delicate legs, and fell into the thicket. 

"Excellent! both together!" cried Levin, running 
with Laska in search of the game. " Oh, yes ! What 
was it that hurt me so just now? Ah, yes! Kitty is 
ill," he remembered. "What is to be done about it? 
It is too bad. — Ah ! she has found it ! Good dog," said 
he, taking the bird, still warm, from Laska's mouth, and 
putting it into his overflowing game-bag. 

" Come on, Stiva ! " he cried. 



216 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XVI 



On their way home, Levin questioned his friend about 
Kitty's illness and the plans of the Shcherbatskys. 
Though it caused some conscientious scruples, what he 
heard was pleasant news to him. It was pleasant because 
it left him with some grounds for hope, and it was still 
more pleasant to think that she who had caused him so 
much suffering, was suffering herself. But when Stepan 
Arkadyevitch began to speak of the reason of Kitty's 
illness; and pronounced the name of Vronsky, he inter- 
rupted him. » 

" I have no right to know these family matters, since 
I am not concerned." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch smiled imperceptibly as he 
noticed the sudden and characteristic change in Levin, 
who, in an instant, had passed from gayety to sadness. 

" Have you succeeded in your transaction with Rabinin 
about the. wood ?" he asked. 

"Yes, I have made the bargain. He gives me an 
excellent price, — thirty-eight thousand rubles, eight in 
advance, and the rest in six years. I had been long 
about it ; no one offered me any more." 

"That means you are selling your wood for a song," 
said Levin, frowning. 

"Why so?" said Stepan Arkadyevitch, with a good- 
humored smile, knowing that now Levin would totally 
disapprove of everything. 

"Because your wood is worth at least five hundred 
rubles a desyatin." 

" Oh ! You rural economists ! " replied Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, banteringly. "What a tone of scorn to us, 
your city brpther ! .... And yet, when it comes to busi- 
ness matters, we come out of it better than you do. 
Believe me, I have made a careful calculation. The 
wood is sold under very favorable conditions ; and I 
fear only one thing, and that is lest the merchant will 
back out of it ! You see, it is wretched wood," he went 
on, accenting the word wretched^ so as to convince 



ANNA KARENINA 217 

Levin of the unfairness of his criticism, "and nothing 
but fire-wood. There will not be much more than thirty 
cords to the acre, 1 and he pays me at the rate of two 
hundred rubles." 

Levin smiled scornfully. 

"I know these city people," he thought,'* who, com- 
ing twice in ten years into the country, and learning 
two or three country words, which they use appropri- 
ately or inappropriately, are firmly persuaded that they 
know it all. ' Wretched ! only thirty cords!' he speaks 
words without knowing what he is talking about." 

"1 do not pretend to teach you what you write in 
your office," said he, "and, if I needed, I would even 
ask your advice. But you are so sure that you under- 
stand this whole document about the wood. It is hard. 
Have you counted the trees ? " 

"What? Count my trees?" asked Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, with a laugh, and still trying to get his friend out 
of his ill-humor. " Count the sands, the rays of the 
planets — though a lofty genius might .... " 

"Well, now! I tell' you the lofty genius of Rabinin 
may ! Never does a merchant purchase without count- 
ing, — unless, indeed, the wood is given away for noth- 
ing as you have done. I know your forest, I go hunting 
there every year ; and your forest is worth five hundred 
rubles a desyatin cash down ; and he has given you only 
two hundred, and on a long term. That means you make 
him a present of thirty thousand." 

" Well, enough of imaginary receipts," said Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, plaintively. " Why did n't some one offer 
me this price ? " 

" Because the merchants connive together. I have 
had to do with all of them ; I know them. They are 
not merchants, but speculators. None of them is satis- 
fied with a profit less than ten or fifteen percent. They 
wait till they can buy for twenty kopeks what is worth a 
ruble." 

"Well, enough ; you are out of sorts." 

1 Thirty sazhens to the desyatin. A desyatin is 2.7 acre. A cubic 
sazktji is 2.6S cords. 



2i 8 ANNA KARENINA 

j 

" Not at all," said Levin, sadly, as they were approach 
ing the house. 

A small cart, tightly bound with iron and leather, drawn 
by a fat horse, tightly harnessed with wide straps, was 
standing at the entrance ; in the cart sat a red-faced 
overseer tightly belted, who served Rabinin as a coach- 
man. Rabinin himself was already in the house, and 
met the two friends in the vestibule. Rabinin was a 
man of middle age, tall and thin, wearing a mustache, 
but his prominent chin was well shaven. His eyes were 
protuberant and muddy. He was clad in a dark blue 
coat with buttons set low behind, and he wore high 
boots, wrinkled around the ankles and smooth over the 
calves, and over his boots huge galoshes. Wiping his 
face with his handkerchief, and wrapping his over- 
coat closely around him, though without that it fitted 
him well enough, he came out with a smile, to meet 
the gentlemen as they entered. He gave one hand 
to Stepan Arkadyevitch as if he wanted to grasp some- 
thing. 

"Ah! Here you are," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
shaking hands. "Very good." 

" I should not have ventured to disobey your excel- 
lency's orders, though the roads are very bad. Posi- 
tively, I came all the way on foot, but I got here on time. 
A greeting to you, Konstantin Dmitritch," said he, 
turning to Levin, intending to seize his hand also ; 
but Levin, frowning, affected not to notice the motion, 
and began to take out the snipe. 

"You have been enjoying a hunt? What kind of a 
bird is that ? " asked Rabinin, looking at the snipe dis- 
dainfully. " I suppose it has a peculiar flavor." And 
he shook his head disapprovingly, as if he felt doubtful 
whether the game were worth the candle. 

"Would you like to go into the library?" said Levin, 
darkly scowling, addressing Stepan Arkadyevitch in 
French. " Go to the library, and discuss your business 
there." 

"Just as you please," replied the merchant, in a tone 
of disdainful superiority, apparently wishing it to be 



ANNA KARENINA 219 

understood that others might find difficulties in trans- 
acting business, but that he never could. 

As he entered the library, Rabinin glanced about as 
if his eyes were in search of the holy image ; but when 
he caught sight of it, he did not cross himself. He 
glanced at the bookcases and the shelves lined with 
books, and with the same air of doubt that the snipe had 
caused, he smiled scornfully and shook his head disap- 
provingly, as if this kind of game also were not worth 
the candle. 

"Well, did you bring the money?" asked Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. " Sit down." 

" The money will come all in good time, but I came 
to see you and have a talk." 

" What have we to talk about ? However, sit 
down." 

" May as well sit down," said Rabinin, taking a chair, 
and leaning back in it in the most uncomfortable atti- 
tude. "You must give in a trifle, prince; it would be 
sinful not to do it. As to the money, it is all ready, ■ 
absolutely and finally even to the last kopek ; as far as 
the money goes, there will be no delay." 

Levin, who had been putting his gun away in the 
armory, and was just leaving the room, stopped as he 
heard the last words. 

" You bought the wood for a song," said he. " He 
came to visit me too late ; I would have got a good price 
for it." 

Rabinin arose and smilingly contemplated Levin from 
head to foot, but said nothing. 

" Konstantin Levin is very sharp," said he, at length, 
turning to Stepan Arkadyevitch. " One never succeeds 
in arranging a bargain finally with him. I have bought 
wheat, and paid good prices." 

" Why should I give you my property for a song ? I 
did not find it in the ground, nor did I steal it." 

" Excuse me ; at the present day it is absolutely im- 
possible to be a thief, everything is done, in the present 
day, honestly and openly. Who could steal, then ? We 
have spoken honestly and honorably. The wood is too 



aao ANNA KARENINA 

dear ; I shall not make the two ends meet. I beg him 
to yield a little." 

"But is your bargain made, or is it not? If it is 
made, there is no need of haggling; if it is not," said 
Levin, " I am going to buy the wood." 

The smile suddenly disappeared from Rabinin's lips. 
A rapacious and cruel expression, like that of a bird of 
prey, came in its place. With his bony fingers he tore 
open his overcoat, bringing into sight his shirt, his waist- 
coat with its copper buttons, and his watch-chain ; and 
from his breast-pocket he pulled out a huge, well-worn 
wallet. 

" Excuse me, the wood is mine," he exclaimed, making a 
rapid sign of the cross, and he extended his hand. " Take 
your money, the wood is mine. This is how Rabinin 
ends his transactions. He does not reckon his kopeks," 
said he, knitting his brows and waving his wallet eagerly. 

" If I were in your place, I should not be in haste," 
said Levin. 

" Mercy on me ! " said Oblonsky, astonished, " I have 
given my word." 

Levin dashed out of the room, slamming the door. 
Rabinin glanced at the door and shook his head. 

" Merely the effect of youth ; definitely, pure child- 
ishness. Believe me, I buy this, so to speak, for the 
sake of glory, so that they may say, * It 's Rabinin, and 
not some one else, who has bought Oblonsky's forest.' 
And God knows how I shall come out of it ! Have faith 
in God ! Please sign." .... 

An hour later the merchant, carefully wrapping his 
khalat around him and buttoning up his overcoat, took 
his seat in his cart and drove home, with the agreement 
in his pocket. 

"Oh! these gentlemen!" he said to his overseer, 
"always the same story." 

" So it is," replied the prikashchik, giving up the reins, 
so as to arrange the leather boot. * And your little pur- 
chase, MikhaYl Ignatyitch?" 

"Well! well!" 



ANNA KARENINA 221 



CHAPTER XVII 

Stepan Arkadyevitch went up-stairs, his pockets 
bulging out with "promises to pay," due in three months, 
which the merchant had given him. The sale of the 
forest was concluded ; he had money in his pocket ; 
sport had been good ; and Stepan Arkadyevitch was in 
the happiest frame of mind, and therefore was especially 
eager to dispel the sadness which had taken possession 
of Levin. He wanted a good ending for the day that 
since dinner had shown such promise. 

In point of fact, Levin was not in good spirits, and 
in spite of his desire to seem amiable and thoughtful 
toward his beloved guest, he could not CQntrol himself. 
The intoxication which he felt in learning that Kitty 
was not married had begun little by little to affect him. 

Kitty not married, and ill — ill from love for a man 
who had jilted her. It was almost like a personal in- 
sult. Vronsky had slighted her, and she had slighted 
him. Levin, consequently, had gained the right to de- 
spise him. He was therefore his enemy. Levin did 
not reason this all out. He had a vague sense that 
there was something in this humiliating to him, and he 
was angry now because it had upset his plans, and so 
everything which came up annoyed him. The stupid 
sale of the forest, which had taken place under his roof, 
and the way Oblonsky had been cheated, exasperated him. 

"Well, is it finished?" he asked, as he met Stepan 
Arkadyevitch up-stairs. "Would you like some sup- 
per?" 

"Yes, I won't refuse. What an appetite I feel in 
the country ! It 's wonderful ! Why did n't you offer a 
bite to Rabinin ? " 

"Ah! the devil take him!" 

" Why ! how you treated him ! " exclaimed Oblonsky, 
"You didn't even offer him your hand! Why didn't 
you offer him your hand ? " 

" Because I don't shake hands with my lackey, and 
my lackey is worth a hundred of him." 



222 ANNA KARENINA 

"What a retrograde you are! And how about the 
fusion of classes ? " said Oblonsky. 

"Let those who like it, enjoy it! It is disgusting 
to me." 

"You, I see, are a retrograde." 

"To tell the truth, I never asked myself what I am. 
I am Konstantin Levin — nothing more." 

"And Konstantin Levin in a very bad humor," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, smiling. 

"Yes, I am in bad humor, and do you know why? 
Because.... excuse me.... because of your stupid barg.... " 

Stepan Arkadyevitch frowned good-naturedly, like a 
man who is unreasonably scolded and blamed. 

"There! that'll do!" he said. "After any one has 
sold anything, they come saying, 'You might have sold 
this at a higher price;' but no one thinks of offering 

this fine price before the sale No; I see you have 

a grudge against this unfortunate Rabinin." 

" Maybe I have. And do you know why ? You will 
call me retrograde or some worse name, but it is so 
vexatious and disgusting to me to see what is going 
on everywhere — the nobility which I belong to, and 
in spite of your fusion of classes, am very glad to be- 
long to, always getting poorer and poorer And this 

growing poverty is not in consequence of luxurious 
living. That would be nothing. To live like lords is 
proper for the nobles ; the nobles only can do this. 
Now the muzhiks are buying up our lands ; that does not 
trouble me ; the proprietor does nothing, the muzhik 
is industrious, and supplants the lazy man. So it ought 
to be. And I am very glad for the muzhik. But what 
vexes me, and stirs my soul, is to see the proprietor 
robbed by..,. I don't know how to express it .... by his 
own innocence. Here is a Polish leasehdlder, who has 
bought, at half price, a superb estate of a lady who 
lives at Nice. Yonder is a merchant who has hired a 
farm for a ruble an acre, and it is worth ten rubles an 
acre. And this very day, without the slightest reason, 
you have given this rascal a present of thirty thousand." 

" But what can I do ? Count my trees one by one ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 223 

" Certainly ; if you have not counted them, Rabinin 
did, and his children will have the means whereby to 
live and get an education, whereas yours, perhaps, will 
not" 

" Well, forgive me, but there is something pitiful in 
such minute calculations. We have our ways of doing 
things, and they have theirs ; and let them get the 
profits. There now ! Moreover, it is done, and that 's 
the end of it And here is my favorite omelette com- 
ing in ; and then Agafya MikhaTlovna will certainly give 
us a glass of her marvelous herb-beer." .... 

Stepan Arkadyevitch sat down at the table and be- 
gan to joke with Agafya MikhaTlovna, assuring her that 
he had not eaten such a dinner and such a supper for 
an age. 

"You can give fine speeches, at least," said Agafya 
MikhaTlovna. " But Konstantin Dmitritch, whatever 
was set before him, if only a crust of bread, would eat 
it and go away." 

Levin, in spite of his efforts to control himself, was 
melancholy and gloomy. He wanted to ask Stepan 
Arkadyevitch one question, but he could not make up 
his mind, nor could he find either the opportunity in 
which to ask it, or a suitable form in which to couch it. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch had gone down to his room, 
and, after another bath, had put on a ruffled night-shirt 
and gone to bed. Levin still dallied in his room, talking 
about various trifles, but not having the courage to ask 
what he had at heart. 

" How wonderfully well this is made ! " said he, tak- 
ing from its wrapper a piece of perfumed soap, which 
Agafya MikhaTlovna had prepared for the guest, but 
which Oblonsky had not used. "Just look; isn't it 
truly a work of art?" 

" Yes ; all sorts of improvements nowadays," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, with a beatific yawn. "The 
theaters, for example, and — a — a — a" — yawning again 
— "these amusing a-a-a.... and electric lights every- 
where a-a-a-a-a.... " 

"Yes, the electric lights," repeated Levin. "And 



224 ANNA KARENINA 

that Vronsky, where is he now ? " he suddenly asked, 
putting down the soap. ■ ■ 

" Vronsky ? " said Stepan Arkadyevitch, ceasing to 
yawn. " He is at Petersburg. He went away shortly 
after you did, and has not been in Moscow since. And 
do you know, Kostia," he continued, leaning his elbow 
on a little table placed near the head of the bed, and 
resting his handsome ruddy face on his hand,, while two 
oily, good-natured, and sleepy eyes shone out like twin 
stars, " I am going to tell you the truth. You yourself 
were to blame. You were afraid of a rival. And I will 
remind you of what I said : I don't know which of you 
had the best chances. Why didn't you go ahead? I 
told you then that...." 

He yawned again, with his jaws only, trying not to 
open his mouth. 

"Does he, or does n't he, know that I offered myself ? " 
thought Levin, looking at him. "Yes! there is some- 
thing subtle, something diplomatic, in his face,;" and, 
feeling that he was flushing, he said nothing, but looked 
straight into Oblonsky's eyes. 

" If on her part there was any feeling for him, it was 
merely a slight drawing," continued Oblonsky. " You 
know, that absolutely high breeding of his and the 
chances of position in the world had an effect on her 
mother, but not on her." 

Levin frowned. The humiliation of his rejection, 
with which he was suffering as from a recent wound, 
smarted in his heart. Fortunately, he was at home ; 
and the very walls of the home sustain one. 

" Wait ! wait ! " he interrupted ; (i you said, '■ high 
breeding ' ! 1 But let me ask you, what means this high 
breeding of Vronsky, or any one else — a high breeding 
that could look down on me. You consider Vronsky an 
aristocrat. I don't: A man whose father Sprang from 
nothing, by means of intrigue, whose mother has had 
liaisons with God knows whom .... Oh, no, excuse me ! 
■ Aristocrats, in my opinion, are men like myself, who 
can show in the past three or four generations of excel* 

1 Aristokratism. 



ANNA KARENINA 225 

lent families, belonging to the most cultivated classes, 
— talents and intellect are another matter, — who never 
abased themselves before anybody, and were never de- 
pendent on others, — like my father and grandfather. 
And I know many such. It seems small business to 
you that I count my trees, while you give thirty thou- 
sand rubles to Rabinin : but you receive a salary, and 
other things ; and I receive nothing of the sort, and 
therefore I appreciate what my father left me, and what 

my labor gives me We are the aristocrats, and not 

those who live only by means of what the powers of 
this world dole out to them, and who can be bought for 
a copper." 

"There ! whom are you so angry with ? I agree with 
you," replied Stepan Arkadyevitch, sincerely and gay ly, 
though he knew that when Levin hurled his sarcasms 
at those who could be bought for a copper, he meant 
him. "But Levin's animation really pleased him. 
"Whom are you angry with? Though much of what 
you say about Vronsky is not true, still I won't speak 
about that I will tell you frankly that if I were in 
your place, I would start for Moscow, and .... " 

" No ! I don't know whether you know or not, — 
but it 's over for me. I will tell you. I proposed and 
was rejected ; so that now the memory of Katerina 
Aleksandrovna is painful and humiliating." 

V Why so ? What nonsense ! " 

" But let us not speak of it. Forgive me if I have 
been rude to you," said Levin. Now that he had made 
a clean breast of, it, he began once more to feel as he 
had felt in the morning. " You will not be angry with 
me, Stiva ? I beg of you, don't be angry with me," 
said he, and with a smile he took his hand. 

"Of course not. I will .not think anything more 
about it.. I am very glad, though, that we have spoken 
frankly to each other. And, do you know, sport will 
be capital to-morrow. We can try it again, can't we ? 
In that case I would not even sleep, but go straight 
from the grove to the station." 

"Capital!" . , < 

VOL. I. — I? 



226 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XVIII 



Although Vronsky's inner life was wholly absorbed 
by his passion, his outward life unchangeably and inevi- 
tably ran along on the former ordinary rails of his social 
and regimental ties and interests. His regiment filled 
an important part in his life, in the first place because 
he loved his regiment, and, still more, because he was 
extremely popular in it. In his regiment he was not 
only admired, but he was also respected. They were 
proud of him, proud that a man enormously rich, with 
a fine education and with qualities, with a path open 
before him to every kind of success and ambition and 
glorification, scorned all that, and placed the interests of 
his regiment and his comrades above all the interests of 
life. Vronksy .recognized the feeling which he inspired, 
and, besides the fact that he loved that life, he felt called 
on, in a certain degree, to sustain his character. 

Of- course he spoke to no one of his passion. Never 
did an imprudent word escape him, even when he joined 
his comrades in the liveliest of drinking-bouts, — how- 
ever, he was never so intoxicated as to lose control over 
himself, — and he kept his mouth shut in the presence 
of those gossiping meddlers who made the least allusion 
to the affairs of his heart. -Nevertheless, his passion 
was a matter of notoriety throughout the city ; all had 
more or less well-founded suspicions of his relationship 
to Madame Karenin, and most of the young men envied 
him on account of the very thing that was the greatest 
drawback to his love, — Karenin's high station, which 
made the matter more conspicuous. 

The majority of young women, jealous of Anna, 
whom they were weary of hearing always called the just, 
were not sorry to have their predictions verified, and 
were waiting only for the. sanction of public opinion, to 
overwhelm her -with the whole weight of their scorn; 
they had -already prepared for use the mud which should 
be thrown at her when the time should come. Most 
people of experience, and those of high rank, were dis- 



ANNA KARENINA 227 

pleased at the prospect of a disgraceful scandal in 
society. 

Vronsky's mother, when she heard of the liaison, at 
first was glad ; because, in her opinion, nothing gave 
the last finish to a brilliant young.man compared to an 
intrigue in high life ; and because she was not sorry to 
find that this Madame Karenin, who had pleased her so 
much and who seemed so entirely devoted to her boy, 
was, after all, only like any other handsome and elegant 
woman. But later she learned that her son had refused 
an important promotion, for no other reason than that 
he might stay with his regiment and keep on visiting 
Madame Karenin, and she learned that, on account of 
this, persons very high in authority were dissatisfied 
with him, and she changed her opinion in regard to it. 

There was another reason why she did not now ap- 
prove of it : from all she could learn of this liaison, it 
was not the brilliant and fashionable flirtation, such as 
she approved, but a desperate tragedy, after the style of 
Werther, according to report, and she was afraid lest 
her son should be drawn into some folly. Since his un- 
expected departure from Moscow she had not seen him, 
but she sent word to him, through his elder brother, that 
she desired him to come to her. His elder brother was 
even more dissatisfied, not because he felt anxious to 
know whether this love-affair was to be deep or epheme- 
ral, passionate or Platonic, innocent or, guilty, — he 
himself, though a married man and the father of a 
family, had a ballet dancer for a mistress, and therefore 
had no right to be severe, — but because he knew that 
this love-affair was displeasing in quarters where it was 
better to be on good terms ; and therefore he blamed 
his brother's conduct. 

Vronsky, besides his society relations and his military 
duties, had yet another absorbing passion, — horses. 
The officers' handicap races were to take place this 
summer. ^He'became a subscriber, and bought a pure- 
blood English trotter; and in spite of his love-affair, he 
was passionately though discreetly interested in the 
results of the races 



a28 ANNA KARENINA 

These two passions did not interfere with each other. 
On the contrary, he needed something independent of 
his love-affair, some occupation and interest in which 
he could find refreshment and recreation after the over- 
violent emotions which stirred him. 



CHAPTER XIX 

On the day of the Krasno-Sielo races, Vronsky came 
earlier than usual to eat a beefsteak in the officers' com- 
mon dining-hall. He was not at all constrained to limit 
himself, since his weight satisfied the 160 pounds 1 re- 
quired ; but he did not want to get fat, and so he 
refrained from sweet and farinaceous foods. He sat 
down with his coat unbuttoned over his white waistcoat, 
and with both elbows resting on the table; while he was 
waiting for his beefsteak he kept his eyes on the pages 
of a French novel which lay on the plate. He looked 
at his book only so as not to talk with the officers as 
they went and came, but he was thinking. 
* He was thinking, how Anna had promised to meet 
him after the races. But he had not seen her for three 
days ; and he was wondering if she would be able to 
keep her appointment, as her husband had just returned 
to Petersburg from a journey abroad, and* he was won- 
dering how he could find out. They had met for the 
last time at his cousin Betsy's datcha, or country-house. 
For he went to the Karenins' datcha as little as possi- 
ble, and now he wanted to go there, and he was asking 
himself, " How can it be managed ? " 

" Of course) I will say that I am charged by Betsy to 
find whether she expects to attend the races, — yes, 
certainly, I will go," he said, raising his head from his 
book. And his face shone with the joy caused by his 
imagination of the forthcoming interview. 

" Send wbrd that I wish my carriage and troika har- 
nessed and brought round," said he to the waiter who 

1 Four and a half pud : &pud is 36.1 1 pounds avoirdupois. 



ANNA KARENINA 229 

was bringing his beefsteak on a hot silver platter. 
Moving the platter toward him, he began his meal. 

In the adjoining billiard-room the clicking of balls 
was heard, and two voices talking and laughing.' ' Two 
officers appeared in the door : one of them was a young 
man with delicate, refined features, who had just gradu- 
ated from the Corps of Pages and joined the regiment ; 
the other was old and fat, with little, moist eyes, and 
wore a bracelet on his wrist. 

Vronsky glanced at them and frowned, and went on 
eating and reading at the same time, as if he had not 
seen them. 

"Getting ready for work, are you?" asked the fat 
officer, sitting down near him. 

"You see I am," replied Vronsky, wiping his lips, 
and frowning again, without looking up. 

"But aren't you afraid of getting fat?" continued 
the elderly officer, pulling up a chair for his junior. 

" What ! " cried Vronsky, making a grimace to express 
his disgust and aversion, and showing his splendid teeth. 

"Aren't you afraid of getting fat?" 

" Waiter, sherry ! " cried Vronsky, without replying, 
and he changed his book to the other side of his plate, 
and continued to read. 

The fat officer took the wine-list, and passed it over 
to the young officer. 

"You select what we'll have to drink/' said he, giv- 
ing him the list and looking at him. 

" Rhine wine, if you please," replied the young officer, 
looking timidly at Vronsky out of the corner of his eye 
and trying to twist his imaginary mustache. 

When he saw that Vronsky did not turn, the young 
officer got up and said, " Let us go into the billiard- 
room." 

The fat officer humbly arose, and the two went out of 
the door. 

At the same time a tall, stately cavalry captain, named 
Yashvin, came in. He condescendingly and disdain- 
fully nodded to the two officers, and went toward 
Vronsky. 



230 ANNA KARENINA 

"Ah ! here he is," he cried, laying his heavy hand on 
Vronsky's shoulder. Vronsky turned round angrily, 
but in an instant a pleasant, friendly expression came 
into his face. 

"Well, Alyosha !" said the cavalry captain, in his big 
baritone. "Have something more to eat, and drink 
one more glass with me." 

"No; I don't want anything more to eat." 

"Those are inseparables," said Yashvin, looking 
derisively at the two officers as they disappeared. 
Then he sat down, doubling up under the chair, which 
was too short for him, his long legs dressed in tight 
uniform trousers. " Why were n't you at the Krasmen- 
sky theater last evening?. Numerova was not bad at 
all. Where were you ? " 

" I stayed too late at the TverskoYs'," said Vronsky. 

" Ah ! " exclaimed Yashvin. 

Yashvin, a gambler, a debauchee, was Vronsky's best 
friend in the regiment. It could not be said of him 
that he lacked principles. He had principles, but they 
were immoral ones. Vronsky liked him, both for his 
exceptional physical vigor, which allowed him to drink 
like a hogshead and not feel it, and to do absolutely 
without sleep if it were necessary, and also for his great 
social ability, which he employed in his relations to his 
superiors, and his comrades, attracting to himself their 
love and respect ; and also in gambling, at which he 
risked tens of thousands, and always, no matter how 
much he had been drinking, played so cleverly and 
daringly that he was regarded as the leading gambler 
at the English Club. 
* Vronsky.' felt friendship and consideration for him, 
because he felt that Yashvin liked him, not for his for- 
tune or his social position, but chiefly on his own account. 
Moreover, Yashvin was the only man to whom Vronsky 
would have been willing to speak of his love. He felt 
that, in spite of his affected scorn for all kinds of senti- 
ment, he alone could appreciate the serious passion 
which now absorbed his whole life. Besides, he was 
persuaded that he found absolutely no pleasure in 



ANNA KARENINA 231 

tittle-tattle and scandal, but considered this feeling as 
essential, in other' words, that he knew and believed 
that love was no joke, no mere pastime, but something 
serious and important. Thus, taken all in all, his pres- 
ence was always agreeable to him. / 

• Vronsky had not yet spoken to him ^bout his love, 
but he knew that Yashvin knew it — looked on it in its 
true light ; and it was a pleasure to read this in his eyes. 

" Ah, yes ! " said the cavalry captain, when he heard 
the name of the Tverskol's ; and, flashing his brilliant 
black eyes at him, he seized his left mustache and began 
to cram it into his mouth, for this was a bad habit of 
his. 

" And what did you do last evening ? • Did you gain ? " 
asked Vronsky. 

" Eight thousand rubles, but three thousand possibly 
are no good — I may not get them/' 

"Well! Then you may .lose on me," said Vronsky, 
laughing ; Yashvin had laid a large wager on him. 

/'But I shall not lose. Makhotin is the only one to 
be afraid of." 

And the conversation went off in regard to the races, 
which was the only subject of which Vronsky could now 
think. 

/'Come on, I have done," said Vronsky, getting up 
and going to the door. Yashvin also arose, and stretched 
his huge legs and long back.' \ , , 

" I can't dine so early, but I will take something to 
drink. I will follow you immediately. Here, wine /" 
he cried, in his heavy voice, which was the wonder of 
the regiment ; it made the windows rattle.* " No, no 
matter ! " he cried again ; V if you are going home, I '11 
join you." 

And he went off with Vronsky 



232 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XX 

Vronsky was lodging in a neat and spacious Finnish 
izba, divided in two by a partition;' Petritsky was his 
chum, not only in Petersburg, but here also in camp. 
He was asleep when Vronsky and Yashvin entered! 

"Get up! you've slept long enough," said Yashvin; 
going behind the partition, and shaking the sleeper's 
shoulder, as he lay with 'his nose buried in the pillow. 

Petritsky suddenly got up on his knees, and looked 
all about him. > 

"Your brother has been here," said he to Vronsky. 
" He w6ke me up, the devil take him ! and he said that 
he would come again." 

Then he threw himself back on the pillow again, and 
pulled up the bedclothes. 

"Stop! Yashvin," he cried angrily, as his comrade 
twitched off his quilt. Then he turned over, opened his 
eyes, ahid said, " You would do much better to tell me 
what I ought to drink to take this bad taste out of my 
mouth." * r - t 

"Vodka is better than anything," said Yashvin. 
"Tereshchenko ! Bring the barin some vodka and 
cucumbers," he cried, delighting in the thunder of his 
voice. * - 

" You advise vodka ? ha ! " exclaimed Petritsky, scowl- 
ing, and rubbing his eyefe. " Will you take some, too ? 
If you '11 join, all right ! Vronsky, will you have a 
drink?" said Petritsky," getting up and wrapping a 
striped quilt around him under his' arms. He came to 
the door of the partition, raised his arms in the air, and 
began to sing in French, "'There was a king in Thu- 
u-le.' — Vronsky, will you have a drink?" 

"Go away," replied the latter, who was putting on 
an overcoat brought him by his valet. 

"Where are you going?" asked Yashvin, seeing a 
carriage drawn by three horses. " Here's the troika." 

"To the stables, then to Briansky's to see about 
some horses," replied Vronsky. 



ANNA KARENINA 233 

Vronsky had, indeed, promised to bring some money 
to Briansky, who lived about ten versts from Peterhof ; 
and he was in a hurry to get there as soon as possible 
so as to pay for the horses, but his friends immediately 
understood that he was also' going somewhere else. 

Petritsky, who kept on singing, winked, and pursed 
his lips as if he would say, " We know who this Brian- 
sky means." 

"See here, don't be late," said Yashvin ; and, chang- 
ing the subject, "And my roan, does she suit you?" 
he asked, looking out of the window, and referring to 
the middle horse of the team which he*had,sold. 

Just as Vronsky left the room, Petritsky called out 
to him, " Hold on ! your brother left a note and a letter. 
Hold on ! where did I put them?" 

Vronsky waited impatiently. 
1 " Well, where are they ? " 

"Where are they indeed? That's the question," 
declaimed Petritsky, solemnly, putting his forefinger 
above his nose. f i 

"Speak quick! no nonsense!" said Vronsky, smiling. 

" I have not had any fire in the fireplace ; where can 
I have put them ? " 

"Come now, that's enough talk! where 's the letter?" 

" I swear I have forgotten ; or did I dream about it ? 
Wait, wait ! don't get angry. If you had drunk four 
bottles, as I did yesterday, you would n't even know 
where you went to bed. Hold on, I '11 think in a min- 
ute." ^ 

Petritsky went behind his screen again, and got into 
bed. 

" Hold on ! I was lying here. He stood there. Da- 
da-da-da ! .... Here it is ! " 

And he pulled the letter out from under the mattress, 
where he had put it. J 

Vronsky took the letter and his brother's note/ It 
was exactly as he expected. His mother reproached 
him because he had not been to see her, and his brother 
said he had something to speak to him about. " What 
concern is it of theirs?" he muttered; and, crumpling 



234 ANNA , KARENINA 

up the notes, he thrust them between his coat-buttons, 
intending to read them more carefully on the way. , 

Just as he left the izba, he met two officers, one of 
whom belonged to a different regiment. Vronsky's 
quarters were always the headquarters of all the offi- 
cers. 

" Whither away ?," -.,/.•' , * 

"Must — to Peterhof." 

" Has your horse come from Tsarskoye ? " 

" Yes, but I have not seen her yet." 

"They say Makhotin's * Gladiator' is lame." 

" Rubbish; ! But how can you trot in such mud ? " 
said the other. 

i " Here are my saviors," cried Petritsky, as he saw 
the newcomers. The denshchik was standing before 
him with vodka and salted cucumbers on a platter. 
" Yashvin, here, ordered me to drink, so as to clear my 
head." 

"Well, you were too much for* us last night," said 
one of the officers. "You did not let us sleep all night." 

"I must tell you how we ended it," began Petritsky. 
" Volkof climbed up on the roof, and told us that he 
was blue. I sung out, 'Give us some music, — a fu- 
neral march.' And he went to sleep on the roof to the 
music of the funeral march." 

"Drink, drink your vodka by. all means, and then 
take seltzer and a lot of lemon," said Yashvin, encour- 
aging Petritsky as a mother encourages her child to 
swallow some medicine. " It is only a little bottle." 
• "Now, this is sense. Hold on, Vronsky, and have a 
drink with us ! " 

" No. Good-by, gentlemen. I am not drinking to- 
day." 

" Vronsky," cried some one, after he had gone into 
the vestibule. 

"What?" > 

" You 'd better cut off your hair ; it *s getting very 
long, especially on the bald spot." 

Vronsky, in fact, was beginning to get a little bald. 
He laughed gayly, showing his splendid teeth, and, pull- 



ANNA KARENINA 235 

ing his cap over the bald spot, he went out and got 
into his carriage. 

"To the stables/' he said. 

He started to take his letters for a second reading, 
but on second thought deferred them so that he might 
think of nothing else but his horse. 

"I'll wait." 



CHAPTER XXI 

A temporary stable, — a balagan, or hut, — made out 
of planks, had been built near the race-course ; and here 
Vronsky's horse should have been brought the evening 
before. He had not as yet seen her. During the last 
few days he himself had not been out to drive, but he had 
intrusted her to the trainer; and Vronsky did not know 
in what condition he should find her. He was just get- 
ting out of his carriage when his konyukhy or groom, a 
young fellow, saw him from a distance, and immediately 
called the trainer. This was an Englishman with with- 
ered face and tufted chin, and dressed in short jacket 
and top-boots. He came out toward Vronsky in the 
mincing step peculiar to jockeys, and with elbows stick- 
ing out. 

"Well, how is Frou Frou ?" said Vronsky, in English. 

"All right, sir" said the Englishman, in a voice that 
came out of the bottom of his throat. " Better not go 
in, sir," he added, taking off his hat. "I have put a 
muzzle on her, and that excites her. Better not go in, 
it excites a horse." 

" No, I am going in, I want to see her." 

"Come on, then," replied the Englishman, testily; 
and, without ever opening his mouth, and with his dandi- 
fied step, he led the way. 

They went into a small yard in front of the stable. 
An active and alert stable-boy in a clean jacket, with 
whip in hand, met them as they entered, and followed 
them. Five horses were in the stable, each in its own 
stall. Vronsky knew that his most redoubtable rival, — 



236 ANNA KARENINA 

Makhotin's. Gladiator, a chestnut horse five vershoks 
high, — was there, and he was more curious to see Gladia- 
tor than to see his own racer ; but he knew that, accord- 
ing to the etiquette of the races, he could not have him 
brought out, or even ask questions about him. As he 
passed along the corridor the groom opened the door of 
the second stall at the left, and Vronsky saw a powerful 
chestnut with white feet. He knew it was Gladiator ; 
but with the delicacy of a man who turns away from an 
open letter which is not addressed to him, he instantly 
turned away and walked toward Frou Frou's stall. 

"That horse belongs to Ma..,, k.... mak, .... I never 
can pronounce his name," said the Englishman, over 
his shoulder, and pointing to Gladiator's stall with a 
huge finger, the nail of which was black with dirt. 

" Makhotin's ? Yes ; he is my only dangerous rival." 

"If you would mount him, I would bet on you/' said 
the Englishman. . Ij i 

"Frou Frou has more nerve, this one stronger," 
. said Vronsky, smiling at the jockey's praise. 

"In hurdle-races, all depends on the mount, and on 
pluck" , ' 

Pluck <-~ that is, audacity and coolness — Vronsky 
knew that he* had in abundance; and, what was far 
more important, he was firmly convinced that no one 
could have more of this pluck than he had. 

" You are sure that a good sweating was not neces- 
sary ? " • » - 

" Not at all," replied the Englishman. " Please not 
speak so loiid, the horse is -restive," he added, jerking 
his head toward the closed stall in front of which they 
were standing. They could hear the horse stamping on 
the straw, i 

: He opened the door, and Vronsky entered a box-stall 
feebly lighted by a little window. A dark bay horse, 
muzzled, was nervously' prancing up and down on the 
fresh straw. As he gazed into the semi-obscurity of 
the stall, Vronsky in spite of himself took in at one gen- 
eral observation all the points of his favorite horse. 
Frou Frou was a horse of medium size, and not faultless 



ANNA KARENINA 237 

in form. Her bones were slender, although her brisket 
showed powerfully ; her breast. was narrow, the crupper 
was rather tapering ; and the legs, particularly the hind 
legs, considerably bowed. The muscles of the legs were 
not big ; but, on the other hand, where the saddle rested 
the horse was extraordinarily wide, and this was particu- 
larly striking by reason of the firmness and the smaH- 
ness of her belly. The bones of the legs below the 
knee seemed not thicker than a finger, seen from the 
front ; they were extraordinarily large when seen side- 
wise. The whole steed, with the exception of the ribs, 
seemed squeezed in and lengthened out. But she had 
one merit that outweighed all her faults : she was a 
thoroughbred, had good blood, — which tells, as the 
English say. Her muscles, standing out under a net- 
work of veins, covered with a skin as smooth and soft 
as satin, seemed as solid as bone ; her slender head, with 
prominent eyes, bright and animated, widened out at 
the septum into projecting nostrils with membrane 
which seemed suffused with blood. In her whole form 
and especially in her head there was an expression of 
something energetic and decided, and at the same time 
good-tempered. It was one of those creatures which 
do not speak for the single reason that the mechanical 
construction of their mouths does not permit of it. 

Vronsky, at any rate, was convinced that she under- 
stood all of his thoughts while he was looking at her. 
As soon as he went to her she began to -take long 
breaths, and, turning her prominent eyes so that the 
whites became suffused with blood, she gazed from the 
opposite side at the /visitors, trying to shake off her 
muzzle, and dancing on her feet with elastic motion. 

" You see how excited she is," said the English- 
man. : 

" Whoa, my loveliest, whoa ! " said Vronsky, approach- 
ing to soothe her ; but the nearer he came the more ner- 
vous she grew, and only when he had caressed her head 
did she become tranquil. He could feel her muscles 
strain and tremble under her delicate, smooth skin. 
Vronsky smoothed her powerful neck, and put into 



238 ANNA KARENINA 

place a tuft of her mane that she had tossed on the 
other side ; and then he put his face close to her nos- 
trils, which swelled and dilated like the wings of a bat. 
She' drew in the air, and loudly expelled it from her 
quivering nostrils, pricked up her sharp ears, and 
stretched out her long black lips to seize his sleeve ;■ 
but, when she found herself prevented by her muzzle, 
she shook it, and began to caper again on her slender 
legs. • ' 

"Quiet, my beauty, quiet," said Vronsky, calming 
her ; and he left the stable with the reassuring convic- 
tion that his horse was in perfect condition. 

But the nervousness of the steed had taken posses- 
sion of Vronsky ; he felt the blood rush to his heart, 
and, like the horse, he wanted violent action ; he felt 
like prancing and biting. It was a sensation at once 
strange and joyful. 

"Well, I count on you," said he to the Englishman. 
"Be on the grounds at half-past six." 

" All shall be ready. > But where are you going, my 
lord?" asked the Englishman, using the title of "my 
lord," which he almost never permitted himself to use. 

Astonished at this, Vronsky raised his head, and 
looked at him as he well understood how to do, not 
into the Englishman's eyes, but at his forehead. He 
instantly saw that the Englishman had spoken to him, 
not as to his master, but as to a jockey ; and he replied : — 

"I have got to see Briansky, and I shall be at home 
in an hour," 

" How many times have I been asked that question 
to-day ! " he said to himself ; and he grew red, which 
was a rare occurrence with him. The Englishman 
looked at him closely. And, as' if he also knew where 
Vronsky was going, he said : — 

"The main thing is to keep calm before the race. 
Don't get out of sorts ; don't get bothered." 

" All right" replied Vronsky, with a smile ; and, jump- 
ing into his carriage, he ordered the coachman to drive 
to Peterhof. 

He had gone but a short distance before the clouds, 



ANNA KARENINA 239 

which since morning had been threatening rain, grew 
thicker, and a heavy shower fell. 

" Too bad ! " thought Vronsky, raising the hood ot 
his carriage. "It has been muddy; now it will be a 
swamp." 

Now that he was sitting alone in his covered calash, 
he took out his mother's letter and his brother's note, 
and read them over. 

Yes, it was always the old story ; both his mother 
and his brother found it necessary to meddle with his 
love-affairs. This interference aroused his anger, — a 
feeling which he rarely experienced. 

" How does this concern them ? Why does every 
one feel called on to meddle with me, and why do they 
bother me ? Because they see that there is something 
about this that they can't understand. If it were an 
ordinary vulgar society intrigue, they would leave me 
in peace ; but they imagine that it is something else, 
that it is not mere trifling, that this woman is dearer 
to me than life ; that is incredible and vexatious to 
them. Whatever be our fate, we ourselves have made 
it, and we shall not regret it," he said to himself, in- 
cluding Anna in the word " we." "But no, they want 
to teach us how to live. They have no idea of what 
happiness is. They don't know that, were it not for 
this love, there would be for us neither joy nor grief in 
this world ; life itself would not exist." 

In reality, what exasperated him most against every 
one was the fact that his 1 conscience told him that they 
— all of them — were right. He felt that his love for 
Anna was not a superficial impulse, destined, like so 
many social attachments, to disappear, and leave no trace 
beyond sweet or painful memories. He felt keenly all 
the torture of her situation and his, and how difficult 
it was in the prominent position which they held in the 
eyes of society to hide their love, to lie, to deceive, 
to dissemble, and constantly to think about others, when 
the passion uniting them was so violent that they both 
forgot about everything else except their love. 

He vividly pictured to himself all the constantly re- 



2 4 o ANNA KARENINA 

curring circumstances when it was essential to employ 
falsehood and deceit, which were so contrary to his 
nature. He recalled with especial vividness the feel- 
ing of shame which' he had often surprised in Anna, 
when she also was driven to tell a lie. 

Since this affair with her, he sometimes experienced 
a strange sensation, i This was a feeling of disgust and 
repulsion for some one, he could not tell for whom he 
felt it — for Alekser Aleksandrovitch or himself, or for 
all society. As far as possible he banished this strange 
feeling. 

"Yes, heretofore she has been unhappy, but proud 
and calm ; now she cannot be proud and content any 
longer, though she may not betray the fact. Yes, this 
must end," he would conclude in his own mind. 

And for the first time the thought of cutting short 
this life of dissimulation appeared to him clear and tan- 
gible ; the sooner, the better. 

" She and I must leave everything, and together we 
must go and hide ourselves somewhere with our love,*' 
he said to himself. 



k u CHAPTER XXII 

>«• ji" 

The shower was of short duration ; and when Vronsky 
reached Peterhof, his shaft-horse at full trot, and the 
other two galloping along in j the mud, the sun was 
already out again, and the wet roofs of the villas and 
the old lindens in the gardens on both sides of the prin- 
cipal avenue were dazzlingly shining. The water was 
running from the roofs, and the raindrops were drip- 
ping from the tree-tops. He no longer thought of the 
harm that the shower might do the race-course, but he 
was full of joy as he remembered that, thanks to the 
rain, she would be alone; for he knew that Alekset 
Aleksandrovitch, who had just got back from a visit to 
the baths; would not have driven out from Petersburg. 

Hoping to find her alone, Vronsky stopped his horses, 
as he always did, at some little distance from the house, 



ANNA KARENINA 241 

ji order to attract as little attention as possible, and, not 
driving across the little bridge, got out and went to the 
house on foot. He did not go to the front entrance, 
but went through the court. 

" Has the barin come?" he asked of a gardener. 

"Not yet; but the baruinya is at home. Go to the 
front door; there are servants there; if you ring, they 
will open the door.", 

" No ; I will go in through the garden." 

Having satisfied himself that she was alone, and wish- 
ing to surprise her, as he had not promised that he was 
coming that day, and on account of the races she would 
not be looking for him, he walked cautiously along the 
sandy paths, bordered with flowers, lifting up his saber 
so that it should make no noise. In this way he reached 
the terrace which led down to the garden. Vronsky had 
by this time forgotten all the thoughts which had op- 
pressed him on the way about the difficulties of his situ- 
ation ; he thought only of the pleasure of shortly seeing 
her, not in imagination only, but alive, in person, as she 
was in reality. 

He was mounting the steep steps as gently as possi- 
ble, when he suddenly remembered what he was always 
forgetting, and what constituted the most painful fea- 
ture of his relations with her, — her son, with his inquisi- 
tive and, as it seemed to him, repulsive face. 

This child was the principal obstacle in the way of 
their interviews. When he was present neither Vron- 
sky nor Anna allowed themselves to speak of anything 
which the whole world might not hear, nor, what was 
more, did they even hint at anything which the child 
himself could not comprehend. There was no need of an 
agreement on that score, it was instinctive with them. 
Both of them considered it degrading to themselves to de- 
ceive the little lad ; before him they talked as if they were 
mere acquaintances. But in spite of this circumspection 
Vronsky often noticed the lad's scrutinizing and rather 
suspicious eyes fixed on him, and a strange timidity and 
variability in his behavior toward him. Sometimes he 
seemed affectionate, and then again cold and shy. The 
VOL. 1.— 16 



242 ANNA KARENINA 

child seemed instinctively to feel that between this man 
and his mother there was some strange bond of union, 
which was beyond his comprehension. 

In fact, the boy felt that he could not understand this 
relationship, and he tried in vain to account to himself 
for the feeling which he ought to have for this man. 
He saw, with that' quick intuition peculiar to childhood, 
that his father, his governess, and his nurse — all of 
them — not only did not like Vronsky, but looked with the 
utmost disfavor on him, although they never spoke about 
him, while his mother treated him as her best friend. 

" What does this mean ? Who is he ? Must I love 
him ? and is it my fault, and am I a naughty or stupid 
child, if I don't understand it at all ?" thought the little 
fellow. Hence came his timidity, his questioning and 
distrustful manner, and this changeableness, which were 
so unpleasant to Vronsky. The presence of this child 
always caused in Vronsky that strange feeling of unrea- 
sonable repulsion which for some time had pursued him. 

The presence of the child aroused in Vronsky and 
Anna a feeling like that experienced by a mariner who 
sees by the compass that the course in which he is 
swiftly moving is widely different from what it should 
be, but that to stop this course is not in his power ; that 
every instant carries him farther and farther in the wrong 
direction, and the recognition of the movement that 
carries him from the right course is the recognition of 
the ruin that impends. 

This child with his innocent views of life was the 
compass which pointed out to them the degree of their 
deviation from what they knew but wished not to know. 

This day Serozha was not at home and Anna was en- 
tirely alone, and sitting on the terrace waiting for the 
return of her son, who had gone out to walk and got 
caught in the rain. She had sent a man and a maid to 
find him, and was sitting there till he should return. 
Dressed in a white gown with wide embroidery, she 
was sitting, at one corner, of the terrace, concealed "by 
plants and flowers, and she did not hear Vronsky's step. 
With her dark .curly head bent, she was pressing her 



ANNA KARENINA 243 

heated brow against a cool watering-pot, standing on 
the balustrade, and with both her beautiful hands laden 
with rings, which he knew so well, she was holding the 
watering-pot. The beauty of her figure, her head, her 
neck, her hands, always caused in Vronsky a new feeling 
of surprise. He stopped and looked at her in ecstasy. 
But as soon as he proceeded to take another step and 
come nearer to her, she felt his approach, pushed away 
the watering-pot, and turned to him her glowing face. 

" What is the matter ? Are you ill ? " said he, in 
French, as he approached her. He felt a desire to run 
to her, but, remembering that there might be witnesses, 
he looked toward the balcony door and turned red, as 
he always turned red when he felt that he ought to be 
ashamed of himself and dread to be seen. 

"No; I am well,'* said Anna, rising, and warmly 
pressing the hand that he offered her. " I did not ex- 
pect .... you." 

" Bozhe moY ! how cold your hands are ! " 

"You startled me," said she. " I was alone, waiting 
for Serozha. He went out for a walk ; they will come 
back this way." 

But though she tried to be calm, her lips trembled. 

" Forgive me for coming, but I could not let the day 
go by without seeing ¥011," he continued, in French, as 
he always spoke, thus avoiding the impossible vui y you, 
and the dangerous tm> thou, of the Russian. 

"What have I to forgive ? I am so glad ! " 

" But you are ill, or sad ? " said he, bending over her 
and still holding her hand. "What were you thinking 
about ? " 

" Always about one thing," she replied, with a smile. 

She told the truth. If at any moment she had been 
asked what she was thinking about, she could have 
made the infallible reply, that she was thinking about 
one thing : her happiness and her unhappiness. Just 
as he had surprised her, she was thinking about this: 
she was thinking how it was that for some, for Betsy, 
for example, — for she knew about her love-affair with 
Tushkievitch, though it was a secret from society in 



a 4 4 ANNA KARENINA 

general, — all this was such a trifle, while for her it was 
so painful. To-day this thought, for various reasons, 
had been particularly tormenting her. 

She asked him about the races. He answered her, 
and, seeing that she was in a very excited state, in order 
to divert her mind, told her, in the tone most natural, 
about the preparation that had been made. 

" Shall I, or shall I not, tell him ? " she thought, as 
ahe looked at his calm, affectionate eyes. " He seems 
so happy, he is so interested in these races, that he will 
not comprehend, probably, the importance of what I 
must tell him." 

" But you have not told me of what you were think- 
ing when I came," said he, suddenly, interrupting the 
course of his narration. " Tell me, I beg of you ! " 

She did not reply; but she lifted her head a little, 
and looked at him questioningly f rom her beautiful eyes, 
shaded by her long lashes; her fingers, playing with a 
fallen leaf, trembled. 

He saw this, and his face immediately showed the 
expression of humble adoration, of absolute devotion, 
which had so won her. 

" I see that something has happened. Can I be easy 
for an instant when I know that you feel a grief that I 
do not share ? In the name of Heaven, speak ! " he in- 
sisted, in a caressing tone. 

" I shall never forgive him if he does not appreciate 
the importance of what I have to tell him ; better be 
silent than put him to the proof," she thought, continu- 
ing to look at him in the same way, and conscious that 
her hand, holding the leaf, trembled more and more 
violently. 

"In the name of Heaven ! " said he, taking her hand 
again. 

"Shall I tell you?" 

"Yes, yes, yes...." 

"Je suis enceinte ! " she said, in a low and deliberate 
voice. 

The leaf that she held in her fingers trembled still 
more, but she did not take her eyes from, his face, for 



ANNA KARENINA 245 

she wished to see how he would receive what she 
said. 

He grew pale, tried to speak, then stopped short, 
dropped her hand, and hung his head. 

"Yes, he understands the significance of this/' she 
said to herself, and gratefully pressed his hand. 

But she was mistaken in thinking that he appreciated 
the significance of what she had told him, as she, a 
woman, did. On learning this, he felt that he was 
attacked with tenfold force by that strange feeling of 
repulsion and horror which he had already experienced. 
But at the same time, he realized that the crisis which 
he had expected was now at hand, that it was impossible 
longer to keep the secret from the husband ; and it was 
important to extricate themselves as soon as possible 
from the unnatural situation in which they were placed. 
Moreover, her anguish communicated itself to him 
physically. He looked at her with humbly submissive 
eyes, kissed her hand, arose, and began to walk up and 
down the terrace without speaking. 

At last he approached her, and said in a tone of 
decision : — 

"Well," said he, "neither you nor I have looked on 
our relations as a pastime, and now our fate is decided ; 
at last we must put an end to the false situation in 
which we live," — and he looked around him. 

"Put an end ? How put an end, Alekse'f?" she asked 
gently. 

She was calm now, and her face beamed with a tender 
smile. 

"You must leave your husband and unite your life 
with mine." 

"But aren't they already united?" she asked, in 
an almost inaudible voice. 

" Yes, but not completely, not absolutely ! " 

"But how, Aleksei'? tell me how," said she, with 
a melancholy irony at. the hopelessness of her situation. 
"How is there any escape from such a position ? Am 
I not the wife of my husband ? " 

" From any situation, however difficult, there 15 always 



246 ANNA KARENINA 

some way of escape; here we must simply decide. — 
Anything is better than the life you are leading. How 
well I see how you are tormenting yourself about your 
husband, your son, society, all ! " 

"Akh ! only not my husband," said she, with a simple 
smile. "I don't know him, I don't think about him! 
He is not" 

"You speak insincerely! I know you; you torment 
yourself on his account also." 

"Not even he knows.../' said she, and suddenly a 
bright crimson spread over her face ; it colored her 
cheeks, brow, her neck, and tears of shame came into 
her eyes. 

" Let us not speak more of him." 



CHAPTER XXIII 

Vronsky had many times tried, though not so de- 
cidedly as now, to bring clearly before her nnind their 
position; and always he had met the same superficial 
and frivolous way of looking at it, as she now treated 
his demand. Apparently, there was something in this 
which she was unwilling or unable to fathom; appar- 
ently, as soon as she began to speak about it, she, the 
real Anna, disappeared, to give place to a strange and 
incomprehensible woman, whom he did not love, but 
feared, and who was repulsive to him. To-day he was 
bound to have an absolute explanation. 

"Whether he knows or not," he said, in a calm but 
authoritative voice, " whether he knows or not, it does 
not concern us. We cannot .... we cannot now continue 
as we are." 

"What/ in your opinion, must we do about it?" she 
demanded, in the same bantering tone of irony. Though 
she had been so keenly apprehensive that he would not 
receive her confidence with due appreciation, she was 
now vexed that he deduced from it the absolute neces- 
sity of energetic action. 

"Tell him all, and leave him." 



ANNA KARENINA 247 

"Very good ! let us suppose I do it," said she. "Do 
you know what the result would be ? I will tell you ; V 
and a wicked fire flashed from her eyes, which were 
just now so gentle. " ' Oh ! you love another, and 
your course with him has been criminal? " said she, 
imitating her husband, and accenting the word criminal 
in exactly his manner. "'I warned you of the con- 
sequences which would follow from the point of view 
of religion, of society, and of the family. You did not 
listen to me ; now I cannot allow my name to be dis- 
honored, and my ' " — she was going to say my son, but 
stopped, for she could not jest about him — " 'my name 
dishonored/ and so on in the same style," she added. 
" In a word, he will tell me with his official manner 
and with precision and clearness that he cannot set me 
free, but that he will take measures to avoid a scandal. 
And he will do exactly as he says. That is what will 
take place ; for he is not a man, he is a machine, and, 
when he is stirred up, an ugly machine," said she, call- 
ing to mind the most trifling details in her husband's 
face and manner of speaking, and charging to him as a 
crime all the ill that she could find in him, and not 
pardoning him at all on account of the terrible sin of 
which she had been guilty before him. 

"But, Anna," said Vronsky, in a persuasive, tender 
voice, trying to calm her, "you must tell him every- 
thing, and act accordingly as he proceeds." 

"What! elope?" 

" Why not elope ? I see no possibility of living as 
we are any longer ; it is not on my account, but I see 
you will suffer." 

" What ! elope, and become your mistress ? " said she, 
bitterly. 

" Anna ! " he cried, deeply wounded. 

"Yes, your mistress, and lose everything!".... 

Again she was going to say my son, but she could 
not pronounce the word. 

Vronsky could not understand how she, with her 
strong, loyal nature, could accept the false position in 
which she was placed, and not endeavor to escape from 



248 ANNA KARENINA 

ft. But he could not doubt that the principal cause 
of this was represented by that word son, which she 
could not pronounce. 

When she thought of her son and his future relations 
to a mother who had deserted his father, the horror of 
what she had done appeared so great, that, like a real 
woman, she was not able to reason, but only endeavored 
to reassure herself by fallacious arguments, and persuade 
herself that all would go on as before ; above all things, 
she must shut her eyes, and forget this terrible ques- 
tion, what would become of her son. 

" I beg of you, I entreat you,'' she said suddenly, 
speaking in a very different tone, a tone of tenderness 
and sincerity, and seizing his hand, " don't ever speak 
to me of that again. " . 

"But, Anna.... " 

"Never, never! Leave it to me. I know all the 
depth, all the horror, of my situation, but it is not so 
easy as you imagine to decide. Let me decide, and 
listen to me. Never speak to me again of that. Will 
you promise me ? .... never, never ? promise ! • .... 

"I promise all; but I cannot be calm, especially 
after what you have told me. I cannot be calm when 
you cannot be calm." .... 

"I?" she repeated. "Yes, I suffer torments some- 
times, but that will pass if you will not say anything 
more about it. When you speak with me about this, 
then, and then only, it tortures me." 

"I don't understand.... " 

"I know/' she interrupted, "how your honest nature 
abhors lying ; I am sorry for you ; and very often I 
think that you have sacrificed your life for me ! " 

"That is exactly what I say about you. I was just 
this moment thinking how you could sacrifice yourself 
for me! .1 cannot forgive myself for having made you 
unhappy." 

"I unhappy?" said she, coming up close to him, 
and looking at him with a smile of enthusiastic love. 
"I? I am like a man dying of hunger, to whom food 
has been given. Maybe he is cold, and his raiment is 



ANNA KARENINA 249 

rags, and he is ashamed, but he is not unhappy. I un- 
happy ? No ; here comes my joy." .... 

She had heard the voice of her little boy coming 
near, and giving a hurried glance around her, swiftly 
arose. Her face glowed with the fire which Vronsky 
knew so well, and with a hasty motion putting out her 
lovely hands, covered with rings, she took Vronsky* s 
face between them, looked at him a long moment, 
reached her face up to his, with her smiling lips parted, 
kissed his mouth and both eyes, and pushed him away. 
She started to go, but he kept her back a moment. 

" When ? " he whispered, looking at her with ecstasy. 

" To-day at one o'clock," she replied in a low voice, 
and with a deep sigh she ran, in her light, graceful 
gait, to meet her son. 

Serozha had been caught by the rain in the park, 
and had taken refuge with his nurse in a pavilion. 

"Well, good-by — da svidanya /" said she to Vron- 
sky. "I must get ready for the races. Betsy has 
promised to come and get me." 

Vronsky looked at his watch, and hurried away. 



CHAPTER XXIV 

When Vronsky looked at his watch on the Karenins' 
terrace, he was so stirred and preoccupied, that, though 
he saw the figures on the face, he did not know what 
time it was. He hurried along the driveway, and, pick- 
ing his way carefully through the mud, he reached his 
carriage. He had been so absorbed by his conversation 
with Anna that he did not notice the hour, or ask if he 
still had time to go to Briansky's. As it often happens, 
he had only the external faculty of memory, and it re- 
called to him only that he had decided to do something. 
He found his coachman dozing on his box under the 
already slanting shade of the linden ; he noticed the 
swarms of midgets buzzing around his sweaty horses ; 
then, waking the coachman, he jumped into his carriage, 
and ordered him to drive to Briansky's ; only after he 



250 ANNA KARENINA 

had gone six or seven versts did he remember that he 
had looked at his watch and realized that it was half- 
past five, and that he was late. 

On that day there were *to be several races : first the 
draught-horses, then the officers' two-verst dash, then a 
second of four, and last that in which he was to take 
part. He could be in time for his race, but, if he went 
to Briansky's, he ran the risk of getting to the grounds 
after the court had arrived. That was not in good 
form. But he had promised Briansky to be there, there- 
fore he kept on, commanding the coachman not to spare 
the troYka, He reached Briansky's, spent five minutes 
with him, and was off again at full speed. The rapid 
motion calmed him. All the difficulties that confronted 
him in his relations with Anna, all the uncertainty that 
remained after their conversation, vanished from his 
mind ; he thought with delight and excitement of the 
race, and how he might after all get there in time, and 
then again he vividly imagined the brilliant society 
which would gather to-day at the course. 

And he got more and more into the atmosphere of 
the races as he overtook people coming in their car- 
riages from various villas, and even from Petersburg, on 
their way to the hippodrome. 

When he reached his quarters, no one was at home ; 
all had gone to the races, except his valet, who was wait- 
ing for him at the entrance. While he was changing 
his clothes, his valet told him that the second race had 
already begun,, that a number of gentlemen had been to 
inquire for him. 

Vronsky dressed without haste, — for he never was 
hurried and he never lost his self-command, — and di- 
rected the coachman to take him to the stables. From 
there he saw a sea of carriages of all sorts, of pedes- 
trians, soldiers, and of spectators, surrounding the hip- 
podrome, and the seats boiling with people. 

Evidently the second course had been run, for just 
as he reached the stables he heard the sound of a bell. 
As he reached the stable, he noticed Makhotin's white- 
footed chestnut Gladiator, covered with a blue and 



ANNA KARENINA 251 

orange caparison, and with huge ear-protectors trimmed 
with blue. They were leading him out to the hippo- 
drome. 

" Where is Cord ? " he asked of the groom. 

"In the stable ; he is putting on the saddle." 

Frou Frou was all saddled in her open box-stall. They 
started to lead her out. 

" I am not late, am I ? " 

"All right, all right," said the Englishman. "Don't 
get excited." 

Vronsky once more gave a quick glance at the excel- 
lent, favorable shape of his horse, as she stood trem- 
bling in every limb ; and, finding it hard to tear himself 
away from such a beautiful sight, he left her at the 
stable. He approached the benches at a most favorable 
moment for doing this without attracting observation. 
The two-verst dash was just at an end, and all eyes were 
fixed on a cavalry-guardsman who was in the lead, and a 
hussar just at his heels, whipping their horses furiously, 
and approaching the goal. From the center and both 
ends all crowded in toward the goal, and a group of 
officers and guardsmen were hailing with shouts the 
triumph of their fellow-officer and friend. 

Vronsky, without being noticed, joined the throng 
just as the bell announced the end of the race; the 
victor, a tall cavalry-guardsman, covered with mud, 
dropped the reins, slipped off from the saddle, and stood 
by his roan stallion, which was black with sweat, and 
heavily breathing. 

The stallion, with a violent effort thrusting out his 
legs, had stopped the swift course of his big body; and 
the officer, like a man awakening from a deep sleep, was 
looking about him, trying hard to smile. A throng of 
friends and strangers pressed about him. 

Vronsky, with intention, avoided the elegant people 
who were circulating about, engaged in gay and ani- 
mated conversation in front of the seats. He had al- 
ready caught sight of Anna, Betsy, and his brother's 
wife, but he did not join them, so that he might not be 
disconcerted ; but he kept meeting acquaintances who 



252 ANNA KARENINA 

stopped him, and told him various items about the last 
race, or asked him why he was late. 

While they were distributing the prizes at the pavilion, 
and every one had gone in this direction, Vronsky was 
joined by nis elder brother. Aleksandr Vronsky was a 
colonel and wore epaulets, and, like AlekseV, was a 
man of medium stature, and rather thick-set ; but he 
was handsomer and ruddier. His nose was red, and 
his frank, open face was flushed with wine. 

"Did you get my note?" he asked of his brother. 
"You are never to be found." 

Aleksandr Vronsky, in spite of his life of dissipation 
and his love for drink, which was notorious, was a thor- 
oughly courtly man. Knowing that many eyes might 
be fixed on them, he preserved, while he talked on a 
very painful subject, a smiling face, as if he were jesting 
with his brother about some trifling matter. 

"I got it,"' said he, "but I really don't understand 
why you interfere." 

"I interfere because I noticed you were not to be 
found this morning, and because you were seen at 
Peterhof Monday." - 

"There are matters which cannot be judged except 
by those who are directly interested, and the matter in 
which you concern yourself is such." .... 

"Yes ; but when one is not in the service, he...." 

" I beg you to mind your own business, and that is all." 

Alekse'f Vronsky's frowning face grew pale, and his 
rather prominent lower jaw shook. This happened 
rarely with him. He was a man of kindly heart, and 
rarely got angry ; but when he grew angry, and when 
his chin trembled, he became dangerous. Aleksandr 
Vronsky knew it, and with a gay laugh replied : — 

" I only wanted to give you matushka's letter. An- 
swer it, and don't get angry before the race. Bonne 
chance" he added, with a smile, and left him. 

The next moment another friendly greeting surprised 
Vronsky. 

"Won't you recognize your friends? How are you, 
mon chert 11 said Stepan Arkadyevitch, with his rosy 



ANNA KARENINA 253 

face and carefully combed and pomaded whiskers ; in 
the midst of the brilliant society of Petersburg, he was 
no less brilliant than at Moscow. " I came down yes- 
terday, and am very glad to be present at your triumph. 
When can we meet ? " 

"Come to the mess, after the race is over," said 
Vronsky ; and with an apology for leaving him, he 
squeezed the sleeve of his paletot, and went to the 
middle of the hippodrome, where they were bringing the 
horses for the handicap-race. 

The grooms were leading back the sweaty horses, 
wearied by the race which they had run ; and one by 
one the fresh horses entered for the next course appeared 
on the ground. They were, for the most part, English 
horses, in hoods, and well caparisoned, and looked like 
enormous strange birds. At the right-hand side they 
were leading in the lean beauty, Frou Frou, which came 
out, stepping high as if on springs, with her elastic and 
slender pasterns. And not far from her they were 
removing the trappings from the lop-eared Gladiator. 
The stallion's solid, superb, and perfectly symmetrical 
form, with his splendid crupper and his extraordinarily 
short pasterns placed directly over the hoofs, attracted 
Vronsky's admiration. He was just going up to Frou 
Frou when another acquaintance stopped him again. 

"Ah! there is Karenin," said the friend with whom 
he was talking; "he is hunting for his wife. She is in 
the very center of the pavilion. Have you seen her? " 

"No, I have not," replied Vronsky; and, without 
turning his head in the direction where his acquain- 
tance told him that Madame Karenin was, he went to 
his horse. 

He had scarcely time to make some adjustment of 
the saddle, when those who were to compete in the 
hurdle-race were called to receive their numbers and 
directions. With serious, stern, and some with pale 
faces, seventeen men in all approached the stand and 
received their numbers. Vronsky's number was seven. 

" Mount ! " was the cry. 

Vronsky, feeling that he, with his companions, was 



254 ANNA KARENINA 

the focus toward which all eyes were turned, went up 
to his horse with the slow and deliberate motions which 
were usual to him when he was under the strain of 
excitement. 

Cord, in honor of the races, had put on his gala-day 
costume : he wore a black coat, buttoned to the chin, 
and a stiffly starched shirt-collar, which made a support 
for his cheeks; he had on Hessian boots and a round 
black cap. He was, as always, calm and full of impor- 
tance, as he stood by the mare's head, holding both 
reins in his hand. Frou Frou was still shivering as if 
she had an attack of fever ; her fiery eyes gazed askance 
at Vronsky as he approached. He passed his finger 
under the girth of the saddle. The mare looked at him 
still more askance, showed her teeth, and pricked up 
her ears. The Englishman puckered up his lips with a 
grin at the idea that there could be any doubt as to his 
skill in putting on a saddle. " Mount, and you won't 
be so nervous," said he. 

Vronsky cast a final glance on his rivals ; he knew 
that he should not see them again until the race was 
over. Two of them had already gone to the starting- 
point. Galtsin, a friend of his, and one of his dangerous 
rivals, was turning around and around his bay stallion, 
which was trying to keep him from mounting. A little 
Leib-hussar in tight cavalry trousers was off on a gal- 
lop, bent double over his horse, like a cat on the crupper, 
in imitation of the English fashion. Prince Kuzovlef, 
white as a sheet, was mounted on a thoroughbred mare 
from the Grabovsky stud ; an Englishman held it by 
the bridle. Vronsky and all his comrades knew Kuzo- 
vlef s terrible self-conceit, and his peculiarity of " weak 
nerves." They knew that he was timid at everything, 
especially timid of riding horseback ; but now, notwith- 
'standing the fact that all this was horrible to him, 
because he knew that people broke their necks, and 
that at every hurdle stood a surgeon, an ambulance with 
its cross and sister of charity, still he had made up his 
mind to ride. 

They exchanged glances, and Vronsky gave him an 



ANNA KARENINA 255 

encouraging and approving nod. One only he now 
failed to see : his most redoubtable rival, Makhotin, on 
Gladiator, was not there. 

" Don't be in haste," said Cord to Vronsky, "and 
remember one thing : when you come to a hurdle, don't 
pull back or spur on your horse ; let her take it her own 
way.'* 

"Very good," replied Vronsky, taking the reins. 

" If possible, take the lead, but don't be discouraged 
even to the last if you are behind." 

The horse did not have time to stir before Vronsky, 
with supple and powerful movement, put his foot on the 
notched steel stirrup, and gracefully, firmly, took his 
seat in the squeaking leather saddle. Having put his 
right foot in the stirrup, with his customary care he then 
arranged the double reins between his fingers, and 
Cord let go the animal's head. Frou Frou, as if not 
knowing which foot to put down first, stretched out her 
neck, and pulled on the reins, and she started off as if 
on springs, balancing her rider on her supple back. 
Cord, quickening his pace, followed them. The mare, 
excited, jumped to right and left, trying to take her 
master off his guard, and pulled at the reins, and Vron- 
sky vainly endeavored to calm her with his voice and 
with his hand. 

They were approaching the diked bank of the river, 
where the starting-post was placed. Some of the riders 
had gone on ahead, others were riding behind, when 
Vronsky suddenly heard on the muddy track the gallop 
of a horse ; and Makhotin dashed by on his white-footed, 
lop-eared Gladiator. Makhotin smiled, showing his long 
teeth, but Vronsky looked at him angrily. He did not 
like Makhotin any too well, and now he regarded him 
as his most dangerous rival ; and he was exasperated at 
the way he galloped up behind him, exciting his mare. 

Frou Frou kicked up her heels and started off at a 
gallop, made two bounds, and then, angry at the re- 
straint of the curb, changed her gait into a trot which 
shook up her rider. Cord was also disgusted, and ran 
almost as fast as Vronsky. 



■i S 6 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XXV 

The number of the officers who were to take part 
was seventeen. The race-course was a great ellipse of 
four versts, extending before the judges' stand, and nine 
obstacles were placed upon it : the "river" ; a great bar- 
rier two arshins — four feet, eight inches — high, in front 
of the pavilion ; a dry ditch ; a ditch filled with water ; 
a steep ascent ; an Irish banketka, which is the most 
difficult of all, composed of an embankment set with 
dry branches, behind which is concealed a ditch, oblig- 
ing the horseman to leap two obstacles at once, at the 
risk of his life ; then three more ditches, two filled with 
water and one dry ; and finally the goal opposite the 
pavilion again. The track did not begin in the circle 
itself, but about a hundred sazhais> or seven hundred 
feet, to one side ; and in this space was the first obstacle, 
the diked "river," about three arshins, or seven, feet, 
wide, which the racers were free to leap or to ford. 

Three times the riders got into line, but each time 
some horse or other started before the signal, and the 
men had to be called back. Colonel Sestrin, the starter, 
was beginning to get impatient ; but at last, for the 
fourth time, the signal was given, "Pashol! — Go ! " and 
the riders put spurs to their horses. 

All eyes, all lorgnettes, were directed toward the 
variegated group of racers as they started off. 

"There they' go!" "There they come!" was the 
cry on all sides after the silence of expectation. 

And in order to follow them, the spectators rushed, 
singly or in groups, toward the places where they could 
get a better view. At the first moment the collected 
group of horsemen scattered a little, and it could be 
* seen how they, in twos and threes, and singly, one after 
the other, approached the "river." To the spectators it 
seemed as if they were all moving together, but to the 
racers themselves there were seconds of separation 
which had great value. 

Frou Frou, excited and too nervous at first, lost the 



ANNA KARENINA 257 

first moment, and several of the horses were ahead of 
her; but Vronsky, not having yet reached the "river," 
and trying with all his might to calm her as she pulled 
on the bridle, soon easily outstripped three, and now 
had as competitors only Makhotin's chestnut Gladiator, 
which was easily and smoothly running a whole length 
ahead, and still more to the fore the pretty Diana, car- 
rying Prince Kuzovlef, not knowing whether he was 
dead or alive. 

During these first few seconds Vronsky had control 
neither of himself nor of his horse. Up to the first ob- 
stacle, the "river," he could not control the movements 
of his horse. 

Gladiator and Diana reached it at almost one and the 
same moment. Both at once rose above the reka, or 
"river," and flew across to the other side. Frou Frou 
lightly leaped behind them, as .if she had wings. The 
instant that Vronsky perceived that he was in the air, 
he caught a glimpse of Kuzovlef almost under the feet 
of his horse, wrestling with Diana on the other side 
of the "river." Kuzovlef had loosened the reins after 
Diana jumped, and the horse had stumbled, throwing 
him over her head. These details Vronsky learned 
afterwards, but at this time he only saw that Frou Frou 
might land on Diana's head or legs. But Frou Frou, 
like a falling cat, making a desperate effort with back 
and legs as she leaped, landed beyond the fallen racer. 

" O you dear ! " thought Vronsky. 

After the reka he got full control of his horse, and 
even held 'her back a little, meaning to leap the great 
hurdle behind Makhotin, and to do his best to outstrip 
him when they reached the long stretch of about two 
hundred sazhcus, or fourteen hundred feet, which was 
free of obstacles. 

This great hurdle was built exactly in front of the 
imperial pavilion ; the emperor, the court, and an im- 
mense throng were watching them, watching him and 
Makhotin on the horse a length ahead of him, as they 
approached the chort, or devil, as the barrier was called. 
Vronsky felt all these eyes fixed on him from every side; 
vol. 1. — 17 



258 ANNA KARENINA 

but he saw only his horse's ears and neck, the ground 
flying under him, and Gladiator's flanks, and white feet 
beating the ground in cadence, and always maintaining 
the same distance between them. Gladiator flew at the 
hurdle, gave a whisk of his well-cropped tail, and, with- 
out having touched the hurdle, vanished from Vronsky's 
eyes. 

" Bravo ! " cried a voice. 

At the same instant the planks of the hurdle flashed 
before his eyes. Without the least change in her motion, 
the horse rose under him. The planks creaked and just 
behind him there was the sound of a thump. Frou Frou, 
excited by the sight of Gladiator, had leaped too soon, 
and had struck the hurdle with one of her hind feet, but 
her gait was unchanged ; and Vronsky, his face splashed 
with mud, saw that he was still at the same distance 
from Gladiator, he saw once more Gladiator's crupper, 
his short tail, and his swiftly moving white feet. 

At the very instant that Vronsky decided that he 
ought now to get ahead of Makhotin, Frou Frou herself 
comprehending his thought, and needing no stimulus, 
sensibly increased her speed, and gained on Makhotin 
by trying to take the inside track next the rope. But 
Makhotin did not yield this advantage. Vronsky was 
wondering if they could not pass on the outside, when 
Frou Frou, as if divining his thought, changed of her 
own accord and took this direction. Her shoulder, 
darkened with sweat, came up even with Gladiator's 
flank, and for several seconds they flew almost side by 
side ; but Vronsky, before the obstacle to which they 
were now coming, in order not to take the outside of 
the great circle, began to ply his reins, and, just on the 
declivity, he managed to get the lead. As he drew by 
Makhotin he saw his mud-stained face ; it even seemed 
to him that he smiled. Vronsky had passed Makhotin, 
but he was conscious that he was just behind, he was 
still there, within a step ; and Vronsky could hear the 
regular rhythm of Gladiator's feet, and his hurried, but 
far from winded, breathing. 

The next two obstacles, the ditch and the hurdle, were 



ANNA KARENINA 259 

easily passed, but Gladiator's gallop and puffing came 
nearer, Vronsky gave Frou Frou the spur, and perceived 
with a thrill of joy that she easily accelerated her speed ; 
the sound of Gladiator's hoofs was heard once more in 
the same relative distance behind. 

He now had the lead, as he had desired, and as Cord 
had recommended, and he felt sure of success. His 
emotion, his joy, his affection for Frou Frou, were all 
growing more pronounced. He wanted to look back, 
but he did not dare to turn around, and he strove to calm 
himself, and not to push his horse too far, so that she 
might keep a reserve equal to that which he felt Gladi- , 
ator still maintained. 

One obstacle, the most serious, now remained ; if he 
cleared that before the others, then he would be first in. 
He was now approaching the Irish banketka. He and 
Frou Frou at the same instant caught sight of the ob- 
stacle from afar, and both, horse and man felt a moment 
of hesitation. Vronsky noticed the hesitation in his 
horse's ears, and he was just lifting his whip ; but in- 
stantly he was conscious that his fears were ungrounded, 
the horse knew what she had to do. She got her start, 
and, exactly as he had foreseen, spurning the ground, she 
gave herself up to the force of inertia which carried her 
far beyond the ditch ; then fell again into the measure 
of her pace without effort and without change. 

"Bravo, Vronsky! " 

He heard the acclamations of the throng. He knew 
it was his friends and his regiment, who were standing 
near this obstacle; and he could not fail to distinguish 
Yashvin's voice, though he did not see him. 

" O my beauty ! " said he to himself, thinking of Frou 
Frou, and yet listening to what was going on behind 
him. " He has cleared it," he said, as he heard Gladia- 
tor's hoof-beats behind him. 

The last ditch, full of water, five feet x wide, now was 
left. Vronsky scarcely heeded it ; but, anxious to come 
in far ahead of the others, he began to saw on the reins, 
lifting her head and letting it fall again in time with the 

1 Two arskins, four feet, eight inches. Three arshins make a sazhen. 



a6o ANNA KARENINA 

rhythm of her gait. He felt that the horse was begin- 
ning to draw on her last reserves; not only were her 
neck and her sides wet, but the sweat stood in drops 
on her throat, her head, and her ears ; her breath was 
short and gasping. Still, he was sure that she had 
force enough to cover the fourteen hundred feet that 
lay between him and the goal. Only because he felt 
himself nearer the ground, and by the extraordinary 
smoothness of her motion, did Vronsky realize how 
much she had increased her speed. The ditch was 
cleared, how, he did not know. 

She cleared the ditch scarcely heeding it ; she cleared 
it like a bird. But at this moment Vronsky felt, to his 
horror, that, instead of taking the swing of his horse, he 
had made, through some inexplicable reason, a wretch- 
edly and unpardonably wrong motion in falling back 
into the saddle. His position suddenly changed, and 
he felt, that something horrible had happened. He 
could not give himself any clear idea of it ; but there 
flashed by him a chestnut steed with white feet, and 
Makhotin by a swift leap passed him. 

One of Vronsky's feet touched the ground, and his 
horse stumbled. He had scarcely time to clear himself 
when the horse, fell on her side, panting painfully, and 
making vain efforts with her delicate foam-covered neck 
to rise again. But she lay on the ground, and strug- 
gled like a wounded bird ; the awkward movement 
that he had made in the saddle had broken her back. 
But he did not learn this till afterwards. Now he 
saw only one thing, that Makhotin was far ahead, and 
that he was tottering there alone, standing on the 
muddy immovable ground, and before him, heavily pant- 
ing, lay Frou Frou, who stretched her head toward 
him, and looked at him with her beautiful eyes. Still 
not realizing what had happened, Vronsky pulled on the 
reins. The poor animal struggled like a fish, splitting 
the flaps of the saddle, and tried to get up on her fore 
legs; but, unable to move her hind quarters, she fell 
back on the ground all of a tremble. Vronsky, his face 
pale and distorted with passion, and with trembling 



ANNA KARENINA 261 

lower jaw, kicked her in the belly and again pulled at 
the reins. But she did not move, but gazed at her 
master with one of her speaking looks, and buried her 
nose in the sand. 

f Aaah ! what have I done ? " cried Vronsky, taking 
her head in his hands. "Aaah! what have I done?'* 
And the lost race ! and his humiliating, unpardonable 
blunder! and the poor ruined horse! "Aaah! what 
have I done ? " . ♦ ' . 

The people's doctor and his assistant, the officers of 
his regiment, ran to his aid ; but to his great mortifica- 
tion he found that he was safe and sound. The horse's 
back was broken and she had to be killed.* 

Vronsky could not answer the questions which were 
put to him, could not speak a word to any one ; he turned 
away and, without picking up his cap, left the hippo- 
drome, not knowing whither he was going. He was in 
despair. For the' first time in his life he was the victim 
of a misfortune for which there was no remedy, and for 
which he felt that he himself was the only one to blame. 

Yashvin, with his cap, overtook him and brought him 
back to his quarters, and in half an hour Vronsky was calm 
and self-possessed again ; but this race was for a long 
time the most bitter and cruel remembrance of his life. 



CHAPTER XXVI 

The external relations of AlekseX Aleksandroviteh 
and his wife were the same as they had been. The 
only difference was that he was more absorbed in his 
work than he had been. Early in the spring he went 
abroad, as was his custom each year, to recuperate at 
the water-cure after the fatigues of the winter. He re- 
turned in July, as he usually did, and resumed his duties 
with new energy. His wife had taken up her summer 
quarters as usual in a datcha, or summer villa, not far 
from Petersburg ; he remained in the city. 

Since their conversation after the reception at the 
Princess Tverskaya's, he had said nothing more about 



262 ANNA KARENINA 

his jealousies or suspicions ; and the tone of raillery 
habitual with Alekseif Aleksandrovitch was to the high- 
est degree useful to him in his present relations with 
his wife. He was somewhat cooler in his treatment of 
her, although he seemed to have felt only a slight ill- 
will toward her after that night's conversation which 
she had refused to listen to. In his relations to her 
there was a shade of spite, but nothing more. He 
seemed to say, " You have not been willing to have an 
understanding with me; so much the worse for you. 
Now you must make the first advances, and I, in my 
turn, will not listen to you." 

" So much the worse for you," said he in his thought, 
like a man who should try in vain to put out a fire and 
should be angry at his vain efforts, and should say, " I 
have done my best for you ; burn then ! " 

This man, so keen and shrewd in matters of public 
concern, could not see the absurdity of such behavior to 
his wife. He did not understand it because it was too 
terrible to understand his actual position. He preferred 
to bury the affection which he felt for his wife and child 
deep in his heart, as in a box locked and sealed. He, 
a watchful father, had begun toward the' end of that 
winter to be singularly cold toward the child, speaking 
to him in the same bantering tone that he used toward 
his wife. When he addressed him he would say, "Ah, 
young man ! " 

Alekseif Aleksandrovitch thought and declared that 
he had never had so many important affairs as this year ; 
but he did not confess that he had himself under- 
taken them in order to keep from opening his secret 
coffer which contained his sentiments toward his wife 
and his family/ and his thoughts concerning them, — 
thoughts which grew more and more terrible to him 
the longer he kept them out of sight. 

If any one had assumed the right to ask him what he 
thought about his wife's conduct, this calm and pacific 
Alekser Aleksandrovitch would have made no reply, but 
would have been very indignant with the man who 
should dare to ask him such a question. And so his 



ANNA KARENINA 263 

face always looked stern and haughty whenever any one 
asked how his wife was. Alekseif Aleksandrovitch did 
not wish to think about his wife's conduct and feelings, 
and therefore he did not think about them. 

The Karenins' summer datcha was at Peterhof ; and the 
Countess Lidya Ivanovna generally spent her summers 
in the same neighborhood, keeping up friendly relations 
with Anna. This year the countess had not cared to go to 
Peterhof, nor had she once called on Anna Arkadyevna ; 
and as she was talking with Karenin one day, she made 
some allusion to the impropriety of Anna's intimacy 
with Betsy and Vronsky. Alekseif Aleksandrovitch 
stopped her harshly, and declared that for him his wife 
was above suspicion, and from that day he avoided the 
countess. He did not wish to see and he did not see 
that many people in society were beginning to give 
his wife the cold shoulder ; he did not wish to com- 
prehend and he did not comprehend why his wife es- 
pecially insisted on going to Tsarskoye, where Betsy 
lived and from which it was not far to Vronsky's 
camp. 

He did not allow himself to think about this, and he 
did not think ; but at the same time, without any proof 
to support him, without actually acknowledging it to 
himself, in the depths of his soul he felt that he was a 
deceived husband ; he had no doubt about it, and he 
suffered deeply. 

How many times in the course of his eight years of 
happy married life, as he had seen other men's wives 
playing them false and other husbands deceived, had he 
not asked himself, "How did it come to this? Why 
don't they free themselves at any cost from such an 
absurd situation ? " But now, when the evil had fallen 
on his own head, he not only did not dream of extricat- 
ing himself from his own trouble, but he would not 
even admit it, would not admit it for the very reason 
that it was too horrible and too unnatural. 

Since his return from abroad, Alekse'i Aleksandrovitch 
had gone twice to his wife's datcha, — once to dine 
with her, the other time to pass the evening with some 



264 ANNA KARENINA 

guests, but not once had he spent the night, as had 
been his custom in previous years. 

The day of the races was extremely engrossing for 
Alekser Aleksandrovitch ; but when in the morning he 
made out the program of the day, he decided to go to 
his wife's datcha after an early dinner, and thence to 
the hippodrome, where he expected to find the court, 
and where it was proper that he should be seen. He 
went to see his wife because he had resolved, for the 
sake of propriety also, to visit his wife every week. 
Moreover, it was the fifteenth of the month, and it was 
his custom at this time to place in her hands the money 
for the household expenses. 

With his ordinary power over his thoughts he gave 
this much consideration to his wife's affairs, but beyond 
this point he would not permit them to pass. 

His morning had been extremely full of business. 
The evening before he had received a pamphlet, written 
by a famous traveler, who had recently returned from 
China and was now in Petersburg ; a note from the 
Countess Lidya, accompanying it, begged him to receive 
this traveler, who seemed likely to be, on many ac- 
counts, a useful and interesting man. AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch had not been able to get through the 
pamphlet in the evening, and he finished it after break- 
fast. Then came petitions, reports, visits, nominations, 
removals, the distribution of rewards, pensions, salaries, 
correspondence, all that "workaday labor," as Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch called it, which consumes so much 
time. 

Then came his private business, a visit from his phy- 
sician and a call from his steward. The steward did not 
stay very long. He only brought the money which 
AlekseY Aleksandrovitch needed, and a brief report on 
the condition of his affairs, which this year were not 
very satisfactory, since it happened that in consequence 
of various outlays there had been a heavy drain upon 
him and there was a deficit. 

But the doctor, who was a famous physician of 
Petersburg, and had come into very friendly relations 



ANNA KARENINA 265 

with AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, took considerable time. 
Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch had not expected him that day 
and was astonished at his visit, and still more so at the 
scrupulous care with which he plied him with questions, 
and sounded his lungs and punched and thumped his 
liver ; AlekseT Aleksandrovitch was not aware that his 
friend, the Countess Lidya, troubled by his abnormal 
condition, had begged the doctor to visit him and give 
him a thorough examination. 

"Do it for my sake," said the Countess Lidya Iva- 
novna. 

" I will do it for the sake of Russia, countess/' replied 
the doctor. 

" Admirable man ! " cried the countess. 

The doctor was very much disturbed at Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch's state. His liver was congested, his 
digestion was bad ; the waters had done him no good. 
He ordered more physical exercise, as little mental 
strain as possible, and, above all, freedom from vexation 
of spirit ; in other words, he ordered Aleksei' Aleksan- 
drovitch to do what was as impossible for him as not to 
breathe. 

The doctor departed, leaving AlekseT Aleksandrovitch 
with the disagreeable impression that something was 
very wrong with him, and that there was no help for it. 

On the way out, the doctor met on Karenin's steps 
his old acquaintance Sliudin, who was Aleksei Alek- 
sandrovitch's chief secretary. They had been in the 
university together; but, though they rarely met, they 
were still excellent friends, and therefore to no one else 
than Sliudin would the doctor have expressed his opinion 
concerning the sick man so frankly. 

" How glad I am that you have been to see him ! " 
said Sliudin. " He is not well, and it seems to me..., 
Well, what is it ? " 

" I will tell you," said the doctor, nodding to his 
coachman to drive up to the door. "This is what I 
say ; " and, taking with his white hand the fingers of 
his dogskin glove, he stretched it out ; " try to break 
a tough cord which is not stretched and it 's hard work ; 



266 ANNA KARENINA 

but keep it stretched out to its utmost tension, and 
put the weight of your finger on it, it breaks. Now, 
with his too sedentary life, and his too conscientious 
labor, he is strained to the utmost limit ; and besides, 
there is a violent pressure in another direction/' con- 
cluded the doctor, raising his eyebrows significantly. 
"Shall you be at the races?" he added, as he got into 
his carriage, i 

"Yes, yes, certainly; it takes a good deal of time," 
he said in reply to something that Sliudin said, and 
which he did not catch.. 

Immediately after the departure of the doctor, who 
had taken so much time, the celebrated traveler ap- 
peared ; and AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, aided by the 
pamphlet which he had just read, and by some pre- 
vious information which he had on the subject, aston- 
ished his visitor by the extent of his knowledge and 
the breadth of his views. 

At the same time the marshal x of nobility of his 
government was announced, who had come to Peters- 
burg and wanted to talk with him. After his departure 
he was obliged to settle the routine business with his 
chief secretary, and finally to go out and make a serious 
and necessary call on an important personage. 

Alekset Aleksandrovitch had only time to get back 
to his five o'clock dinner with Sliudin, whom he in- 
vited to join him on his visit to the country and to the 
races. 

Without exactly accounting for it, Alekse'f Aleksan- 
drovitch always endeavored lately to have a third per- 
son present when he had an interview with his wife. 



CHAPTER XXVII 

Anna was in her room standing before a mirror and 
fastening a final bow to her dress, with Annushka's aid, 
when the noise of wheels on the gravel driveway was 
heard. 

1 Gubermky Prcdvodityd. 



ANNA KARENINA 267 

" It is too early for Betsy," she thought ; and, looking 
out of the window, she saw a carriage and in the car- 
riage Aleksei Aleksandrovitch's black hat and well- 
known ears. 

"How provoking! Can he have come for the night ?" 
she thought ; and all the consequences of his visit 
seemed to her so terrible, so horrible, that without 
taking time for a moment of reflection, she went down- 
stairs, radiant with gayety, to receive her husband; and, 
feeling in her the presence of the spirit of falsehood and 
deception which now ruled her, she gave herself up to it 
and spoke with her husband, not knowing what she said. 

"Ah! how good of you ! " said she, extending her 
hand to Karenin,- while she smiled on Sliudin as a 
household friend. 

" You 've come for the night, I hope ? " were her first 
words, inspired by the demon of untruth ; "and now we 
will go to the races together. But how sorry I am that 
I engaged to go with Betsy. She is coming for me." 

Aleksef Aleksandrovitch frowned slightly at the name 
of Betsy. 

"Oh! I will not separate the inseparables/' said he, 
in his light jesting tone. "I will walk with Mikha'd 
Vasilyevitch. The doctor advised me to take exercise ; 
I will join the pedestrians, and imagine I am still at 
the Spa." 

"There is no hurry," said Anna. "Will you have 
some tea ? " 

She rang. 

" Serve the tea, and tell Serozha that AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch has come. — Well! how is your health? — 
Mikhail Vasilyevitch, you have not been out to see us 
before; look! how pleasant it is on the balcony!" said 
she, looking now at her husband, now at her guest. 

She spoke very simply and naturally, but too fast and 
too fluently. She herself felt that it was so, especially 
when she caught Mikha'fl Vasilyevitch looking at her with 
curiosity and perceived that he was studying her. 

Mikhail Vasilyevitch got up and went out on the 
terrace, and she sat down beside her husband. 



268 ANNA KARENINA 

"You do not look at all well," said she. 

" Oh, yes! The doctor came this morning, and wasted 
an hour of my time. I am convinced that some one of 
my friends sent him. * My health is so precious ...." 
• " No, what did he say ? " 

And she questioned him about his health and his 
labors, advising him to take rest, and to come out into 
the country, where she was. 

It was all said with gayety and animation, and with 
brilliant light in her eyes, but Alekseif Aleksandrovitch 
attached no special importance to her manner ; he heard 
only her words, and took them in their literal significa- 
tion. And he replied simply, though jestingly. The 
conversation had no special weight, yet Anna never after- 
ward could remember the whole short scene without the 
keen agony of shame. 

Serozha came in, accompanied by his governess. If 
Alekseif Aleksandrovitch had allowed himself to notice, 
he would have been struck by the timid manner in 
which the lad looked at his parents, — at his father 
first, and then at his mother. But he was unwilling to 
see anything, and he saw nothing. 

"Ah, young man! He has grown. Indeed, he is 
getting to be a great fellow ! Good-morning, young 
man ! " 

And he stretched out his hand to the puzzled child. 
Serozha had always been a little afraid of his father ; 
but now, since Alekseif Aleksandrovitch had begun to 
call him "young man/' and since he had begun to rack 
his brains to discover whether Vronsky were a friend or 
an enemy, he was becoming more, timid than ever. He 
turned to his mother, as if for protection ; he felt at 
ease only when with her. Meantime AlekseY Aleksan- 
drovitch laid his hand on the boy's shoulder, and asked 
his governess about him ; but the child was so painfully 
shy of him that Anna saw he was going to cry. 

Anna, who had flushed at the moment her son came 
in, now noticing that it was awkward for him, quickly 
jumped up, raised AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's hand to 
let the boy go, kissed the little fellow, and took hiro 



ANNA KARENINA 269 

out on the terrace. Then she came back to her husband 
again. 

" It is getting late/' she said, consulting her watch. 
"Why doesn't Betsy come? V .... 

"Oh, yes," said Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, and as he 
got up he joined his fingers and made them crack. " I 
came also to bring you some money, for nightingales 
don't live on songs," said he. " You need it, I sup- 
pose ? " 

" No, I don't need it .... yes .... I do," said she, not look- 
ing at him and blushing to the roots of her hair. " Well, 
I suppose you will come back after the races ? " 

"Oh, yes!" replied Aleksei Aleksandrovitch. "But 
here is the glory of Peterhof, the Princess Tverskaya," 
he added, looking out of the window at a magnificent 
carriage with a short body set very high and with horses 
harnessed in the English fashion, drawing up to the 
entrance; "what elegance! splendid! well, let us go 
too ! " 

The Princess Tverskaya did not leave her carriage ; 
her lackey, in top-boots and pelerinka, or short cloak, 
and wearing a tall hat, leaped to the steps. 

" I am going, good-by," said Anna, and after she had 
kissed her son, she went to Aleksei Aleksandrovitch 
and gave him her hand. " It was very kind of you to 
come." 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch kissed her. hand. 

"Well then, da svidanya! You will come back to 
tea ? Excellent ! " she said, as she went down the steps, 
seeming radiant and happy. 

But hardly had she passed from his sight before she 
felt on her hand the place where his lips had kissed it, 
and she shivered with repugnance. 



270 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XXVIII 

When Aleksei* Aleksandrovitch reached the race- 
course, Anna was already in her place beside Betsy, in 
the grand pavilion, where all the highest society was 
gathered in a brilliant throng. She saw her husband 
from a distance. Two men, her husband and her lover, 
were for her the two centers of life, and without the help 
of her external senses she felt their presence. Even 
when her husband was at a distance she was conscious 
of his presence, and she involuntarily followed him in 
that billowing throng in the midst of which he was 
coming along. She saw him approach the pavilion, now 
replying with condescension to ingratiating salutations, 
then cordially or carelessly exchanging greetings with his 
equals ; then again assiduously watching to catch the 
glances of the great ones of the earth, and taking off 
his large, round hat, which came down to the top of his 
ears. Anna knew all these mannerisms of salutation, 
and they were all equally distasteful to her. 

" Nothing but ambition ; craze for success ; it is all 
that his heart contains," she thought ; " but his lofty 
views, his love for civilization, his religion, they are 
only means whereby to win success/' 

From the glances that Karenin cast on the pavilion, 
he was looking straight at his wife, but could not see 
her in the sea of muslin, ribbons, feathers, flowers, and 
sunshades — Anna knew he was looking for her, but 
she pretended not to see him. 

" AlekseY Aleksandrovitch," cried the Princess Betsy, 
" don't you see your wife ? here she is ! " 

He looked up with his icy smile. 

"Everything is so brilliant here, that it blinds the 
eyes," he replied, as he came up the pavilion. 

He smiled at Anna, as it is a husband's duty to do 
when he has only just left his wife, greeted Betsy and 
his other acquaintances, conducting himself in due form, 
in other words, jesting with the ladies, and exchanging 
compliments with the men. 



ANNA KARENINA 271 

A general-adjutant, well known for his wit and culture, 
and highly esteemed by Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, was 
standing below near the pavilion. Aleksei Aleksan- 
drovitch joined him, and engaged in conversation. It 
was the interval between two of the races ; the general- 
adjutant condemned racing. Aleksei Aleksandrovitch 
replied and defended them. 

Anna heard his shrill, monotonous voice, and lost not 
a single word ; and every word that he spoke seemed to 
her hypocritical and rang unpleasantly in her ear. 

When the four-verst handicap-race began, she leaned 
forward, not letting Vronsky out of her sight for an 
instant. She saw him approach his horse, then mount 
it ; and at the same time she heard her husband's odious, 
incessant voice. She was tormented with fear for Vron- 
sky ; but she was tormented still more by the sound of 
her husband's sharp voice, every intonation of which 
she knew ; it seemed to her that he would never cease 
speaking. 

" I am a wicked woman, a lost woman," she thought ; 
" but I hate falsehood, I cannot endure lies ; but to 
him " — meaning her husband — " lies are his daily food ! 
He knows all, he sees everything ; how much feeling 
has he, if he can go on speaking with such calmness ? 
I should have some respect for him if he killed me, if 
he killed Vronsky. But no ! what he prefers above 
everything is falsehood and conventionality," said Anna 
to herself, not exactly knowing what she wanted of her 
husband, whatever she might want him to see. She 
did not understand that the very volubility of Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch, which irritated her so, was only the 
expression of his interior agitation and anxiety. 

As a child, hurt when jumping, puts its muscles into 
motion to assuage the pain, so Aleksei Aleksandrovitch 
absolutely required some intellectual movement, so as to 
become oblivious to the thoughts about his wife that 
arose in his mind at the sight of Anna and at the sight 
of Vronsky, whose name he heard on all sides. And 
as it is natural for a child to jump, so for him was it 
natural to talk tersely and well. 



272 ANNA KARENINA 

"Danger," he was saying, "is an indispensable con 
dition in these military and cavalry races. If England 
can show hi her history the most glorious deeds of arms 
performed by her cavalry, she owes it solely to the his- 
toric development of vigor in her people and her horses. 
Sport> in my opinion, has a deep significance ; and, as 
usual, we take it only in its superficial aspect. " 

" Not superficial," said the Princess Tverskaya ; " they 
say that one of the officers has broken two ribs." 

Alekser Aleksandrovitch smiled with his smile which 
only uncovered his teeth and was perfectly expression- 
less. 

" Let us admit, princess," said he, "that in this case it 
is not superficial, but serious. 1 But that is not the 
point ; " and he turned again to the general, and resumed 
his dignified discourse : — 

"You must not forget that those who take part are 
military men who have chosen this career, and you must 
agree that every vocation has its reverse side of the 
medal. This belongs to the calling of war. Such 
brutal sport as boxing-matches and Spanish bull-fights 
are indications of barbarism, but specialized sport is a 
sign of development." 

" No, I won't come another time," the Princess 
Betsy was saying ; " it is too exciting for me ; don't 
you think so, Anna ?" 

" It is exciting, but it is fascinating," said another 
lady; "if -I had been a Roman, I should never have 
missed a single gladiatorial show." 

Anna did not speak, but, with her opera-glass, was 
gazing intently at a single spot. 

At this moment a tall general came across the 
pavilion. AlekseX Aleksandrovitch, breaking off his 
discourse abruptly, arose with dignity, and made a 
low bow. 

"Are n't you racing? " asked the general, jestingly. 

" My race is a far more difficult one," replied Alekset 
Aleksandrovitch, respectfully ; and though this answer 
was not remarkable for its sense, the military man 

1 Vnutrenneye, internal. 



ANNA KARENINA 273 

seemed to think that he had received a witty repartee 
from a witty man, and appreciated la pointe de la 
sauce, 

" There are two sides to the question," AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch said, resuming, — "that of the participants, 
and that of the spectators ; and I confess that a love 
for such spectacles is a genuine sign of. inferiority in 
those that look on, but .... " 

" Princess, a wager," cried the voice of Stepan Ar- 
kadyevitch from below, addressing Betsy. "Which 
side will you take ? " 

"Anna and I bet on Prince Kuzovlef," replied Betsy. 

" I am for Vronsky. A pair of gloves." 

"Good!" 

"How jolly! isn't it?" 

Alekser Aleksandrovitch stopped speaking while this 
conversation was going on around him, and then he 
began anew: — 

" I confess, unmanly games .... " 

But at this instant the signal of departure was heard, 
and all conversation ceased. Alekser Aleksandrovitch 
also ceased speaking ; and every one stood up so as 
to look at the "river." But Alekser Aleksandrovitch 
was not interested in the race, and so, instead of 
watching the riders, looked around the assembly with 
weary eyes. His gaze fell on his wife. 

Her face was pale and stern. She evidently saw 
nothing and no one — except one person. Her- hands 
convulsively clutched her fan ; she held her breath. 
Karenin looked at her, then hastily turned away, gaz- 
ing at the faces of other women. 

" There is another lady very much moved, and still 
another just the same ; it is very natural," said Alekser 
Aleksandrovitch to himself. He did not wish to look 
at her ; but his gaze was irresistibly drawn to her face. 
He once more gazed into her face, trying not to read 
in it what was so plainly pictured on it, and against 
his will he read, with feelings of horror, all that he 
had tried to ignore. 

When Kuzovlef fell at the "river," the excitement 
VOL. 1. — 18 



274 ANNA KARENINA 

was general ; but AlekseT Aleksandrovitch saw clearly 
by Anna's pale, triumphant face that he that fell was 
not the one on whom her gaze was riveted. 

When, after Makhotin and Vronsky crossed the great 
hurdle, another officer was thrown head first, and was 
picked up for dead, a shudder of horror ran through 
the assembly ; but Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch perceived 
that Anna did not even notice it, and scarcely knew 
what the people around her were talking about. 

But he kept studying her face, with deeper and 
deeper attention. Anna, all absorbed as she was in 
the spectacle of Vronsky's course, was conscious that 
her husband's cold eyes were on her. She turned 
around for an instant and looked at him questioningly. 
Then with a slight frown she turned away. 

V Akh ! it is all the same to me," she seemed to say, 
as she turned her glass to the race. She did not look 
at him again. 

The race was disastrous ; out of the seventeen riders, 
more than half were thrown and hurt. Toward the end 
the excitement became intense, the more because the 
emperor was displeased. 



CHAPTER XXIX 

All were loudly expressing their dissatisfaction, and 
the phrase was going the rounds, "Now only the lions 
are left in the arena ; " and when Vronsky fell, horror 
was felt by all, and Anna groaned in dismay. In this 
there was nothing extraordinary. But, from thence on, 
a change which was positively improper had come over 
her face, and she entirely lost her presence of mind. 
She tried to escape, like a bird caught in a snare. 
Thus she struggled to arise, and to get away ; and 
then she cried to Betsy: — 

" Come, let us go, let us go ! " 

But Betsy did not hear her. She was leaning over, 
engaged in lively conversation with a general who had 
just entered the pavilion. 



ANNA KARENINA 275 

Alekset Aleksandrovitch hastened to his wife, and 
courteously offered her his arm. 

" Come, if it is your wish to go," said he, in French ; 
but Anna was listening eagerly to what the general 
said, and paid no attention to her husband. 

" He has broken his leg, they say ; but this is not 
at all likely," said the general. 

Anna did not look at her husband ; but, taking her 
glass, she gazed at the place where Vronsky had 
fallen. It was so distant, and the crowd was so dense, 
that she could not make anything out of it. She 
dropped her binocle, and started to go ; but at that 
instant an officer came galloping up to make some 
report to the emperor. Anna leaned forward, and 
listened. 

" Stiva ! Stiva ! " she cried to her brother. 

He did not hear her. 

She again made an effort to leave the pavilion. 

" I again offer you my arm, if you wish to go," re- 
peated AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, touching her hand. 

Anna drew back from him with aversion, and replied 
without looking at him : — 

" No, no ; leave me ; I am going to stay." 

She now saw an officer riding at full speed across the 
race-course from the place of the accident to the pavilion. 
Betsy beckoned to him with her handkerchief ; the offi- 
cer brought the news that the rider was uninjured but 
the horse had broken her back. 

When she heard this, Anna quickly sat down, and hid 
her face behind her fan. Alekset Aleksandrovitch 
noticed, not only that she was weeping, but that she 
could not keep back the tears or even control the sobs 
that heaved her bosom. He stepped in front of her to 
shield her from the public gaze and give her a chance 
to regain her self-command. 

"For the third time I offer you my arm," said he. 
turning to her at the end of a few moments. 

Anna looked at him, not knowing what to say. The 
Princess Betsy came to her aid. 

" No, Alekse'i Aleksandrovitch. I brought Anna, and 



276 ANNA KARENINA 

I will be responsible for bringing her home," said Betsy, 
interfering. 

" Excuse me, princess," he replied, politely smiling, 
and looking her full in the face ; " but I see that she is 
not well, and I wish her to go with me." 

Anna looked round in terror, and, rising hastily, took 
her husband's arm. 

"I will send to inquire for him, and let you know," 
whispered Betsy. 

As Aleksef Aleksandroviteh left the pavilion with his 
wife, he spoke in his ordinary manner to all whom he 
met, and Anna was forced to listen and to reply as 
usual ; but she was not herself, and as in a dream she 
passed along on her husband's arm. 

" Is he killed, or not ? Can it be true ? Will he 
come ? Shall I see him to-day ? " she asked herself. 

In silence she got into AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's 
carriage, and she sat in silence as they left the throng 
of vehicles. In spite of all he had seen, Aleksel Alek- 
sandroviteh did not allow himself to think of his wife's 
present attitude. He saw only the external signs. He 
saw that her deportment had been improper, and he felt 
obliged to speak to her about it. But it was very diffi- 
cult not to say more, — to say only that. He opened 
his mouth to tell her how improperly she had behaved ; 
but, in spite of himself, he said something absolutely 
different. 

"How strange that we all like to see these cruel 
spectacles ! I notice ...." 

" What ? I did not understand you," said Anna, 
scornfully. 

He was wounded, and instantly began to say what 
was on his mind. . 

" I am obliged to tell you ...." he began. 

"Now," thought Anna, "comes the explanation ; " and 
a terrible feeling came over her. 

" I am obliged to tell you that your conduct to-day 
has been extremely improper," said he, in French. 

"Wherein has my conduct been improper?" she 
demanded angrily, raising her head quickly, and look- 



ANNA KARENINA 277 

ing him straight in the eyes, no longer hiding her feel- 
ings under a mask of gayety, but putting on a bold 
front, under which, with difficulty, she hid her fears. 

" Be careful," said he, pointing to the open window 
behind the coachman's back. 

He leaned forward and raised the pane. 

"What impropriety did you remark?" she asked 
again. 

"The despair which you took no pains to conceal 
when one of the riders was thrown." 

He awaited her answer ; but she said nothing, and 
looked straight ahead. 

" I have already requested you so to behave when in 
society that evil tongues cannot find anything to say 
against you. There was a time when I spoke of your 
inner feelings ; I now say nothing about them. Now I 
speak only of outward appearances. You have behaved 
improperly, and I would ask you not to let this happen 
again." 

She did not hear half of his words ; she felt over- 
whelmed with fear; and she thought only of Won sky, 
and whether he was killed. Was it he who was meant 
when they said the rider was safe but the horse had 
broken her back ? 

When Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch ceased speaking, she 
looked at him with an ironical smile, and answered not 
a word, because she had not noticed what he said. At 
first he had spoken boldly ; but as he saw clearly what 
he was speaking about, the terror which possessed her 
seized him also. He noticed that smile of hers, and it 
led him into a strange mistake. 

" She is amused at my suspicions ! She is going to 
tell me now what she once before said, that there is no 
foundation for them, that this is absurd." 

Now when the discovery of the whole thing hung 
over him, he desired nothing so much as that she should 
answer derisively as she had done before, that his sus- 
picions were ridiculous and had no foundation. What 
he now knew was so terrible to him that he was ready 
to believe anything that. she might say. But the ex- 



278 ANNA KARENINA 

pression of her gloomy and frightened face now allowed 
him no further chance of falsehood. 

"Possibly I am mistaken," said he; "in that case, I 
beg you to forgive me." 

" No, you are not mistaken," she replied, with meas- 
ured words, casting a look of despair on her husband's 
icy face. "You are not mistaken; I was in despair, 
and I could not help being. I hear you, but I am think- 
ing only of him. I love him, I am his mistress. I can- 
not endure you, I fear you, I hate you!.... Do with me 
what you please ! " 

And, throwing herself into a corner of the carriage, 
she covered her face with her hands, and burst into tears. 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch did not move, or change the 
direction of his eyes ; but his whole face suddenly as- 
sumed the solemn rigidity of a corpse, and this expres- 
sion remained unchanged throughout the drive to the 
datcha. As they reached the house, he turned his head 
to her still with the same expression. 

" So ! but I insist on the preservation of appearances 
until" — and here his voice trembled — "I decide on 
the measures which I shall take to save my honor and 
communicate them to you." 

He stepped out of the carriage, and assisted Anna 
out. Then, in presence of the domestics, he shook 
hands with her, reentered the carriage, and drove back 
to Petersburg. 

He had just gone, when a lackey from Betsy brought 
a note to Anna : — 

"I sent to Alekse* Vronsky to learn how he was. 
He writes me that he is safe and sound, but in despair." 

"Then he will come," she thought. "How well I 
did to tell him all ! " 

She looked at her watch ; scarcely three hours had 
passed since she saw him, but the memory of their 
interview made her heart hot within her. 

"Bozhe mo'f! how light it is! It is terrible! but I 

love to see his face, and I love this fantastic light 

My husband ! oh ! yes ! ....well! thank God it is all over 
with him !" 



ANNA KARENINA 279 



CHAPTER XXX • 

As in all places where human beings congregate, so 
in the little German village where the Shcherbatskys 
went to take the waters, there is formed a sort of social 
crystallization which puts every one in his exact and un- 
changeable place. Just as a drop of water exposed to 
the cold always and invariably takes a certain crystalline 
form, so each new individual coming to the Spa immedi- 
ately finds himself fixed in the place peculiar to him. 

" Fiirst Schtscherbatzsky sammt Gemahlin und Toch- 
ter," — Prince Shcherbatsky, wife, and daughter, — both 
by the apartments that they occupied, and by their name 
and the acquaintances that they found, immediately 
crystallized into the exact 'place that was predestined to 
receive them. 

This year a genuine German Fiirstin> or princess, was 
at the Spa, and in consequence the crystallization of 
society took place even more energetically than usual. 
The Russian princess felt called on to present her 
daughter to the German princess, and the ceremony 
took place two days after their arrival. Kitty, dressed 
in a very simple toilet, that is to say, a very elegant 
summer costume imported from Paris, made a low and 
graceful courtesy. The Fiirstin said : — 

" I hope that the roses will soon bloom again in this 
pretty little face." 

And immediately the Shcherbatsky family found them- 
selves in the fixed and definite walk in life from which 
it was impossible to descend. They made the acquain- 
tance of the family of an English Lady, of a German 
Grafin> and her son who had been wounded in the late 
war, of a scientific man from Sweden, and of a M. Canut 
and his sister. 

But, for the most part, the Shcherbatskys spontane- 
ously formed social relations among the people from 
Moscow, among them Marya Yevgenyevna Rtishchevaya 
and her daughter, whom Kitty did not like because she 
likewise was ill on account of a love-affair, and a Mos 



a8o ANNA KARENINA 

cow colonel whom she had seen in society since child- 
hood, and known by his uniform and his epaulets, and 
who now, with his little eyes, and his bare neck and 
flowery cravats, seemed to Kitty supremely ridiculous, 
and the more unendurable because she could not get rid 
of him. When they were all established, it became very 
tiresome to Kitty, the more as her father had gone to 
Carlsbad, and she and her mother were left alone. She 
could not interest herself in her old acquaintances, be- 
cause she knew that she should not find anything novel 
in them ; and so her principal amusement was in study- 
ing the people whom she had never seen before. It was 
in accordance with Kitty's nature to see the best side 
of people, especially of strangers ; and now, in making 
her surmises about the persons whom she saw, — who 
they were and what they were like and what relation- 
ship they bore to one another, — she amused herself in 
imagining the most wonderful and beautiful characters, 
and found justification for her observations. 

Of all these people, there was one in whom she took 
a most lively interest : this was a young Russian girl 
who had come to the baths with a sick Russian lady 
named Madame Stahl. Madame Stahl belonged to the 
high nobility ; but she was so ill that she could not 
walk, and only occasionally, on very fine days, appeared 
at the baths in a wheeled-chair. But it was rather from 
pride than illness, as the princess judged, that she 
failed to make any acquaintances among the Russians. 
The girl was her nurse ; and, as Kitty remarked, she 
frequently went to those who were seriously ill, — and 
there were many at the baths, — and with the most 
natural, unaffected zeal, took care of them. 

This young Russian girl, Kitty discovered to her sur- 
prise, was no relation to Madame Stahl, nor even a hired 
companion. Madame Stahl called her simply Varenka, 
but her. friends called her "Mademoiselle Varenka." 
Kitty not only found it extremely interesting to study 
the relations between this young girl and Madame 
Stahl, and other persons whom she did not know, but, 
as often happens, she also felt an unaccountable sym- 



ANNA KARENINA 281 

pathy drawing her toward Mademoiselle Varenka ; and, 
when their eyes met, she imagined that it pleased her also. 

This Mademoiselle Varenka was not only no longer in 
her first youth, but she seemed like a creature without 
any youth ; her age might be guessed as either nineteen 
or thirty. If one analyzed her features, she was rather 
good-looking in spite of the sickly pallor of her face. 
If her head had not been rather large, and her figure 
too slight, she would have been considered handsome ; 
but she was not one to please men ; she made one think 
of a beautiful flower, which, though still preserving its 
petals, was faded and without perfume. There was one 
other reason why she could not be attractive to men, 
and that was the fact that she lacked exactly what Kitty 
had in excess — the repressed fire of life and a con- 
sciousness of her fascination. 

Varenka seemed always absorbed in some important 
work ; and therefore it seemed she could not take any 
interest in anything irrelevant. It was this very con- 
trast to herself that especially attracted Kitty to her. 
Kitty felt that in her and in her mode of life she might 
find what she was seeking with so much trouble, — an 
interest in life, the dignity of life outside of the social 
relationships of young women to young men, which 
now seemed to Kitty like an ignominious exposure of 
merchandise waiting for a purchaser. The more she 
studied her unknown friend, the more convinced she 
became that this girl was the most perfect creature 
which she could imagine and the more she longed to 
become acquainted with her. 

The two girls passed each other many times every 
day ; and every time they met Kitty's eyes seemed 
always to ask: "Who are you? What are you? Are 
you not, in truth, the charming person that I imagine 
you to be ? But for Heaven's sake," the look seemed 
to add, "don't think that I would permit myself to 
demand your acquaintance ! I simply admire you, and 
love you." 

" I also love you, and you are very, very charming ; 
and I would love you still better, if I had time," replied 



282 ANNA KARENINA 

the unknown maiden's look ; and indeed Kitty saw that 
she was always busy. Either she was taking the chil- 
dren of a Russian family home from the baths, or carry- 
ing a plaid for an invalid and wrapping her up in it, 
or she was trying to divert some irritable sick man, or 
selecting and buying confections for some other sick 
persons. 

One morning, soon after the arrival of the Shcher- 
batskys, two new persons appeared who immediately 
became the object of rather unfriendly criticism. The 
one was a very tall, stooping man, with enormous hands, 
black eyes, at once innocent and terrifying, and wearing 
an old, ill-fitting, short coat. The other was a pock- 
marked woman, with a kindly face, and dressed very 
badly and inartistically. 

Kitty instantly recognized that they were Russians ; 
and in her imagination set to work constructing a 
beautiful and touching romance about them. But the 
princess, learning by the kurliste, or list of arrivals, 
that this was Nikolai Levin and Marya Nikolayevna, 
explained to her what a bad man this Levin was, and 
all her illusions about these two persons vanished. 

The fact that he was Konstantin Levin's brother, 
even more than her mother's words, suddenly made 
these two people particularly repulsive to Kitty. This 
Levin, with his habit of twitching his head, aroused in 
her an unsurmountable feeling of repulsion. It seemed 
to her that in his great, wild eyes, as they persistently 
followed her, was expressed a sentiment of hatred and 
irony, and she tried to avoid meeting him. 



CHAPTER XXXI 

It was a stormy day ; the rain fell all the morning, 
and the invalids with umbrellas thronged the gallery. 

Kitty and her mother, accompanied by the Muscovite 
colonel playing the elegant in his European overcoat, 
bought ready-made in Frankfort, were walking on one 
side of the gallery, in order to avoid Nikolai Levin, who 



ANNA KARENINA 283 

was on the other. Varenka, in her dark dress and a 
black hat with the brim turned down, was walking up 
and down the whole length of the gallery with a little 
blind French woman ; each time that she and Kitty 
met, they exchanged friendly glances. 

"Mamma, may I speak with her?" asked Kitty, as 
she happened to be following her unknown friend and 
noticed that she was approaching the spring, where they 
might meet. 

" Yes, if you wish it so much. I will inquire about 
her, and make her acquaintance first/' said her mother. 
" But what do you find especially interesting in her ? 
She is only a lady's companion. If you like, I can 
speak to Madame Stahl. I knew her belle-smir," added 
the princess, proudly raising her head. 

Kitty knew that her mother was vexed because 
Madame Stahl seemed to avoid making her acquaint 
tance, and she did not press the point. 

" How wonderfully charming she is ! " said she, as she 
saw Varenka give the blind French lady a glass. " See 
how lovely and gentle everything is that she does." 

" You amuse me with your engouements," replied the 
princess. " No, we had better go back," she added, as 
she saw Levin approaching with Marya and a German 
doctor, with whom he was speaking in a loud and angry 
tone. 

As they turned to go back, suddenly they heard, not loud 
voices, but a cry. Levin had stopped, and was shriek- 
ing. The doctor was also angry. A crowd was gather- 
ing around them. The princess and Kitty hurried away, 
but the colonel joined the throng to find out what the 
trouble was. After a few moments the colonel came 
back to them. 

"What was it ?" asked the princess. 

" It is a shame and a disgrace," replied the colonel. 
"There 's only one thing you need to fear, and that is to 
meet with Russians abroad. This tall gentleman was 
quarreling with his doctor, heaped indignities upon him 
for not attending to him as he wished, and finally he 
threatened him with his cane. It is simply disgraceful." 



284 ANNA KARENINA 

* Akh ! how unpleasant ! " said the princess. " Well, 
how did it end ?" 

"Fortunately that.... that girl with a hat like a toad- 
stool interfered. A Russian, it seems," said the colonel. 

" Mademoiselle Varenka ? " joyously exclaimed Kitty. 

" Yes, yes ! She went quicker than any one else, and 
took the gentleman by the arm, and led him off." 

"There, mamma!" said Kitty, "and you wonder at 
my enthusiasm for Varenka ! " 

The next morning Kitty, watching her unknown 
friend, noticed that Mademoiselle Varenka had the 
same relations with Levin and Marya as with her other 
prottgfe : she joined them and talked with them, and 
acted as interpreter to the woman, who did not know 
any language besides her own. 

Kitty again begged her mother even more urgently 
to let her become acquainted with Varenka ; and though 
it was unpleasant to the princess to seem to be making 
advances to the haughty and exclusive Madame Stahl, 
she made some inquiries about Varenka, and learning 
enough to satisfy herself that there was no possible 
harm, though very little that was advantageous, in the 
proposed acquaintance, she went first to Varenka and 
introduced herself. 

Choosing a time when Kitty was at the spring, and 
Varenka was opposite the baker's, the princess went up 
to her. 

"Allow me to introduce myself," said she, with her 
dignified smile. " My daughter has taken a great fancy 
to you. But perhaps you do not know me. I ...." 

" It is more than reciprocal, princess," replied Varenka, 
quickly. 

"What a good thing you did yesterday toward our 
wretched fellow-countryman," said the princess. 

Varenka blushed. 

"I do not remember," she replied. "I don't think I 
did anything." 

" Yes, indeed ! you saved this Levin from an unpleasant 
affair." 

" Ah, yes ! sa compagne called me, and I tried to calm 



ANNA KARENINA 285 

him ; he is very sick, and dissatisfied with his doctor. 
I am quite used to this kind of invalids." 

"Oh, yes. I have heard that you live at Mentone 
with your aunt, Madame Stahl. I used to know her 
belle-s&itr" 

"No, Madame Stahl is not my aunt. I call her 
maman, but I am no relation to her. I was brought up 
by her,' 1 replied Varenka, again blushing. 

All this was said with perfect simplicity ; and the 
expression of her pleasing face was so frank and sin- 
cere, that the princess began to understand why Kitty 
was so charmed by this Varenka. 

"Well, what is this Levin going to do?" she asked. 

" He is going away." 

At this moment, Kitty, radiant with pleasure because 
her mother had made the acquaintance of her unknown 
friend, came in from the spring. 

" See here ! Kitty, your ardent desire to know Made- 
moiselle...." 

" Varenka," said the girl, smiling. " Every one calls 
me so." 

Kitty was flushed with delight, and without speaking 
long pressed her new friend's hand, which gave no an- 
swering pressure, but lay passive in hers. Her hand 
gave no answering pressure, but Mademoiselle Varenka's 
face shone with a quiet, joyous, though melancholy smile, 
which showed her large but handsome teeth. 

" I have been longing to know you," she said. 

" But you are so busy ...." 

" Oh ! on the contrary, I have n't anything to do," 
replied Varenka; but at the same instant she had to 
leave her new acquaintances because two little Russian 
girls, the daughters of an invalid, ran to her. 

"Varenka, mamma is calling," they cried. 

And Varenka followed them. 



286 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XXXII ' 

The particulars which the princess learned about 
Varenka's past life, and her relations with Madame 
Stahl, and about Madame Stahl herself, were as fol- 
lows : — 

Madame Stahl had always been a sickly and excitable 
woman, who was said by some to have tormented the 
life out of her husband, and by others to have been tor- 
mented by his unnatural behavior. After she was 
divorced from her husband, she gave birth to her first 
child, which did not live; and Madame Stahl's parents, 
knowing her sensitiveness, and fearing that the shock 
would kill her, substituted for the dead child the 
daughter of a court cook, born on the same night, and 
in the same house at Petersburg. This was Varenka. 
Madame Stahl afterwards learned that the child was 
not her own, but continued to take charge of her, the 
more willingly as the true parents shortly after died. 

For more than ten years Madame Stahl lived abroad, 
in the South, never leaving her bed. Some said that 
she was a woman who had made a public show of her 
piety and good works ; others said that she was at heart 
the most highly moral of women, and that she lived only 
for the good of her neighbor, that she was really what 
she pretended to be. 

No one knew whether she was Catholic, Protestant, 
or orthodox ; one thing alone was certain, — that she had 
friendly relations with the high dignitaries of all the 
churches and of all communions. 

Varenka always lived with Madame Stahl abroad ; 
and all who knew Madame Stahl knew Mademoiselle 
Varenka also, and loved her. When she had learned 
all the particulars, the princess found nothing objection- 
able in her daughter's acquaintance with Varenka ; the 
more because Varenka had the most cultivated manners 
and a fine education ; she spoke French and English 
admirably, and chief of all she brought from Ma- 
dame Stahl her regrets that, owing to her illness, she 



ANNA KARENINA 287 

was deprived of the pleasure of making the princess's 
acquaintance. 

After she had once made Varenka's acquaintance, 
Kitty became more and more attached to her friend, 
and each day discovered some new charm in her. The 
princess, having discovered that Varenka sang well, in- 
vited her to come and give them an evening of music. 

" Kitty plays, and we have a piano ; not a very good in- 
strument, to be sure, but you would give us a great pleas- 
ure," said the princess, with her hypocritical smile which 
was displeasing to Kitty, especially as she knew that 
Varenka did not want to sing. But Varenka came, that 
same evening, and brought her music. The princess 
had invited Marya Yevgenyevna and her daughter, and 
the colonel. 

Varenka seemed perfectly indifferent to the presence 
of these people, who were strangers to her, and she went 
to the piano without being urged. She could not ac- 
company herself, but in singing she read the notes per- 
fectly. Kitty, who played very well, accompanied her. 

"You have a remarkable talent," said the princess, 
after the first song, which Varenka sang beautifully. 

Marya Yevgenyevna and her daughter added their 
compliments and their thanks. 

" See," said the colonel, looking out of the window, 
"what an audience you have attracted." 

In fact, a large number of people had gathered in 
front of the house. 

" I am very glad to have given you pleasure," said 
Varenka, without affectation. 

Kitty looked at her friend proudly ; she admired her 
art and her voice and her face, and, more than all, she 
was enthusiastic over the way in which Varenka made 
it evident that she took little account of her singing, 
and was perfectly indifferent to compliments. She 
simply seemed to say, " Shall I sing some more, or is 
that enough ?" 

" If I were in her place, how proud I should be ! How 
happy I should be to see that crowd under the window ! 
But she seems perfectly unconscious of it. All that 



288 ANNA KARENINA 

she seemed to want was not to refuse, but to please 
maman. What is there about her ? What is it that 
gives her this power of indifference, this calmness and 
independence ? How I should like to learn this of her.! " 
thought Kitty, as she looked into her peaceful face. 

The princess asked Varenka to sing again ; and she 
sang this time as well as the first, with the same care 
and the same perfection, standing erect near the piano, 
and beating time with her thin brown hand. 

The next piece in her music-roll was an Italian aria. 
Kitty played the introduction, and looked at Varenka. 

" Let us not do that one," said she, blushing. 

Kitty, in alarm and wonder, fixed her eyes on Varenka's 
face. 

"Well! another one," she said, hastily turning the 
pages, and somehow feeling an intuition that the Italian 
song brought back to her friend some painful association. 

" No," replied Varenka, putting her hand on the notes 
and smiling, "let us sing this." And she sang it as 
calmly and coolly as the one before. 

After the singing was over, they all thanked her 
again, and went out into the dining-room to drink tea. 
Kitty and Varenka went down into the little garden 
next the house. 

" You had some association with that song, did you 
not?" asked Kitty. "You need not tell me about it," 
she hastened to add ; " simply say, ' Yes, I have.' " 

" Why should I not tell you about it ? Yes, there is 
an association," said Varenka, calmly, and not waiting 
for Kitty to say anything, "and it is a painful one. I 
once loved a man, and used to sing that piece to him." 

Kitty with wide-open eyes looked at Varenka meekly,, 
but did not speak. 

"I loved him, and he loved me also; but his mother 
was unwilling, and he married some one else. He does 
not live very far from us now, and I sometimes see him. 
You did n't think that I also had my romance, did you?" 

And her face lighted up with a rare beauty, and a 
fire such as Kitty imagined might have been habitual 
in other days. 



ANNA KARENINA 289 

"Why shouldn't I have thought so? If I were a 
man I could never have loved any one else after know- 
ing-you," said Kitty. "What I cannot conceive is, that 
he was able to forget you, and make you unhappy for 
the sake of obeying his mother. He could n't have had 
any heart." 

" Oh, no, he was an excellent man ; and I am not un- 
happy ; on the contrary, I am very happy. .... Well, shall 
we sing anymore this evening?" she added, starting 
to go toward the house. eJ 

" How good you are ! how good you are ! " cried 
Kitty, and stopping her, she kissed her., "If I could 
only be a bit like you ! " 

" Why should you resemble any one else besides your- 
self ? You are a good girl as you are," said Varenka, 
with her sweet and melancholy smile. 

"No, I am not good at all. Now, tell me.... Stay, 
stay; let us sit down a little while,". said Kitty, -draw- 
ing her down to a settee near by. "Tell me how it can 
be other than a pain to think of a man who has scorned 
your love, who has jilted you...." 

" But no, he did not scorn it at all ; lam sure that he 
loved me. But he was a dutiful son, and...." 

"Yes, but suppose it had not been for his mothers 
sake, but simply of his own free will," said Kitty, feeling 
that she was betraying her secret, and her face, glowing 
red with mortification, convicted her. 

"Then he would not have behaved honorably, and I 
should not mourn for him," replied Varenka, perceiving 
that the supposition concerned, not herself, but Kitty. 

"But the insult ! " cried Kitty. "One cannot forget 
the insult. It is impossible," said she, remembering her 
own look when the music stopped at the last ball. 

" Whose insult ? You did n't act, badly ? " 
• " Worse than badly, — shamefully ! " 

Varenka shook her head, and laid her hand on Kitty's. 

"Well, but why shamefully?" she asked. "You 
surely did not tell a man who showed indifference to 
you that you loved him ? " 

" Certainly not ; I never uttered a word. But he 
vol. 1. — 19 



290 ANNA KARENINA 

knew itj There are looks, there are ways .... no, no ! 
not if I lived a hundred years should I ever forget it." 

"Now, what is it? I don't understand you. The 
question is solely this : do you love him now or not ? " 
said Varenka, who liked to call things by their right 
names. 

"I hate him. I cannot forgive myself." 

"But what for?" 

"The shame, the insult." 

" Akh ! if every one were as sensitive as you ! There 
is never a young girl who does not sometimes feel the 
same way. It is all such a trifling thing ! " 

11 But what, then, is important ? " asked Kitty, look- 
ing at Varenka with astonishment and curiosity. 

" Oh ! many things are important," replied Varenka, 
with a smile. J 

" Yes ; but what ? " 

" Oh ! there are many things more important," re- 
plied Varenka, not knowing what to say ; but at that 
moment the voice of the princess was heard from the 
window : — 

" Kitty, it is getting cool ; put on your shawl, or 
come in." 

"It is time to go," said Varenka, getting up. "I 
must go and see Madame Berthe; she asked me to 
come." . : 

Kitty held her by 'the hand, and her eyes, full of 
passionate, almost supplicating, curiosity, asked her : — 

" What is it that is so important that can give such 
calm ? You know ; tell me." 

But Varenka did not understand the meaning of 
Kitty's look. She remembered only that she had still 
to go to see Madame Berthe, and to get home at mid- 
night for tea with mamatu She went back to the 
room, picked up her music, and, having said good-night 
to all, started to go. 

"Allow me; I will escort you," said the colonel. 

" Certainly," said the princess. "How could you go 
home alone at night ? I was going to send Parasha 
with you." ' / ,r 



' ANNA KARENINA i 9 i 

Kitty saw that Varenka could hardly keep from smil- 
ing at the idea that she needed any one to go home 
with her. 

" No ; I always go home alone, and nothing ever 
happens to me," said she, taking her hat, and after 
kissing Kitty again, though she did not tell her "the 
one important thing," she hurried away with firm steps, 
her music-roll under her arm, and disappeared in the 
semi-darkness of the summer night, carrying with her 
her secret of "what is important" and what gave her 
her enviable calmness and dignity. 



CHAPTER XXXIII 

Kitty also made Madame Stahl's acquaintance, and 
her relations with this lady and her friendship with 
Varenka had not only a powerful influence on her, but 
also soothed her grief. 

She found this consolation in the fact that, through 
this friendship, there opened before her an entirely new 
world, which had nothing in common with her past, — 
a beautiful, supernal world, from the lofty heights of 
which she could look down calmly on her past. She 
discovered that this world, which was entirely apart 
from the instinctive life which she had hitherto led, 
was the spiritual life. This life was reached by re- 
ligion, — a religion which had nothing in common with 
the religion to which Kitty had been accustomed since 
infancy, a religion which consisted of going to morn- 
ing and evening service, and to the House of Widows, 1 
where she met her acquaintances, or of learning by 
heart Slavonic texts with the parish priest. This was 
a lofty, mystic religion, united with the purest thoughts 
and feelings, and believed in not because one was com- 
manded to do so, but through love." 

Kitty learned all this, but not by words. Madame 
Stahl talked to her as to a dear child whom she loved 
as the type of her own youth, and only once did she 
1 Vdovui Dom 



% 9 2 ANNA KARENINA 

make any allusion to the consolation brought by faith 
and love for human sorrows, and to the compassion 
of Christ, who looked on no sorrows as insignificant ; 
and she immediately changed the subject, 

But in, all this lady's motions, in her words, in her 
heavenly looks, as Kitty called them, and, above all, 
in the story of her life, which she knew through Va- 
renka, Kitty discovered "the important thing" which 
till now had been but a sealed book to her. 

But, lofty as Madame Stahl's character was, touch- 
ing as was her history, high-minded and affectionate 
her discourse, Kitty could not help noticing certain 
peculiarities, which troubled her. One day, for ex- 
ample, when her relatives were mentioned, Madame 
Stahl smiled disdainfully ; it was contrary to Christian 
charity. Another time Kitty noticed, when she met 
a Roman Catholic dignitary calling on her, that Madame 
Stahl kept her face carefully shaded by the curtain, and 
smiled peculiarly. Insignificant as these two incidents 
were, they gave her some pain, and caused her to doubt 
Madame Stahl's sincerity. 

Varenka, on the other hand, alone in the world, with- 
out .family connections, without friends, hoping for 
naught, harboring no ill-will after her bitter disap- 
pointment, seemed to her absolute perfection. Through 
Varenka she learned how to forget herself, and to love 
her neighbor, if she wanted to be happy, calm, and 
good. And Kitty did wish this. And, ,when once 
she learned what was the important thing, Kitty was 
no longer willing simply to admire, but gave herself 
up with her whole heart to the new life which opened 
before her. After the stories which Varenka told her 
of Madame Stahl and others whom she named, Kitty 
drew up a plan for her coming life. She decided that, 
following the example of Aline, Madame Stahl's niece, 
whom Varenka often told her about, she would visit 
the unhappy, no matter where she might be living, 
and that'she would aid them to the best of her ability; 
that she would distribute the .Gospel, read the New 
Testament to the sick, to the dying, to criminals : the 



ANNA KARENINA 293 

thought of reading the New Testament to criminals, 
as this Aline *had done, especially appealed to Kitty. 
But she indulged in these dreams secretly, without 
telling them to her mother or even to her friend. 

However, while she was waiting to be able to carry 
out her schemes on a wider scale, it was easy for Kitty 
to put her aiew principles in practice at the waters, 
even then and there at the Spa, "where the sick and 
unhappy are easily found, and she did as Varenka did. 

The princess swiftly noticed that Kitty had fallen 
under the powerful influence of her engouement with 
Madame Stahl (as she called it), and particularly with 
Varenka. She saw that Kitty imitated Varenka, not 
only in her deeds of charity, but even in her gait, in her 
speech, in her ways of shutting her eyes. Later she 
discovered that her daughter was passing through a sort 
of crisis of the soul quite independent of the influence 
of her friends. 

The 'princess saw that Kitty was reading the Gospels 
evenings in a French Testament loaned her by Madame 
Stahl, — a thing which she had never done before. 
She also noticed that she avoided her society friends, 
and gave her time to the sick under Varenka's cafe, and 
particularly to the poor family of a sick painter named 
Petrof. 

Kitty seemed proud to fill, in this household, the 
functions of a sister of charity. All this was very 
good ; and the princess had no fault to find with it, and 
opposed it all the less from the fact that Petrof s wife 
was a woman of good family, and that one day the 
Filrstin, noticing Kitty's charitable activity, had praised 
her, and called her the "ministering angel." All would 
have been very good if it had not been carried to ex- 
cess. But the princess saw that her daughter was going 
to extremes, so she spoke to her about it. « 

"// ne fant rien outrer — One must never go to ex- 
tremes," she said to her. 

But her daughter made no reply ; she only questioned 
from the bottom of her heart whether one could ever 
talk about going to extremes in the matter of religion. 



294 



ANNA KARENINA 



How could there be any possibility of extremes in follow- 
ing teachings which bid you offer your left cheek when 
the right has been struck, and to give your shirt when 
your cloak is taken from you ? But the princess was 
displeased with this tendency to exaggeration, and she 
was still more displeased to feel that Kitty was unwill- 
ing to open her heart to her. In point of fact, Kitty 
kept secret from her mother her new views and feelings. 
She kept them secret, not because she lacked affection 
or respect for her mother, but simply because she was 
her mother. It would have been easier to confess them 
to a stranger than to her mother. 

" It is a long time since Anna Pavlovna has been to 
see us," said the princess one day, speaking of Madame 
Petrof. " I invited her to come, but she seems of- 
fended." 

" No, I don't think so, maman" replied Kitty, with a 
guilty look. 

"You have not been with her lately, have you ?" 

" We planned a walk on the mountain for to-morrow," 
said Kitty. 

"I see no objection," replied the princess, noticing 
her daughter's confusion, and trying to fathom the 
reason. 

That same day Varenka came to dinner and an- 
nounced that Anna Pavlovna had given up the proposed 
expedition. The princess noticed that Kitty again 
blushed. 

" Kitty, has there been anything unpleasant between 
you and the Petrols?" she asked, as soon as they were 
alone. "Why have they ceased to send their children, 
or to come themselves? " 

Kitty replied that nothing had happened, and that she 
really did not understand why Anna Pavlovna seemed 
to be angry with her ; and she told the truth. She did 
not know the reasons for the change in Madame Petrof, 
but she suspected them, and thus also she suspected a 
thing which she dared not to confess, even to herself, 
still less to her mother. This was one of those things 
which you know, but which are impossible to speak even 



ANNA KARENINA 295 

to yourself, so humiliating and painful would it be if 
you are mistaken. 

Again and again she passed in review all the mem- 
ories of her relations with this family. She remembered 
the innocent joy which shone on Anna Pavlovna's 
honest, round face when they first met ; she remembered 
their secret discussions to find means to distract the 
invalid, and keep him from the forbidden work, and to 
get him out of doors ; the attachment of the youngest 
child, who called her Moya Kiti, and would not go to 
bed without her. How beautiful everything was at that 
time ! Then she remembered Petrof s thin face, his 
long neck, stretching out from his brown coat ; his thin, 
curly hair ; his blue eyes, with their questioning look, 
which she had feared at first ; his painful efforts to seem 
lively and energetic when she was near; she recalled 
the effort that she had to make at first to overcome the 
repugnance which he, as well as all consumptives, caused 
her to feel ; and the trouble which she had in finding 
something to talk with him about. 

She remembered the sick man's humble and timid looks 
when he saw her, and the strange feeling of compassion 
and awkwardness which came over her at first, followed 
by the pleasant consciousness of her charitable deeds. 
How lovely it all had been ! but it lasted only for a 
brief moment. Now and for several days there had 
been a sudden change. Anna Pavlovna received Kitty 
with pretended friendliness, and did not cease to watch 
her and her husband. 

Could it be that the invalid's pathetic joy at the sight 
of her was the cause of Anna' Pavlovna's coolness ? 

"Yes," she said to herself, "there was something 
unnatural and quite different from her ordinary sweet 
temper when she said to me, day before yesterday, 
sharply, 'There! he will not do anything without you; 
he would not even take his coffee, though he was awfully 
faint.' 

" Yes ! perhaps it was not agreeable to her when I 
gave him his plaid. It was such a simple little thing to 
do ; but he seemed so strange, and thanked me so warmly, 



296 ANNA KARENINA 

that I felt ill at ease. And then that portrait of me 
which he painted so well ; but, above all, his gentle and 
melancholy look. Yes, yes, it must be so," Kitty re- 
peated with horror. " No, it cannot be, it must not be ! 
He is to be pitied so ! " she added, in her secret heart. 
This suspicion poisoned the pleasure of her new life. 



CHAPTER XXXIV 

Just before their season at the Spa was over, Prince 
Shcherbatsky rejoined them. He had been to Carlsbad, 
to Baden, and to Kissingen, with Russian friends, — " to 
get a breath of Russian air/* as he expressed it. 

The prince and princess had conflicting ideas in re- 
gard to living abroad. The princess thought that every- 
thing was lovely ; and, notwithstanding her assured posi- 
tion in Russian society, while she was abroad she put 
on the airs of a European lady which she was not, for 
she was in every way a genuine Russian baruinya. The 
prince, on the other hand, considered everything abroad 
detestable, and the European life unendurable ; and he 
even exaggerated his Russian characteristics, and tried 
to be less of a European than he really was. 

He came back emaciated and with drooping sacks 
under his eyes, but in the happiest spirits ; and his 
happy frame of mind was still further enhanced when 
he found that Kitty was on the road to health. 

The accounts that he heard of Kitty's intimacy with 
Madame Stahl and Varenka, and the princess's de- 
scription of the moral transformation through which his 
daughter was passing, rather vexed the prince, awaking 
in him that feeling of jealousy which he always had in 
regard to everything that might draw Kitty away from 
under his influence. He was afraid that she might 
ascend to regions unattainable to him. But these dis- 
agreeable presentiments were swallowed up in the sea 
of gayety and good humor which he always carried with 
him, and which his sojourn at Carlsbad had increased. 

The day after his arrival, the prince, in his long pale- 



ANNA KARENINA 297 

tot, and with his Russian wrinkles and his puffy cheeks 
standing out above his stiffly starched collar, went in 
the very best of spirits with Kitty to the spring. 

The morning was beautiful. The neat, gay houses, 
with their little gardens, the sight of the German ser- 
vants, with their red faces and red arms, happily work- 
ing, the brilliant sun, — everything filled the heart with 
pleasure. But as they came nearer to the spring they 
met more and more invalids, whose lamentable appear- 
ance contrasted painfully with the trim and beneficent 
German surroundings. 

For Kitty the bright sunlight, the vivid green of the 
trees, the sounds of the music, all formed a natural 
framework for these well-known faces, whose changes 
for better or worse she had been watching. But for 
the prince there was something cruel in the contrast 
between this bright June morning, the orchestra play- 
ing the latest waltz, and especially the sight of these 
healthy-looking servants, and the miserable invalids, 
from all the corners of Europe, dragging themselves 
painfully along. 

In spite of the return of his youth which the prince 
experienced, and the pride that he felt in having his 
favorite daughter on his arm, he confessed to a sense 
of shame and awkwardness in walking along with his 
firm step and his vigorous limbs. 

"Introduce me, introduce me to your new friends," 
said he to his daughter, pressing her arm with his elbow. 
" I am beginning to like your abominable Soden for the 
good which it has done you. Only it is melancholy for 
you. — Who is this ? " 

Kitty told the names of the acquaintances and 
strangers that they met on their way. At the very 
entrance of the garden they met Madame Berthe and 
her companion, and the prince was pleased to see the 
expression of joy on the old Frenchwoman's face at 
the sound of Kitty's voice. With true French exagger- 
ation she immediately overwhelmed the prince with 
compliments, congratulating him on having such a 
charming daughter, whose merits she praised to the 



298 ANNA KARENINA 

skies, declaring to her face that she was a treasure, a 
pearl, a ministering angel. 

"Well! she must be angel number two," said the 
prince, gallantly, "for she calls Mademoiselle Varenka 
angel number one." 

" Oh ! Mademoiselle Varenka is truly an angel. 
Allez" said Madame Berthe, vivaciously. 

They met Varenka herself in the gallery. She 
hastened up to them, carrying an elegant red bag. 

"Here is papa," said Kitty. 

Varenka made the prince a simple and natural saluta- 
tion, almost like a courtesy, and without any false 
modesty immediately entered into conversation with 
him as she conversed with every one, without restraint 
or affectation. 

: "Of course I know you, — know you very well al- 
ready," said the prince, with a pleasant expression that 
made Kitty see that her friend pleased her father. 
" Where were you going so fast ? " 

" Maman is here/' she replied, turning to Kitty. 
"She did not sleep all night, and the doctor advised her 
to take the air. I have brought her work." 

"So that is angel number one?" said the prince, 
when Varenka had gone. 

Kitty saw that he had intended to rally her about her 
friend, but had refrained because her friend had pleased 
him. "Well, let us go and see them all," said he, — 
" all your friends, even Madame Stahl, if she will deign 
to remember me." 

"But did you ever know her, papa?" asked Kitty, 
with fear, as she saw an ironical flash in her father's 
eyes as he mentioned Madame Stahl. 

" I knew her husband, and I knew her a little, before 
she joined the Pietists." 

" What are Pietists, papa ? " asked Kitty, troubled 
because such a nickname was given to what in Madame 
Stahl she valued so highly. 

" I myself do not know much about them. I only 
know this, that she thanks God for everything, even 
for her tribulations, and, above all, she thanks God 



ANNA KARENINA 2 99 

because her husband is dead. Now, that is comical, 
because they did not live happily together. But who is 
that ? What a melancholy face ! " he added, seeing an 
invalid sitting in a shop in cinnamon-colored paletot, 
with white pantaloons making strange folds around his 
emaciated legs. This gentleman had raised his straw 
hat, and bared his sparse curly hair and high sickly 
forehead, on which showed the red line made by the 
brim. 

"That is Petrof, a painter/' replied Kitty, with a 
blush ; " and there is his wife," she added, indicating 
Anna Pavlovna, who, at their approach, had evidently 
made the excuse of running after one of their children 
playing in the street. 

" Poor fellow ! and what a pleasant face he has ! " 
said the prince. "But why did you not go to him? He 
seemed anxious to speak to you." 

"Well, let us go back to him," said Kitty, resolutely 
turning about. " IJow do you feel to-day ? " she asked 
of Petrof. 

Petrof arose, leaning on his cane, and looked timidly 
at the prince. 

"This is my daughter," said the prince; "allow me 
to make your acquaintance." 

The painter bowed and smiled, showing teeth of 
strangely dazzling whiteness. 

"We expected you yesterday, princess," said he to 
Kitty. 

He staggered as he spoke ; and to conceal the fact 
that it was involuntary, he repeated the motion. 

" I expected to come, but Varenka told me that Anna 
Pavlovna sent word that you were not going." 

"That we were n't going?" said Petrof, troubled, and 
beginning to cough. Then, looking toward his wife, he 
called hoarsely, " Annetta ! Annetta ! " while the great 
veins on his thin white neck stood out like cords. 

Anna Pavlovna drew near. 

" How did you send word to the princess that we 
were not going ? " he demanded angrily, in a whisper. > 

"Good-morning, princess," said Anna Pavlovna, with 



3 oo ANNA KARENINA 

a constrained smile, totally different from her former 
effusiveness. "Very glad to make your acquaintance," 
she added, addressing the prince. "You have been 
long expected, prince." 

" How could you have sent word to the princess that 
we were not going ? " again demanded the painter, in his 
hoarse whisper, and still more irritated because he could 
not express himself as he wished. 

" Oh, good heavens ! I thought that we were not 
going," said his wife, testily. 

"How?.... when ?".... 

He coughed, and made a gesture of despair with his 
hand. 

The prince raised his hat, and went away with his 
daughter. 

" Oh ! okh !" he said, with a deep sigh. " Oh, these 
poor creatures ! " 

"Yes, papa," said Kitty; "and you must know that 
they have three children, and no servant, and almost no 
means. He receives a pittance from the Academy," 
she continued eagerly, so as to conceal the emotion 
caused by the strange change in Anna Pavlovna, in 
her behavior to her. "Ah, there is Madame Stahl ! " 
said Kitty, directing his attention to a wheeled-chair, in 
which was lying a human form, wrapped in gray and 
blue, propped up by pillows, and shaded by an umbrella. 
It was Madame Stahl. A solemn and sturdy German 
laborer was pushing her chair. Beside her walked a light- 
complexioned Swedish count, whom Kitty knew by sight. 
Several people had stopped near the wheeled-chair, and 
were gazing at this lady as if she were some curiosity. 

The prince approached her, and Kitty instantly noticed 
in her father's eyes that ironical gleam which had 
troubled her before. He went up to Madame Stahl, 
and addressed her in that excellent French which so 
few Russians nowadays are able to speak, and was ex- 
tremely polite and friendly. 

" I do not know whether you still recollect me, but 
it is my duty to bring myself to your remembrance, in 
order that I may thank you for your kindness to my 



ANNA KARENINA 301 

daughter/' said he, taking off his hat, and holding it 
in his hand. 

" Prince Aleksandr Shcherbatsky ! " said Madame 
Stahl, looking at him with her heavenly eyes, in which 
Kitty detected a shade of dissatisfaction. " I am very 
glad to see you ; I love your daughter so ! " 

" Your health is not always good? " 

" Oh ! I am pretty well used . to it now," replied 
Madame Stahl ; and she presented the prince to the 
Swedish count. 

"You have changed very little,'* said the prince to 
her, "during the ten or twelve years since I had the 
honor of seeing you/' 

" Yes. God gives the cross, and gives also the power 
to carry it. I often ask myself why my life is so pro- 
longed Not like that," she said crossly, to Varenka, 

who had not succeeded in putting her plaid over her 
shoulders to her satisfaction. 

" For doing good, without doubt/' said the prince, 
with laughing eyes. 

"It is not for us to judge," replied Madame Stahl, 
observing the gleam of irony in the prince's face. 

" I pray you send me that book, dear count. I will 
thank you a thousand times," said she, turning to the 
young Swede. 

"Ah! " cried the prince, who had just caught sight 
of the Muscovite colonel standing near ; and, bowing to 
Madame Stahl, he went away with his daughter and the 
Muscovite colonel, who had joined him. 

" This is our aristocracy, prince ! " said the colonel, 
with sarcastic intent, for he also was piqued because 
Madame Stahl refused to be friendly. 

" Always the same," replied the prince. 

" Did you know her before her illness, prince, — that 
is, before she became an invalid ?" 

" Yes ; she became an invalid after I knew her." 

" They say that she has not walked for ten years. " .... 

" She does not walk because one leg is shorter than 
the other. She is very badly put together. " .... 

" Papa, it is .impossible," cried Kitty. 



3°^ 



ANNA KARENINA 



* " Evil tongues say so, my dear ; and your friend 
Varenka ought to see her as she is. Oh, these invalid 
ladies ! " 

"Oh, no, papa! I assure you, Varenka adores her," 
cried Kitty, eagerly; "and besides, she does so much 
good ! Ask any one you please. Every one knows her 
and Aline Stahl." 

" Maybe," replied her father, pressing her arm gently ; 
"but it would be better when people do such things 
that no one should know about it." 

Kitty was silent, not because she had nothing to say, 
but she was unwilling to reveal her inmost thoughts 
even to her father. 

There was one strange thing, however : decided though 
she was not to unbosom herself to her father, not to 
let him penetrate into the sanctuary of her reflections, 
she nevertheless was conscious that her ideal of holiness, 
as seen in Madame Stahl, which she had for a whole 
month carried in her soul, had irrevocably disappeared, 
as a face seen in a garment thrown down by chance 
disappears when one really sees how the garment is 
lying. She retained only the image of a lame woman 
who, because she was deformed, stayed in bed, and who 
tormented the patient Varenka because she did not 
arrange her plaid to suit her. And it became impossi- 
ble for her imagination to bring back to her the remem- 
brance of the former Madame Stahl. 



CHAPTER XXXV 

The prince's gayety and good humor were contagious ; 
his household and acquaintances, and even their Ger- 
man landlord, felt it. 

When he came in with Kitty, from the springs, the 
prince invited the colonel, Marya Yevgenyevna and her 
daughter, and Varenka, to luncheon, and had the table 
and chairs brought out under the chestnut trees in the 
garden, and there the guests were served. The landlord 
and his domestics were filled with zeal under the influ- 



ANNA KARENINA 303 

ence of his good spirits. They knew his generosity ; 
and before half an hour was over a sick Hamburg doc- 
tor, who had rooms on the upper floor, was looking down 
with envy on the happy group of hearty Russians sitting 
under the chestnut trees. 

Under the flickering shade of the sun-flecked leaves sat 
the princess, in a bonnet trimmed with lilac ribbons, pre- 
siding over the table spread with a white cloth, whereon 
were placed the coffee-service, the bread, butter, cheese, 
and cold game; she was distributing cups and tarts. 
At the other end of the table sat the prince, eating 
with good appetite, and talking with great animation. 
He had spread out in front of him his purchases, — 
carved boxes, jackstraws, paper-cutters of all kinds, 
which he had brought back from all the places where 
he had been ; and he was distributing them around to 
all, including Lieschen the maid, and the landlord, with 
whom he joked in his comically bad German, assuring 
him that it was not the waters that had cured Kitty, 
but his excellent cuisine, and particularly his prune soup. 

The princess laughed at her husband for his Russian 
peculiarities ; but never, since she had been at the Spa, 
had she been so gay and lively. The colonel, as always, 
was amused at the prince's jests ; but he agreed with 
the princess on the European question, which he im- 
agined that he understood thoroughly. The good 
Marya Yevgenyevna laughed at every good thing that 
the prince said ; and even Varenka, to Kitty's great 
astonishment, laughed till she was tired, with unde- 
monstrative but infectious hilarity awakened by the 
prince's jests. This was something Kitty had never 
known to happen before. 

All this delighted Kitty, but she could not free her- 
self from mental agitation ; she could not resolve the 
problem which her father had unintentionally given her 
by his jesting, humorous attitude toward her friends 
and the life which offered her so many attractions. 
Moreover, she could not help puzzling herself with the 
reasons for the change in her relations with the Pe- 
trofs, which had struck her that day so plainly and dis- 



304 ANNA KARENINA 

agreeably. All the rest were gay, but Kitty could not 
be gay, and this still more annoyed her. She experi- 
enced a feeling analogous to that which she had known 
in her childhood, when, as a punishment for some offense, 
she was shut up in her room and heard the gay merri- 
ment of her sisters. 

" Now, why did you purchase this heap of things ? " 
asked the princess, smiling and offering her husband a 
cup of coffee. 

"You go out for a walk, well! and you come to a 
shop, and they address you, and say, ' Erlaitcht, Excel- 
lenz, Diirchlancht!' Well, when they say Durchlaucht} 
I cannot resist any longer, and my ten thalers vanish. " 

"it was merely because you were bored," said the 
princess. 

"Certainly I was bored! It was ennui which one 
does not know how to escape from." 

" But how can you be bored ? There are so many 
interesting things to see in Germany now," said Marya 
Yevgenyevna. 

"Yes! I know all which is interesting just at the 
present time : I know soup with prunes, I know pea- 
pudding, I know everything." 

"Just as you please, prince, but their institutions are 
interesting," said the colonel. 

"Yes! but what is there interesting about them? 
They are as contented as copper kopeks. They have 
whipped the world ! Now, why should I find anything 
to content me here ? I never conquered anybody ; but 
I have to take off my boots myself, and, what is worse, 
put them out myself in the corridor. In the morning 
I get up, and have to dress myself, and go down to the 
dining-room and drink execrable tea. 'T is n't like that 
at home. There you can get up when you please ; if 
you are out of sorts, you can grumble ; you have all the 
time you need for remembering things, and you can do 
whatever you please without hurrying." 

"But time is money; you forget that," said the 
colonel. . 

1 Durchlaucht, highness. 



ANNA KARENINA 305 

"That depends. There are whole months which you 
would sell for fifty kopeks, and half-hours which you 
would not take any amount of money for. Isn't that 
so, Katenka ? But why are you so solemn ? " 

"I am not, papa." 

"Where are you going? Stay a little longer," said 
the prince to Varenka. 

"But I must go home/' said Varenka, rising, and 
laughing gayly again. After she had excused herself, 
she took leave of her friends, and went into the house 
to get her hat. 

Kitty followed her. Even Varenka seemed to her 
friend changed. She was not less good, but she was 
different from what she had imagined her to be. 

"Akh! it is a long time since I have laughed so 
much," said Varenka, as she was getting her parasol 
and her satchel. " How charming your papa is ! " 

Kitty did not answer. 

" When shall I see you again ? " asked Varenka. 

"Maman wanted to go to the Petrofs'. Are you 
going to be there ? " asked Kitty, trying to sound 
Varenka. 

" I am going to be there," she replied. " They are 
expecting to leave, and I promised to help them pack." 

"Well, then I will go with you." 

" No ; why should you ? "• 

" Why not ? why not ? why not ? " asked Kitty, open- 
ing her eyes very wide, and holding Varenka by her 
sunshade. "Wait a moment, and tell me why not." 

" * Why not ? ' Because your papa has come, and 
because they are vexed at you." 

" No ; tell me honestly why you don't like to have 
me go to the Petrofs'. You don't like it ; why is 
it?" 

"I did n't say so," replied Varenka, calmly. 

" I beg you to tell me." 

"Must I tell you all?" 

"All, all," replied Kitty. 

" Well ! There is really nothing very serious ; only 
MikhaTl Alekseyevitch — that was Petrofs name — a 
vol. 1. — 20 



3 o6 ANNA KARENINA 

short time ago wanted to leave even before this, and now 
he does not want to go at all," replied Varenka, smiling. 

"Well, well!" cried Kitty, looking at Varenka with 
a gloomy expression. 

" Now for some reason Anna Pavlovna imagines that 
he does not want to go because you are here. Of 
course this was unfortunate; but you have been the 
unwitting cause of a family quarrel, and you know how 
irritable these invalids are." 

Kitty grew still more melancholy, and kept silent ; 
and Varenka went on speaking, trying to smooth it 
over, and put things in a better light, though she fore- 
saw that the result would be either tears or reproaches, 
she knew not which. 

"So it is better for you not to go there ....and you 
will not be angry.... " 

"But it was my fault, it was my fault," said Kitty, 
speaking rapidly, and snatching Varenka' s parasol away 
from her, and not looking at her. 

Varenka was amused at her friend's childish anger ; 
but she was afraid of offending her. 

" How is it your fault ? I don't understand ! " 

"My fault because it was all pretense, it was all 
hypocrisy, and because it did not come from the heart. 
What business had I to meddle in the affairs of a stran- 
ger? And so I have been the cause of a quarrel, and 
I have been doing what no one asked me to do, simply 
because it was all hypocrisy, hypocrisy," said she. 

"But why do you call it hypocrisy?" asked Varenka, 
gently. 

" Akh ! How stupid, how wretched ! It was none of 

my business Hypocrisy ! " mechanically opening and 

shutting the sunshade. 

" But it was your idea ? " 

"So as to seem better to others, to myself, to God, — 
to deceive every one. No, I will not fall so low again. 
I may be wicked, but at least I will not be a liar and 
deceiver! " 

"But who is a liar?" asked Varenka, in a reproachful 
tone. " You speak as if .... " 



ANNA KARENINA 307 

But Kitty was thoroughly angry, and did not let her 
finish. 

" I am not speaking of you, not of you at all. You 
are perfection. Yes, yes ; I know that you are all per- 
fection. How can I help it?.... I am wicked;* this 
would not have occurred, if I had not been wicked. So 
let me be what I am, but I will not be deceitful. What 
have I to do with Anna Pavlovna ? Let them live as 
they want to, and I will do the same. I can't be some- 
body else Besides, everything is different.... " 

" What is ' different ' ? " asked Varenka, in perplexity. 

" Everything ! I can only live by my heart, but you 
live by your principles. I like you all ; but you have 
had in view only to save me, to convert me." 

"You are not fair," said Varenka. 

"I am not speaking for other people. I only speak 
for myself." 

"Kitty!" cried her mother's voice, "come here and 
show papa your corals." 

Kitty, with a haughty face and not making it up with 
her friend, took the box with the corals from the table 
and carried it to her mother. 

"What is the matter? why are you so flushed?" 
asked her father and mother with one voice. 

" Nothing ; I am coming right back ; " and she hur- 
ried back to the house. 

" She is still there," she thought ; " what shall I tell 
her ? Bozhe moi ! what have I done ? what have I said? 
Why did I hurt her feelings ? What have I done ? what 
shall I say to her?" she asked herself, as she hesitated 
at the door. 

Varenka, with her hat on and her parasol in her hand, 
was sitting by the table, examining the spring, which 
Kitty had broken. She raised her head. 

"Varenka, forgive me," whispered Kitty, coming up 
to her. " Forgive me, I don't know what I said. I .... " 

"Truly, I did not mean to cause you pain," said 
Varenka, smiling. 

Peace was made. 

But her father's coming had changed for Kitty the 



3 o8 ANNA KARENINA 

whole world in which she lived. She did not give up 
what she had learned, but she confessed that she had 
been under an illusion by believing that she was what 
she had dreamed of being. She awoke as it were from 
a dream. She felt all the difficulty of staying without 
hypocrisy and boastfulness on the heights to which she 
had tried to raise herself; moreover, she felt still more 
vividly all the weight of that world of misfortunes, of 
illnesses, of those who surrounded her, and she was tor- 
mented by the efforts which she had made to interest 
herself in them ; and she began to long to breathe the 
purer, healthier atmosphere of Russia at Yergushovo, 
where Dolly and the children had gone, as she learned 
from a letter that had just come. 

But her love for Varenka had not diminished. When 
she went away, she begged her to come and visit them 
in Russia. 

" I will come when you are married/' said she. 

U I shall never marry." 
r "'Well, then I shall never come." 

' "Well, in that case, I shall get married only for 
your sake. Don't forget your promise," said Kitty. 

The doctor's prophecies were realized. Kitty came 
home to Russia perfectly well ; possibly she was not 
as gay and careless as before, but her calmness was 
restored. The pains of the past were only a memory. 



END OF VOL. I. 




Levin and Kitty. 

Original Drawing by E. Boyd Smith. 



ANNA KARENINA 

VOL. II 



ANNA KARENINA 



PART THIRD 



CHAPTER I 

SERGYEUVANOVITCH KOZNUISHEF wanted 
a rest after his intellectual labors ; and, instead of 
going abroad as usual, he came, toward the end of May, 
to visit his brother in the country. In his opinion, coun- 
try life was best of all, and he came now to his brother's 
to enjoy it. Konstantin Levin was very glad to welcome 
him, the more because this sumrper he did not expect 
his brother NikolaL But in spite of his love and respect 
for SergyeY Iyanovitch, Konstantin was not at his ease 
with him in the country. He was not at his ease, he 
was even annoyed to see how his brother regarded the 
country. For Konstantin Levin the country was the 
place for life, — for pleasures, sorrows, labor. For Ser- 
gyei' Ivanovitch the country, on the one side, offered 
rest from labor, on the other, a profitable antidote against 
corruption, and he took it gladly, convinced of its utility. 
For Konstantin Levin the country was beautiful because 
it offered field for works of incontestable utility. For 
Sergye'f Ivanovitch the country was especially delightful 
because there was nothing he could do, or needed to do 
there, at all. 

Moreover, Sergye'f Ivanovitch's behavior toward the 
people somewhat piqued Konstantin. Sergyef Ivano- 
vitch said that he loved and knew the people ; and he 
often chatted with the muzhiks as he was fully able to 
do, without pretense and without affectation, and dis- 
covered, in his interviews with them, traits of character 
honorable to the people, so that he felt convinced that 
vol, n. — i i 



2 ANNA KARENINA 

he knew them thoroughly. Such relations with the 
people displeased Konstantin Levin. For him the peas- 
antry was only the chief factor in associated labor ; and 
though he respected the muzhik, and, as he himself said, 
drew in with the milk of the woman who nursed him a 
genuine love for them, stiil he, as a factor associated 
with them in the general labors, while sometimes ad- 
miring their strength, their good nature, their sense of 
justice, very often when in the general work of the 
estate other qualities were needed, flew into a passion 
with the peasantry for their carelessness, slovenliness, 
drunkenness, untruthfulness. If he had been asked 
whether he liked the people, he would really have not 
known what reply to make. He liked and he did not 
like the people as the majority of men did. Of course 
as a good man he liked men more than he disliked 
them ; and so it was with the peasantry. But to like or 
not to like the peasantry, as something out of the com- 
mon, was an impossibility to him, because he not only 
lived with the peasantry, because not only were his in- 
terests bound up with those of the peasantry, but also 
he looked on himself as a part of the people, saw no 
qualities or faults in the people that he did not himself 
possess, and could not take his stand contrary to the 
people. Moreover, although he had long lived in the 
closest relationship with his muzhiks as their landlord, 
their mediator, and, what was more, their adviser, — for 
the muzhiks had faith in him, and came to him from 
forty versts around to ask his advice, — he passed no 
definite judgment on them ; and to the question, did 
he know the people, he would have found it as hard 
to find an answer as to the question, did he* like the 
people. 

But to say that he knew the peasantry would have 
meant in his opinion the same as to say that he knew 
men. He was constantly admiring and studying all 
kinds of men, and among them, men from among the 
peasantry whom he considered to be fine and interest- 
ing specimens of humanity, and he was all the time 
discovering in them new characteristics, and chang- 



ANNA KARENINA 3 

ing and revising his preconceived theories regarding 
them. 

SergyeT Ivanovitch was the opposite. Just exactly as 
he liked and enjoyed the country life for its contrariety 
to that which he did not like, so he liked the peasantry 
for their contrariety to that class of men which he did 
not like, and in exactly the same way he knew the 
people as beings opposed to men in general. His 
methodical mind clearly differentiated the definite forms 
of life among the peasantry, deducing it partly from 
the life of the peasantry itself, but principally from 
its contrarieties. He never changed his opinions in 
regard to the people and his sympathetic relationship 
to them. 

In the discussions which arose between the brothers 
in consequence of their divergence of views, SergyeY 
Ivanovitch always won the victory because he had defi- 
nite opinions concerning the people, their character, 
peculiarities, and tastes ; while Konstantin Levin, cease- 
lessly modifying his, was easily convicted of contradict- 
ing himself. 

SergyeY Ivanovitch looked on his brother as a splen- 
did fellow, whose heart was bien placi, as he expressed 
it in French, but whose mind, though quick and active, 
was open to the impressions of the moment, and, there- 
fore, full of contradictions. With the condescension of 
an elder brother, he sometimes explained to him the real 
meaning of things ; but he could not take genuine pleas- 
ure in discussing with him, because his opponent was so 
easy to vanquish. 

Konstantin Levin looked on his brother as a man of 
vast intelligence and learning, endowed with extraordi- 
nary faculties, most advantageous to the community at 
large ; but as he advanced in life, and learned to know 
him better, he sometimes asked himself, in the secret 
chambers of his heart, if this devotion to the general 
interests, which he felt that he himself entirely lacked, 
was really a good quality, or rather a lack of something 
— not a lack of good-natured, upright, benevolent wishes 
and tastes, but the lack of the motive power of life, 



4 ANNA KARENINA 

which is called "heart," of that impulse which con- 
strains a man to choose one out of all multitudes of 
paths which life offers to men, and to desire this alone. 
The better he knew his brother, the more he remarked 
that SergyeY Ivanovitch and many other workers for the 
common good were not drawn by their affections to this 
work, but that they used their reason to justify them- 
selves in the interest they took in it. 

Levin was still further confirmed in this hypothesis 
by the observation that his brother did not really take 
much more to heart the questions concerning the com- 
mon good and the immortality of the soul than those 
connected with a game of chess or the ingenious con- 
struction of a new machine. • 

Again Levin felt, also, constraint with his brother 
from the fact that while he was in the country, and es- 
pecially in the summer-time, he was all the time busy 
with his work on the estate. The days seemed to him 
too short for him to accomplish all that he wanted to 
do, while his brother was taking his ease. But, though 
Sergyef Ivanovitch was enjoying his vacation, in other 
words, was riot working at his writing, he was so used to 
intellectual activity, that he enjoyed expressing in beau- 
tiful, concise form the thoughts that occurred to him, 
and he liked to have some one listen to him. His most 
habitual and most natural auditor was his brother, and 
therefore, notwithstanding the friendly simplicity of 
their relations, Konstantin felt awkward to be alone with 
him. SergyeY Ivanovitch liked to lie on the grass, in the 
sun, stretched out at full length, and to talk lazily. 

" You would n't believe/' he would say to his brother, 
"how I enjoy this tufted idleness. I have not an idea 
in my head ; it is empty as a shell." 

But Konstantin Levin quickly wearied of sitting down 
and hearing him talk — especially because he knew that 
in his absence they were spreading the manure on the 
unplowed field, and would be up to God knows what 
mischief, unless he should be on hand to superintend this 
work ; he knew that they would not screw up the cutters 
in his plows, but would be taking them off and then 



ANNA KARENINA 4 

say that plows were foolish devices, and that Andreyefs 
sokha 1 did the work, and the like. 

" Don't you ever get weary going about so in this 
heat?" asked Sergyei' Ivanovitch. 

" No. Only I must run over to the office for a min- 
ute," said Levin; and he hurried across the field. 



CHAPTER II 

Early in June, Agafya Mikhaflovna, the old nurse 
and ekononika y or housekeeper, in going down cellar with 
a pot of salted mushrooms, slipped and fell, and dislo- 
cated her wrist. 

The district doctor, a loquacious young medical stu- 
dent who had just taken his degree, came, and, after 
examining the arm, declared that it was not out of joint. 
During dinner, proud of finding himself in the society 
of the distinguished SergyeY Ivanovitch Koznuishef, he 
began to relate all the petty gossip of the district in 
order to display his enlightened views of things ; and he 
expressed his regrets at the bad condition of provincial 
affairs. 

Sergyer Ivanovitch listened attentively, asking various 
questions ; and animated by the presence of a new hearer, 
he made keen and shrewd observations, which were re- 
ceived by the young doctor with respectful appreciation, 
and his spirits rose high, which, as his brother knew, 
was liable to be the case with him after a lively and brill- 
iant conversation. 

After the doctor's departure he expressed his desire 
to go to the river and fish. He was fond of fishing, 
and seemed to take pride in showing that he could 
amuse himself with such a stupid occupation. Kon- 
stantin had to go to certain fields and meadows, and 
offered to take his brother in his cabriolet as far as the 
river. 

1 The picture by Repin represents Count Tolstoi plowing with the primi- 
tive sokha. Levin's peasantry call the plow {plug) vuidumka pustaya^ 
" empty invention." 



6 ANNA KARENINA 

It was the time of the year, the very top of the sum. 
mer, when the prospects of harvest may be estimated, 
when the labors of the next year's planting begin to be 
thought of, and the mowing-time has come ; when the rye 
is already eared and sea-green in color, but still not fully 
formed ; when the ears of corn swing lightly in the breeze ; 
when the green oats, with scattered clumps of yellow 
grass, peep irregularly from the late-sown fields; when 
the early buckwheat already is up and hides the soil ; 
when the fallow fields, beaten as hard as stone by the 
cattle and with paths deserted, on which the sokha, or 
primitive plow, has no effect, are half broken up ; when 
the odor of the dry manure, neaped in little hillocks over 
the fields, mingles at twilight with the perfume of the 
"honey-grass," 1 and on the bottom lands, waiting for 
the scythe, stand the protected meadows like a bound- 
less sea with the darkening clumps of sorrel that has 
done blooming. 

It was the time when there is a brief breathing-spell 
before the harvest, that great event which the muzhik 
with eagerness expects each year. The crops promised 
to be superb ; and there was a succession of bright, clear 
summer days, followed by short, dewy nights. 

The two brothers had to go through the woodland to 
reach the fields. SergyeY Ivanovitch was all the time 
admiring the beauty of the forest with its dense canopy 
of leaves, and he pointed out to his brother, as they rode 
along, now an old linden almost in flower, dark on its 
shady side and variegated with yellow stipules ; now at 
the emerald-shining young shoots of that same year; 
but Konstantin did not himself like to speak or to hear 
about the beauties of nature, Words, he thought, spoiled 
the beauty of the thing that £e saw. He assented to 
what his brother said, but allowed his mind to concern 
itself with other things. After they left the wood, his 
whole attention was absorbed by a fallow field on a 
hillock, where in some places the grass was growing 
yellow, where in others whole squares of it had been 
cut, and in others raked up into haycocks, and where in 

1 Uoleus mollis^ soft-grass. 



ANNA KARENINA 7 

still other places the men were plowing. The carts 
were thronging up toward the field. Levin counted 
them, and was satisfied "with the work which was going 
on. 

His thoughts were diverted, by the sight of. the 
meadows, to the question of haymaking. He always 
experienced something which went to his very heart at 
the hay-harvesting. When they reached the meadow 
Levin stopped his horse. The morning dew was still 
damp on the thick grass, and Sergyei' Ivanovitch begged 
his brother, in order that he might not wet his feet, to 
drive him in his cabriolet as far as a "clump of laburnums 
near which perch were to be caught. Though Levin 
disliked to trample down his grass, he drove over through 
the field. The tall grass clung round the wheels and 
the horse's legs, and scattered its seed on the damp 
spokes and naves. 

Sergyet sat down under the laburnums, and cast his 
line, but Levin drove the horse aside, fastened him, and 
then went off through the vast green sea of the meadow 
unstirred by a breath of wind. The silky grass with 
its ripe seeds was almost waist-high in the places that 
had been overflowed. 

As Konstantin Levin crossed the meadow diagonally, 
he met on the road an old man with one of his eyes 
swollen, and carrying a swarm in g-basket full of bees. 

" Well ? Have you caught them, Fomitch ? " he asked. 

" Caught them indeed, Konstantin Mitritch ! If only 
I could keep my own ! This is the second time this 
swarm has gone off, .... but, thanks to the boys ! they 
galloped after 'em ! .... They 're plowing your fields. 
They unhitched the horse and dashed off after 'em!" .... 

" Well, what do you say, Fomitch, should we begin 
mowing or wait ? " 

" Just as you say ! According to our notions we should 
wait till St. Peter's Day. 1 But you always mow earlier., 
Well, just as God will have it — the grass is in fine con- 
dition. There '11 be plenty of room for the cattle." 

"And what do you think of the weather?" 

1 The feast of St. Peter and St. Paul is June 29 (O.S.), or July 11. 



8 ANNA KARENINA 

" Well, all is in- the hand of God. Maybe the weathei 
will hold." 

Levin returned to his brother. 

Though he had caught nothing, SergyeY Ivanovitch 
was .undisturbed, and seemed in the best of spirits. 
Levin saw that he was stimulated by his talk with the 
doctor, and that he was eager to go on talking. Levin, 
on the contrary, was anxious to get back to the house 
as soon as possible to give some orders about hiring 
mowers for the next day, and to decide the question 
about the haymaking which occupied all his thoughts. 
"Well," said he, "shall we go?" 

" What is your hurry ? Do let us sit down. But how 
drenched you are ! .... No, I have had no luck, but I have 
enjoyed it all the same. All outdoor sports are beautiful 
because you have to do with nature. Now just notice 
how charming that steely water is ! " he exclaimed. 

"These meadow banks," he went on to say, "always 
remind me of an enigma, do you know? — 'The grass 
says to the river, " We have strayed far enough, we have 
strayed far enough." ' " 

"I don't know. that riddle," interrupted Konstantin, 
in a melancholy tone. 



CHAPTER III 

"Do you know, I was thinking about you," said 
Sergyet Ivanovitch. "It is not well at all, what is 
going on in your district, if that doctor tells the truth ; 
he is not a stupid fellow. And I have told you all 
along, and I say to-day, you are wrong in not going to 
the assembly-meetings and in generally holding aloof 
from the affairs of the commune. If men of standing 
don't take an interest in affairs, God knows how things 
will turn out. The taxes we pay will be spent in salaries, 
and not for schools, or hospitals, or midwives, or pharma- 
cies, or anything." 

"But I have tried it," replied Levin, faintly and 



ANNA KARENINA 9 

unwillingly. " I can't do anything. What is to be 
done about it ? " 

" Now, why can't you do anything ? I confess I don't 
understand it. I cannot admit that it is indifference or 
lack of intelligence ; is n't it simply laziness ? " 

" It is not that, or the first or the second. I have 
tried it, and I see that I cannot do anything," said 
Levin. 

-He was not paying great heed to what his brother 
said, but was looking intently across the fields on the 
other side of the river. He saw something black, but 
he could not make out whether it was only a horse, or 
his overseer on horseback. 

" Why can't you do anything ? You have made an 
experiment, and it does not turn out to your satisfaction, 
arid you give up. Why not have a little pride about 
you?" 

" Pride ? " said Levin, touched to the quick by his 
brother's reproach. " I don't see what that has to do 
with it. If at the university they had told me that 
others understood the integral calculus, but I did not, 
that would have touched my pride ; but here one must 
be convinced in advance that one needs special apti- 
tude for these things, and first of all that these things 
are very important." 

" What ! do you mean to say that they are not impor- 
tant ? " asked Sergye'f Ivanovitch, in his turn touched to 
the quick because his brother seemed to attach so little 
importance to what so deeply interested him, and more 
than all because he apparently gave him such poor 
attention. 

" What you wish does not seem to me important, and 
I cannot feel interested in it," replied Levin, who now 
saw that the black speck was the overseer, and that the 
overseer was probably taking some muzhiks from their 
work. They had canted over their plows. " Can they 
have finished plowing?" he asked himself. 

" Now, listen ! nevertheless," said his brother, his 
handsome intellectual face growing a shade darker. 
" There are limits to everything. It is very fine to be an 



io ANNA KARENINA 

original and outspoken man, and to hate falsehood,— 
all that I know; but the fact is, what you say has no 
sense at all, or has a very bad sense. How can you 
think it unimportant that this people, which you love, 
as you assert.... " 

. " I never asserted any such thing," said Konstantin 
Levin to himself. 

" That this people should perish without aid ? Coarse 
peasant women act as midwives, and the people remain 
in ignorance, and are at the mercy of every letter-writer. 
But the means is given into your hands to remedy all 
this ; and you don't assist them, because, in your eyes, 
it is not important." 

And Sergye'f Ivanovitch offered him the following di- 
lemma : — 

" Either you are not developed sufficiently to see all 
that you might do, or you do not care to give up your 
own. comfort, or your vanity, I don't know which, in 
order to do this." 

Konstantin Levin felt that he must make a defense, 
or be convicted of indifference for the public weal, and 
this was vexatious and offensive to him. 

" Ah ! but there is still another thing/' he said reso- 
lutely. " I do not see how it is possible .... " 

" What ! impossible to give medical aid if the funds 
were watched more closely ? " 

" Impossible it seems to me In the four thousand 

square versts of our district, with our floods, snow-storms, 
and busy seasons, I don't see the possibility of giving pub- 
lic medical aid. Besides, I don't much believe in medi- 
cine, anyway." .... 

" Well now, what nonsense ! you are unjust I could 

name you a thousand cases .... well, but how about 
schools?" 

"Why schools?" 

"What do you say? Can you doubt the advantages 
of education ? If it is good for you, then it is good for 
every one!" 

Konstantin Levin felt that he was morally pushed to 
the wall ; and so he grew irritated, and involuntarily 



ANNA KARENINA n 

revealed the chief reason for his indifference to the 
communal affairs. 

" Maybe all this is a good thing," said he ; "but why 
should I put myself out to have medical dispensaries 
located which I shall never make use of, or schools 
where I shall never send my children, and where the 
peasants won't want to send their children, and where I 
am not sure that it is wise to send them, anyway ? " 

Sergyef Ivanovitch for a moment was disconcerted by 
this unexpected way of looking at the matter ; but he 
immediately developed a new plan of attack. He was 
silent, pulled in one of his lines and wound it up ; then 
with a smile he turned to his brother : — 

"Now, excuse me In the first place, the dispensary 

has proved necessary. Here, we ourselves have just 
sent for the communal doctor for Agafya Mikhailovna/' 

"Well, I still think her wrist was out of joint/' 

"That remains to be proved In the next place, the 

muzhik who can read is a better workman, and more 
useful to you." 

" Oh, no ! " replied Konstantin Levin, resolutely. 
" Ask any one you please, they will tell you that the 
educated muzhik is far worse as a laborer. He will not 
repair the roads ; and, when they build bridges, he will 
only steal the planks." 

" Now, that is not the point," said SergyeT, frowning 
because he did not like contradictions, and especially 
those that leaped from one subject to another, and kept 
bringing up new arguments without any apparent con- 
nection, so that it was impossible to know what to say 
in reply. " That is not the point. Excuse me. Do 
you admit that education is a benefit to the peasantry?" 

" I do," said Levin, at haphazard, and instantly he 
saw that he had not said what he thought. He realized 
that, by making this admission, it would be easy to 
convict him of speaking nonsense. How it would be 
brought up against him he did not know ; but he knew 
that he would surely be shown his logical inconsequence, 
and he awaited the demonstration. ' It came much sooner 
than he expected. 



12 ANNA KARENINA 

"If you admit its value," said Sergyef Ivanovitch, 
" then, as an honest man, you cannot refuse to delight 
in this work and sympathize with it, and give it your 
cooperation." 

" But I still do not admit that this activity is good," 
said Konstantin Levin, his face flushing. 

" What ? But you just said ...." 

" That is, I don't say that it is bad, but that it is not 
possible." 

11 But you can't know this, since you have not made 
any effort to try it." 

"Well, let us admit that the education of the people 
is advantageous," said Levin, although he did not in 
the least admit it. " Let us admit that it is so ; still I 
don't see why I should bother myself with it." 

" Why not ? " 

" Well, if we are going to discuss the question, then 
explain it to me from your philosophical point of view." 

" I don't see what philosophy has to do here," retorted 
Sergyef Ivanovitch, in a tone which seemed to cast some 
doubt on his brother's right to discuss philosophy; and 
this nettled Levin. 

" This is why," said he, warmly. " I think that the 
motive power in all our actions is forever personal hap- 
piness. Now, I see nothing in our provincial institu- 
tions that contributes to my well-being as a nobleman. 
The roads are not better, and cannot be made so. My 
horses carry me, even on bad roads. The doctor and 
the dispensary are no use to me. The justice of the 
peace does me no good ; I never went to him, and never 
shall go to him. The schools seem to me not only use- 
less, but, as I have said, are even harmful ; and these 
communal institutions oblige me to pay eighteen kopeks 
a desyatin, to go to town, to sleep with bugs, and to 
hear all sorts of vulgar and obscene talk, but my 
personal interests are not helped." 

"Excuse me," said Sergyef Ivanovitch, with a smile. 
" Our personal interests did not compel us to work for 
the emancipation of the serfs, and yet we worked for it." 

" No," replied Konstantin, with still more animation ; 



ANNA KARENINA 13 

"the emancipation of the serfs was quite another affair. 
It was for personal interest. We wanted to shake off 
this yoke that hung on the necks of all of us decent 
people. But to be a member of the council ; to discuss 
how much the night workman should be paid, and how 
to lay sewer-pipes in. streets where one does not live ; to 
be a juryman, and sit in judgment on a muzhik who has 
stolen a ham ; to listen for six hours to all sorts of rub- 
bish which the defendant and the prosecutor may utter, 
and, as presiding officer, to ask my old friend, the half- 
idiotic Aloshka, ' Do you plead guilty, Mr. Accused, of 
having stolen this ham V " .... 

And Konstantin, carried away by his subject, enacted 
the scene between the president' and the half-idiotic Al- 
oshka. It seemed to him that this was in the line of 
the argument. 

But Sergyei Ivanovitch shrugged his shoulders. 

" Nu ! what do you mean by this ? V 

11 1 only mean that I will always defend with all my 
powers those rights which touch me, — my interests ; 
that when the policemen came to search us students, and 
read our letters, I was ready to defend these rights with 
all my might, to defend my rights to instruction, to lib- 
erty. I am interested in the military obligation which 
concerns the fate of my children, of my brothers, and of 
myself. I am willing to discuss this because it touches 
me ; but to deliberate on the employment of forty thou- 
sand rubles of communal money, or to judge the crack- 
brained Aloshka, I won't do it, and I can't." 

Konstantin Levin discoursed as if the fountains of his 
speech were unloosed. SergyeY Ivanovitch smiled. 

" Supposing to-morrow you. were arrested ; would you 
prefer to be tried by the old * criminal court ' ? " x 

" But I am not going to be arrested. I am not going 
to cut any one's throat, and this is no use to me. Now, 
see here ! " he continued, again jumping to a matter en- 
tirely foreign to their subject, " our provincial institu- 
tions, 'and all that, remind me of the little twigs which 
on Trinity day we stick into the ground, to imitate a 

1 Ugolovnaya Palaia. 



i 4 ANNA KARENINA 

forest. The forest has grown of itself in Europe ; but 
I cannot on my soul have any faith in our birch sprouts, 
or water them." 

SergyeT Ivanovitch only shrugged his shoulders again, 
as a sign of astonishment that birch twigs should be 
mingled in their discussion, although he understood per- 
fectly what his brother meant. 

" Excuse me," said he. " That is no way to reason." 

But Konstantin Levin was eager to explain his self- 
confessed lack of interest in matters of public concern, 
and he went on to say : — 

" I think that there can be no durable activity if it is 
not founded in individual interest : this is a general, a 
philosophical truth," said he, laying special emphasis on 
the word " philosophical," as if he wished to show that he 
also had the right, as well as any one else, to speak of 
philosophy. 

Again SergyeT Ivanovitch smiled. " He also," thought 
he, "has his own special philosophy for the benefit of 
his inclinations." 

"Well, have done with philosophy," he said. "Its 
chief problem has been in all times to grasp the indis- 
pensable bond which exists between the individual inter- 
est and the public interest. This is not to the point, 
however. But I can make your comparison fit the case. 
The little birch twigs have not been merely stuck in, 
but have been sowed, planted, and it is necessary to 
watch them carefully. The only nations which can 
have a future, the only nations which deserve the name 
of f historic, are those which feel the importance and 
the v&lue of their institutions, and prize them." 

And SergyeT Ivanovitch transferred the question over 
into the domain of the historico-philosophical, which 
Konstantin was by no means able to appreciate, and 
showed him all the erroneousness of his views. 

" As to your distaste for affairs, excuse me if I refer 
it to our Russian indolence and gentility ; 1 and I trust 
that this temporary error of yours will pass away." 

Konstantin; was silent. He felt himself routed on 

1 Barstvo, Russian rank. . The stem appears in the word barin, master. 



ANNA KARENINA 15 

every side, but he felt also that his brother had not 
understood what he wished to say. He did not know 
exactly whether it was because he did not know how to 
express himself clearly, or because his brother did not wish 
to understand him, or whether he could not understand 
him. He did not try to fathom this question ; but, with- 
out replying to his brother, he became absorbed in en- 
tirely different thoughts, connected with his own work. 
Sergyei Ivanovitch reeled in his last line, he unhitched 
the horse, and they drove away. 



CHAPTER IV 

The thought that was absorbing Levin at the time of 
his discussion with his brother was this : the year be- 
fore, having come one day to the hay-field, Levin had 
fallen into a passion with his overseer. He had em- 
ployed his favorite means of calming himself — had 
taken the scythe from a muzhik and begun to mow. 

He enjoyed the work so much that he had tried it 
again and again. He had mowed the whole of the 
lawn in front of his house, and this year early in the 
spring he had formulated a plan of spending whole 
days mowing with the muzhiks. 

Since his brother's arrival he had been in doubt: 
Should he mow or not? He had scruples about leaving 
his brother alone for whole days at a time, and he was 
afraid that his brother would make sport of him on ac : 
count of this. But as they crossed the meadow, and he 
recalled the impression that the mowing had made on 
him, he had almost made up his mind that he would 
mow. Now after his vexatious discussion with his 
brother, he again remembered his project. 

'•' I must have some physical exercise, or my charac- 
ter will absolutely spoil," he thought, and made up his 
mind to mow, no matter what his brother or his servants 
should say. 

That very evening Konstantin Levin went to the office, 
gave some directions about the work to be done, and 



16 ANNA KARENINA 

sent to the village to hire some mowers for the morrow, 
so as to attack his field at Kalinovo, which was the 
largest and best. 

" And here, please send my scythe over to Sef , and 
have him put it in order and bring it back to-morrow ; 
perhaps I will come and mow too," said he, trying to 
hide his confusion. 

The overseer smiled, and said : — 

" I will obey you — slushayu-s" 

Later, at the tea-table, Levin said to his brother : — 

"It seems like settled weather. To-morrow I am 
going to begin mowing.' ' 

" I like this work very much," said Sergye'f Ivanovitch. 

" I like it extremely/* said Levin. " Last year I 
myself mowed with the muzhiks, and to-morrow I am 
going to spend all day at it." 

Sergyei' Ivanovitch raised his head, and gazed with 
astonishment at his brother. 

"What did you say? Like the muzhiks, all day 
long ? " 

" Certainly ; it is very enjoyable," said Levin. 

" It is excellent as physical exercise, but can you stand 
such work ? " asked Sergye'f Ivanovitch, without mean- 
ing to say anything ironical. 

" I have tried it. At first it is hard work, but after- 
wards you get used to it. I think I shall not leave 
off." .... 

" Really ! but tell me, how do the muzhiks look at it? 
Naturally they make sport because the barin is queer, 
'don't they ? " 

" No, I don't think so ; but this is such pleasant and 
at the same' time hard work, that they don't think about 
it." / 

" But how do you and they do about dinner ? You 
could hardly have a bottle of Lafitte and a roast turkey 
sent you out there." 

" No ; I come home while the workmen have their 
nooning." 

The next morning Konstantin Levin got up earlier 
than usual ; but his duties about the house detained 



ANNA KARENINA 17 

him, and when he came to the mowing-field he found 
the men had already mowed the first time across. 

From the top of the slope the part of the meadow 
still in the shade, and already mowed, spread out before 
him, with its long windrows and the little black heaps 
of kaftans thrown down by the men when they went by 
the first time. 

As he drew nearer he saw also the band of muzhiks, 
some in their kaftans, some in their shirt-sleeves, mov- 
ing in a long line, and swinging their scythes in unison. 
He counted forty-two men of them. They were advanc- 
ing slowly over the uneven bottom-land of the meadow, 
where there was an old dike. Many of them Levin 
knew. There was the old round-shouldered Yermil, in 
a very clean white shirt, wielding the scythe ; there was 
the young small Vaska, who used to be Levin's coach- 
man ; there was Sef , also, a little, thin old peasant, 1 who 
had taught him how to mow. He was cutting a wide 
swath without stooping, and handling his scythe as if 
he were playing with it. 

Levin dismounted from his horse, tied her near the 
road, and went across to Sef, who immediately got a 
second scythe from a clump of bushes and handed it to 
him. 

" All ready, barin ; 'tis like a razor, —cuts of itself," 
said Sef, with a smile, taking off his cap and handing 
him the scythe. 

Levin took it and began to try it. The mowers, hav- 
ing finished their line, were returning one after the other 
on their track, covered with sweat, but gay and lively. 
They laughed timidly, and saluted the barin. All of 
them looked at him, but no one ventured to speak until 
at last a tall old man, with a wrinkled, beardless face, 
and dressed in a sheepskin jacket, thus addressed 
him : — 

" Look here, barin, if you put your hand to the rope, 
you must not let go," said he ; and Levin heard the 
sound of stifled laughter among the mowers. 

1 Muzliichok, diminutive of muzhik, as muzhik is diminutive of muzk y a 
man. 

VOL. II. — 2 



1 8 ANNA KARENINA 

" I will try not to be left behind," he said, as he took 
his place behind Sef, and waited for the signal to 
begin. 

" 'Tention ! " cried the old man. 

Sef opened the way, and Levin followed in his track. 
The grass was short and tough ; and Levin, who had 
not mowed in a long time, and was confused by the 
watchful eyes of the men, at first made very bad work 
of it, though he swung the scythe energetically. Voices 
were heard behind him : — 

" He does not hold his scythe right : the sned is too 
high. See how he stoops like," said one. 

" Bears his hand on too much," said another. 

"No matter, it goes pretty well," said the head 
man. 

" Look, he goes at a great rate ! Cuts a wide swath ! 
.... He '11 get played out. The master is trying it for 
himself as hard as he can, but look at his row ! For 
such work my brother was beaten once." 

The grass became less tough; and Levin, listening 
and making no reply, trying to mow as well as he could, 
followed Sef. Thus they went a hundred steps. Sef 
kept on without any intermission, and without showing 
the least fatigue ; but Levin began by this time to feel 
terribly and feared that he could not keep it up, he was 
so tired. 

He was just thinking that he was using his last 
strength and had determined to ask Sef to rest; but 
at this time the muzhik of his own " accord halted, 
bent over, and, taking a handful of grass, began to 
wipe his scythe, and to whet it. Levin straightened 
himself up, and with a sigh of relief looked about him. 
Just behind was a peasant, and he also was evidently 
tired, because instantly without catching up to Levin he 
also stopped and began to whet his scythe. Sef whetted 
his own scythe and Levin's, and they started again. 

At the second attempt it was just the same. Sef ad- 
vanced a step at every swing of the scythe, without 
stopping and without sign of weariness. Levin followed 
him, striving not to fall behind; but each moment it 



ANNA KARENINA 19 

came harder and harder. But, as before, just as he 
believed himself at the end of his forces, Sef stopped 
and whetted his scythe. 

Thus they went over the first swath. And this long 
stretch seemed especially hard for Levin, When the 
swath was finished and Sef, throwing the scythe over 
his shoulder, slowly walked back in the tracks made by 
his heels as he had mowed, and Levin also retraced his 
steps in the same way, although the sweat stood on his 
face and dropped from his nose, and all his back was as 
wet as if he had been plunged in water ; still he felt 
very comfortable. He was especially glad that he knew 
now that he could keep up with the rest. 

His pleasure was marred only by the fact that his 
swath was not good. 

" I will work less with my arms and more with my 
whole body," he said to himself, carefully comparing 
Sef s smooth straight swath, with his own rough and 
irregular line. 

The first time, as Levin observed, Sef went very 
rapidly, apparently wishing to test his barin's endur- 
ance, and the swath seemed endless. But the succeed- 
ing swaths grew easier and easier. Still Levin had to 
exert all his energies >not to fall behind the muzhiks. 
He had no other thought, no other desire, than to reach 
the other end of the meadow as soon as the others did, 
and to do his work as perfectly as possible. He heard 
nothing but the swish of the scythes, saw nothing but 
Sef's straight back, plodding on in front of him, and the 
semicircle described in the grass which fell over, slowly 
carrying with it the delicate heads of flowers, and then 
far in front of him the end of the row, where he would 
be able to get breath. 

Not at first realizing what, it was or whence it came, 
suddenly in the midst of his labors he felt a pleasant 
sensation of coolness on his shoulders. He looked up 
at the sky while Sef was plying the whetstone, and he 
saw an inky black cloud. A heavy shower had come 
up and the raindrops were falling fast. Some of the 
muzhiks were putting on their kaftans; others, like 



ao ANNA KARENINA 

Levin himself, were glad to feel the rain on their hot, 
sweaty shoulders. 

The work went on and on. Some of the swaths were 
long, others were shorter ; here the grass was good, 
there it was poor. Levin absolutely lost all idea of time 
and knew not whether it was early or late. In his work 
a change now began to be visible, and this afforded him 
vast satisfaction. ' While he was engaged in this labor 
there were moments during which he forgot what he 
was doing and it seemed easy to him, and during these 
moments his swath came out almost as even and per- 
fect as that done by Sef. But as soon as he became 
conscious of what he was doing and strove to do better, 
he immediately began to feel all the difficulty of the 
work and his swath became poor. 

After they had gone over the field one more time, he 
started to turn back again ; but Sef halted, and, going 
to the old man, whispered something to him. Then the 
two studied the sun. 

" What are they talking about ? and why don't they 
keep on?" thought Levin, without considering that the 
muzhiks had been mowing for more than four hours, and 
it was time for them to have their morning meal. 

" Breakfast, barin," said the old man. 

"Time, is it? Well, breakfast, then." 

Levin gave his scythe to Sef, and together with the 
muzhiks, who were going to their kaftans for their bread, 
he crossed the wide stretch of field, where the mown 
grass lay lightly moistened by the shower, and went to 
his horse.- Then only he perceived that he had made a 
false prediction about the weather, and that the rain had 
wet his hay. 

"The hay will be spoiled," he said. 

" No harm done, barin ; mow in the rain, rake in the 
sun," said the old man. 

Levin unhitched his horse and went home to take 
coffee. 

SergyeY Ivanovitch had just got up; before he was 
dressed and down in the dining-room, Konstantin was 
back to the field again. 



ANNA KARENINA 21 



CHAPTER V 

After breakfast, Levin took his place in the line not 
where he had been before, but between the quizzical old 
man, who asked him to be his neighbor, and a young 
muzhik who had been married only since autumn and 
was now mowing for the first time. 

The old man, standing very erect, mowed straight 
on, with long, regular strides; and the swinging of the 
scythe seemed no more like labor than the swinging 
of his arms when walking. His well-whetted scythe 
cut, as it were, of its own energy through the succulent 
grass. 

Behind Levin came the young Mishka, His pleasant, 
youthful face, under a wreath of green grass which bound 
his hair, worked with the energy that employed the rest 
of his body. But when any one looked at him, he would 
smile. He would rather die than confess that he found 
the labor hard. 

Levin went between the two. 

The labor seemed lighter to him during the heat of 
the day. The sweat in which he was bathed refreshed 
him ; and the sun, burning his back, his head, and his 
arms bared to the elbow, gave him force and tenacity 
for his work. More and more frequently the moments 
of oblivion, of unconsciousness of what he was doing, 
came back to him ; the scythe went of itself. Those 
were happy moments. Then, still more gladsome were 
the moments when, coming to the river where the wind- 
rows ended, the old man, wiping his scythe with the 
moist, thick grass, rinsed the steel in the river, then, 
dipping up a ladleful of the cool water, gave it to 
Levin. 

" This is my kvas ! It 's good, is n't it ? " he exclaimed, 
winking. 

And, indeed, it seemed to Levin that he had never 
tasted any liquor more refreshing than this lukewarm 
water, in which grass floated, and tasting of the rusty 
tin cup. Then came the glorious slow promenade, 



22 ANNA KARENINA 

when, with scythe on the arm, there was time to wipe 
the heated brow, fill the lungs full, and glance round at 
the long line of haymakers, and* the busy work that had 
been accomplished in field and forest 

The longer Levin mowed, the more frequently he 
felt the moments of oblivion, when his hands did not 
wield the scythe, but the scythe seemed to have a self- 
conscious body, full of life, and carrying on, as it were 
by enchantment, a regular and systematic work. These 
were indeed joyful moments. 

It was hard only when he was obliged to interrupt 
this unconscious activity to think about something, when 
he had to remove a clod or a clump of wild sorrel. The 
old man did this easily. When he came to a clod, he 
changed his motion and now with his heel, now with 
the end of the scythe, pushed it aside with repeated 
taps. And while doing this he noticed everything and 
examined everything that was to be seen. Now he 
picked a strawberry, and ate it himself or gave it to 
Levin; now snipped off a twig with the end of the 
scythe ; now he discovered a nest of quail from which 
the mother was scurrying away, or impaled a snake as 
if with a spear, and, having shown it to Levin, flung it 
out of the way. 

But for Levin and the young fellow behind him these 
changes of motion were difficult. When once they got 
into the swing of work, they could not easily change 
their movements and at the same time observe what 
was before them. 

Levin did not realize how the time was flying. If he 
had been asked how long he had been mowing, he 
would have answered, " Half an hour ; " and here it 
was almost dinner-time. 

After they finished one row, the old man drew his 
attention to some little girls and boys, half concealed 
by the tall grass, who were coming from all sides, 
through the tall grass and down the roads, bringing to 
the haymakers their parcels of bread and rag-stoppered 
jugs of kvas, which seemed too heavy for their little 
arms. 



ANNA KARENINA 23 

"See! here come the midgets," 1 said he, pointing to 
them ; and, shading his eyes, he looked at the sun. 

Twice more they went across the field, and then the 
old man stopped. 

"Well, barin, dinner/' said he, in a decided tone. 

Then the mowers, walking along the riverside, went 
back through the windrows to their kaftans, where the 
children were waiting with the dinners. The muzhiks 
gathered together ; some clustered around the carts, 
others sat in the shade of a laburnum bush, where the 
mown grass was heaped up. 

Levin sat down near them ; he had no wish to leave 
them. 

All constraint in the presence of the barin had disap- 
peared. The muzhiks prepared to take their dinner. 
Some washed themselves, the children went in swim- 
ming in the river, others found places to nap in, or 
undid their bags of bread and uncorked their jugs of 
kvas. 

The old man crumbed his bread into his cup, mashed 
it with the shank of his spoon, poured water on from 
his tin basin, and, cutting off still more bread, he salted 
the whole plentifully ; and, turning to the east, he said 
his prayer. 

" Here now, barin, try my bread-crumbs ! n 2 said he, 
kneeling down before his cup. 

Levin found the soaked bread so palatable that he 
decided not to go home to dinner. He dined with the 
old man, and talked with him about his domestic affairs, 
in which he took a lively interest, and in his turn told 
the old man about such of his plans and projects as 
would interest him. 

He felt far nearer to him than to his brother, and he 
could not help smiling at the affection which he felt for 
this simple-hearted man. 

When the old man got up from his dinner, offered 

1 Kozyavki, ladybugs. 

2 Tiurka, diminutive of tiara , a bread-crumb soaked in kvas % or beer. 
The starik used water instead of kvas. Kvas is a drink made of fermented 
rye meal or bread with malt. 



24 ANNA KARENINA 

another prayer, and arranged a pillow of fresh-mown 
grass; and composed himself for a nap, Levin did the 
same ; and, in spite of the stubborn, sticky flies and 
insects tickling his heated face and body, he immedi- 
ately went off to sleep, and did not wake until the 
sun came out on the other side of the laburnum bush 
and began to shine in his face. The starik had been 
long awake, and was sitting up cutting the children's 
hair. 

Levin looked around him, and did not know where he 
was. Everything seemed so changed. The vast level 
of the mown meadow with its windrows of already 
fragrant hay was lighted and glorified in a new fashion 
by the oblique rays of the afternoon sun. The trimmed 
bushes down by the river, and the river itself, before in- 
visible but now shining like steel with its windings ; 
and the busy peasantry; and the high wall of grass, 
where the meadow was not yet mowed; and the young 
vultures flying high above the bare field, — all this was 
absolutely new to him. 

Levin calculated how much had been mowed, and 
how much could still be done that day. The work 
accomplished by the forty-two men was considerable. 
The whole great meadow, which in the time of serfdom 
used to take thirty scythes two days, was now almost 
mowed ; only a few corners with short rows were left. 
But Levin wanted to do as much as possible that day, 
and he was vexed at the sun which was sinking too 
early. He felt no fatigue ; he only wanted to do more 
rapid work, and get as much done as was possible. 

" Do you think we shall get Mashkin Verkh l mowed 
to-day? " he asked of the old man. 

" If God allows ; the sun is getting low. Will there 
be little sips of vodka for the boys?" 

At the time of the mid-afternoon luncheon, when the 
men rested again, and the smokers were lighting their 
pipes, the elder announced to the "boys " : — 

" Mow Mashkin Verkh — extra vodka ! " 

"All right! Come on, Sef! Let 's tackle it lively, 

1 Mashka's Hillside. 



ANNA KARENINA 25 

We 'II eat after dark. Come on ! " cried several voices ; 
and, even while still munching their bread, they got to 
work again. 

" Well, boys, keep up good hearts ! " said Sef, setting 
off almost on the run. 

"Come, come!" cried the old man, hastening after 
him and easily outstripping him. " I am first. Look 
put!" 

Old and young mowed as if they were racing; and 
yet, with all their haste, they did not spoil their work, 
but the windrows lay in neat and regular swaths. 

The triangle was finished in five minutes. The last 
mowers had just finished their line, when the first, throw- 
ing their kaftans over their shoulders, started down the 
road to the Mashkin Verkh. 

The sun was just hovering over the tree-tops, when, 
with rattling cans, they came to the little wooded ravine 
of Mashkin Verkh. 

The grass here was as high as a man's waist, tender, 
succulent, thick, and variegated with the flower called 
Ivan-da-Ma rya. 

After a short parley, to decide whether to take it 
across, or lengthwise, an experienced mower, Prokhor 
Yermilin, a huge, black-bearded muzhik, went over it 
first. He took it lengthwise, and came back in his 
track; and then all followed him, going along the hill 
above the hollow, and skirting the wood. The sun was 
setting. The light was going behind the forest. The 
dew was already falling. Only the mowers on the 
ridge were in the sun ; but down in the hollow, where 
the mist was beginning to rise, and behind the slope, 
they went in fresh, dewy' shade. 

The work went on. The grass, cut off with a juicy 
sound, and falling evenly, lay in high windrows. The 
mowers came close together from all sides as the rows 
converged, rattling their drinking-cups, sometimes hit- 
ting their scythes together, working with joyful shouts, 
rallying one another. 

Levin still kept his place between the short young 
man and the elder. The elder, with his sheepskin 



26 ANNA KARENINA 

jacket loosened, was as gay, jocose, free in his move* 
ments as ever. 

They kept finding birch-mushrooms in the woods, 
lurking in the juicy grass and cut off by the scythes. 
But the elder bent down whenever he saw one, and* 
picking it, put it in his breast. 

" Still another little present for my old woman," he 
would say. 

Easy as it was to mow the tender and soft grass, it 
was hard to climb and descend the steep sides of the 
ravine. But the elder did not let this appear. Always 
lightly swinging his scythe, he climbed with short, firm 
steps, and his feet shod in huge lapti, or bast shoes, 
though he trembled with his whole body, and his drawers 
were slipping down below his shirt, he let nothing escape 
him, not an herb or a mushroom; and he never ceased 
to joke with Levin and the muzhiks. 

Levin went behind him, and more than once felt that 
he would surely drop, trying to climb, scythe in hand, 
this steep hillside, where even unencumbered it would 
be hard to go. But he persevered all the same, and did 
what was required. He felt as if some interior force 
sustained him. 



CHAPTER VI 

The men had mowed the Mashkin Verkh, they had 
finished the last rows, and had taken their kaftans, and 
were gayly going home. Levin mounted his horse and 
regretfully took leave of his companions. On the hill- 
top he turned round to take a 'last look ; but the even- 
ing's mist, rising from the bottoms, hid them from 
sight; but he could hear their loud, happy voices and 
laughter and the sound of their clinging scythes. 

Sergyef Ivanovitch had long finished dinner, and, 
sitting in his room, was taking iced lemonade, and read- 
ing the papers and reviews which had just come from 
the post, when Levin, with his disordered hair matted 
down on his brow with perspiration, and with his back 



ANNA KARENINA 27 

and chest black and wet, came into the room and joined 
him, full of lively talk. 

"Well! we mowed the whole meadow. Akh! How 
good, how delightful ! And how has the day passed 
with you ? " he asked, completely forgetting the un- 
pleasant conversation of the evening before. 

" Ye saints ! How you look ! " exclaimed Sergye'i 
Ivanovitch, staring at first not over-pleasantly at his 
brother. "There, shut the door, shut the door ! " he 
cried. " You 've certainly let in more than a dozen ! " 

Sergyei' Ivanovitch could not endure flies ; and he 
never opened his bedroom windows except at night, and 
he made it a point to keep his doors always shut. 

"Indeed, not a one! If I have, I '11 catch him!.... 
If you knew what fun I Ve had ! And how has it gone 
with you ? V 

" First-rate. But you don't mean to say that you 
have been mowing all day ? You must be hungry as a 
wolf. Kuzma has your dinner all ready for you." 

" No ; I am not hungry. I ate yonder. But I 'm 
going to polish myself up." 

"All right, I'll join you later," said SergyeY Ivano- 
vitch, shaking his head and gazing at his brother. "Be 
quick about it," he added, with a smile, arranging his 
papers and getting ready to follow; he also suddenly 
felt enlivened, and was unwilling to be away from his 
brother. "Well, but where were you during the 
shower ? " 

"What shower? Only a drop or two fell. I '11 soon 
be back. And did the day go pleasantly with you ? 
Well, that 's capital ! " 

And Levin went to dress. 

About five minutes afterwards the brothers met in the 
dining-room. Although Levin imagined that he was not 
hungry, and he sat down only so as not to hurt Kuzma's 
feelings, yet when he once began eating, he found it ex- 
cellent. Sergyei' Ivanovitch looked at him with a smile. 

" Oh, yes, there 's a letter for you," he said. " Kuzma, 
go and get it. Be careful and see that you shut the 
door." 



28 ANNA KARENINA 

The letter was from Oblonsky. Levin read it aloud. 
It was dated from Petersburg : — 

I have just heard from Dolly ; she is at Yergushovo ; every- 
thing is going wrong with her. Please go and see her, and 
give her your advice, — you who know everything. She will be 
so glad to see you ! She is all alone, wretched. The mother- 
in-law is still abroad with the family. 

" This is admirable ! Certainly I will go to see her," 
said Levin. " Let us go together. She is a glorious 
woman ; don't you think so ? " 

" And they live near you ? " 

" About thirty versts, possibly forty. But there 's a 
good road. We can cover it quickly." 

" I shall be delighted," said Sergyef Ivanovitch, 
smiling. The sight of his brother immediately filled 
him with happiness. " Well there ! what an appetite you 
have ! " he added, looking at his tanned, sunburned, 
glowing face and neck, as he bent over his plate. 

" Excellent ! You can't imagine how useful this 
regime is against whims ! I am going to enrich medi- 
cine with a new term, arbeitskur — labor-cure." 

"Well, you don't seem to need it much, it seems to 
me." 

"Yes; it is a sovereign specific against nervous 
troubles." 

" It must be looked into. I was coming to see you 
mow, but the heat was so insupportable that I did not 
go farther than the wood. I rested awhile, and then I 
went to the village. I met your nurse there, and 
sounded her as to what the muzhiks thought about you. 
As I understand it, they don't approve of you. She 
said, ' Not gentlemen's work.' I think that, as a gen- 
eral thing, the peasantry form very definite ideas about 
what is becoming for the gentry to do, and they don't 
like to have them go outside of certain fixed limits." 

"Maybe; but you see I have never enjoyed anything 
more in all my life, and I do not do anybody any harm, 
do I ? " asked Levin. " And suppose it does n't please 
them, what is to be done ? Whose business is it ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 29 

" Well, I see you are well satisfied with your day," 
replied Sergye'f Ivanovitch. 

" Very well satisfied. We mowed the whole meadow, 
and I made such friends with an old man — the elder. 
You can't imagine how he pleased me." 

"Well, you are satisfied with your day! So am I 
with mine. In the first place, I solved two chess prob- 
lems, and one was a beauty — it opened with a pawn. 
I '11 show it to you. And then — I thought of our last 
evening's discussion." 

" What ? Our last evening's discussion ? " said Levin, 
half closing his eyes, and drawing a long breath with a 
sensation of comfort after his dinner, and really unable 
to recollect the subject of their discussion. 

" I come to the conclusion that you are partly in the 
right. The discrepancy in our views lies in the fact 
that you assume personal interest as the motive power 
of our actions, while I claim that every man who has 
reached a certain stage of intellectual development must 
have for his motive the public interest. But you are 
probably right in saying that materially interested activity 
would be more to be desired. Your nature is, as the 
French say, primesaiittere} You want strong, energetic 
activity, or nothing." 

Levin listened to his brother, but he did not under- 
stand him at all, and did not try to understand. His 
only fear was that his brother would ask him some 
question, by which it would become evident that he was 
not listening. 

" How is this, my dear boy ? " asked SergyeT Ivano- 
vitch, touching him on the shoulder. 

" Yes, of course. But, then, I don't set much store 
on my own opinions," replied Levin, smiling like a 
guilty child. His thought was, " What was our discus- 
sion about ? Of course ; I am right, and he is right, and 
all is charming. But I must go the office and give my 
orders." He arose, stretching himself and smiling. 

SergyeY Ivanovitch also smiled. 

" If you want to go out, let 's go together," he said, 

1 Off-hand. 



3 o ANNA KARENINA 

not wanting to be away from his brother, from whom 
emanated such a spirit of freshness and good cheer. 
" If you must go the office, I '11 go with you." 

" O ye saints ! " exclaimed Levin, so loud that Ser- 
gey! Ivanovitch was startled. 

" What 's the matter ? " 

" Agafya Mikhai'lovna's hand," said Levin, striking 
his forehead. " I had forgotten all about her." 

"She is much better." 

" Well, I must go to her, all the same. I '11 be back 
before you get on your hat." 

And he started down-stairs on the run, his heels 
clattering on the steps. 



CHAPTER VII 

At the time Stepan Arkadyevitch was off to Peters- 
burg to fulfil the most natural of obligations, without 
which the service could not exist, unquestioned by all 
functionaries, however unimportant for non-function- 
aries — that of reporting to the ministry, and while 
fulfilling this obligation, being well supplied with 
money, was enjoying himself at the races and his 
friends' datchas, Dolly, with the children, was on her 
way to the country, in order to reduce the expenses as 
much as possible. She was going to their country- 
place at Yergushovo, an estate which had been a part 
of her dowry. It was where the wood had been sold 
in the spring, and was situated about fifty versts from 
Levin's Pokrovsky. 

The large old mansion at Yergushovo had long been 
demolished, and the prince had contented himself with 
enlarging and repairing one of the wings. Twenty 
years before, when Dolly was a little girl, this wing 
was spacious and comfortable, though, in the manner 
of all wings, it stood sidewise as regarded the avenue 
and the south. But now this wing was old and out of 
repair. When Stepan Arkadyevitch went down in the 
spring to sell the wood, Dolly asked him to look over 



ANNA KARENINA 31 

the house and have done to it whatever was necessary 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, like all . guilty husbands, being 
deeply concerned for his wife's comfort, inspected the 
house and made arrangements to have everything done 
that, in his opinion, was necessary. In his opinion it 
was necessary to have the furniture covered with cre- 
tonne, to hang curtains, to clear up the garden, to plant 
flowers, and to .build a bridge across the pond; but he 
had overlooked many more essential matters, the lack 
of which afterwards caused Darya Aleksandrovna great 
annoyance. 

Although Stepan strove to be a solicitous husband 
and father, he never could realize that he had a wife 
and children. His tastes remained those of a bachelor, 
and to them he conformed. When he got back to Mos- 
cow he proudly assured his wife that everything was 
in prime order, that the house would be perfection, and 
he advised her strongly to go there immediately. To 
Stepan Arkadyevitch his wife's departure to the country 
was delightful in many ways : it would be healthy for 
the children, expenses would be lessened, and he would 
be freer. 

Darya Aleksandrovna, on her part, felt that a sum- 
mer in the country was indispensable for the children, 
and especially for the youngest little girl, who gained 
very slowly after the scarlatina. Moreover, she would 
be freed from petty humiliations, from little duns of the 
butcher, the fish-dealer, and the baker, which troubled 
her. 

And above all the departure was very pleasant to her 
for the especial reason that the happy thought had oc- 
curred to her to invite her sister Kitty, who was coming 
home from abroad about the middle of the summer and 
had been advised to take some cold baths. " Kitty wrote 
her from the Spa that nothing would delight her so 
much as to spend the rest of the summer with her at 
Yergushovo, that place that was so full of happy child- 
hood memories for both of them. 

The first part of the time country life was very hard 
for Dolly. She had lived there when she was a child, 



32 ANNA KARENINA 

and it had left the impression that it was a refuge from 
all the trials of the city, and if it was not very elegant, 
— and Dolly was willing to put up with that, — at least, 
it would be comfortable and inexpensive, and the chil- 
dren would be happy. But now, when she came there 
as mistress of the house, she found that things were not 
at all as she had expected. 

* On the morning after their arrival, it began to rain 
in torrents, and by night the water was leaking in the 
corridor and the nursery, so that the little beds had to 
be brought down into the parlor. It was impossible to 
find a cook. Among the nine cows in the barn, accord- 
ing to the dairy woman's report, some were going to 
calve, some had their first calf, still others were too old, 
and the rest had trouble with their udders, consequently 
they could not have butter, or even milk for the chil- 
dren. Not an egg was to be had. It was impossible 
to find a hen. They had for roasting or broiling only 
tough old purple roosters. No women were to be found 
to do the washing — all were at work on the potatoes. 

They could not go driving, because one of the horses 
was restive and pulled at the pole. There was no 
chance for bathing, because the bank of the river had 
been trodden into a quagmire by the cattle, and was 
visible from the road. They could not even go out 
walking, because the cattle had got into the garden, 
through the tumble-down fences, and there was a terri- 
ble bull which bellowed, and therefore, of course, tossed 
people with his horns. In the house, there was no 
clothes-press. The closet doors either would not shut, 
or flew open when any one passed. In the kitchen, 
there were no pots or kettles. In the laundry, there 
were no tubs, or even any scrubbing-boards for the 
domestics. 

At first, therefore, finding herself plunged into what 
seemed to her such terrible straits, instead of the rest 
and peace which she expected, Darya Aleksandrovna 
was in despair. Though she exerted all her energies, 
she felt the helplessness of her situation, and could not 
keep back her tears. 



ANNA KARENINA 33 

The steward, who had been formerly a vakhmistr, or 
quartermaster in the army, and on account of his good 
looks and fine presence had been promoted by Stepan 
Arkadyevitch from his place as Swiss, showed no sym- 
pathy with Darya Aleksandrovna's tribulations, but sim- 
ply said in his respectful way : — 

" Nothing can be done, such a beastly peasantry ! " 
and would not raise his hand to help. 

The situation seemed hopeless ; but in the Oblonsky 
household, as in all well-regulated homes, there was one 
humble but still important and useful member, Matriona 
Filimonovna. She calmed the baruinya, telling her that 
"all would come out right," — that was her phrase, and 
MatveT had borrowed it from her, — and she went to 
work without fuss and without bother. 

She had made the acquaintance of the overseer's 
wife, and on the very day of their arrival went to take 
tea with her and the overseer under the acacias, and 
discussed with them the state of affairs. A club was 
quickly organized by Matriona Filimonovna under the 
acacia; and then through this club, which was com- 
posed of the overseer's wife, the starosta y or village elder, 
and the bookkeeper, the difficulties, one by one, disap- 
peared, and within a week everything, as Matriona said. 
" came out all right." The roof was patched up ; a 
cook was found in a friend of the starosta's ; chickens 
were bought ; the cows began to give milk ; the garden- 
fence was repaired ; the carpenter made a mangle, and 
drove in hooks, and put latches on the closets, so that 
they would not keep flying open; the ironing-board, cov- 
ered with a piece of soldiers' cloth, was stretched from 
the dresser across the back of a chair, and the smell of 
the ironing came up from below. 

" There now," exclaimed Matriona Filimonovna, point- 
ing to the ironing-board, "there is no need of worrying." 

They even built a board bath-house. Lili began to 
bathe, and Darya Aleksandrovna's hope of a comfortable, 
if not a peaceful, country life became almost realized. 
Peaceful life was impossible to Darya Aleksandrovna 
with six children. If one had an ill turn, another was 

VOL. II. — 3 



34 ANNA KARENINA 

sure to follow suit, and something would happen to a 
third, and the fourth would show signs of a bad dispo- 
sition, and so it went on. Rarely, rarely came even 
short periods of rest But these very anxieties and 
troubles were the only chances of happiness that Darya 
Aleksandrovna had. If it had not been for this, she 
would have been alone with her thoughts about a hus- 
band who no longer loved her. But however cruel were 
the anxieties caused by the fear of illness, by the ill- 
nesses themselves, and by the grief a mother feels at 
the sight of evil tendencies in her children, these same 
children repaid her for her sorrows by their pleasures 
and enjoyments. Her joys were so small that they 
were almost invisible, like gold in sand ; and in trying 
hours she saw only the sorrows, only the sand ; but 
there were also happy moments, when she saw only the 
joys, only the gold. 

Now, in the quiet of the country, she became more 
and more conscious of her joys. Often, as she looked 
on them, she made unheard-of efforts to persuade her- 
self that she was mistaken, that she had a mother's 
partiality; but she could not help saying to herself that- 
she had beautiful children, all six, all of them charming 
in their own ways, — such children as are rare to find. 
And she rejoiced in them, and was proud of them. 



CHAPTER VIII 

Toward the beginning of June, when everything 
was more or less satisfactorily arranged, she received 
her husband's reply to her complaints about her do- 
mestic tribulations. He wrote, asking pardon because 
he had not remembered everything, and promised to 
come just as soon as he could. This had not yet 
come to pass ; and at the end of June Darya Alek- 
sandrovna was still living alone in the country. 

It was midsummer, Sunday, -the feast of St. Peter, and 
Darya Aleksandrovna took all her children to the holy 
communion. In her intimate philosophical discussions 



ANNA KARENINA 35 

with her sister, her mother, or her friends, she often sur- 
prised them by the breadth of her views on religious 
subjects. A strange religious metempsychosis had 
taken place in her, and she had come out into a faith 
which had very little in common with ecclesiastical 
dogmas. But in her family, — not merely for the sake 
of example, but in answer to the requirements of her 
own soul, — she conformed strictly to all the obligations 
of the church, and now she was blaming herself because 
her children had not been to communion since the be- 
ginning of the year ; and, with the full approbation and 
sympathy of Matriona Filimonovna, she resolved to ac- 
complish this duty. 

For several days beforehand she had been occupied 
in arranging what the children should wear: and now 
their dresses were arranged, all clean and in order; 
flutings and flounces were added, new buttons were put 
on, and ribbons were gathered in knots. Only Tania's 
frock, which had been intrusted to the English gover- 
ness to alter, caused Dolly great vexation. The English 
governess, in making the changes, put the seams in the 
wrong place, cut the sleeves too short, and spoiled the 
whole garment. It fitted so badly about the shoulders 
that it was painful to look at her. But it occurred to 
Matriona Filimonovna to piece out the waist and to 
make a cape. The damage was repaired, but they 
almost had a quarrel with the English governess. 

By morning all was in readiness ; a'nd about ten 
o'clock — the hour they had asked the father to give 
them for the communion — the children, in their best 
clothes and radiant with joy, were gathered on the steps 
before the calash waiting for their mother. 

Thanks to Matriona Filimonovna's watchful care, the 
overseer's Buror had been harnessed to the calash in 
place of the restive Voron, and Darya Aleksandrovna, 
who had taken considerable pains with her toilet, ap- 
peared in a white muslin gown, and took her seat in the 
vehicle. 

Darya Aleksandrovna had arranged her hair and 
dressed herself with care and with emotion. In former 



.36 ANNA KARENINA 

times she had liked to dress well so as to render herself 
handsome and attractive ; but as she became older, she 
lost her taste for adornment ; she saw how her beauty 
had faded. But now she once more found satisfaction 
and a certain emotion in being attractively arrayed. 
She did not now dress for her own sake, or to enhance 
her beauty, but so that, as mother of these lovely chil- 
dren, she might not spoil the general impression. And 
as she cast a final glance at the mirror, she was satisfied 
with herself. She was beautiful, — not beautiful in the 
same way as at one time she liked to be at a ball, but 
beautiful for the purpose which she had now in mind. 

There was no one at church except the muzhiks 
and the household servants ; but Darya Aleksandrovna 
noticed, or thought she noticed, the attention that she 
and her children attracted as they went along. The 
children were handsome in their nicely trimmed dresses, 
and still more charming in their behavior. Alosha, to 
be sure, was not absolutely satisfactory ; he kept turn- 
ing round, and trying to look at the tails of his little 
coat, but nevertheless he was wonderfully pretty. 
Tania behaved like a grown-up lady, and looked after 
the younger ones. But Lili, the smallest, was fascinat- 
ing in her natve wonder at everything that she saw; 
and it was hard not to smile when, after she had re- 
ceived the communion, she cried out in English, 
" Please, some more / " 

After they -got home, the children felt the conscious- 
ness that something solemn had taken place, and were 
very quiet. 

All went well in the house, till at lunch Grisha began 
to whistle, and, what was worse than all, refused to 
obey the English governess; and he was sent away 
without any tart. Darya Aleksandrovna would not 
have allowed any punishment on such a day if she had 
been there ; but she was obliged to uphold the gover- 
ness, and confirm her in depriving Grisha of the tart. 
This was a cloud on the general happiness. 

Grisha began to cry, saying that Nikolinka also had 
whistled but they did not punish him, and that he was 



ANNA KARENINA 37 

not crying about the tart, — that was no account, — but 
because they had not been fair to him. This was very 
disagreeable; and Darya Aleksandrovna, after a con- 
sultation with the English governess, decided to pardon 
Grisha, and went to get him. But then, as she went 
through the hall, she saw a scene which brought such 
joy to her heart, that the tears came to her eyes, and 
she herself forgave the culprit. 

The little fellow was sitting in the drawing-room by 
the bay-window ; near him stood Tania with a plate. 
Under the pretext of wanting some dessert for her dolls, 
she had asked the English governess to let her take her 
portion of the pie to the nursery ; but, instead of this, 
she had taken it to her brother. Grisha, still sobbing 
over the unfairness of his punishment, was eating the 
pie, and saying to his sister in the midst of his tears, 
" Take some too .... we will eat to .... together." 

Tania was full of sympathy for her brother, and had 
the sentiment of having performed a generous action, 
and the tears stood in her eyes, but she accepted the 
portion and was eating it. 

When they saw their mother, they were scared, but 
they felt assured, by the expression of her face, that 
they were doing right; they both laughed, and, with 
their mouths still full of pie, they began to wipe their 
laughing lips with their hands, and their shining faces 
were stained with tears and jam. 

"Ye saints! my new white gown! Tania! Grisha!" 
exclaimed the mother, endeavoring to save her gown, 
but at the same time smiling at them with a happy, 
beatific smile. 

Afterwards the new frocks were taken off, and the 
girls put on their old blouses and the boys their old 
jackets; and the line'ika, or two-seated drozhky, was 
brought out, and again, to the overseer's annoyance, 
Buroi' was at the pole, so that they might go out after 
mushrooms, and to have a bath. It is needless to say 
that enthusiastic shouts and squeals arose in the nurs- 
ery, and did not cease until they actually got started for 
their excursion. 



38 ANNA KARENINA 

They soon filled a basket with mushrooms ; even Lili 
found some of the birch agarics. Always before Miss 
Hull had found them and pointed them out to her ; but 
now she herself found a huge birch shliupik, and there 
was a universal cry of enthusiasm : — 

" Lili has found a mushroom ! " 

Afterwards they came to the river, left the horses 
under the birch trees, and went to the bath-house. The 
coachman, Terenti, leaving the animals to switch away 
the flies with their tails, stretched himself out on the 
grass in the shade of the birches, and smoked his pipe, 
and listened to the shouts and laughter of the children 
in the bath-house. 

Though it was rather embarrassing to look after all 
these children, and to keep them from mischief; though 
it was hard to remember, and not mix up all these 
stockings, shoes, and trousers for so many different 
legs, and to untie, unbutton, and then fasten again, so 
many tapes and buttons, — still Darya Aleksandrovna 
always took a lively interest in the bathing, looking on 
it as advantageous for the children, and never feeling 
happier than when engaged in this occupation. To fit 
the stockings on those plump little legs; to take the 
younger ones by the hand, and dip their naked little 
bodies into the water; to hear their cries, now joyful, 
now terrified; to see these breathless faces of those 
splashing cherubimchiks of hers, with their scared or 
sparkling eyes wide open with excitement, — all this 
was a perfect delight to her. * . 

When half of the children were dressed, some peas- 
ant women, in Sunday attire, on their way to get herbs, 
came along, and stopped timidly at the bath-house. 
Matriona Filimonovna called to one of them, in order 
to give her a sheet and a shirt to dry that had Mien 
into the water ; and Darya Aleksandrovna talked with 
the women. At first they laughed behind their hands, 
not understanding her questions; but little by little 
their courage returned and they began to chatter, and 
they quite won Darya Aleksandrovna's heart by their 
sincere admiration of the children. 



ANNA KARENINA 39 

" Ish tui I ain't she lovely, now ? White as sugar ! " 
said one, pointing to Tania, and nodding her head. 
" But thin...." 

" Yes ; because she has been ill." 

" Visit tidy 1 said still another, pointing to the youngest 
child. 

" It seems you don't take him into the water, do 
you ? " 

" No," said Darya Aleksandrovna, proudly. " He is 
only three months old." 

" You don't say so ! " l 

" And have you any children ? " 

' ' I *ve had four ; two are alive, a boy and a girl. I 
weaned the youngest before Lent." 

" How old is she ? " 

" Well, she is going into her second year." 

"Why do you nurse her so long? " 

" It 's our way : three springs." .... 

And then the woman asked Darya Aleksandrovna 
about the birth of her baby : did she have a hard time ? 
where was her husband ? would he come often ? 

Darya Aleksandrovna was reluctant to part with the 
peasant women, so delightful did she find the conversa- 
tion with them, so perfectly identical were their interests 
and hers. And it was more pleasant to her than any- 
thing else to see how evidently all these women were 
filled with admiration because she had so many and such 
lovely children. The women made Darya Aleksandrovna 
laugh, and offended Miss Hull for the very reason that 
she was the cause of their unaccountable laughter. One 
of the young women gazed with all her eyes at the Eng- 
lish governess, who was dressing last; and, when she 
put on the third petticoat, she could not restrain her- 
self any longer, but burst out laughing : — 

" Ish tui ! she put on one, and then she put on another, 
and she has n't got them all on yet ! " and they all broke 
into loud laughter. 

* "Ish tui) » 



4 o. ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER IX 

Darya Aleksandrovna, with a kerchief on her head, 
and surrounded by all her flock of bathers with wet hair, 
was just drawing near the house when the coachman called 
out, " Here comes some barin,— Pokrovsky, it looks like." 

Darya Aleksandrovna looked out, and, to her great 
joy, saw that it was indeed Levin's well-known form in 
gray hat and gray overcoat. She was always glad to 
see him, but now she was particularly delighted, because 
he saw»her in all her glory. No one could appreciate 
her splendor better than Levin. 

When he caught sight of her, it seemed to him that he 
saw one of his visions of family life. 

" You are like a brooding hen, Darya Aleksandrovna/' 

" Oh, how glad I am ! " said she, offering him her hand. 

" Glad ! But you did not let me know. My brother 
is staying with me ; I had a little note from Stiva, tell- 
ing me you were here." 

" From Stiva ? " repeated Dolly, astonished. 

"Yes. He wrote me that you had come into the 
country, and thought that you would ajlow me to be of 
some use to you," said Levin ; and, even while speaking, 
he became confused, and breaking off suddenly, walked 
in silence by the lineifka, pulling off and biting linden 
twigs as he went. It had occurred to him that Darya. 
Aleksandrovna would doubtless find it painful to have 
a neighbor offer her the assistance which her husband 
should have given. In fact, Darya Aleksandrovna was 
displeased at the way in which Stepan Arkadyevitch 
had thrust his domestic difficulties upon a stranger. She 
immediately perceived that Levin felt this, and she felt 
grateful to him for his tact and delicacy. 

"Of course, I understood," said Levin, "that this 
only meant that you would be glad to see me ; and I 
was glad. Of course, I imagine that you, a city house- 
keeper, find it uncivilized here; and, if I can be of the 
least use to you, I am wholly at your service." 

" Oh, no ! " said Dolly. " At first it was rather hard, 



ANNA KARENINA 41 

but now everything has been beautifully arranged. 1 
owe it all to my old nurse," she added, indicating 
Matriona Filimonovna, who, perceiving that they were 
speaking of her, gave Levin a pleasant, friendly smile. 
She knew him, and knew that he would make a splen- 
did husband for the young lady, and she wished that it 
might be so. 

"Will you get in? We will squeeze up a little/' said 
she. 

" No, I will walk. — Children, which of you will run 
with me to get ahead of the horses ? " 

The children were very slightly acquainted with Levin, 
and did not remember where they had seen him ; but 
they had none of that strange feeling of timidity and 
aversion which children are so often blamed for show- 
ing toward grown-up persons who are not sincere. Pre- 
tense in any person may deceive the shrewdest and most 
experienced of men, but a child of very limited intelli- 
gence detects it and is repelled by it, though it be most 
carefully hidden. 

Whatever faults Levin had, he could not be accused 
of lack of sincerity, and consequently the children 
showed him the same good-will that they had seen on 
their mother's face. The two eldest instantly accepted 
his invitation, and ran with him as they would have 
gone with their nurse, or Miss Hull, or their mother. 
Lili also wanted to go with him, and her mother in- 
trusted her to him ; so he set her on his shoulder and 
began to run with her. 

" Don't be frightened, don't be frightened, Darya 
Aleksandrovna," he said, laughing gayly. "I won't 
hurt her or let her fall." 

And when she saw his strong, agile, and, at the same 
time, prudent and careful movements, the mother felt 
reassured, and smiled as she watched him, with pleasure 
and approval. 

There in the country, with the children and with 
Darya Aleksandrovna, whom he liked, Levin entered 
into that boylike, happy frame of mind which was not 
unusual with him, and which Darya Aleksandrovna 



42 ANNA KARENINA 

especially admired in him. He played with the children, 
and taught -them gymnastic exercises; he jested with 
Miss Hull in his broken English; and he told Darya 
Aleksandrovna of his undertakings in the country. 

After dinner, Darya Aleksandrovna, sitting alone with 
him on the balcony, began to speak of Kitty. 

" Did you know ? Kitty is coming here to spend the 
summer with me ! " 

" Indeed !" replied Levin, confused; and instantly, in 
order to change the subject, he added: — 

" Then I shall send you two cows, shall I ? And if 
you insist on paying, and have no scruples, then you 
may give me five rubles a month." 

" No, thank you. We shall get along." 

" Well, then I am going to look at your cows ; and, 
with your permission, I will give directions about feed- 
ing them. Everything depends on that." 

And Levin, in order to turn the conversation, ex- 
plained to Darya Aleksandrovna the whole theory of 
the proper management of cows, which was based on 
the idea that a cow is only a machine for the conversion 
of fodder into milk, and so on. 

He talked on this subject, and yet he was passion- 
ately anxious to hear the news about Kitty, but he was 
also afraid to hear it. It was terrible to him to think that 
his peace of mind, so painfully won, might be destroyed. 

"Yes; but, in order to do all this, there must be some 
one to superintend it; and who is there ?" asked Darya 
Aleksandrovna, not quite convinced. 

Now that she carried on her domestic affairs so satis- 
factorily, through Matriona Filimonovna, she had no 
desire to make any changes ; moreover, she had no 
faith in Levin's knowledge about rustic management. 
His reasonings about a cow being merely a machine to 
produce milk were suspicious. It seemed to her that 
such theories would throw housekeeping into discord ; it 
even seemed to her that it was all far simpler, that it 
was sufficient, to do as Matriona Filimonovna did, — to 
give Pestrukha and Byelopakha 1 more fodder and drink, 

1 Dapple and White- foot. 



ANNA KAREN IN A 43 

and to prevent the cook from carrying dish-water from 
the kitchen to the cow, — that was clear. But the 
theories about meal and grass for fodder were not clear, 
but dubious ; but the principal point was, that she 
wanted to talk about Kitty. 



CHAPTER X 

"Kitty writes me that she is longing for solitude 
and repose," began Dolly, after a moment's silence. 

" Is her health better ? " asked Levin, with emotion. 

" Thank the Lord, she is entirely well ! I never be- 
lieved that she had any lung trouble." 

" Oh ! I am very glad," said Levin ; and Dolly 
thought that, as he said it, and then looked at her in 
silence, his face had a pathetic, helpless expression. 

" Tell me, Konstantin Dmitritch," said Darya Alek- 
sandrovna with a friendly, and at the same time a rather 
mischievous, smile, "why are you angry with Kitty?" 

" I ? I am not angry with her," said Levin. 

" Yes, you are. Why did n't you come to see any of 
us the last time you were in Moscow ? " 

" Darya Aleksandrovna," he exclaimed, blushing to 
the roots of his hair, V I am astonished that, with your 
kindness of heart, you can think of such a thing ! How 
can you not pity me when you know .... " 

"What do I know?" 

" You know that I offered myself, and was rejected." 
And as he said this, all the tenderness that he had felt 
for Kitty a moment before changed in his heart into a 
sense of anger at the memory of this injury. 

" How could you suppose that I knew ? " 

" Because everybody knows it." 

"That is where you are mistaken. I suspected it, 
but I knew nothing positive." 

" Ah, well, and so you know now ! " 

" All that I know is that there was something which 
keenly tortured her, and that she has besought me 
never to mention it. If she has not told me, then she 



44 ANNA KARENINA 

has not told any one. Now, what have you against 
her ? Tell me ! " 

" I have told you all that there was." 

" When was it ? " 

"When I was at your house the last time." 

"But do you know? I will tell you," said Darya 
Aleksandrovna. " I am sorry for Kitty, awfully sorry. 
You suffer only in your pride .... " 

"Perhaps so," said Levin, "but...." 

She interrupted him. 

" But she, poor little girl, I am awfully sorry for her. 
Now I understand all I " 

"Well, Darya Aleksandrovna, excuse me," said he, 
rising. " Prashcha'ite — good-by, Darya Aleksandrovna, 
da svidanya ! " 

"No! wait!" she cried, holding him by the sleeve; 
" wait ! sit down ! " 

" I beg of you, I beg of you, let us not speak of this 
any more," said Levin, sitting down again, while a ray 
of that hope which he believed forever vanished flashed 
into his heart. 

" If I did not like you," said Dolly, and the tears 
came into her eyes, "if I did not know you as I do .... " 

The hope which he thought was dead awoke more 
and more, filled Levin's heart, and took masterful pos- 
session of it. 

"Yes, I understand all now," said Dolly: "you can- 
not understand this, you men, who are free in your 
choice ; it is perfectly clear whom you love ; but a young 
girl, with that feminine, maidenly reserve which is im- 
posed on her, and seeing you men only at a distance, is 
constrained to wait, and she is, and must be, so agitated 
that she will not know what answer to give." 

" Yes, if her heart does not speak .... " 
: " No ; her heart speaks, but think for a moment : 
you men decide on some girl, you visit her home, 
you watch, observe, and you make up your minds 
whether you are in love or not, and then, when you 
have come to the conclusion that you love her, you offer 
yourselves .... " 



ANNA KARENINA 45 

" Well, now ! we don't always do that." 

"All the same, you don't propose until your love 
is fully ripe, or when you have made up your mind 
between two possible choices. But the young girl 
cannot make a choice. They pretend that she can 
choose, but she cannot ; she can only answer ' yes ' or 
no. 

"Well! the choice was between me and Vronsky," 
thought Levin ; and the resuscitated dead love in his 
soul seemed to die a second time, giving his heart an 
additional pang. 

"Darya Aleksandrovna," said he, "thus one chooses 
a gown or any trifling merchandise, but not love. Be- 
sides, the choice has been made, and so much the 
better .... and it cannot be done again. " 

"Oh! pride, pride! " said Dolly, as if she would ex- 
press her scorn for the degradation of his sentiments 
compared with those which only women are able to 
comprehend. "When you offered yourself to Kitty, 
she was in just that situation where she could not give 
an answer. She was in doubt ; the choice was you or 
Vronsky. She saw him every day; you she had not 
seen for a long time. If she had been older, it would 
have been different; if I, for example, had been in her 
place, I should not have hesitated. He was always 
distasteful to me, and so that is the end of it." 

Levin remembered Kitty's reply : " No> this cannot 
de...." 

" Darya Aleksandrovna," said he, dryly, " I am touched 
by your confidence in me, but I think you are mistaken. 
But whether I am right or wrong, this pride which you 
so despise makes it impossible for me ever to think about 
Katerina Aleksandrovna ; you understand ? utterly im- 
possible." 

" I will say only one thing more. You must know 
that I am speaking to you of my sister, whom I love 
as my own children. I don't say that she loves you, 
but I only wish to say that her reply at that moment 
amounted to nothing at all." 

" I don't know," said Levin, leaping suddenly to his 



46 ANNA KARENINA 

feet. " If you only realized the pain that you cause me ! 
It is just the same as if you had lost a child, and they 
came to you and said, ' He would have been like this, 
like this, and he might have lived, and you would 

have had so much joy in him But he is dead, dead, 

dead.' " .... 

" How absurd you are ! " said Darya Aleksandrovna, 
with a melancholy smile at the sight of Levin's emotion. 
" Well ! I understand it all better and better," she con- 
tinued pensively. "Then you won't come to see us 
when Kitty is here ? " 

" No, I will not. Of course I will not avoid Katerina 
Aleksandrovna; but, when it is possible, I shall en- 
deavor to spare her the affliction of my presence." 

" You are very, very absurd," said Darya Aleksan- 
drovna, looking at him affectionately. "Well, then, let 
it be as if we had not said a word about it. — What do 
you want, Tania ? " said she in French to her little girl, 
who came running in. 

" Where is my little shovel, mamma ? " 

"I speak French, to you, and you must answer in 
French." 

The child tried to speak, but could not recall the 
French word for lopatka, shovel. Her mother whis- 
pered it to her, and then told her, still in French, where 
she should go to find it This made Levin feel un- 
pleasant. 

Everything now seemed changed in Darya Aleksan- 
drovna's household ; even the children were not nearly 
so attractive as before. 

" And why does she speak French with the children ? " 
he thought. " How false and unnatural ! Even the 
children feel it. Teach them French, and spoil their 
sincerity," he said to himself, not knowing that Darya 
Aleksandrovna had twenty times asked the same ques- 
tion, and yet, in spite of the harm that it did their 
simplicity, had come to the conclusion that this was the 
right way to teach them. 

"But why are you in a hurry ? Sit a little while 
longer." .. { 



ANNA KARENINA 47 

Levin stayed to tea ; but all his gayety was gone, and 
he felt uncomfortable. 

After tea he went out into the anteroom to give 
orders about harnessing the horses ; and when he came 
in he found Darya Aleksandrovna in great disturbance, 
with flushed face, and tears in her eyes. During his 
short absence an occurrence had ruthlessly destroyed 
all the pleasure and pride that she took in her children. 
Grisha and Tania had quarreled about a ball. Darya 
Aleksandrovna, hearing their cries, ran to them, and 
found them in a frightful state. Tania was pulling her 
brother's hair ; and he, with face distorted with rage, 
was pounding his sister w 7 ith all his might. When 
Darya Aleksandrovna saw it, something seemed to 
snap in her heart. A black cloud, as it were, came 
down on her life. She saw that these children of hers, 
of whom she was so proud, were not only ordinary and 
ill-trained, but were even bad, and inclined to the most 
evil and tempestuous passions. 

This thought troubled her so that she could not speak 
or think, or even explain her sorrow to Levin. 

Levin saw that she was unhappy, and he did his best 
to comfort her, saying that this was not so very terrible, 
after all, and that all children quarreled; but in his 
heart he said, " No, I will not bother myself to speak 
French with my children. I shall not have such chil- 
dren. There is no need of spoiling them, and making 
them unnatural ; and they will be charming. No ! my 
children shall not be like these." 

He took his leave, and rode away ; and she did not 
try to keep him longer. 



CHAPTER XI 

Toward the end of July, Levin received a visit from 
the starosta of his sister's estate, situated about twenty 
versts from Pokrovskoye. He brought the report about 
the progress of affairs, and about the haymaking. 



48 ANNA KARENINA 

The chief income from his sister's estate came from 
the meadows inundated in the spring. In former years 
the muzhiks rented these hayflelds at the rate of twenty 
rubles a desyatin. 1 But when Levin undertook the 
management of this estate, and examined the hay- 
crops, he came to the conclusion that the rent was too 
low, and he raised it to the rate of twenty-five rubles 
a desyatin. The muzhiks refused to pay this, and, as 
Levin suspected, drove away other lessees. Then Levin 
himself went there, and arranged to have the meadows 
mowed partly by day laborers, partly on shares. His 
muzhiks were greatly discontented with this new plan, 
and did their best to thwart it ; but it was attended with 
success, and even the very first year the yield from the 
meadows was nearly doubled. The opposition of the 
peasantry continued through the second and third sum- 
mers, and the haymaking was conducted on the same 
conditions. 

But this year they had mowed the meadows on thirds, 
and now the starosta had come to announce that the 
work was done, and that he, fearing it was going to 
rain, had summoned the bookkeeper and made the divis- 
ion in his presence, and turned over the eighteen hay- 
ricks which were the proprietor's share. 

By the unsatisfactory answer to his question, how 
much hay had been secured from the largest meadow, 
by the starosta's haste in making the division without 
orders, by the man's whole manner, Levin was induced 
to think there was something crooked in the division of 
the hay, and he concluded that it would be wise to go 
and look into it. 

Levin reached the estate just at dinner-time; and, 
leaving his horse at the house of his old friend, the 
husband of his brother's former nurse, he went to find 
the old man at the apiary, hoping to obtain from him 
some light on the question of the hay-crop. 

The loquacious, beautiful-looking old man, whose 
name was Parmenuitch, was delighted to see Levin, 
showed him all about his husbandry, and told him all 

1 About six dollars an acre. 



ANNA KARENINA 49 

the particulars about his bees, and how they swarmed 
this year; but when Levin asked him about 1 the hay, he 
gave vague and unsatisfactory answers. This still more 
confirmed Levin in his suspicions. 

He went to the meadows, and, on examination of the 
hayricks, found that they could not contain fifty loads 
each, as the muzhiks said. So in order to give the peas- 
ants a lesson he had one of the carts which they had 
used as a measure to be brought, and ordered all the 
hay from one of the ricks to be carried into the shed. 

The hayrick was found to contain only thirty-two 
loads. Notwithstanding the starosta's protestations 
that the hay was measured right, and that it must 
have got pressed down in the cart ; notwithstanding 
the fact that he called God to witness that it was all 
done in the most godly manner, — Levin insisted on it 
that, as the division had been made without his orders, 
he would not accept the hayricks as equivalent to fifty 
loads each. 

After long parleys, it was decided that the muzhiks 
should take eleven of these hayricks for their share, 
but that the master's should be measured over again. 
The colloquy and the division of the hayricks lasted 
until the mid-afternoon luncheon hour. When the last 
of the hay had been divided, Levin, confiding the care 
of the work to the bookkeeper, sat down on one of the 
hayricks which was marked by a laburnum stake, and 
enjoyed the spectacle of the meadows alive with the 
busy peasantry. 

Before him, at the bend of the river beyond the marsh, 
he saw the peasant women in a variegated line, and 
heard their ringing voices as they gossiped together, 
while raking into long brown ramparts the hay scattered 
over the bright green aftermath. Behind the women 
came the men with pitchforks turning the windrows 
into wide, high-swelling hayricks. 

Toward the left across the meadow, already cleared 

of the hay, came the creaking telyegas, or peasant carts, 

and one by one, as the hayricks were lifted on the point 

of monstrous forks, disappeared, and their places were 

vol. 11. — 4 



5 o ANNA KARENINA ' 

taken by the horse-wagons filled to overflowing with 
the fragrant hay which almost hid the rumps of the 
horses. 

" Splendid hay-weather! It'll soon be all in," said 
Parmenuitch, as he sat down near Levin. "Tea, not 
hay ! It scatters like seed for the ducks when they 
pitch it up." Then, pointing to a hayrick which the 
men were demolishing, the old man went on : " Since 
dinner, pitched up a good half of it. — Is that the last ? " 
he shouted to a young fellow who, standing on the pole 
of a cart, and shaking the ends of his hempen reins, was 
driving by. 

" The last, batyushka," shouted back the young fellow, 
pulling in his horse. Then he looked down with a smile 
on a happy-looking, rosy-faced woman who was sitting 
on the hay in the telyega, and whipped up his steed 
again. 

"Who is that ? your son ? " asked Levin. 

" My youngest," said the elder, with an expression 
of pride. 

" What a fine fellow ! " 

"Not bad." 

" Married yet ? " 

" Yes, three years come next Filippovok." l 

" So ? And are there children ? " 

" How ? children ? For a whole year I have n't heard 
anything about it ! and it fs a shame," said the old man. 
"Well, this is hay! Just tea!" he repeated, wishing to 
change the subject. 

Levin looked with interest at Vanka Parmenof and 
his wife. They were loading on a hayrick near by. 
Ivan Parmenof was standing on the wagon, arranging, 
storing, and pressing down the fragrant hay which the 
handsome goodwife handed up to him in great loads, 
first in armfuls, then with the fork. The young woman 
worked gayly, industriously, and skilfully. First she 
arranged it with her fork ; then, with elastic and agile 
motions, she exerted all her strength upon it ; and, stoop- 
ing over, she lifted up the great armful, and standing 
1 St. Philip's Day, November 14. 



ANNA KARENINA 51 

straight, with full bosom under the white chemise 
gathered with a red girdle, she piled it high upon the 
load. 

Ivan, working as rapidly as he could, so as to relieve 
her of every moment of extra work, stretched out his 
arms wide, and caught up the load which she extended, 
and trampled it down into the wagon. Then, raking up 
what was left, the woman shook off the hay that had got 
into her neck, and, tying a red handkerchief around her 
broad white brow, she crept under the cart to fasten 
down the load. Vanka snowed her how the ropes 
should be tied, and at some remark that she made burst 
into a roar of laughter. In the expression on the faces 
of both of them could be seen strong young love recently 
awakened. 

CHAPTER XII 

The load was complete, and Ivan, jumping down, 
took his gentle fat horse by the bridle, and joined the 
file of telyegas going to the village. The young woman 
threw her rake on top of the load, and, swinging her 
arms, joined the other women, who had collected in a 
group to sing. These women, with rakes on their 
shoulders and dressed in bright colors, suddenly burst 
forth into song with loud happy voices as they followed 
the carts. One wild untrained voice would sing a verse 
of the Pyesna, or folk-song, and when she had reached 
the refrain, fifty other young, fresh, and powerful voices 
would take it up simultaneously and repeat it to the 
end. 

The peasant women, singing their folk-song, came 
toward Levin ; and it seemed to him that a cloud, 
freighted with the thunder of gayety, was moving down 
upon him. The thunder-cloud drew nearer, it took 
possession of him, — and the haycock on which he 
was reclining and the other haycocks and the carts 
and the whole meadow and the far-off field moved 
and swayed to the rhythm of this wild song, with its 
accompaniment of whistles and shrill cries and clapping 



52 ANNA KARENINA 

of hands. This wholesome gayety filled him with envy; 
he would have liked to take part in this expression of 
joyous life; but nothing of the sort could he do, and he 
was obliged to lie still and look and listen. When the 
throng with their song had passed out of sight and 
hearing, an oppressive feeling of melancholy came over 
him at the thought of his loneliness, of his physical 
indolence, of the hostility which existed between him 
and this alien world. 

Some of these very muzhiks, even those who had 
quarreled with him about the hay, or those whom he 
had injured, or those who had intended to cheat him, 
saluted him gayly as they passed, and evidently did not 
and could not bear him any malice, or feel any remorse, 
or even remembrance that they had tried to defraud 
him. All was swallowed up and forgotten in this sea 
of joyous, universal labor. God gave the day, God gave 
the strength ; and the day and the strength consecrated 
the labor, and yielded their own reward. For whom 
was the work? What would be the fruits of the work ? 
These were secondary, unimportant considerations. 

Levin had often looked with interest at this life, had 
often experienced a feeling of envy of the people that 
lived this life; but to-day, for the first time, especially 
under the impression of what he had seen in the bear- 
ing of Ivan Parmenof toward his young wife, he had 
clearly realized that it depended on himself whether he 
would exchange the burdensome, idle, artificial, selfish 
existence which he led, for the laborious, simple, pure, 
and delightful life of the peasantry. 

The elder who had been sitting with him had already 
gone home; the people were scattered; the neighbor- 
ing villagers had already .reached their houses, but 
those who lived at a distance were preparing to spend 
the night in the meadow, and were getting ready for 
supper. 

Levin, without being noticed by the people, still re- 
clined on the haycock, looking, listening, and thinking. 
The peasantry gathered in the meadow scarcely slept 
throughout the short summer night. At first gay gos- 



ANNA KARENINA 53 

sip and laughter were heard while they were eating; 
then followed songs and jests again. 

No trace of all the long, laborious day was left upon 
them, except of its happiness. Just before the dawn 
there was silence everywhere. Nothing could be heard 
but the nocturnal sounds of the frogs ceaselessly croak- 
ing in the marsh, and the horses whinnying as they 
waited in the mist that rose before the dawn. Coming 
to himself, Levin got up from the haycock, and, looking 
at the stars, saw that the night had gone. 

"Well! what am I going to do ? How am I going to 
do this ? " he asked himself, trying to give a shape to 
the thoughts and feelings that had occupied him during 
this short night. All that he had thought and felt had 
taken three separate directions. First, it seemed to him 
that he must renounce his former mode of life, which 
was useful neither to himself nor to any one else. This 
renunciation seemed to him very attractive and was easy 
and simple. 

The second direction that his thoughts and feelings 
took referred especially to the new life which he longed 
to lead. He clearly realized the simplicity, purity, and 
regularity of this new life, and he was convinced that 
he should find in it that satisfaction, that calmness and 
mental freedom, which he now felt the lack of so pain- 
fully. The third line of thought brought him to the 
question how he should effect the transition from the 
old life to the new, and in this regard nothing clear 
presented itself to his mind. 

" I must have a wife. I must engage in work, and 
have the absolute necessity of work. Shall I abandon Po- 
krovskoye ? buy land ? join the commune ? marry a peas- 
ant woman? How can I do all this ?" he again asked 
himself, and no answer came. " However,'* he went 
on, in his self-communings, " I have not slept all night, 
and my ideas are not very clear. I shall reduce them 
to order by and by. One thing is certain; this night 
has settled my fate. All my former dreams of family 
existence were rubbish, but this — all this is vastlj 
simpler and better." .... 



54 ANNA KARENINA 

" How lovely ! " he thought, as he gazed at the delicate 
white curly clouds, colored like mother-of-pearl, which 
floated in the sky above him. " How charming every, 
thing has been this lovely night ! And when did that 
shell have time to form? I have been looking this long 
time at the sky, and nothing was to be seen — only two 
white streaks. Yes! thus, without my knowing it, my 
views about life have been changed." 

He left the meadow, and walked along the highway 
that led to the village. A cool breeze began to blow, 
and it became gray and melancholy. The somber mo- 
ment was at hand which generally precedes the dawn, 
the perfect triumph of light over the darkness. 

Shivering with the chill, Levin walked fast, looking 
at the ground. 

" What is that ? Who is coming ? " he asked himself, 
hearing the sound of bells. He raised his head. About 
forty paces from him he saw, coming toward him on 
the highway, on the grassy edge where he himself was 
walking, a traveling carriage, drawn by four horses. 
The pole-horses, to avoid the ruts, pressed close against 
the pole ; but the skilful postilion, seated on one side of 
the box, kept the pole directly over the rut, so that the 
wheels kept only on the smooth surface of the road. 

Levin was so interested in this that, without thinking 
who might be coming, he only glanced heedlessly at the 
carriage. 

In one corner of the carriage an elderly lady was 
asleep ; and by the window sat a young girl, evidently 
only just awake, holding with both hands the ribbons 
of her white bonnet. Serene and thoughtful, filled with 
a lofty, complex life which Levin could not understand, 
she was gazing beyond him at the glow of the morning 
sky. 

At the very instant that this vision flashed by him he 
caught a glimpse of her frank eyes. She recognized 
him, and a gleam of joy, mingled with wonder, lighted 
up her face. 

He could not be mistaken. Only she in all the world 
had such eyes. In all the world there was but one 



ANNA KARENINA 55 

being who could concentrate for him all the light and 
meaning of life. It was she ; it was Kitty. He judged 
that she was on her way from the railway station to 
Yergushovo. 

And all the thoughts that had occupied Levin through 
his sleepless night, all the resolutions that he had made, 
vanished in a twinkling. Horror seized him as he re- 
membered his dream of marrying a krestyanka — a 
peasant wife ! In that carriage which flashed by him 
on the other side of the road, and disappeared, was the 
only possible answer to his life's enigma which had 
tormented and puzzled him so long. 

She was now out of sight ; the rumble of the wheels 
had ceased, and scarcely could he hear the bells. The 
barking of the dogs told him that the carriage was 
passing through the village. And now there remained 
only the empty fields, the distant village, and himself, 
an alien and a stranger to everything, walking solitary 
on the deserted highway. 

He looked at the sky, hoping to find there still the 
sea-shell cloud which' he had admired, and which per- 
sonified for him the movement of his thoughts and 
feelings during the night. But in the sky there was 
nothing that resembled the shell. There, at immeasur- 
able heights, that mysterious change had already taken 
place. There was no trace of the shell, but in its place 
there extended over a good half of the heavens a carpet 
of cirrus clouds sweeping on and sweeping on. The 
sky was growing blue and luminous, and with the same 
tenderness and also with the same unsatisfactoriness it 
answered his questioning look. 

" No," he said to himself, " however good this simple 
and laborious life may be, I cannot bring myself to it 
I love her" 



S 6 ANNA KARENINA 



. CHAPTER XIII 

No one except Aleksef Aleksandrovitch's most in- 
timate friends suspected that this apparently cold and 
sober-minded man had one weakness absolutely con- 
tradictory to the general consistency of his character. 
He could not look with indifference at a child or a 
woman who was weeping. The sight of tears caused 
him to lose his self-control, and destroyed for him his 
reasoning faculties. The manager of his chancelry and 
his secretary understood this, and warned women who 
came to present petitions not to allow their feelings 
to overcome them unless they wanted to injure their 
prospects. 

"He will fly into a passion, and will not listen to 
you," they said. And it was a fact that the trouble 
which the sight of weeping caused Aleksef Aleksandro- 
vitch was expressed by hasty irritation. " I cannot, I 
cannot do anything for you. Please leave me," he 
would exclaim, as a general thing, in such cases. 

When, on their way back from the races, Anna con- 
fessed her relations with Vronsky, and, immediately 
afterwards covering her face with her hands, burst into 
tears, Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, in spite of his anger 
against his wife, was conscious at the same time of that 
deep, soul-felt emotion welling up which the sight of 
tears always caused him. Knowing this, and knowing 
that any expression of it would be incompatible with 
the situation, he endeavored to restrain any sign of 
agitation, and therefore he neither moved nor looked 
at her ; hence arose that strange appearance of death- 
like rigidity in his face which so impressed Anna. 

When they reached home, he helped her from the car- 
riage ; and, having made a great effort, he left her with 
ordinary politeness, saying only those words which would 
not oblige him to follow any course. He simply said 
that on the morrow he would let her know his decision. 

His wife's words, confirming his worst suspicions, 
caused a keen pain in his heart; and this pain was 



ANNA KARENINA 57 

made still keener by the strange sensation of physical 
pity for her, caused by the sight of her tears. Yet, as 
he sat alone in his carriage, Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, to 
his surprise and pleasure, was conscious of an absolute 
freedom, not only from that sense of pity, but also from 
the doubts and the pangs of jealousy which had of late 
been tormenting him. 

He experienced the feelings of a man who has been 
suffering for a long time from the toothache. After 
one terrible moment of agony, and the sensation of 
something enormous — greater than the head itself — 
which is wrenched out of the jaw, the patient, hardly 
able to believe in his good fortune, suddenly discovers 
that the pain that has been poisoning his life so long 
has ceased, and that he can live and think and interest 
himself in something besides his aching tooth. 

This feeling Aleksei" Aleksandrovitch now experi- 
enced. The pain had been strange and terrible. But 
now it was over. He felt that he could live again, and 
think of something besides his wife. 

"Without honor, without heart, without religion, an 
abandoned woman ! I have always known this and I 
have always seen it, though out of pity for her I tried 
to shut my eyes to it," he said to himself. 

And it really seemed to him that he had always seen 
this. He recalled many details of their past lives ; and 
things which had once seemed innocent in his eyes, now 
clearly came up as proofs that she had always been 
corrupt. 

" I made a mistake when I joined my life to hers ; but 
my mistake was not my fault, and therefore I ought not 
to be unhappy. I am not the guilty one," said he, 
"but she is. But I have nothing more to do with her. 
She does not exist for me.".... 

All that would befall her as well as his son, toward 
whom also his feelings underwent a similar change, now 
ceased to occupy him. The only thing that did occupy 
him now was the question how to make his escape from 
this wretched crisis in a manner at once wise, correct, 
and honorable for himself, and having cleared himself 



58 ANNA KARENINA 

from the mud with which she had spattered him by her 
fall, how he would henceforth pursue his own path of 
honorable, active, and useful life. 

"> Must I make myself wretched because a wretched 
woman has committed a crime ? All I want is to find 
the best way out from this situation to which she has 
brought me. And I will find it," he added, getting 
more and more indignant. " I am not the first, nor the 
last." 

And not speaking of the historical examples, begin- 
ning with La Belle H£lene of Menelaus, which had 
recently been brought to all their memories by Offen- 
bach's opera, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch went over in his 
mind a whole series of contemporary episodes, where 
husbands of the highest position had been obliged to 
mourn the faithlessness of their wives. 

" Daryalof, Poltavsky, Prince Karibanof, Count Pa- 
skudin, Dramra, .... yes, even Dramm, honorable, indus- 
trious man as he is, .... Semenof, Chagin, Sigonin. 
Admit that they cast unjust ridicule on these men ; as 
for me, I never saw anything except their misfortune, 
and I always pitied them," said Alekser Aleksandro- 
vitch to himself, although this was not so, and he had 
never sympathized with misfortune of this sort, and had 
only plumed himself the more as he had heard of wives 
deceiving their husbands. 

" This is a misfortune which is likely to strike any 
one, and now it has struck me. The only thing is to 
know how to find the best way of settling the difficulty." 

And he began to recall the different ways in which 
these men, finding themselves in such a position as he 
was, had behaved. 

" Daryalof fought a duel .... " 

Dueling had often been a subject of consideration 
to Aleksel Aleksandrovitch when he was a young man, 
and for the reason that physically he was a timid man 
and he knew it. He could not think without a shudder 
of having a pistol leveled at him, and never in his life 
had he practised with firearms. This instinctive horror 
had in early life caused him often to think about duel* 



ANNA KARENINA 59 

ing and to imagine himself obliged to expose his life to 
this danger. 

Afterward, when he had attained success and a high 
social position, he had got out of the way of such 
thoughts; but his habit of mind now reasserted itself, 
and his timidity, owing to his cowardice, was so great 
that Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch long deliberated about 
the matter, turning it over on all sides, and questioning 
the expediency of a* duel, although he knew perfectly 
well that in any case he would never fight. 

"Undoubtedly the state of our society is still so sav- 
age," he said, — "though it is not so in England, — 
that very many.... " 

And in these many, to whom such a solution was sat- 
isfactory, there were some for whose opinions Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch had the very highest regard. " Look- 
ing at the duel from its good side, to what result does it 
lead ? Let us suppose that I send a challenge ! " 

And Aleksef Aleksandrovitch went on to draw a 
vivid picture of the night that he would spend after the 
challenge; and he imagined the pistol aimed at him, 
and shuddered, and realized that he could never do 
such a thing. 

" Let us suppose that I challenge him to a duel ; let us 
suppose that I learn how to shoot," he forced himself 
to think, "that I am standing, that I pull the trigger," 
he said to himself, shutting his eyes, "and it. happens 
that I kill him ; " and he shook his head, to drive away 
these absurd notions. 

" What sense would there be in causing a man's death, 
in order to settle my relations to a sinful woman and her 
son ? Even then I should have to decide what I ought 
to do with her. But suppose — and this is vastly more 
likely to happen — that I am the one killed or wounded. 
I, an innocent man, the victim, killed or wounded ? Still 
more absurd ! But, moreover, would not the challenge 
to a duel on my part be a dishonorable action, certain as 
I am beforehand that my friends would never allow me 
to fight a duel ? would never permit the life of a gov- 
ernment official, who is so indispensable to Russia, to 



60 ANNA KARENINA 

be exposed to danger? What would happen? This 
would happen, that I, knowing in advance that the 
matter would never result in any danger, should seem 
to people to be anxious to win notoriety by a challenge. 
It would be dishonorable, it would be false, it would be 
an act of deception to others and to myself. A duel is 
not to be thought of, and no one expects it of me. My 
sole aim should be to preserve my reputation, and not 
to suffer.any unnecessary interruption of my activity." 

The service of the State, always important in the eyes 
of AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, now appeared to him of 
extraordinary importance. 

Having decided against the duel, Aleksei" Aleksandro- 
vitch began to discuss the question of divorce — a second 
expedient which had been employed by several of the 
men whom he had in mind. Calling to mind all the 
well-known examples of divorce — and there had been 
many in the very highest circles of society, as he well 
knew — he could not name a single case where the aim 
of the divorce had been such as he proposed. The 
husband in each case had sold or given up the faithless 
wife ; and the guilty party, who had no right to a second 
marriage, had entered into relations, imagined to be 
sanctioned, with a new husband. 

Alekself Aleksandrovitch saw that, in his case at least, 
legal divorce, whereby the faithless wife would be re- 
pudiated, was impossible. He saw that the complicated 
conditions of his life precluded the possibility of those 
coarse proofs which the law demanded for the establish- 
ment of a wife's guilt; he saw that the distinguished 
refinement of his life precluded the public use of such 
proofs, even if they existed, and that the public use of 
these proofs would cause him to fall lower in public 
opinion than the guilty wife. 

Divorce could only end in a scandalous lawsuit, which 
would be a godsend to his enemies and to lovers of 
gossip, and would degrade him from his high position 
in society. His principal object, the determination of 
his position with the least possible confusion, would not 
be attained by a divorce. 



ANNA KARENINA 61 

Divorce, moreover, broke off all intercourse between 
wife and husband, and united her to her paramour. 
Now in Aleksef Aleksandrovitch's heart, in spite of the 
scornful indifference which he affected to feel toward 
his wife, there still remained one very keen sentiment, 
and that was his unwillingness for her, unhindered, to 
unite her lot with Vronsky, so that her fault would turn 
out to her advantage. 

This possible contingency was so painful to Alekself 
Aleksandrovitch that, merely at the thought of it, he 
bellowed with mental pain ; and he got up from his 
seat, changed his place in the carriage, and for a long 
time, darkly scowling, wrapped his woolly plaid around 
his thin and chilly legs. 

" Besides formal divorce," he said to himself, as, 
growing a little calmer, he continued his deliberations, 
"it would be possible to act as Karibanof, Paskudin, 
and that gentle Dramm have done ; that is to say, I 
could separate from my wife." But this measure had 
almost the same disadvantages as the other : it was 
practically to throw his wife into Vronsky's arms. 

"No; it is impossible — impossible," he said aloud, 
again trying to wrap himself up in his plaid. " Icannot 
be unhappy, but neither she nor he ought to be happy." 

The feeling of jealousy which had tormented him 
while he was still ignorant had passed away when by 
his wife's words the aching tooth had been pulled ; but 
this feeling was replaced by a different one, — the desire 
not only that she should not triumph, but that she should 
receive the reward for her sin. He did not express it, 
but in the depths of his soul he desired that she should 
be punished for the way in which she had destroyed his 
peace and honor. 

After once more passing in review the conditions of 
the duel, the divorce, and the separation, and once more 
rejecting them, Alekself Aleksandrovitch came to the 
conclusion that there was only one way to escape from 
his trouble, and that was to keep his wife under his pro- 
tection, shielding his misfortune from the eyes of the 
world, employing all possible means to break off the 



62 ANNA KARENINA 

illicit relationship, and, above all — though he did not 
avow it to himself — punishing his wife's fault. 

" I must let her know that, in the cruel situation into 
which she has brought our family, I have come to the 
conclusion that the status quo is the only way that seems 
advisable for both sides, and that I will agree to pre- 
serve it under the strenuous condition that she on her 
part fulfil my will, and break off all relations with her 
paramour/' 

For the bolstering of this resolution when once he 
had finally adopted it, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch brought 
up one convincing argument: "Only by acting in this 
manner do I conform absolutely with the law of reli- 
gion," said he to himself ; " only by this reasoning do 
I .refuse to send away the adulterous woman ; and I 
give her the chance of amending her ways, and likewise, 
t*t*" painful as it will be to me, — I consecrate a part of 
my powers to her regeneration and salvation." 

Though Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch knew that he could 
have no moral influence over his wife, and that the 
attempts which he should make to reform his wife would 
have no other outcome than falsehood ; although during 
the trying moments that he had been living, he had not 
for an instant thought of finding his guidance in religion, 
— yet now, when he felt that his determination was in 
accordance with religion, this religious sanction of his 
resolution gave him full comfort and a certain share of 
satisfaction. He was consoled with the thought that in 
such a trying period of his life no one would have the 
right to say that ! he had not acted in conformity to the 
religion whose banner he bore aloft in the midst of cool- 
ness and indifference. 

As he went over in his mind the remotest contingen- 
cies, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch even saw no reason why 
his relations with his wife should not remain pretty 
much as they had always been. Of course, it would be 
impossible for him to feel great confidence in her; but 
he saw no reason why he should ruin his whole life, and 
suffer personally, because she was a bad and faithless 
wife. 



ANNA KARENINA 63 

" Yes, time will pass/' he said to himself, "time which 
solves all problems ; and our relations will be brought 
into the old order, so that I shall not feel the disorder 
that has broken up the current of my life. She must 
be unhappy, but I am not to blame, and so I do not see 
why I must be unhappy too." 



CHAPTER XIV 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch during his drive back to 
Petersburg not only fully decided on the line of conduct 
which he should adopt, but even composed in his head 
a letter to be sent to his wife. When he reached his 
Switzer's room, he glanced at .the official papers and 
letters which had been brought from the ministry, and 
ordered them to be brought into the library. 

" Shut the door, and let no one in," said he in reply to 
a question of the Swiss, emphasizing the last words — 
nye prinimaf — let no one in — with some satisfaction, 
which was an evident sign that he was in a better state 
of mind. 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch walked up and down the 
library once or twice, and then, coming to- his huge 
writing-table, on which his lackey, before going out, 
had placed six lighted candles, he cracked his fingers 
and sat down, and began to examine his writing-mate- 
rials. Then, leaning his elbow on the table, he bent his 
head to one side, and after a moment of reflection he 
began to write without the slightest hesitancy. He 
wrote in French without addressing her by name, em- 
ploying the pronoun voas, which has less coldness than 
the corresponding Russian word, vui, has. He wrote : — 

At our recent interview, I expressed the intention of com- 
municating to you my resolution concerning the subject of our 
conversation. Having carefully taken everything into considera- 
tion, I am writing now with the view of fulfilling my promise. 
This is my decision : whatever your conduct may have, been, 
I do not acknowledge that I have the right to break the bonds 
which a Power Supreme has consecrated. The family cannot 



64 ANNA KARENINA 

be broken up through a caprice, an arbitrary act, even through 
the crime of one of the parties ; and our lives must remain 
unchanged. This must be so for my sake, for your sake, for the 
sake of our son. I am fully persuaded that you have been re- 
pentant, that you still feel repentant for the deed that obliges 
me to write you ; that you will cooperate with me in destroy- 
ing root and branch the cause of our estrangement and in 
forgetting the past. 

In case this be not so, you r yourself must understand what 
awaits you and your son. In regard to all this I hope to have 
a more specific conversation at a personal interview. As the 
summer season is nearly over, I beg of you to come back to 
Petersburg as soon as possible — certainly not later than Tues- 
day. All the necessary measures for your return hither will be 
taken. I beg you to take notice that I attach a very particu- 
lar importance to your attention to my request. 

A. Karenin. 

P.S. I inclose in this letter money, which you may need 
at this particular time. 

He reread his letter, and was satisfied with it — espe- 
cially with the fact that he had thought of sending the 
money. There was not an angry word, not a reproach, 
neither was there any condescension in it. The essen- 
tial thing was the golden bridge for their reconciliation. 
He folded his letter, smoothed it with a huge paper- 
cutter of massive ivory, inclosed it in an envelop to- 
gether with the money, and rang the bell, feeling that 
sense of satisfaction which the use of his well-ordered, 
perfect epistolary arrangements always gave him. 

" Give this letter to the courier for delivery to Anna 
Arkadyevna at the datcha to-morrow," said he, and arose. 

" I will obey your excellency. 1 Will you have tea 
here in the library ? " 

Alekser Aleksandrovitch ordered tea brought to him 
in the library; and then, still playing with the paper- 
cutter, he went toward his arm-chair, near which were a 
shaded lamp and a French work on cuneiform inscrip- 
tions which he had begun. 

1 Vashe prevaskkoditydstvo. 



ANNA KARENINA 65 

Above the chair, in an oval gilt frame, hung a por- 
trait of Anna, the excellent work of a distinguished 
painter. Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch looked at it. The 
eyes, as inscrutable as they had been on the evening of 
their attempted explanation, looked down at him ironi- 
cally and insolently. Everything about this remarkable 
portrait seemed to AlekseK Aleksandrovitch insupport- 
ably insolent and provoking, from the black lace on her 
head and her dark hair, to the white, beautiful * hand 
and the ring-finger covered with jeweled rings. 

After gazing at this portrait for a moment, AlekseT 
Aleksandrovitch shuddered, his lips trembled, and with 
a " brr" he turned away. Hastily sitting down in his 
arm-chair, he opened his book. He tried to read, but he 
could not regain the keen interest which he had felt be- 
fore in the cuneiform inscriptions. His eyes looked at 
the book, but his thoughts were elsewhere. He was 
thinking, not of his wife, but of a complication which 
had recently arisen in important matters connected with 
his official activity, and which at present formed the 
chief interest of his service. He felt that he was more 
deeply than ever plunged into this complicated affair, 
and that he could without self-conceit claim that the 
idea which had originated in his brain was bound to 
disentangle the whole difficulty, to confirm him in his 
official career, put down his enemies, and thus enable 
him to do a signal service to the State. As soon as his 
servant had brought his tea, and left the room, AlekseK 
Aleksandrovitch got up and went to his writing-table. 
Pushing to the center of it a portfolio which contained 
papers relating to this affair, he seized a pencil from 
the stand, and, with a faintly sarcastic smile of self-sat- 
isfaction, buried himself in the perusal of the documents 
relative to the complicated business under considera- 
tion. 

The complication was as follows: The distinguish- 
ing trait of Aleksef Aleksandrovitch as a government 
official, — the one characteristic trait peculiar to him 
alone, though it must mark every progressive chinov- 
nik, — the trait which had contributed to his success 
VOL. n. — 5 



66 ANNA KARENINA 

no less than his eager ambition, his moderation, his 
uprightness, and his self-confidence, was his detesta- 
tion of "red tape," and his sincere desire to avoid, 
as far as he could, unnecessary writing, and to go 
straight on in accomplishing needful business with all 
expedition and economy. It happened that, in the 
famous Commission of the 14th of June, a project was 
mooted for the irrigation of the fields in the government 
of ZaraT, which formed a part of Alekse'i Aleksandro- 
vitch's jurisdiction ; and this project offered a striking 
example of the few results obtained by official corre- 
spondence and expenditure. 

Aleksef Aleksandrovitch knew that it was a worthy 
object. The matter of the irrigation of the fields in the 
government of Zara'f had come to him by inheritance 
from his predecessor in the ministry, and, in fact, had al- 
ready cost much money and brought no results. When 
Aleksef' Aleksandrovitch entered the ministry, he had 
perceived this, and had wanted immediately to put his 
hand to this work ; but at first he did not feel himself 
strong enough and perceived that it touched too many 
interests and was imprudent, and afterward, having 
become involved in other matters, he entirely forgot 
about it. 

The fertilization of the Zaraif fields, like all things, 
went in its own way by force of inertia. Many people 
got their living through it, and one family in particu- 
lar, a very agreeable and musical family — all of the 
daughters of which played on stringed instruments. 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch knew this family, and had 
been nuptial godfather 1 when one of the elder daugh- 
ters was married. 

The opposition to this affair, raised by his enemies in 
another branch of the ministry, was unjust, in the opin- 
ion of Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, because in every min- 
istry there are similar cases which by a well-known rule 
of official etiquette no one ever bothers himself about 
But now, since they had thrown down the gauntlet, he 

1 Posazhonnui otyets, — a man who takes the father's place in the Rus- 
sian wedding ceremony. 



ANNA KARENINA 67 

had boldly accepted the challenge and asked for the 
appointment of a special commission for examining and 
verifying the labors of the commissioners on the fertili- 
zation of the ZaraV fields ; and this did not prevent him 
from also keeping these gentlemen busy in other ways. 
He had also demanded a special commission for in- 
vestigating the status and organization of the foreign 
populations. 

This last question had likewise been raised by the 
Commission of June 14, and was energetically supported 
by Aleksei* Aleksandrovitch, on the ground that no de- 
lay should be allowed in relieving the deplorable situa- 
tion of these alien tribes. 

In committee this matter gave rise to the most lively 
discussions among the ministries. The ministry hostile 
to Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch proved that the position of 
the foreign populations was perfectly flourishing; that 
to meddle with them would be to injure their well-being; 
and that, if any fault could be found in regard to the 
matter, it was due to the neglect of Aleksei Aleksandro- 
vitch and his ministry, in not carrying out the measures 
prescribed by law. 

Now Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch had made up his mind 
to demand : first, the appointment of a new committee, 
whose duty should be to study on the spot the condi- 
tion of the foreign populations ; secondly, in case their 
condition should be found such as the official data in 
the hands of the committee represented, that a new 
scientific commission should be sent to study into the 
causes of this sad state of things, with the aim of set- 
tling it from the (a) political, (d) administrative, (c) 
economical, (d) ethnographical, (e) physical, and (/) 
religious point of view ; thirdly, that the hostile min- 
istry should be required to furnish the particulars in 
regard to the measures taken during the last ten years 
to relieve the wretched situation in which these tribes 
were placed ; and fourthly and finally, that this minis- 
try should explain the fact that they had acted in 
absolute contradiction to the fundamental and organic 
law, Volume T, page 18, with reference to Article 36, 



68 ANNA KARENINA 

as was proved by an act of the committee under num- 
bers 17,015 and 18,308 of the 17th of December, 1863, 
and the 19th of June, 1864. 

A flush of animation covered Alekse'f Aleksandro- 
vitch's face as he rapidly wrote down for his own use 
a digest of these thoughts. After he had covered a 
sheet of paper, he rang a bell, and sent a messenger 
to the director of the chancelry, asking for a few data 
which were missing. Then he got up, and began to 
walk up and down the room, looking again at the 
portrait with a frown and a scornful smile. Then he 
resumed his book about the cuneiform inscriptions, and 
found that his interest of the evening before had come 
back to him. He went to bed about eleven o'clock; 
and as he lay, still awake, he passed in review the affair 
with his wife, and it no longer appeared to him in the 
same gloomy aspect 



CHAPTER XV 

Though Anna had obstinately and angrily contra- 
dicted Vronsky when he told her that her position was 
impossible, yet in the bottom of her heart she felt that 
it was false and dishonorable, and she longed with all 
her soul to escape from it. When, in a moment of agi- 
tation, she avowed all to her husband as they were re- 
turning from the races, notwithstanding the pain which 
it cost her, she felt glad. After AlekseX Aleksandro- 
vitch left her, she kept repeating to herself that she 
was glad, that now all was explained, and that hence- 
forth there would be at least no more need of falsehood 
and deception. It seemed to her indubitable that now 
her position would be henceforth determined. It might 
be bad, but it would be definite, and there would be an 
end to lying and equivocation. The pain which her 
words had cost her husband and herself would have 
its compensation, she thought, in the fact that now all 
would be definite. 
. That very evening Vronsky came to see her, but she 



ANNA KARENINA 69 

did not tell him what had taken place between her hus- 
band and herself, although it was needful to tell him, in 
order that the affair might be definitely settled. 

The next morning, when she awoke, her first memory 
was of the words that she had spoken to her husband ; 
and they seemed to her so odious, that she could not im- 
agine now how she could have brought herself to say 
such strange brutal words, and she could not conceive 
what the result of them would be. But the words were 
irrevocable, and AlekseY Aleksandrovitch had departed 
without replying. 

" I have seen Vronsky since, and I did not tell him. 
Even at the moment he went away, I wanted to hold 
him back and to tell him ; but I postponed it because I 
felt how strange it was that I did not tell him at the 
first moment. Why did I have the desire, and yet not 
speak ? " 

And, in reply to this question, the hot flush of shame 
kindled in her face. She realized that it was shame that 
kept her from speaking. Her position, which the even- 
ing before had seemed to her so clear, suddenly pre- 
sented itself as very far from clear, as inextricable. She 
began to fear the dishonor about which she had not 
thought before. When she considered what her hus- 
band might do to her, the most terrible ideas came to 
her mind. It occurred to her that at any instant the 
steward 1 might appear to drive her out of house and 
home, and that her shame might be proclaimed to all 
the world. She asked herself where she could go if 
they drove her from home, and she found no answer. . 

When she thought of Vronsky, she imagined that he 
did not love her, and that he was already beginning to 
tire of her, and that she could not impose herself on 
him, and she felt angry with him. It seemed to her 
that the words which she spoke to her husband, and 
which she incessantly repeated to herself, were spoken 
so that everybody could hear them, and had heard them. 
She could not bring herself to look in the faces of those 
with whom she lived. She could not bring herself to 

1 Upravlyayushchy. 



7 o ANNA KARENINA 

ring for her maid, and still less to go down and meet 
her son and his governess. 

The maid came, and stood long at the door, listening ; 
finally she decided to go to her without a summons. Anna 
looked at her questioningly, and in her terror she blushed. 
The maid apologized for coming, saying that she thought 
she heard the bell. She brought a gown and a note. 
The note was from Betsy. Betsy reminded her that 
Liza Merkalova and the Baroness Stolz with their 
adorers, Kaluzhsky and the old man Stremof, were com- 
ing to her house that morning for a game of croquet. 
" Come and look on, please, as a study of manners. I 
shall expect you," was the conclusion of the note. 

Anna read the letter, and sighed profoundly. 

" Nothing, nothing, I need nothing/' said she to An- 
nushka, who was arranging the brushes and toilet articles 
on her dressing-table. " Go away. I will dress myself 
immediately, and come down. I need nothing." 

Annushka went out ; yet Anna did not begin to dress, 
but sat in the same attitude, with bent head and folded 
hands ; and occasionally she would shiver, and begin to 
make some gesture, to say something, and then fall back 
into listlessness again. She kept saying, " Bozhe mo'i ! 
Bozhe mo'i!" 2 but the words had no meaning in her 
mind. The thought of seeking a refuge from her situa- 
tion in religion, although she never doubted the faith in 
which she had been trained, seemed to her as strange as 
to go and ask help of Alekser Aleksandrovitch him- 
self. She knew beforehand that the refuge offered by 
religion was possible only by the absolute renunciation 
of ail that constituted for her the meaning of life. She 
suffered, and was frightened besides, by a sensation that 
was new to her experience hitherto, and which seemed 
to her to take possession of her inmost soul. She seemed 
to feel double, just as sometimes eyes, when weary, see 
double. She knew not what she feared, what she de- 
sired. She knew not whether she feared and desired 
what had passed or what was to come, and what she 
desired she did not know. 

i Literally, " My God." 



ANNA KARENINA 71 

" Oh ! what am I doing ? " she cried, suddenly feel- 
ing a pain in both temples; and she discovered that 
she had taken her hair in her two hands, and was pull- 
ing it. She got up, and began to walk the floor. 

" The coffee is served, and Mamzel and Serozha are 
waiting," said Ahnushka, coming in again, and finding 
her mistress in the same condition as before. 

"Serozha? what is Serozha doing," suddenly asked 
Anna, remembering, for the first time that morning, the 
existence of her son. 

" He has been naughty, I think," said Annushka, 
with a smile. 

" How naughty ? " 

"You had some peaches in the corner cupboard; he 
took one, and ate it on the sly, it seems." 

The thought of her son suddenly called Anna from 
the impassive state in which she had been sunk. She 
remembered the partly sincere, though somewhat ex- 
aggerated, role of devoted mother, which she had taken 
on herself for a number of years, and she felt with joy 
that in this relationship she had a standpoint indepen- 
dent of her relation to her husband and Vronsky. 
This standpoint was — her son. In whatever situation 
she might be placed, she could not give him up. Her 
husband might drive her from him, and put her to 
shame ; Vronsky might turn his back on ' her, and 
resume his former independent life, — and here again 
she thought of him with a feeling of anger and reproach, 
— but she could not leave her son. She had an aim 
in life ; and she must act, act so as to safeguard this 
relation toward her son, so that they could not take 
him from her. She must act as speedily as possible 
before they took him from her. She must take her 
son and go off. That was the one thing which she 
now had to do. She must calm herself, and get away 
from this tormenting situation. The very thought of 
an action having reference to her son, and of going 
away with him anywhere, anywhere, already gave her 
consolation. 

She dressed in haste, went down-stairs, and with firm 



72 ANNA KARENINA 

steps entered the drawing-room, where, as usual, she 
found lunch ready, and Serozha and the governess wait- 
ing for her. Serozha, all in white, was standing near 
a table under the mirror, with the expression of con- 
centrated attention which she knew so well, and in 
which he resembled his father. Bending over, he was 
busy with some flowers which he had brought in. 

The governess had a very stern expression. Serozha, 
as soon as he saw his mother, uttered a sharp cry, 
which was a frequent custom of his, — " Ah, mammal " 
Then he stopped, undecided whether to throw down 
the flowers and run to his mother, and let the flowers 
go, or to finish his bouquet and take it to her. 

The governess bowed, and began a long and circum- 
stantial account of the naughtiness that Serozha had 
committed ; but Anna did not hear her. She was 
thinking whether she should take her with them. 

"No, I will not," she decided; "I will go alone with 
my son." 

"Yes, that was very naughty," said Anna; and, tak- 
ing the boy by, the shoulder, she looked with a gentle, 
not angry, face at the confused but happy boy, and 
kissed him. " Leave him with me," said she to the 
wondering governess ; and, not letting go his arm, she 
sat down at the table where the coffee was waiting. 

" Mamma .... I .... I .... did n't ...." stammered Serozha, 
trying to judge by his mother's expression what fate was 
in store for him for having pilfered the peach. 

"Serozha," she said, as soon as the governess had 
left the room, " that was naughty. You will not do it 
again, will you?.... Do you love me?" 

She felt that the tears were standing in her eyes. 
"Why can I not love him?" she asked herself, study- 
ing the boy's frightened and yet happy face. " And 
can he join with his father to punish me ? Will he not 
have pity on me?" 

The tears began to course down her face ; and, in 
order to hide them, she rose up quickly, and hastened, 
almost ran, to the terrace. 

Clear, cool weather had succeeded the stormy rains 



ANNA KARENINA 73 

of the last few days. In spite of the warm sun which 
shone on the thick foliage of the trees, it was cool in 
the shade. 

She shivered both from the coolness and from the 
sentiment of fear which in the cool air seized her with 
new force. 

" Go, go and find Mariette," said she to Serozha, who 
had followed her ; and then she began to walk up and 
down on the straw carpet which covered the terrace. 
" Will they not forgive me ? " she asked herself. "Will 
they not understand that all this could not possibly have 
been otherwise ? " 

As she stopped and looked at the top of the aspens 
waving in the wind, with their freshly washed leaves 
glittering brightly in the cool sunbeams, it seemed to 
her that they would not forgive her, that all, that every- 
thing, would be as pitiless toward her as that sky and 
that foliage. And again she felt that mysterious sense 
in her inmost soul that she was in a dual state. 

" I must not, must not think," she said to herself. 
" I must have courage. Where shall .1 go ? When ? 
Whom shall I take ? Yes ! to Moscow by the evening 
train, with Annushka and Serozha and only the most 
necessary things. But first I must write to them both." 

She hurried back into the house to her boudoir, sat 
down at the table, and wrote her husband : — 

After what has passed, I cannot longer remain in your house. 
I am going away, and I shall take my son. I do not know the 
laws, and so I do not know with which of his parents the child 
should remain ; but I take him with me, because I cannot live 
without him. Be magnanimous ; let me have him. 

Up to this point she wrote rapidly and . naturally ; 
but this appeal to a magnanimity which she had never 
seen in him, and the need of ending her letter with 
something affecting, brought her to a halt. 

" I cannot speak of my fault and my repentance, 
because...." Again she stopped, unable to find the 
right words to express her thoughts. " No," she said, 
" nothing more is necessary ; " and, tearing up this 



74 ANNA KARENINA 

letter, she began another, from which she left out any 
appeal to his generosity, and sealed it. 

She had to write a second letter, to Vronsky. 

" I have confessed to my husband," she began ; and 
she sat long wrapped in thought, without being able to 
write more. That was so coarse, so unfeminine ! " And 
then, what can I write to him?" she asked herself. 
Again the crimson of shame mantled her face as she 
remembered how calm he was, and she felt so vexed 
with him that she tore the sheet of paper with its one 
phrase into little bits. " I cannot write," she said to 
herself ; and, closing her desk, she went up-stairs, told 
the governess and the domestics that she was going to 
Moscow that evening, and instantly began to make her 
preparations. 

CHAPTER XVI 

In all the rooms of the villa, the men-servants, the 
gardeners, the lackeys, were hurrying about laden with 
various things. Cupboards and commodes were cleared 
of their contents. Twice they had gone to the shop for 
packing-cord ; on the floor lay piles of newspapers. 
Two trunks, » traveling-bags, and a bundle of plaids 
had been carried into the anteroom. A carriage and 
two cabs were waiting at the front door. Anna, who in 
the haste of packing had somewhat forgotten her in- 
ward anguish, was standing by her table in her boudoir 
and packing her bag, when Annushka called her atten- 
tion to the rumble of a carriage approaching the house. 

Anna looked out of the window, and saw on the 
steps Alekse* Aleksandrovitch's messenger-boy ringing 
the front-door bell. 

" Go and see what it is," said she, and then sat down 
in her chair and, folding her hands on her knees, 
waited with calm resignation. A lackey brought her 
a fat packet directed in Alekseif Aleksandrovitch's 
handwriting. 

"The messenger was ordered to wait an answer/' 
said he. 



ANNA KARENINA 75 

"Very well," she replied; and as soon as he left the 
room she opened the packet with trembling fingers. A 
roll of fresh, new bank-notes, in a wrapper, fell out first. 
She unfolded the letter and began to read it at the end. 
"All the necessary measures for your return hither 

will be taken I attach a very particular importance 

to your attention to my request," she read. 

She ran it through hastily backwards, a second time, 
read it all through, and then she read it again from 
beginning to end. When she had finished it, she felt 
chilled, and had the consciousness that some terrible 
and unexpected misfortune was crushing her. 

That very morning she had regretted her confession 
to her husband, and desired nothing so much as that she 
had not spoken those words. And this letter treated 
her words as if they had hot been spoken, gave her 
what she desired. And yet it seemed to her more 
cruel than anything that she could have imagined. 

''Right, he is right!" she murmured. "Of course 
he is always right ; he is a Christian, he is magnani- 
mous ! Yes, the low, vile man ! No one understands, 
no one knows him but me; and I cannot explain it 
People say, ' He is a religious, moral, honorable, intel- 
lectual man.' But they have not seen what I have 
seen ; they do not know how for eight years he has 
crushed my life, crushed everything that was vital in 
me ; how he has never once thought of me as a living 
woman who needed love. They don't know how at 
every step he has insulted me, and yet remained self- 
satisfied. Have I not striven, striven with all my 
powers, to find a justification of my life ? ' Have I not 
done my best to love him, to love his son when I could 
not love my husband? But the time came when I 
found I could no longer deceive myself, that I am a 
living being, that I am not to blame, that God has 
made me so, that I must love and live. And now what ? 
He might kill me, he might kill Aim, and I could endure 
it, I could forgive it. But no, he.... 

" Why should I not have foreseen what he would do ? 
He does exactly in accordance with his despicably qhar- 



76 ANNA KARENINA 

acter; he stands on his rights. But I, poor unfortunate, 
am sunk lower and more irreclaimably than ever toward 
ruin. ' You may surmise what awaits you and your son? " 
she repeated to herself, remembering a sentence in his 
letter. "It is a threat that he means to rob me of my 
son, and doubtless their wretched laws allow it. But, 
do I not see why he said that ? He has no belief in my 
love for my son ; or else he is deriding, — as he always 
does, in his sarcastic manner, — is deriding this feeling 
of mine, for he knows that I will not abandon my son — 
I cannot abandon him ; that without my son, life would 
be unsupportable, even with him whom I love ; and that 
to abandon my son, and leave him, I should fall like the 
worst of women. This he knows, and knows that I 
should never have the power to do so. 

" ' Our lives must remain unchanged? " she continued, 
remembering another sentence in the letter. "This 
life was a torture before ; but of late it has grown worse 
than ever. What will it be now ? And he knows all 
this, — knows that I cannot repent because I breathe, 
because I love; he knows that nothing except falsehood 
and deceit can result from this : but he must needs pro- 
long my torture. I know him, and I know that he 
swims in perjury like a fish in water. But no; I will 
not give him this pleasure. I will break this network of 
lies in which he wants to enwrap me. Come what may; 
anything is better than lies and deception. 

"But how? Bozhe mof! Bozhe molf! Was there 
ever woman so unhappy as I ? .... 

" No, I will break it ! I will break it ! " she cried, 
springing to her feet and striving to keep back the tears. 
And she went to her writing-table to begin another 
letter to him. But in the lowest depths of her soul she 
felt that she had not the power to break the network of 
circumstances, — that she had not the power to escape 
from the situation in which she was placed, false and 
dishonorable though it was. 

She sat down at the table ; but, instead of writing, 
she folded her arms on the table, and bowed her head 
on them, and began to weep like a* child, with heaving 



ANNA KARENINA 77 

breast and convulsive sobs. She wept because her 
visions about an explanation, about a settlement of her 
position, had vanished forever. She knew that now all 
things would go on as before, and even worse than be- 
fore. She felt that her position in society, which she 
had slighted, and even that morning counted as dross, 
was dear to her ; that she should never have the 
strength to abandon it for the shameful position of a 
woman who has deserted her husband and son and 
joined her lover ; she felt that in spite of all her efforts 
she should never be stronger than herself. She never 
would know what freedom to love meant, but would be 
always a guilty woman, constantly under the threat of 
detection, deceiving her husband for the disgraceful so- 
ciety of an independent stranger, with whose life she 
could never join hers. She knew that this would be so, 
and yet at the same time it was so terrible that she could 
not acknowledge, even to herself, how it would end. 
And she wept, unrestrainedly as a child who has been 
punished sobs. 

The steps of a lackey approaching brought her to 
herself; and, hiding from him her face, she pretended 
to be writing. 

" The courier would like his answer," said the 
lackey. 

" His answer ? Oh, yes ! " said Anna. " Let him 
wait. I will ring." 

"What can I write?" she asked herself. "How 
decide by myself alone? What do I know? What do 
I want ? Whom do I love ? " 

Again it seemed to her that in her soul she felt the 
dual nature. She was alarmed at this feeling, and 
seized on the first pretext for activity that presented 
itself so that she might be freed from thoughts about 
herself. 

" I must see Alekse'f " (thus in thought she called 
Vronsky); "he alone can tell me what I must do. I 
will go to Betsy's. Perhaps I shall find him there." 

She completely forgot that on the evening before, 
when she told him that she was not going to the Prin- 



78 ANNA KARENINA 

qqss Tverskaya's, he said that in that case he should 
not go there either. 

She went to the table again, and wrote her husband: — 

I have received your letter. 

A. 

She rang, and gave it to the lackey. 

" We are not going/' said she to Annushka, who was 
just coming in. 

•"Not going at all?" 

"No; but don't unpack before to-morrow, and have 
the carriage wait. I am going to the princess's." 

" What gown shall you wear ? " 



CHAPTER XVII 

The croquet party to which the Princess Tverskaya 
invited Anna was to consist of two ladies and their 
adorers. These two ladies were the leading represen- 
tatives of a new and exclusive Petersburg clique, called, 
in imitation of an imitation, les sept merveilles du monde f 
the seven wonders of the world. Both of them be- 
longed to the highest society, but to a circle absolutely 
hostile to that in which Anna moved. Moreover, old 
Strerqof, one of the influential men of the city, and 
Liza Merkalof's lover, was in the service of AlekseK 
Aleksandrovitch's enemies, From all these considera- 
tions Anna did not care to go to Betsy's, and her refusal 
called forth the hints in the Princess Tverskaya's note; 
but now she decided to go, hoping to find Vronsky 
there. 

She reached the Princess Tverskaya's before the other 
guests. 

Just as she arrived Vronsky's lackey, with his well- 
combed side-whiskers, like a kammer-junker y was at 
the door. Raising his cap, be stepped aside to let her 
pass. Anna recognized him and only then remembered 
that Vronsky had told her that he was not coming. 
Undoubtedly he had sent him with his excuses. 



ANNA KARENINA 79 

As she was taking off her wraps in the anteroom 
she heard the lackey, who rolled his R's like a kammer- 
junker^ say, " From the count to the princess," at the 
same time he delivered his note. 

She wanted to ask him where his barin was. She 
wanted to go back and write him a note, asking him to 
come to her, or to go and find him herself. But She 
could not follow out any of these plans, for the bell 
had already announced her presence, and one of the 
princess's lackeys was waiting at the door to usher her 
into the rooms beyond* 

" The princess is in the garden. Word has been sent 
to her. Would you not like to step out into the gar* 
den ? " said a second lackey in the second room. 

Her position of uncertainty, of darkness, was just the 
same as at home. It was even worse, because she 
could not make any decision, she could not see Vronsky, 
and she was obliged to remain in the midst of a com- 
pany of strangers diametrically opposed to her present 
mood. But she wore a toilet which she knew was very 
becoming. She was not alone, she was surrounded by that 
solemn atmosphere of indolence so familiar; and on the 
whole it was better to be there than at home. She was 
not obliged to think what she would do. Things would 
arrange themselves. 

Betsy came to meet her in a white toilet absolutely 
stunning in its elegance ; and Anna greeted her, as 
usual, with a smile. The Princess Tverskaya was ac- 
companied by Tushkievitch and a young relative who, 
to the great delight of the provincial family to which 
she belonged, was spending the summer with the famous 
princess. 

Apparently there was something unnatural in Anna's 
appearance, for Betsy immediately remarked it. 

" I did not sleep well," replied Anna, looking furtively 
at the lackey, who was coming; as she supposed, to 
bring Vronsky's note to the princess. 

" How glad I am that you came ! " said Betsy. " I 
am just up, and I should like to have a cup of tea before 
the others come. And you," she said, addressing Tush- 



80 ANNA KARENINA 

kievitch, " had better go with Maska and try the krokeU 
gro-und, which has just been clipped. You and I will 
have time to have a little confidential talk while taking our 
tea. We '11 have a cozy chat, won't we ? " she added in 
English, addressing Anna with a smile, and taking her 
hand, in which she held a sunshade. 

" All the more willingly because I cannot stay long. 
I must call on old Vrede ; I have been promising for 
a hundred years to come and see her," said Anna, to 
whom the lie, though contrary to her nature, seemed 
not only simple and easy, but even pleasurable. Why 
she said a thing which she forgot the second after, she 
herself could not have told ; she said it at haphazard, 
so that, in case Vronsky were not coming, she might 
have a way of escape, and try to find him elsewhere ; 
and why she happened to select the name of old 
Freflina Vrede rather than any other of her acquain- 
tances was likewise inexplicable. But, as events proved, 
out of all the possible schemes for meeting Vronsky, 
she could not have chosen a better. 

"No, I shall not let you go," replied Betsy, scruti- 
nizing Anna's face. " Indeed, if I were not so fond of 
you, I should be tempted to be vexed with you ; any- 
body -would think that you were afraid of my company 
compromising you. — Tea in the little parlor, if you 
please," said she to the lackey, blinking her eyes, as 
was habitual with her ; and, taking the letter from 
him, she began to read it. 

" Alekse'f disappoints us," 2 said she in French. " He 
writes that he cannot come," she added, in a tone as 
simple and unaffected as if it had never entered her 
mind that Vronsky was of any more interest to Anna 
than as a possible partner in a game of croquet. Anna 
knew that Betsy knew all ; but, as she heard Betsy 
speak of Vronsky now, she almost brought herself to 
believe for a moment that she knew nothing. 

"Ah!" she said indifferently, as if it was a detail 
which did not interest her. " How," she continued, 
still smiling, "could your society compromise anyone?" 

1 Alexis nous fait faux bond. 



ANNA KARENINA 81 

This manner of playing with words, this hiding a 
secret, had a great charm for Anna, as it has for all 
women. And it was not the necessity of secrecy, or 
the reason for secrecy, but the process itself, that gave 
the pleasure. 

"I cannot be more Catholic than the Pope/' she said, 
" Stremof and Liza Merkalof, they are the cream of the 
cream of society. They are received everywhere. But 
/" — she laid special stress on the/ — "/have never 
been severe and intolerant. I simply have not had 
time." 

" No. But perhaps you prefer not to meet Stremof ? 
Let him break lances with Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch in 
committee-meetings ; that does not concern us. But in 
society he is as lovely a man as I know, and a passion- 
ate lover of croquet. But you shall see him. And you 
must see how admirably he conducts himself in his 
ridiculous position as Liza's aged lover. He is very 
charming. Don't you know Safo Stoltz? She is the 
latest, absolutely the latest style." 

While Betsy was saying all this, Anna perceived, by 
her joyous, intelligent eyes, that she saw her embarrass- 
ment and was trying to put her at her ease. They had 
gone into the little boudoir. 

" By the way, I must write a word to AlekseY." 

And Betsy sat down at her writing-table, hastily 
penned a few lines, and inclosed them in an envelop. 
" I wrote him to come to dinner. One of the ladies 
who is going to be here has no gentleman. See if I 
am imperative enough. Excuse me if I leave you a 
moment. Please seal it and direct it," said she at the 
door, " I have some arrangements to make." 

Without a moment's hesitation, Anna took Betsy's 
seat at the table, and, without reading her note, added 
these words : — 

I must see you without fail. Come to the Vrede's Garden. 
I will be there at six o'clock. 

She sealed the letter ; and Betsy, coming a moment 
later, despatched it at once. 

VOL. n. — 6 



82 ANNA KARENINA 

The two ladies took their tea at a little table in the 
cool boudoir, and had indeed a cozy chat as the princess 
had promised, until the arrival of her guests. They 
expressed their judgments on them, beginning with 
Liza Merkalof. 

" She is very charming, and she has always been 
.congenial to me," said Anna. 

" You ought to like her. She adores you. Yesterday 
evening, after the races, she came to see me, and was 
in despair not to find you. She says that you are a 
genuine heroine of a romance, and that if she were 
a man, she would Commit a thousand follies for your 
sake. Stremof told her she did that, even as she was." 
* " But please tell me one thing I never could under- 
stand," said Anna, after a moment of silence, and in a 
tone which clearly showed that she did not ask an idle 
question but that what she wanted explained was more 
important, to her than would appear. " Please tell me, 
what are the relations between her and Prince Kaluzh- 
sky, the man they call Mishka ? I have rarely seen 
them together. What are their relations ? " 

A smile came into Betsy's eyes, and she looked keenly 
at Anna. 

"It's a new kind," she replied. "All these ladies 
have adopted it. They Ve thrown their caps behind the 
mill. But there are ways and ways of throwing them." 

"Yes, but what are her relations with Kaluzhsky ? " 

Betsy, to Ann'a*s surprise, broke into a gale of irresisti- 
ble laughter, which was an unusual thing with her. 

"But you ate trespassing on the Princess Miagkaya's 
prbvince; it is the question of an enfant terrible" said 
Betsy, trying in vain to restrain her gayety, but again 
breaking out into' that contagious laughter which is the 
peculiarity of people who rarely laugh. " But you must 
ask them," she at length managed to say, with the tears 
running down her cheeks., 

" Well ! you laugh," said Anna, in spite of herself 
joining in her friend's amusement; "but I never could 
understand it at all, and I don't understand what part 
the husband plays." 



ANNA KARENINA 83 

" The husband ? Liza Merkalof's husband carries 
her plaid for her, and is always at her beck and call. 
But the real meaning of the affair no one cares to know. 
You know that in good society people don't speak and 
don't even think of certain details of the toilet; well, it 
is the same here." 

" Are you going to Rolandaki's fite?" asked Anna, 
to change the conversation. 

" I don't think so," replied Betsy; and, not looking at 
her companion, she carefully poured the fragrant tea 
into little transparent cups. Then, having handed one 
to Anna, she rolled a cigarette, and, putting it into a 
silver holder, she began to smoke. 

"You see, I am in a fortunate position," she began 
seriously, holding her cup in her hand. "I understand 
you, and I understand Liza. Liza is one of these naive, 
childlike natures, who cannot distinguish between ill and 
good, — at least, she was so when she was young, and 
now she knows that this simplicity is becoming to her. 
Now perhaps she purposely fails to understand the dis- 
tinction," said Betsy, with a sly smile. "But all the 
same, it becomes her. You see, it is quite possible to 
look on things from a tragic standpoint, and to get tor- 
ment out of them; and it is possible to look on it sim- 
ply, and even gayly. Possibly you are inclined to look 
on things too tragically." 

" How I should like to know others as well as I know 
myself!" said Anna, with a serious and pensive look. 
" Am I worse than others, or better? Worse, I think." 

" You are an enfant terrible, an enfant tenible" was 
Betsy's comment. " But here they are ! " 



CHAPTER XVIII 

Steps were heard, and a man's voice, then a woman's 
voice and laughter, and immediately after the expected 
guests came in : Safo Stoltz, and a young man called 
Vaska, whose face shone with exuberant health. It was 
evident that rich blood-making beef, burgundy, and truffles 



84 ANNA KARENINA 

had accomplished their work. Vaska bowed to the two 
ladies and glanced at them, but only for a second. He 
followed Safo into the drawing-room, and he followed 
her through the drawing-room, as if he had been tied to 
her, and he kept his brilliant eyes fastened on her as if 
he wished to devour her. Safo Stoltz was a blond with 
black eyes. She wore shoes with enormously high heels, 
and she came in with slow, vigorous steps, and shook 
hands with the ladies energetically, like a man. 

Anna had never before met with this new celebrity, 
and was struck, not only by her beauty, but by the ex- 
travagance of her toilet and the boldness of her man- 
ners. On her head was a veritable scaffolding of false 
and natural hair of a lovely golden hue, and of a height 
corresponding to the mighty proportions of her protu- 
berant and very visible bosom. Her dress was so tightly 
pulled back, that at every movement it outlined the 
shape of her knees and thighs ; and involuntarily the 
question arose : Where, under this enormous, tottering 
mountain, did her neat little body, so exposed above, 
and so tightly laced below, really end ? 

Betsy made haste to introduce her to Anna. 

" Can you imagine it ? We almost ran over two 
soldiers," she instantly began to relate, winking, smiling, 
and kicking back her train, which she in turn threw too 
far over to the other side. " I was coming with Vaska 
.... oh, yes ! You are not acquainted." And she intro- 
duced the young man by his family name, laughing 
heartily at her mistake in calling him Vaska before 
strangers. Vaska bowed a second time to Anna, but 
said nothing to her. He turned to Safo. 

"The wager is lost. We came first," said he, smiling. 
"You must pay." 

Safo laughed still more gayly. 

" Not now, though," said she. 

"All right; I '11 take it by and by." 

"Very well, very well! Oh, by the way!" she sud- 
denly cried out to the hostess. " I .... forgot ....stupid 
that I was ! I bring you a guest ; here he is." 

The young guest whom Safo presented, after having 



ANNA KARENINA 85 

forgotten him, was a guest of such importance that, not- 
withstanding his youth, all the ladies rose to receive him. 

This was Safo's new adorer; and, just as Vaska did, 
he followed her every step. 

Immediately after came Prince Kaluzhsky and Liza 
Merkalof with Stremof. Liza was a rather thin brunette, 
with an Oriental, indolent type of countenance, and with 
ravishing, and as everybody said, inscrutable eyes. The 
style of her dark dress was absolutely in keeping with 
her beauty. Anna noticed it, and approved. Liza 
was as quiet and unpretentious as Safo was loud and 
obstreperous. 

But Liza, for Anna's taste, was vastly more attractive. 
Betsy, in speaking of her to Anna, had ridiculed her 
affectation of the manner of an innocent child; but 
when Anna saw her, she 'felt that this was not fair. 
Liza was really an innocent, gentle, and irresponsible 
woman, a little spoiled. To be sure, her morals were 
the same as Safo's. She also had in her train, as if 
sewed to her, two adorers, one young, the other old, 
who devoured her with their eyes. But there was some- 
thing about her better than her surroundings; she was 
like a diamond of the purest water surrounded by glass. 
The brilliancy shone out of her lovely, enigmatical eyes. 
The wearied and yet passionate look of her eyes, sur- 
rounded by dark circles, struck one by its absolute sin- 
cerity. Any one looking into their depths would think 
that he knew her completely ; and to know her was to 
love her. At the sight of Anna, her whole face sud- 
denly lighted up with a happy smile. 

" Oh ! How glad I am to see you ! " she said, as she 
went up to her. " Yesterday afternoon at the races I 
wanted to get to you, but you had just gone. I was so 
anxious to see you yesterday especially ! Too bad, 
was n't it ? " said she, gazing at Anna with a look which 
seemed to disclose her whole soul. 

"Yes! I never would have believed that anything 
could be so exciting," replied Anna, with some color. 

The company now began to get ready to go to the 
lawn. 



86 ANNA KARENINA 

" I am not going/' said Liza, sitting down near Anna. 
" You are n't going, are you ? What- pleasure can any 
one find in croquet ?" 

" But I am very fond of it," said Anna. 

" There ! how is it that you don't get ennuyie ? To 
look at you is a joy. You live, but I vegetate.'' 

" How vegetate ? Why ! they say you have the gay- 
est society in Petersburg," said Anna. 

. " Perhaps those who are not of our circle are still 
more ennuyie. But we, it seems to me, are not happy, 
but are bored, terribly bored." 

Safo lighted a cigarette, and went to the lawn with 
the two young men. Betsy and Stremof stayed at 
the tea-table. 

" How bored ? " asked Betsy. " Safo says she had a 
delightful evening with you yesterday." 

" Oh ! how unendurable it was ! " said Liza. " They 
all came to my house with me after the races, and it 
was all so utterly monotonous. It is forever one and the 
same thing. They sat on the divans the whole evening. 
How could that be delightful ? No ; but what do you 
do to keep from being bored?" she asked again of 
Anna. " It is enough to look at you ! You are evi- 
dently a woman who can be happy or unhappy, but 
never ennuyie. Now explain what you do." 

" I don't do anything," said Anna, confused by such 
a stream of questions. 

"That is the best way," said Stremof, joining the 
conversation. 

Stremof was a man fifty years old, rather gray, but 
well preserved, very ugly, but with a face full of char- 
acter and intelligence. Liza Merkalof was his wife's 
niece, and he spent with her all his leisure time. Though 
he was an employee in the service of Aleksel Aleksandro- 
vitch's political enemies, he endeavored, no.w that he met 
Anna in society, to act the man of the world, and be 
exceedingly amiable to his enemy's wife. 

" The very best way is to do nothing," he continued, 
with his wise smile. " I have been telling you this long 
time," turning to Liza Merkalof, "that, if you don't want 



ANNA KARENINA 87 

to be bored, you must not think that it is possible to be 
bored ; just as one must not be afraid of not sleeping if 
he is troubled with insomnia. This is just what Anna 
Arkadyevna told you." 

" I should be very glad if I had said so," said Anna, 
" because it is not only clever, it is true." 

" But will you tell me why it is not hard to go to 
sleep, and not hard to be free from ennui f " 

"To sleep, you must work; and to be happy, you 
must also, work." 

" But how can I work when my labor is useful to no 
one ? But to make believe, — I neither can nor will." 

"You are incorrigible," sajd he, not looking at her, 
but turning to Anna again. He rarely met her, and 
could not well speak to her except in the way of small 
talk ; but he understood how to say light things grace- 
fully, and he asked her when she was going back to 
Petersburg, and whether she liked the Countess Lidya 
Ivanovna. And he asked these questions in a man- 
ner which showed his desire to be her friend, and to 
express his consideration and respect. 

Tushkievitch came in just then and explained that 
the whole company was waiting for the croquet players. 

" No, don't go, I beg of you," said Liza, when she 
found that Anna was not intending to stay. Stremof 
added his persuasions. 

"It is too great a contrast," said he, "between our 
society and old Vrede's ; and then, you will be for her 
only an object for slander, while here you will only 
awaken very different sentiments, quite the opposite 
of slander and ill-feeling." 

Anna remained for a moment in uncertainty. This 
witty man's flattering words, the childlike and naive 
sympathy shown her by Liza Merkalof, and all this 
agreeable social atmosphere, so opposed to what she 
expected elsewhere, caused her a moment of hesitation. 
Could she not postpone the terrible moment of expla- 
nation? But remembering what she had to expect 
alone at home if she should not come to some decision, 
remembering the pain that she had felt when she 



88 ANNA KARENINA 

pulled her hair with both hands, not knowing what 
she did, so great was her mental anguish, she took 
leave, and went. 



CHAPTER XIX 

Vronsky, in spite of his worldly life and his apparent 
frivolity, was a man who detested confusion. Once, 
when still a lad in the School of Pages, he found him- 
self short of money, and met with a humiliating refusal 
when he tried to borrow. He vowed that henceforth 
he would not expose himself to such a humiliation again, 
and he kept his word. In order to keep his affairs in 
order, he made, more or less often, according to circum- 
stances, but at least five times a year, an examination of 
his affairs.. He called this "straightening his affairs," 
or, in French, faire sa lessive. 

The morning after the races Vronsky woke late, and 
without stopping to shave, or take his bath, put on his 
kitely or soldier's linen frock, and, placing his money and 
bills and paper on the table, proceeded to the work of 
settling his accounts. Petritsky, knowing that his com- 
rade was likely to be irritable when engaged in such 
occupation, quietly got up, and slipped out without dis- 
turbing him. 

Every man acquainted, even to the minutest details, 
with all the complications of his surroundings, involun- 
tarily supposes that the complications and tribulations of 
his life are a personal and private grievance peculiar to 
himself, and never thinks that others are subjected to 
the same complications of their personal troubles he him- 
self is. Thus it seemed to Vronsky. And not without 
inward pride, and not without reason, he felt that, until 
the present time, he had done well in avoiding the 
embarrassments to which every one else would have suc- 
cumbed. But he felt that now it was necessary for him 
to examine into his affairs, so as not to be embarrassed. 

First, because it was the easiest to settle, Vronsky 
investigated his pecuniary status. He wrote in his 



ANNA KARENINA 89 

fluent, delicate hand a schedule of all his debts, and 
adding them up found that the total amounted to seven- 
teen thousand rubles, and some odd hundreds, which he 
let go for the sake of clearness. Counting up his ready- 
money and his bank-book, he had only eighteen hun- 
dred rubles, with no hope of more until the new year. 
Looking over the schedule of his debts, Vronsky classi- 
fied them, putting them into three categories : first, the 
urgent debts, or, in other words, those that required ready 
money, so that, in case of requisition, there might not be 
a moment of delay. These amounted to four thousand 
rubles, — fifteen hundred for his horse, and twenty-five 
hundred as a guaranty for his young comrade, Venevsky, 
who had, in Vronsky's company, lost this amount in play- 
ing with a sharper. Vronsky, at the time, had wanted 
to hand over the money, since he had it with him ; 
but Venevsky and Yashvin insisted on paying it, rather 
than Vronsky, who had not been playing. This was all 
very well; but Vronsky knew that in this disgraceful 
affair, in which his only participation was going as 
Venevsky's guaranty, it was necessary to have these 
twenty-five hundred rubles ready to throw at the rascal's 
head, and not to have any words with him. Thus, he 
had to reckon the category of urgent debts as four 
thousand rubles. 

In the second category were eight thousand rubles 
of debts, and these were less imperative. These were 
what he owed on his stable account, for oats and hay, 
to his English trainer, and other incidentals. At a 
pinch, two thousand would suffice to leave him perfectly 
easy in mind. The remaining debts were to his tailor, 
and other furnishers ; and they could wait. In conclu- 
sion, he found that he needed, for immediate use, six 
thousand rubles, and he had only eighteen hundred. 

For a man with an income of a hundred thousand 
rubles, — as people supposed Vronsky to have, — it would 
seem as if such debts as these could not be very em- 
barrassing ; but the fact was that he had not an income 
of a hundred thousand rubles. The large paternal 
estate, producing two hundred thousand rubles a year, 



9 o ANNA KARENINA 

had been divided between the two brothers. But when 
the elder brother, laden with debts, married the Princess 
Varia Tchirkof, the daughter of a Dekabrist, 1 who 
brought him no fortune, AlekseT yielded him his share 
of the inheritance, reserving only an income of twenty- 
five thousand rubles. He told his brother that this 
would be sufficient for him until he married, which he 
thought would never happen. His brother, who was in 
command of one of the most expensive regiments in the 
service and only just married, could not refuse this gift. 

His mother, who possessed an independent fortune, 
kept twenty-five thousand rubles for herself and gave 
her younger son a yearly allowance of twenty thousand 
rubles; and AlekseT spent the whole of it. Recently 
the countess, angry with him on account of his depar- 
ture from Moscow and his disgraceful liaison, had ceased 
to remit to him any money. So that Vronsky, who was 
accustomed to living' on a forty-five thousand ruble foot- 
ing, and having this year only twenty-five thousand, 
found himself in some extremity. He could not apply 
to his mother to help him out of his difficulty, for her 
letter which he had received the day before angered 
him by the insinuations which it contained : she was 
ready, it said, to help him along in society, or to advance 
him in his career, but not in this present life which was 
scandalizing all the best people. 

His mother's attempt to bribe him wounded him in 
the tenderest spot in his heart, and he felt more coldly 
towards her than ever. 

He could not retract his magnanimous promise given 
to his brother; although he felt now, in view of his 
rather uncertain relationship with Madame Karenin, 
that his magnanimous promise had been given too has- 
tily, and that, even though he were not married, the 
hundred thousand rubles might stand him in good stead. 
But it was impossible to retract. The impossibility of 
taking back what he had given was made clear to him, 
especially when he remembered his brother's wife, when 

1 The Dekabrists were the revolutionists of December, 1825, who were 
banished at the time of the accession of the Emperor Nicholas. 



ANNA KARENINA 9 i 

he remembered how this gentle, excellent Varia had 
always made him understand that she should not forget 
his generosity, and never cease to appreciate it. r It 
would be as impossible as to strike a woman, to steal, 
or to lie. 

There was only one possible, and practicable thing, 
and Vronsky adopted it without a moment's hesitation : 
to borrow ten thousand rubles of a usurer, — there 
was no difficulty about this, — to reduce his expenses as 
much as he could, and to sell his race-horses. Having 
decided to do this, he immediately wrote a letter to Ro- 
landaki, who had many times offered to buy his stud. 
Then he sent for his English trainer and the usurer, and 
devoted the money which he had on hand to various 
accounts. Having finished this business, he wrote a 
cold and sharp reply to his mother ; and then, taking 
from his portfolio Anna's last three letters, he re-read 
them, burned them, and, remembering his last conversa- 
tion with her, fell into deep meditation. 



CHAPTER XX 

Vronsky's life had been especially happy, because he 
had a special code of rules, which infallibly determined 
all he ought to do and ought not to do. 

This code embraced a very small circle of duties, but 
the rules allowed no manner of question, and as Vronsky 
never had occasion to go outside of this circle, he had 
never been obliged to hesitate about what he had to do. 
These rules prescribed unfailingly that it was necessary 
to pay gambling debts, but not his tailor's bills; that it 
was not permissible to tell lies, except to women ; that 
it was not right to deceive any one except a husband ; 
that insults could be committed, but never pardoned. 

All these precepts might be wrong and illogical, but 
they were indubitable ; and, in fulfilling them, Vronsky 
felt that he was calm, and had the right to hold his head 
high. Only very recently, however, and during the 
progress of his intimacy with Anna, Vronsky began to 



9 2 



ANNA KARENINA 



perceive that his code did not fully determine all condi 
tions, and the future promised to present difficulties and 
doubts through the labyrinth of which he could not find 
the guiding thread. 

Hitherto his relations with Anna and her husband 
had been, on his part, simple and clear ; they were in 
harmony with the code that guided him. 

She was a perfect lady, and she had given him her 
love ; he loved her, and therefore she had a right to his 
respect, even more than if she had been his legal wife. 
He would have cut off his hand sooner than permit him- 
self a word or an allusion that might wound her, or that 
would seem to fail in that respect on which, as a woman, 
she ought to count. 

His relations with society were also clear. All might 
know or suspect his relations with her, but no one 
should dare to speak of it. At the first hint, he was 
prepared to cause the speaker to hold his peace, and to 
respect the non-existent honor of the woman whom he 
loved. 

Still more clear were his relations to the husband : 
from the first moment when Anna gave him her love 
he considered his right and his only imprescriptible. 
The husband was merely a superfluous and meddlesome 
person. Without doubt, he was in a pitiable position ; 
but what could be done about it ? The only right that 
was left him was to demand satisfaction with arms in 
their hands, and for this Vronsky was wholly willing. 

In the last few days, however, new complications had 
arisen in their relationship, and Vronsky was alarmed 
at his uncertainty. Only the evening before, Anna had 
confessed that she was pregnant; and he felt that this 
news and what she expected from him demanded some- 
thing that was not defined by the code of rules by which 
he ruled his life. Indeed, he was taken unawares, and 
at the first moment, when she told him her situation, 
his heart bade him take her from her husband. H$ 
said this, but now on reflection he saw clearly that it 
would be better not to do so ; but at the same time he 
was alarmed and perplexed. 



ANNA KARENI'NA 93 

" If I urge her to leave her husband, it would mean 
— unite her life with mine. Am I ready for that ? How 
can I elope with her when I have no money ? Let us 

admit that I could manage that But how can I take 

her away while I am connected with the service ? If I 
should decide upon this, I should have to get money, 
and throw up my commission/' 

And he fell into thought. The question of resigning, 
or not, brought him face to face with another interest of 
his life known only to himself, though it formed the 
principal spur to his action. 

Ambition had been the dream of his childhood and 
youth, a dream which he did not confess even to himself, 
but which was nevertheless a passion so strong that now 
it fought with his love. His first advances in society, 
and in his military career, had been brilliant, but two 
years before he had made a serious blunder. Wishing 
to show his independence, and to cause a sensation, he 
refused a promotion offered him, with the hope that his 
refusal would put a still higher value upon him. But it 
seemed that he was too confident, and since then he had 
been neglected. Finding himself reduced nolens volens 
to the position of an independent man, he accepted it, 
behaving with perfect propriety and wisdom, as if he 
had nothing to complain of, and counted himself 
slighted by no one, but asked only to be left in peace 
to amuse himself as he pleased. 

In reality, as the year went on, and even before he 
went to Moscow, this pleasure had begun to pall on him. 
He felt that this independent position of a man capable 
of doing anything, but caring to do nothing, was begin- 
ning to grow tame, that many people were beginning to 
think that he was incapable of doing anything, instead 
of being a good, honorable young fellow. 

His relations with Madame Karenin, by making such 
a sensation and attracting attention to him, for a 
time calmed the gnawings of the worm of ambition; 
but lately this worm had begun to gnaw with renewed 
energy. Serpukhovskoi — the friend of his childhood, 
belonging to his own circle, a chum of his in the School 



94 ANNA KARENINA 

of Pages, who had graduated with him, who had been 
his rival in the class-room and in gymnasium, in his 
pranks and in his dreams of ambition — had just returned 
from Central Asia, where he had been promoted two 
tchins and won honors rarely given to such a young 
general. 

He had only just come to Petersburg, and people were 
talking about him as a new rising star of the first magni- 
tude. 

Just Vronsky's age, and his intimate friend, he was a 
general, and was expecting an appointment which would 
give him great influence in the affairs of the country ; 
while Vronsky, though he was independent and brilliant, 
and loved by a lovely woman, was only a rotmistr, or 
cavalry captain, whom they allowed to remain as inde- 
pendent as he pleased. 

"Of course," he said to himself, "I am not envious 
of SerpukhovskoY and could not be ; but his promotion 
proves that a man like me needs only to bide his time 
in order to make a rapid rise in his profession. Three 
years ago he was in the same position as I am now. If 
I left the service, I should burn my ships. If I stay in 
the service, I lose nothing ; she herself told me that she 
did not want to change her position. And I, who am 
sure of her love, cannot be envious of SerpukhovskoY." 

And, slowly twisting his mustache, he arose from the 
table, and began to walk up and down the room. His 
eyes shone with extraordinary brilliancy; and he was 
conscious of that calm, even, and joyous state of mind 
which he always felt after he had cleared up any situa- 
tion. All was now clear and orderly as ever. He shaved, 
took a cold-water bath, dressed, and prepared to go out. 



CHAPTER XXI 

" I was coming for you," said Petritsky, entering the 
room. "Your cleaning up took a long time to-day, 
didn't it ? Are you through ? " 

"All through," said Vronsky, smiling only with his 



ANNA KARENINA 95 

eyes, and continuing to twist the ends of his mustache 
deliberately, as if, after this work of regulation were 
accomplished, any rash and quick motion might de- 
stroy it. 

"You always come out of this operation as from a 
bath," said Petritsky. "I come from Gritska's," — so 
they called their regimental commander, — "they are 
waiting for you." 

Vronsky looked at his comrade without replying; his 
thoughts were elsewhere. 

" Ah ! then that music is at his house ? " he remarked, 
hearing the well-known sounds of waltzes and polkas, 
played by a military band. " What is the celebration ? " 

"SerpukhovskoT has come." 

" Ah ! " said Vronsky, " I did not know it." 

The smile in his eyes was brighter than ever. 

Having once decided for himself that he was happy 
in his love, he had elected to sacrifice his ambition to 
his love. Having at least taken on himself to play this 
part, he could feel neither envy at Serpukhovskoi, nor 
vexation because he, returning to the regiment, had not 
come first to see him. SerpukhovskoT was a good friend 
of his, and Vronsky was glad for him. 

"Ah! I am very glad." 

The regimental commander, Demin, lived in a large 
seignorial mansion. All the company had assembled .on 
the lower front balcony. What first struck Vron sky's 
eyes as he reached the door were the singers of the 
regiment, in summer uniform, grouped around a keg of 
v^odka, and the healthy, jovial face of the regimental 
commander as he stood surrounded by his officers. He 
had come out on the front step of the balcony, and was 
screaming louder than the band, which was playing one 
of Offenbach's quadrilles. He was giving some orders 
and gesticulating to a group of soldiers on one side. 
A group of soldiers, the vakhmistr, or sergeant, and a 
few non-commissioned officers, reached the balcony at 
the same instant with Vronsky. The regimental com- 
mander, who had been to the table, returned with a glass 



96 ANNA KARENINA 

of champagne to the front steps, and proposed the 
toast, — 

" To the health of our old comrade, the brave general, 
Prince SerpukhovskoY. Hurrah ! " 

Behind the regimental commander came Serpukhov- 
skoY, smiling, with a glass in his hand. 

"You are always young, Bondarenko," said he to the 
sergeant, a ruddy-cheeked soldier, who stood directly in 
front of him. 

Vronsky had not seen SerpukhovskoY for three years. 
He had grown older, and wore whiskers, but he was the 
same well-built man, striking not so much for his good 
looks as for the nobility and gentleness of his face and 
his whole bearing. The only change that Vronsky 
noted in him was the slight but constant radiance 
which can generally be seen in the faces of people who 
have succeeded and made everybody else believe in 
their success. Vronsky had seen it in other people, 
and now he detected it in SerpukhovskoY. 

As he descended the steps he caught sight of Vronsky, 
and a smile of joy irradiated his face. He nodded to 
him, lifting his wine-cup as a greeting, and at the same 
time to signify that first he must drink with the sergeant, 
who, standing perfectly straight, had puckered his lips 
for the kiss. 

" Well, here he is ! " cried the regimental commander ; 
" but Yashvin was telling me that you were in one of 
your bad humors/' 

SerpukhovskoY, having kissed the young sergeant's 
moist, fresh lips, wiped his mouth with his handker- 
chief, and came to Vronsky. 

"Well, how glad I am!" he said, shaking hands, and 
drawing him on one side. 

" Bring him along," cried the regimental commander 
to Yashvin, pointing to Vronsky, and descending to join 
the soldiers. 

"Why weren't you at the races yesterday? I ex- 
pected to see you," said Vronsky to SerpukhovskoY, 
studying his face. 

"I did come, but too late. Excuse me," he said; 



ANNA KARENINA 97 

and, turning to his aide, " Please have this distributed 
with my thanks; only have it get to the men." 

And he hurriedly took out of his pocket-book three 
hundred-ruble notes, and the color came into his face. 

" Vronsky, will you have something to eat or drink ? " 
asked Yashvin. "Hey! bring something to the count 
here. There, now, drink this." 

The feasting at the regimental commander's lasted a 
long time. They drank a great deal. They toasted 
SerpukhovskoT, and carried him on their shoulders. 
They cheered also the regimental commander. Then 
the regimental commander and Petritsky danced a Rus- 
sian dance, while the regimental singers made the music ; 
and when he was tired, he sat down on a bench in the 
court, and tried to prove to Yashvin Russia's superiority 
over Prussia, especially in cavalry charges ; and the gay- 
ety calmed down for a moment. Serpukhovsko'f went 
into thehouse to wash his hands, and found Vronsky in 
the toilet-room. Vronsky was splashing the water. He 
had taken off his kitel, and was sousing his head and 
his handsome neck under the tap of the basin, and rub- 
bing them with his hands. When he had finished his 
ablutions, he sat down by Serpukhovsko'f. They sat 
together on a divanchik, and a conversation very inter- 
esting to both parties arose between them. 

, "I have /learned all about you through my wife," 
said Serpukhovsko'f. " I am glad that you see her so 
ofjen." 

"She is a friend of Varia's, and they are the only 
women in Petersburg that I care to see," said Vronsky, 
with a smile. He smiled because he foresaw on what 
subject the conversation would turn, and it was pleasing 
to him. 

" The only ones ? " repeated SerpukhovskoT, also smil- 
ing. 

"Yes; and I, too, know all about you, but not 
through your wife only," said Vronsky, cutting the 
allusion short by the suddenly stern expression of his 
face ; " and I am very glad at your success, but not the 
least surprised. I expected even more." 

VOL. II. — 7 



98 ANNA KARENINA 

Serpukhovskof smiled again. This flattering opinion 
of him pleased him, and he saw no reason to hide it. 

"I, on the contrary, I confess frankly, expected less. 
But I am glad, very glad. I am ambitious ; it is my 
weakness, and I confess it." 

" Perhaps you would n't confess it if you were n't suc- 
cessful," suggested Vronsky. 

" I don't think so," replied SerpukhovskoY, smiling 
again. " I will not say that life would not be worth 
living without it, but it would be tiresome. Of course 
I may be mistaken, but it seems to me that I have some 
of the qualifications necessary to the sphere of activity 
which I have chosen, and that in my hands power of 
any sort soever would be better placed than in the 
hands of .many whom I know," said SerpukhovskoT, 
with the radiant expression of success; "and there- 
fore, the nearer I am to this, the more contented I 
feel." 

" Perhaps this is true for you, but not for everybody. 
I used to think so, and yet I live, and no longer find 
that ambition is the only aim of existence." 

" Here we have it ! Here we have it ! " cried Serpu- 
khovskof, laughing, " I began by saying that I heard 
about you, about your refusal .... of course I approved 
of you. There is a way for everything; and >I; think 
that your action itself was well, but you did' not do' it 
in the right way." *■" " * l< ] 

" What is done, is done ; and you know I never go 
back on what I have done. Besides, I am very Well 
fixed;" ■» 

" Very well — for a time. But you will not be con- 
tented so forever. I do not refer to your brother. He 
is a very good fellow — just like this host of ours. 
Hark! hearthat?" he added, hearing the shouts and 
hurrahs. "He may be happy, but this will not satisfy 
you." . > 

"I don't say that I am satisfied." 

" Well, this is not the only thing. Such men as you 
are necessary ! " j 

" To whom ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 99 

" To whom ? to society ; to Russia. Russia needs 
men, she needs a party ; otherwise all is going, and will 
go, to the dogs." 

" What do you mean ? — Bertenef s party against the 
Russian communists ? " 

" No," said SerpukhovskoY, with a grimace of vexa- 
tion that he should be accused of any such nonsense. 
" Tout $a est une blague! — All that is fudge ! This al- 
ways has been, and always will be. There are n't any 
communists. But intriguing people must needs invent 
some malignant dangerous party. It 's an old joke. 
No, a powerful party is needed, of independent men, 
like you and me." 

" But why," — Vronsky named several influential men, 
— " but why are n't they among the independents ? " 

" Simply because they had not, through birth, an in' 
dependent position, or a name, and have not lived near 
the sun, as we have. They can be bought by money 
or flattery. And to maintain themselves, they must 
fix on a certain course, and follow it, though they do 
not attach any importance to it, and even though it 
may be bad. They have only one object in view — 
the means of securing a home at the expense of the 
crown and certain salaries. Cela 11 est pas plus fin que 
ca} when you look at their cards. Maybe I am worse 
or more foolish than they, though I don't see why I 
should be. But I have, and you have, the one inesti- 
mable advantage, that it is harder to buy us. And such 
men are more than ever necessary now." 

Vronsky listened attentively, not only because of the 
meaning of his words, but because of their connection 
with the case of SerpukhovskoY himself, who was about 
to engage in the struggle with power, and was entering 
into that official world, with its sympathies and antip- 
athies, while he was occupied only with the interests 
of his squadron. Vronsky perceived how strong Ser- 
pukhovskoY might be, with his unfailing aptitude for 
invention, his quickness of comprehension, his intellect, 
and fluent speech, so rarely met with in the circle in 
1 That is all that it amounts to. 



ioo ANNA KARENINA 

which he lived. And, though his conscience reproached 
him, he felt a twinge of envy. 

"All that I need for this is the one essential thing," 
said he, — " the desire for power. I had it, but it is 
gone." 

"Excuse me; I don't believe you," said Serpukhov- 
skoY, smiling. 

"No, it is true, true — now — to be frank with you," 
persisted Vronsky. 

"Yes, true now, ^-that is another affair; this now 
will not last forever." 

" Maybe." 

"You say maybe ; and I tell you certainly not," con- 
tinued Serpukhovsko'f, as if he divined his thought 
" And this is why I wanted to see you. You acted as 
you felt was necessary. I understand that; but it is 
not necessary for you to stick to it. 1 All I ask of you 
is carte blanche for the future. I am not your patron.... 
and yet why should I not take you under my protection ? 
Have you not often done as much for me ? I hope that 
our friendship stands above that. There ! " said he, 
smiling at him tenderly, like a woman. " Give me carte 
blanche. Come out of your regiment, and I will help 
you along so that it won't be known." 

" But understand that I want nothing," said Vronsky, 
"except that all should be as it has been." 

Serpukhovsko'f arose, and stood facing him. 

" You say that all must be as it has been. I under- 
stand what you mean ; but listen to me. We are of the 
same age ; maybe you have known more women than 
I." His smile and his gesture told Vronsky to have no 
fear that he would not touch gently and delicately on 
the tender spot. " But I am married ; and, believe me, 
as some one or other wrote, he who knows only his wife, 
and loves her, understands all women better than if he 
had known a thousand." 

"We 're coming directly," cried Vronsky to an officer 
who looked into the room and said he was sent by the 
regimental commander. 

1 PerseverirovaU 



ANNA KARENINA 101 

Vronsky now felt curious to hear and to know what 
Serpukhovskor would say to him. 

" And this is my idea : Women are the principal 
stumbling-block in the way of a man's activity. It is 
hard to love a woman, and to do anything else. There 
is only one way to love with comfort, and without 
hindrance ; and that is, to marry. And how can I ex- 
plain to you what I mean," continued SerpukhovskoT, 
who was fond of metaphors, — "wait, wait ! .... yes ! 
how can you carry a burden and do anything with your 
hands until the burden is tied on your back ? And so 
it is with marriage. And I found this out when I mar- 
ried. My hands suddenly became free. But to carry 
this fardeau without marriage, your hands will be so full 
that you can't do anything. . Look at Mazankof, Krupof. 
They ruined their careers through women." 

" But what women ! " said Vronsky, remembering the 
Frenchwoman and the actress for whom these two men 
had formed attachments. 

"The higher the woman is in the social scale, the 
greater the difficulty. It is just the same as — not to 
carry your fardeci7t in your hands, but to tear it from 
some other man." 

" You have never loved," murmured Vronsky, looking 
straight ahead, and thinking of Anna. 

" Perhaps ; but you think of what I have told you. 
And one thing more : women are all more material than 
men. We make something immense out of love, but 
they are all terre-ci-terre — of the earth, earthy." 

" Will be there immediately ! " he said, addressing the 
lackey who was coming into the room. But the lackey 
was not a messenger for him, as he supposed. The 
lackey brought Vronsky a note. 

"A man brought this from the Princess Tverskaya." 

Vronsky hastily read the note, and grew red in the face. 

" I have a headache. I am going home," said he to 
Serpukhovskoif. 

"Well, then, proshchai ! farewell; will you give me 
carte blanche f " 

" We will talk about it by and by. I will call on you 
in Petersburg." 



ioa ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XXII 

It was already six o'clock ; and in order not to miss 
his appointment, or to go with his own horses, which 
everybody knew, Vronsky engaged Yashvin's hired car- 
riage, and told the izvoshchik to drive with all speed. 
It was a spacious old carriage, with room for four. He 
sat in one corner, stretched his legs out on the empty 
seat, and began to think. 

The confused consciousness of the order in which he 
had regulated his affairs; the confused recollection of 
the friendship and flattery of Serpukhovskolf, who 
assured him that he was an indispensable man ; and 
most of all, the expectation of the coming interview, — 
conspired to give him a keen sense of the joy of living. 
This impression was so powerful that he could not keep 
from smiling. He stretched his legs, threw one knee 
over the other, felt for the contusion that his fall had- 
given him the evening before, and drew several long 
breaths with full lungs. 

" Good, very good," said he to himself. Oftentimes 
before he had felt a pleasure in the possession of his 
body, but never had he so loved it, or loved himself, as 
now. It was even pleasurable to feel the slight sore- 
ness in his leg, pleasurable was the mouse-like sensation 
of motion on his breast when he breathed. 

This same bright, fresh, August day, which so im- 
pressed Anna with its hopelessness, stimulated, vitalized 
him, and cooled his face and neck, which still burned 
from the reaction after his bath. The odor of brillian- 
tine from his mustaches seemed pleasant to him in this 
fresh atmosphere. Everything that he saw from the 
carriage-window seemed to him in this cool, pure air, in 
this pale light of the dying day, fresh, joyous, and health- 
ful, like himself. And the housetops shining in the rays 
of the setting sun, the outlines of the fences and the 
edifices along the way, and the shapes of occasional 
pedestrians and carriages hurrying hither and thither, 
and the motionless green of the trees, and the lawns, 



ANNA KARENINA 103 

and the fields with their straight-cut rows of potato- 
hills, and the oblique shadows cast by the houses and 
the trees, and even by the potato-hills, — all was as 
beautiful as an exquisite landscape just from the mas- 
ter's hand, and freshly varnished. 

" Make haste, make haste ! " he shouted, pushing up 
through the window a three-ruble note to the driver, 
who turned round and looked down at him. 

The izvoshchik's hand arranged something about the 
lantern, then the crack of the knout was heard, and the 
carriage whirled rapidly over the even pavement. 

"I need nothing, nothing, but this pleasure," he 
thought, as his eyes .rested on the knob of the bell, 
fastened between the windows, and he imagined Anna 
as she seemed when last he saw her. " The farther I 
go, the more I love her. — Ah ! here is the garden of 
the Vrede datcha. Where shall I find her? How? 
Why did she make this appointment ? and why did she 
write on Betsy's note ? " 

This struck him for the first time, but he had no time 
to think about it. He stopped the driver before they 
reached the driveway, and, getting out of the carriage, 
he went up the walk which led to the house. There was 
no one on the avenue; but looking toward the right he 
saw her. Her face was covered with a veil ; but with a 
joyful glance, he recognized her immediately, by her 
graceful motion as she walked, by the slope of her 
shoulders, and the pose of her head, and he felt as if an 
electric shock had passed through him. With new 
strength he felt the joy of life and of action, even from 
the movements of his limbs to the involuntary motion of 
respiration, and something made his lips twitch. 

When he came near her, she eagerly seized his hand. 

"You are not angry because I asked you to come ? I 
absolutely needed to see you," she said ; and the serious 
and stern closing of the lips, which he saw under the 
veil, quickly put an end to his jubilant spirits. 

" I angry ? but how did you come ? when ? " 

" No matter about that," said she, taking Vronsky's 
arm. "Come ; I must have a talk with you." 



io 4 ANNA KARENINA 

He perceived that something had happened, and that 
their interview would not be joyful. While with her, he 
could not control his will. Though he did not know 
what her agitation portended, yet he felt that it had 
taken possession of him also. 

" What is it ? What is the matter ? " he asked, press- 
ing her arm, and trying to read her thoughts by her 
face. 

She went a few steps in silence, so as to get her 
breath ; then she suddenly halted. 

" I did not tell you last evening," she began, breath- 
ing fast and painfully, "that, on the way home with 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, I confessed to him everything 
....I said that I could not be his wife.... that .... and I 
told him all." 

He listened, involuntarily leaning toward her, as if he 
wished to lighten for her the difficulty of this confi- 
dence ; but as soon as she finished speaking, he sud- 
denly drew himself up, and his face assumed a haughty 
and stern expression. 

" Yes ! yes ! that was better, a thousand times better, 
I understand how hard it must have been," he said. 

But she did not heed his words, she read his thoughts 
by the expression of his face. She could not know that 
the expression of his face arose from the first thought 
that came into his mind — the thought that a duel could 
not now be avoided. Never had a thought of a duel 
entered her head, and therefore she interpreted the 
momentary expression of sternness in a quite different 
way. 

Since the arrival of her husband's letter, she felt in 
the bottom of her heart that all would remain as before ; 
that she should not have the strength to sacrifice her 
position in the world, to abandon her son and join her 
lover. The morning spent with the Princess Tverskaya 
confirmed her in this. But this interview with Vronsky 
seemed to her to be of vital importance. She hoped that 
it might change their relations and save her. If, on 
hearing this news, he had said decidedly, passionately, 
without a moment's hesitation, " Leave all, and come 



ANNA KARENINA 105 

with me," she would even have abandoned her son, and 
gone with him. But what she told him did not produce 
on him at all the impression which she had expected ; 
he seemed, if anything, vexed and angry. 

" It was not hard for me at all. It came of its own 
accord," she said, with a touch of irritation ; " and here" 
— she drew her husband's letter from her glove. 

" I understand, I understand," interrupted Vronsky, 
taking the letter, but not reading it, and trying to calm 
Anna. "The one thing I wanted, the one thing I 
prayed for.... to put an end to this situation, so that I 
could devote my whole life to your happiness." 

"Why do you say that to me?" she asked. "Can I 
doubt it ? If I doubted ...." 

"Who are those coming?" asked Vronsky, abruptly, 
seeing two ladies coming in their direction. " Perhaps 
they know us." And he hastily drew Anna with him 
down a side alley. 

" Akh ! it is all the same to me," she said. 

Her lips trembled, and it seemed to Vronsky that her 
eyes looked at him from under her veil with strange 
hatred. 

" As I said, in all this affair, I cannot doubt you. 
But here is what he wrote me. Read it." 

And again she halted. Again, as when he first 
learned of Anna's rupture with her husband, Vronsky, 
beginning to read this letter, involuntarily abandoned 
himself to the impression awakened in him by the 
thought of his relations to the deceived husband. 
Now that he had the letter in his hand, he imagined 
the challenge, which he would receive that day or the 
next, and the duel itself, at the moment when, with the 
same cool and haughty expression which now set his 
face, he woulfl stand in front of his adversary, and, 
having discharged his weapon in the air, would wait 
the outraged husband's shot. And at this very instant 
Serpukhovskof s words and what he himself had felt 
that day flashed through his mind, " Better not tie 
yourself down ; " and she knew that he could not ex- 
press his thought before her. 



106 ANNA KARENINA 

After he read the note, he raised his eyes to her, and 
there was indecision in his look. She instantly per- 
ceived *that he had thought this matter over before. 
She knew that whatever he said to her, he would not 
say all that he thought. And she realized that her last 
hope had vanished. This was not what she had desired. 

"You see what sort of a man he is," said she, with 
faltering voice. " He .... " 

"Excuse me, but I am glad of this/' said Vronsky, in- 
terrupting. " For God's sake, let me speak," he quickly 
added, beseeching her with his look to give him time to 
explain his words. "I am glad, because this cannot, 
and never could go on as he imagines." 

"Why can't it?" demanded Anna, holding back her 
tears, and evidently attaching no importance to what 
he said. She felt that her fate was already settled. 

Vronsky meant that after the duel, which he felt was 
inevitable, this situation must be changed ; but he said 
something quite different. 

" It cannot go on so. I hope that now you will leave 
him. I hope" — he stumbled and grew red — "that 
you will allow me to take charge of our lives, and regu- 
late them. To-morrow.... " he. began to say. 

She did not allow him to finish. 

"And my son!" she cried. "Do you see what he 
writes ? I must leave him ; but I cannot and I will 
not do that." 

" But, for God's sake, which is better, — to leave your 
son, or to continue this humiliating situation ? " 

" For whom is it a humiliating situation ? " 

" For all of us, and especially for you." 

"You say humiliating! .... Don't say that. Forme 
that word has no meaning," said she, with trembling 
voice. She could not bear now to have'him tell her a 
falsehood. Her love for him was trembling in the bal- 
ance, and she wished to love him. "You must know 
that for me, on that day when I first loved you, every- 
thing was transformed. For me there was one thing, 
and only one thing, — your love. If it is mine, then I 
feel myself so high, so firm, that nothing can be humili- 



ANNA KARENINA 107 

ating to me. I am proud of rny position, because.... 
proud that .... proud .... " She did not say why she was 
proud. Tears of shame and despair choked, h^r utter? 
ance. She stopped, and began to sob. 

He also felt that something rose in his throat. For 
the first time in his life he felt ready to cry. He could 
not have said what affected him so. He was sorry for 
her, and he felt that he could not help her ; and; more 
than all, he knew that he was the cause Of her unhap- 
piness, that he had done something abominable. » 

" Then a divorce is impossible ? " he asked gently. 

She shook her head without replying. > " Then, could 
you not take your son, and leave him?": 

"Yes; but all this depends on him. Now I must go 
to him," she said dryly. Her presentiment that all 
would be as before was verified. 

" I shall be in' Petersburg Tuesday, and everything 
will be decided." 

f " Yes," she repeated. " But we shall not speak any 
more about that." * » 

Anna's carriage, which she sent away with the order 
to come back for her at the railing of the Vrede Garden, 
was approaching. Anna took leave of Vronsky, and 
went home. 



1 ' CHAPTER XXIII 

The Commission of- the 2d of June usually -held its 
sittings on Monday. 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch entered the committee-room, 
bowed to the members and the president as usual, and 
took his plac£, laying his hand on the papers made ready 
for him. Among the number were the data which he 
needed, and the outline of the proposition that he in- 
tended to make. These notes, however, were not neces- 
sary.- His grasp of the subject was complete, and he 
did not need to refresh his memory as to what he was 
going to say* He knew that when the time came, and 
he should see his adversary vainly endeavoring to put 



108 ANNA KARENINA 

on an expression of indifference, his speech would come 
of itself in better shape than he could now determine. 
He felt that the meaning of his speech was so great that 
every word would have its importance. Meantime, as 
he listened to the reading of the report, he had a most 
innocent and inoffensive expression. * No one, seeing 
his white hands, with their swollen veins, his delicate, 
long fingers doubling up the two ends of the sheet of 
white paper lying before him, and his expression of 
weariness, as he sat with head on one side, would have 
believed it possible that, in a few moments, from his 
lips would proceed a speech which would raise a terrible 
tempest, cause the members of the Commission to outdo 
one another in screaming, and oblige the president to 
call them to order. 

When the report was finished, Alekseif Aleksandro- 
vitch, in his weak, shrill voice, said that he had a few 
observations to make in regard to the situation of the 
foreign tribes. Attention was concentrated on him. 
Alekseif Aleksandrovitch cleared his throat, . and, not 
looking- at his adversary, but, as he always did at the 
beginning of his speeches, addressing the person who 
sat nearest in front .of him, who happened to be a little, 
meek 'old man, without the slightest importance in the 
Commission, began to deliver his views. 

When he reached the matter of the fundamental and 
organic law, his adversary leaped to his feet, and began 
to reply. Stremof, who was also a member of the Com- 
mission, and also touched to the quick, arose to defend 
himself ; and the session proved to be excessively stormy. 
But Alekseif Aleksandrovitch triumphed, and his propo- 
sition was accepted. The, three new commissions were 
appointed, and the next day in a certain Petersburg cir- 
cle this session formed the staple topic of conversation. 
Alekseif Aleksandrovitch's success far outstripped his 
anticipations. 

The, next, morning, which was Tuesday, Alekseif Alek- 
sandrovitch, on, awaking, recalled with pleasure his vic- 
tory of the day before ; and he could not repress a smile, 
although' he wanted to appear indifferent, when the di« 



ANNA KARENINA 109 

rector of the chancelry, wishing to flatter him, told him 
of the rumors which had reached his ears in regard to 
the proceedings of the Commission. 

Occupied as he was with the director of the chancelry, 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch absolutely forgot that the day 
was Tuesday, the day set by him for Anna Arkadyevna's 
return ; and he was surprised and disagreeably impressed 
when a domestic came to announce that she had 
come. 

Anna reached Petersburg early in the morning. A 
carriage had been sent for her in response to her tele- 
gram, and so AlekseY Aleksandrovitch might have known 
of her coming. But when she came, he did not go to 
receive her. She was told that he had not yet gone out, 
but was busy with the director of the chancelry. She 
bade the servant announce her arrival, and then went to 
her boudoir, and began to unpack her things, expecting 
that he would come to her. But an hour passed, and he 
did not appear. She went to the dining-room, under 
the pretext of giving some orders, and spoke unusually 
loud, thinking that he would join her there. But still 
he did not come, though she heard him come to the door 
of his library, accompanying the director of the chan- 
celry. She knew that it was his habit about this time 
to go to his office; and she wanted to see him before 
that, so that their plan of action might be decided. 

She passed through the " hall," and, finally making up 
her mind, went to him. She stepped into the library. 
Dressed in his uniform, apparently ready to take his 
departure, he was sitting at a little table, leaning his 
elbows on it, and wrapped in melancholy thought. She 
saw him before he noticed her, and she knew that • he 
was thinking of her. 

When he caught sight of her, he started to get up, 
hesitated, and then, for the first time since Anna had 
known him, he blushed. Then, quickly rising, he ad- 
vanced toward her, not looking at her eyes, but at her 
forehead and hair. He came to her, took her by the 
hand, and invited her to sit down. 

" I am very glad that you have come," he stammered, 



no ANNA KARENINA 

sitting do.wri hear her, and evidently desiring to talk with 
her. ■„, Several times he began to speak, but hesitated. 

Although she was prepared for this interview, and had 
made up* her mind to defend herself, and accuse him, she 
did not know, what to say to him, and she felt sorry for 
him. And so the silence lasted some little time. 

" Is Serozha well ? " at length he asked ; and, without 
waiting for an answer, he added, " I shall not dine at 
home to-day ; I have to leave immediately.'* 
f "I intended to start'for Moscow," said Anna. 

" No ; you did very, .very well to come home,'' he 
replied, and again 'was silent. 

Seeing that it was beyond his strength to begin the 
conversation, she herself began : — 

. " Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch," said she, looking at him, 
and not dropping her eyes, under his gaze, which was 
still concentrated on her head-dress, " I am a guilty 
woman ; I am a wicked woman ; but I am what I have 
been, — what I told you I was, — and I have come to 
tell you that' I cannot change.'* j j - : 

" I did not ask you about this/' he replied instantly, 
with sudden resolution, and, with an expression of hate, 
looking straight into her eyes. "I presuppose that." 
Under the influence of anger, he apparently regained 
control of all his faculties. "But as I told you then, 
and wrote you," — he spoke in a sharp, shrill voice,— 
" I now repeat, that I am not obliged to know this. I 
ignore it. Not all women are so good as you are, to 
hasten to give their husbands such very pleasant news." 
H£ laid a special stress on the word priyat?toye, "pleas- 
ant." " I will ignore it for the present, as. long as the 
world «does not know,- — as long as my name is not dis- 
honored. I, therefore, only warn you that our relations 
must, remain as they always havfc been, and that only in 
case of your compromising yourself, shall I be forced to 
take measures to protect my honor;" 
f V But our relations cannot remain as they have been," 
she said with timid accents, looking at him in terror. 

As she once more saw his undemonstrative gestures, 
heard his mocking voice with. its, sharp, childish tones, 



ANNA KARENINA in 

all the pity that she had begun to feel for him was driven 
away by the aversion that he inspired, and she had only 
a feeling of fear, which arose from the fact that she did 
not see any light in regard to their relations. 

" I cannot be your wife, when I .... " she began. 

He laughed with a cold and wicked laugh. 

" It must needs be that the manner of life which you 
have chosen is reflected in your ideas. 'I have too much 
esteem or contempt.... or rather I esteem your past, and 
despise your present.... too much for me to accept the 
interpretation which you put on my words." 

Anna sighed, and bowed her head. 

" Besides, I do not understand how you, having so 
much independence/' he continued, growing excited, 
" and telling your husband up and down of your in- 
fidelity, and not finding anything blameworthy in it, as 
it seems, how you can find anything blameworthy either 
in the fulfilment of a wife's duties to her husband." 

" Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch ! What do you require of 
me ? " 

"I require that I may never meet this man here, and 
that you comport yourself so that neither the world nor 
our servants can accuse you .... that you do not see him. 
It seems to me that this is little. And in doing this, 
you will enjoy the rights of an honorable wife, though 
you do not fulfil the obligations. This is all that I have 
to say to you. Now it is time for me to go. I shall not 
dine at home." 

He got up, and went to the door. Anna also arose. 
He silently bowed, and allowed her to pass. - ' 



CHAPTER XXIV 

The night spent by Levin on the hayrick was not 
without its lesson. His way of farming became repug- 
nant to him, and entirely lost its interest. Notwith- 
standing the excellent crops, never, or at least it seemed 
to him that never, had there been such failure, and such 
unfriendly relations between him and the muzhiks, as 



ii2 ANNA KARENINA 

this year ; and now the reasons for this failure, and this 
animosity, were perfectly clear to him. The pleasure 
which he found in work itself, the resulting acquaintance 
with the muzhiks, the envy which seized him when he 
saw them and their lives, the desire to lead such a life 
himself, which on that night had been not visionary but 
real, now that he had thought over all the details neces- 
sary to carry out his desire, — all this taken together had 
so changed his views in regard to the management of his 
estate, that he could not take the same interest in it as 
before, and he could not help seeing how these un- 
pleasant relations with the laborers met him at every 
new undertaking. 

The herd of improved cows, like Pava ; all the fertil- 
ized lands plowed with European plows ; nine equal 
fields set round with young trees ; the ninety desyatins, 
covered with dressing well plowed in ; the deep drills 
and other improvements, — all was excellent as far as 
it concerned only himself or himself and the people who 
were in sympathy with him. 

But now he clearly saw — and his work, his treatise 
on rural economy, in which the principal element was 
found to be the laborer, helped him to this conclusion 

— that his present way of carrying on his estate was 
only a cruel and wicked struggle between him and the 
laborers, in which on one side, on his side, was a con- 
stant effort to change everything to what he thought a 
better model, while on the other side was the natural 
order of things. 

In this struggle, he saw that on his side there were 
effort and lofty purpose, and on the other no effort or 
purpose, and that the result was that the estate went 
from bad ' to worse ; beautiful tools were destroyed, 
beautiful cattle and lands ruined. The principal ob- 
jection was the energy absolutely wasted in this mat- 
ter; but he could not help thinking now, when his 
thought was laid bare, that the aim of his energies 
was itself unworthy. In reality, where lay this quar- 
rel? He insisted on having every penny of his own, 

— and he could not help insisting on it, because he was 



ANNA KARENINA 113 

obliged to use his energies to the utmost, otherwise he 
would not have wherewithal to pay his laborers, — and 
they insisted on working lazily and comfortably, in other 
words, as they had always done. 

It was for his interests that every laborer should do 
his very best ; above all, should strive not to break the 
winnowing-machines, the horse-rakes, .the threshing- 
machines, so that he might accomplish what he was 
doing. 

But the laborer wanted to do his work as easily 
as possible, with long breathing-spaces, with plenty 
of time for resting, and — what was more — without 
being bothered to think. 

This year Levin had this experience at every step. 
He sent men to mow the clover-fields, selecting the 
poorer portions to be done first, where the intermix- 
ture of grass and wormwood made the crop unfit for 
seed ; and they mowed his best fields, — those reserved 
for seed, —justifying themselves by saying that they 
had done what the overseer ordered, and trying to con- 
sole him with the assurance that it would make splen- 
did fodder. But he knew that they did this because 
these fields were the easiest ones to mow. 

He sent out the hay-making machine, but the muzhiks 
broke it on the first few rows because the driver, sitting 
on the box-seat, disliked having the arms of the machine 
waving over his head; and they tried to console him 
by saying: — 

" Oh, it 's all right ; the women will do the work 
easy enough." 

The new plows were condemned as good for nothing, 
because the muzhik did not think to raise the blade 
on turning a corner, but wrenched it round through 
the soil, thus tearing up the land and straining the 
horses. And here again they urged Levin to have 
patience with them. 

The horses strayed into the wheat, for the reason 

that no one would act regularly as night watchman, 

the muzhiks, in spite of strict orders to the contrary, 

insisting on taking the duty in turns ; and Vanka, who 

vol. n. — 8 



1 1 4 ANNA KARENINA 

had been at work all day, fell asleep during his watch. 
When accused, he acknowledged his fault and only 
said: "Do* what you please with me." 

Three of the best calves were poisoned. They were 
allowed to get into the clover aftermath without giving 
them water ; the result was that they were blown, out 
and died. But -the muzhiks would not believe that it 
was the clover that did the harm ; and they tried to 
console Levin by informing him that one of his neigh- 
bors had lost one hundred and twelve head within three 
days in the same way. . t n * 

'All these mishaps took place, not because any one 
wished ill either to Levin or to his estate ; on the con- 
trary, he knew that the muzhiks loved him, and called him 
" a simple-minded gentleman," — prostoi barin, —which 
was the highest praise. But these mishaps happened 
simply because the muzhiks liked to work merrily and 
carelessly ; and his interests were not only strange and 
incomprehensible to them, but even fatally clashed with 
what they thought their own true interests. 

For a long time Levin had felt that there was some- 
thing unsatisfactory in his methods. He saw that his 
canoe was leaking, but he could not find the' leaks ; 
and he did not search" for them, perhaps on purpose 
to deceive Himself. Nothing would be left him if he 
shbuld allow his illusions to perish.- But now he could 
no longer 'deceive himself. .Not' only had his system 
of management become uninteresting, but had begun 
actually to 'disgust him, and: he felt he could no longer 
continue it. ' . 

Besides all this, Kitty Shcherbatsky was within thirty 
versts of him, and he wanted to see her, and could 
not. 

Darya Aleksandrovna Oblonskaya, when, he called on 
her, invited 'him to come:- — to come with the express 
purpose of renewing his offer to her sister, Avho, as she 
pretended to think, now cared for him. Levin himself, 
after he caught the glimpse of Kitty Shcherbatsky, felt 
that he had not ceased to love her; but he could not 
go*to r the Oblonskys', because he knew that she was 



ANNA KARENINA 1*5 

there. The fact that he had offered himself, and she 
had refused him, put an unsurmountable barrier between 
them, 

" I cannot ask her to be my wife simply because she 
cannot be the wife of the man she wanted/' he said to 
himself. 

The thought of this made him cold and hostile toward 
her. 

" I have not the strength to go and talk with her with- 
out a sense of reproach, to look at her without angry 
feelings ; and she would feel even more incensed against 
me, and justly so. And besides, how can I go there 
now, after what Darya Aleksandrovna told me ? How 
can I help showing that I know what she told me? 
That I go with magnanimity, — to pardon her, to be 
reconciled to her ! I, in her presence, play the role of a 
pardoning and honor-conferring lover to her! — Why 
did Darya Aleksandrovna tell me that ? If I had met 
her accidentally, then perhaps everything might have 
been arranged of itself ; but now it is impossible, impos- 
sible !" 

Darya Aleksandrovna sent him a note, asking the 
loan of a side-saddle for Kitty. "They tell me you 
have a saddle," she wrote : " I hope that you will bring 
it yourself." 

This was too much for him. How could a sensible 
woman of any delicacy so lower her sister ? He wrote 
ten notes, and tore them all up, and then sent the saddle 
without any reply. To write that he would come was 
impossible, because he could not come : to write that he 
could not come because he was busy, or was going away 
somewhere, was still worse. So he sent the saddle with- 
out any reply ; and, with the consciousness that he was 
doing something disgraceful, on the next day, leaving 
the now disagreeable charge of the estate to the overseer, 
he set off to a distant district where there were magnificent 
snipe-marshes to see his friend Sviazhsky, who had 
lately invited him to fulfil an old project of making him 
a visit. The snipe-marshes in the district of Surof had 
long been an attraction to Levin, but on account of his 



n6 ANNA KARENINA 

farm-work he had kept postponing his visit there. Now 
he was glad to escape from the neighborhood of the 
Shcherbatskys, and especially from his estate, and to go 
on a hunting-expedition, which for all his tribulations was 
a sovereign remedy. 



CHAPTER XXV 

In the district of Surof there were neither railways 
nor post-roads ; and Levin took his own horses, and 
went in a tarantas or traveling-carriage. 

When he was halfway, he stopped to get a meal at 
the house of a rich muzhik. The host, who was a bald, 
robust old man, with a great red beard, growing gray on 
the cheeks, opened the gate, crowding up against the 
post to let the trofka enter. Pointing the coachman to 
a place under the shed in his large, neat, and orderly 
new courtyard, with charred sokhas or wooden-plows, 
the old man invited Levin to enter the room. A neatly 
clad young girl, with galoshes on her bare feet, stooping 
down, was washing up the floor in the new entry. When 
she saw Levin's dog, she was startled, and screamed, 
but immediately laughed at her own terror when she 
found that the dog would not bite. With her bare arm 
she pointed Levin to the living-room, then stooping 
down again, she hid her handsome face, and continued 
her scrubbing. 

" Will you have the samovar ? " she asked. 

" Yes, please." 
v The living-room was large, with a Dutch stove and 
a partition. Under the sacred images stood a table 
ornamented with colored designs, a bench, and two 
chairs. Near the doorway was a cupboard with dishes. 
The window-shutters were closed ; there were few flies ; 
and it was so neat that Levin took care that Laska, who 
had been flying over the road, and was covered with 
splashes of mud, should not soil the floor, and bade her 
lie down in the corner near the door. After glancing 
into the living-room, Levin went to the back of the house. 



ANNA KARENINA 117 

A good-looking, girl in galoshes, swinging her empty 
pails on the yoke, ran to get him water from the 
well. 

" Lively there/' gayly shouted the old man to her; and 
then he turned to Levin. " So, sir, you are going to see 
Nikolai Ivanovitch .Sviazhsky? He often stops with 
us," he began to say in his garrulous style, as he leaned 
on the balustrade of the steps. But just as he was in 
the midst, of telling about his acquaintance with Sviazh- 
sky, again the gate creaked on its hinges, and the work- 
men came in from the fields with their harrows and 
wooden-plows. The horses attached to them were fat and 
in good condition. The laborers evidently belonged to 
the family : two were young fellows, and wore colored 
cotton shirts, and caps. The other two were hired men, 
and wore shabby shirts : one was an old man, the other 
middle-aged. 

The old peasant, starting down from the porch, went 
to the horses and began to unharness them. 

" Where have you been plowing ? " 

" In the potato-fields. We 've finished with one 

You, Fyodot, don't bring the gelding, but leave him 
at the trough; we'll harness another." 

" Say, batyushka, shall I tell 'em to take out the plow- 
shares, or to bring 'em ? " asked a big-framed, healthy- 
looking lad, evidently the old peasant's son. 

" Put 'em in the drags," replied the old man, coiling 
up the reins and throwing them on the ground. " Put 
things in order; then we'll have dinner." 

The handsome girl in galoshes came back to the house 
with her brimming pails swinging from her shoulders. 
Other women appeared from different quarters, — some 
young and comely, others old and ugly, with children 
and without children. 

The samovar began to sing on the stove. The work- 
men and the men of the household, having taken out 
their horses, came in to dinner. Levin, sending for his 
provisions from the tarantas, begged the old peasant 
to take tea with him. 

"Well, I have already drunk my tea," said the old 



u8 ANNA KARENINA 

peasant, evidently flattered by the invitation. "How- 
ever, for company's sake...." 

At tea Levin learned the whole history of the old 
man's domestic economy. Ten years before, he had 
rented of a lady one hundred and twenty desyatins, and 
the year before had bought them; and he had rented 
three hundred more of a neighboring landowner. A 
small portion of this land, and that' the poorest, he 
sublet ; but forty desyatins he himself worked, with the 
help of his sons find two hired men. The old peasant 
complained that all was going' bad; but Levin saw that 
he complained only for form's sake, and that his affairs 
were flourishing, s If they had been bad he would not 
have bought land for five hundred rubles, or married 
off his three sons and his nephew, or built twice after 
his izba was burned, and each time better. Notwith- 
standing the old peasant's complaints, it was evident 
that he felt pride in his prosperity, pride in his sons, 
in his nephew, his daughters, his horses, his cows, and 
especially in the fact that he owned all this domain. 

From his conversation with the old man, Levin learned 
that he believed in modern improvements. He planted 
many potatoes ; and his potatoes, which Levin saw in 
the storehouse, he had already dug and brought * in, 
while on Levin's estate they had only begun to dig 
them. He used the " ploog " on the potato-fields, as he 
called the plow which he got from the proprietor. He 
sowed wheat. The little detail that the old peasant 
sowed rye, and fed his horses with it, especially struck 
Levin/ H6w many times Levin/ seeing this beautiful 
fodder going to waste on his own estate, had wished 
to harvest it ; but he found it impossible to accomplish 
it. The muzhik used it, and could not find sufficient 
praise for it. 

" How do the women do it ? " 

" Oh ! they pile it up on one side, and then the cart 
comes for it." ' t 

" But with us proprietors everything goes wrong with 
the hired men," said Levin, filling his teacup and offer- 
ing it to him. 



ANNA KARENINA 119 

" Thank you," replied the old man, taking the cup, 
but refusing the sugar, pointing to the lumps which 
lay in front of him. 

" How can you get along with hired men ? " said he. 
"It is ruinous.. Here's Sviazhsky, for example. We 
know .what splendid land ....but they don't get decent 
crops, all from lack of Care." ; 

" Yes ; but how do you do with your workmen ? " 

"It's all among ourselves. We watch everything. 
Lazybones, off' .they go! We work with our own 
hands." 

h " Batyushka, Finogen wants you to give him the tar- 
water," said the woman in galoshes, looking in through 
the door. 

"So it is, sir," said the old man, rising; and, having 
crossed himself many times before the ikons or sacred 
pictures, he once more thanked Levin, and left the 
room, 

.When Levin went into the dark izba to give orders 
to his coachman, he found all the " men-folks " sitting 
down to dinner. The peasant women were on their 
feet helping. The healthy-looking young son, with his 
mouth full of kas/ta-gruel, got off some joke, and all 
broke into loud guffaws ; and more hilariously than 
the others laughed the woman in galoshes, who was 
pouring sAc/ii, or cabbage soup, into a cup. , , 

It well might be that the jolly face of the woman 
in the galoshes cooperated powerfully with the whole 
impression of orderliness which this peasant home pro- 
duced on Levin ; but the impression was so strong that 
Levin could never get rid, of it ; and all the way from 
the old man's j to Sviazhsky's, again and again he 
thought of what he had seen at the farm-house as 
something deserving special attention. ' 



i2o ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XXVI 

Sviazhsky was predvodityel or marshal of the nobility 
iii his district. He was five years older than Levin, and 
had been married some time. His sister-in-law was an 
inmate of his family, and to Levin she was a very attrac- 
tive young lady ; and Levin knew that Sviazhsky and 
his wife would be very glad for him to marry her. He 
knew this infallibly, as marriageable young men usually 
know such things, and he knew also that though he 
dreamed of marriage, and was sure that this fascinat- 
ing young lady would make a charming wife, Jie would 
sooner have been able to fly to heaven than to marry 
her, even if he had not been in love with Kitty Shcher- 
batsky. And this knowledge poisoned his pleasure in 
his prospective visit. 

On receiving Sviazhsky's letter, with its invitation to 
go hunting, Levin had immediately thought about this ; 
but in spite of it, decided that such views in regard to 
him on the part of Sviazhsky were entirely gratuitous, 
and he decided to accept the invitation. Moreover he 
had in the depths of his soul a strong curiosity to see 
this girl once more, and experiment on the effect that 
she would produce on him. 

Sviazhsky's domestic life was in the highest degree 
pleasant, and Sviazhsky himself was the very best type 
of the proprietor devoted to the affairs of the province, 
and this fact always interested Levin. 

He was one of those men that always excited Levin's 
amazement, whose opinions, very logical, although never 
self-formed, take one direction, while their lives, perfectly 
defined and confident in their course, take another, abso- 
lutely independent of each other and almost always in op- 
position. Sviazhsky was a thorough-going liberal. He 
despised the nobility, charged the majority of the nobles 
with secretly, and from motives of cowardice, opposing 
emancipation ; and he regarded Russia as a rotten coun- 
try like Turkey, and its government so wretched that he 
did not permit himself seriously to criticize its acts ; and 



ANNA KARENINA 121 

yet he had accepted public office, and attended faithfully 
to his duties. He never even went out without donning 
his official cap, with its red border and cockade. He 
declared that human existence was endurable only 
abroad, where he was going to live at the first oppor- 
tunity ; but at the same time he carried on in Russia a 
very complicated estate l in the most perfect style, and 
was interested in all that was going on in Russia, and 
was fully up with the times. The Russian muzhik, in 
his eyes, stood between man and monkey ; but, when 
the elections came, he gave his hand to the peasants by 
preference, and listened to them with the utmost atten- 
tion. He believed neither in God nor in the devil ; but 
he showed great concern in the questions concerning 
ameliorating the condition of the clergy, and the dimi- 
nution of the revenues, and moreover he labored with 
especial zeal to have his village church kept in repair. 

In regard to the complete emancipation of woman and 
especially her right to work, he sided with the most ex- 
treme supporters of this doctrine, but he lived with his 
wife in such perfect harmony that though they had no 
children every one admired them, and he took entire 
direction of the family affairs, so that his wife did noth- 
ing, and could do nothing, except in cooperation with 
him, in order to pass the time as agreeably as possible. 

If Levin had not been naturally disposed to see the 
best side of people the analysis of Sviazhsky's character 
would have caused him no trouble or question ; he would 
have said to himself : " Fool or Good-for-nothing," and 
that would, have been the end of it. But he could not 
say fool — durak — because Sviazhsky was undoubtedly 
not only very clever, but also a very cultivated and an ex- 
traordinarily simple-hearted man, entirely free from con- 
ceit ; there was no subject which he did not know ; but 
he displayed his knowledge only when it was needed. 
Still less could he say that he was a good-for-nothing, be- 

1 Khozyaistvo includes household economy, the outside interests, farm* 
ing, mills, — everything connected with an estate. The master of an 
estate is called kkozyain, the mistress khozyalka, — terms often used for 
host and hostess. 



i2i ANNA KARENINA 

cause Sviazhsky was unquestionably an honorable, excel* 
lent/ sensible man, who was always doing his work 
cheerfully and alertly, and had apparently never inten- 
tionally"- done anything wrong or could do anything 
wrong. 

Levin tried to comprehend and could not understand 
him and always looked at him and his life as a living 
enigma. 

He and Levin had been friends and therefore Levin 
allowed himself to study Sviazhsky, and tried to trace 
his view of life to the very source. But this was always 
an idle task. Every time Levin made the effort to pene- 
trate a little farther into the hidden chambers of Svia- 
zhsky's mind he discovered that the man was somewhat 
confused ; a sort of terror showed itself in his eyes, as 
if he feared that Levin was going to entrap him ; and he 
would give him a good-natured and jolly rebuff. 

Now, after his disenchantment on the subject of 
farm management, Levin was especially glad to be at 
Sviazhsky's. To say nothing of the fact that he was 
always pleasantly impressed by the sight of these doves 
so ' contented with themselves and all they possessed, 
and their comfortable nest, he had a great longing, now 
that he was so dissatisfied with his own life, to discover 
the secret of his having such clear, decided, and cheer- 
ful views of life. Moreover, Levin knew that he should 
meet at Sviazhsky's the proprietors of the neighborhood, 
arid he was especially desirous to talk with them, to 
hear about their experiences in farm management, about 
their crops, their ways of hiring service, and the like, 
which, as Levin knew* well, it was the fashion to regard 
as very trifling topics of conversation, but which seemed 
to him more important than anything else. 

" Perhaps these things were not important during the 
days of serfdom or in England. In both those cases 
conditions are definitely fixed ; but with us at the pres- 
ent time when everything has been overturned and the 
new order is only just begun, the question how to regu- 
late these conditions is the only important one in Rus- 
sia." 'Such was Levin's conviction. 



ANNA KARENINA 123 

The hunting which Sviazhsky gave him was poorer 
ihan Levin had expected : the marshes were dry, and the 
woodcock scarce. Levin walked all day, and bagged 
only three birds ; but in compensation he brought back 
with him as always from hunting a ravenous appetite, 
capital spirits, and that intellectual excitement which 
violent physical exercise always gave him. Even while 
he was out hunting, while, as it would seem, his thoughts 
were not busy about anything, he kept remembering the 
old man and his family, and the impression remained 
with him that there was some peculiar tie between him- 
self and that family. 

In the evening, at the tea-table in the company of 
two proprietors, who had come on some business with 
the marshal, the interesting conversation that he had 
looked forward to soon began. At the tea-table Levin 
sat next the hostess and had to keep up a conversa- 
tion with her and her sister who sat opposite him. His 
hostess was a moon-faced lady of medium stature and 
light complexion, all radiant with smiles and dimples. 
Levin endeavored, through her, to unravel the enigma 
which her husband's character offered him; but he 
Could not get full control of his thoughts, because oppo- 
site him sat the pretty sister-in-law in a gown worn, 
as it seemed to him, for' his especial benefit, with a 
square corsage cut rather low in front, and giving a 
glimpse of a very white bosom. This dfcolletf gown, in 
spite of the fact that the bosom was very white or per- 
haps from the very reason that it was very white, stopped 
the free flow of his thought. He could not help imagin- 
ing, though of course erroneously, that this display was 
made for his benefit, and yet he felt that he had no 
right to look at it, and he tried not to look at it ; but he 
was conscious of being to blame for her wearing such 
a gown. It seemed to Levin that he was deceiving some 
one, that he ought to make some kind of irn explanation, 
but that it was an utter impossibility to do it, and so he 
kept blushing and felt ill at ease, and his constraint com- 
municated itself to the pretty young lady. But the hostess 
seemed not to notice it, and kept up a lively conversation. 



i2 4 ANNA KARENINA 

" You say that my husband does not take an interest 
in Russian affairs ? " she asked. " On the contrary, he 
was happy when he was abroad, but not so happy as he 
is here. Here he feels that he is in his sphere. He 
has so much to do, and he has the faculty of interesting 
himself in everything. Oh ! you have not been to see 
our school, have you ? " 

"Yes, I have, — that little house .covered with ivy?" 

" Yes ; that is Nastia's work," said she, glancing at 
her sister. 

" Do you yourself teach ? " asked Levin, trying to 
look at Nastia's face, but feeling that, in spite of. him- 
self, he would see the low corsage. 

" Yes, I teach, and intend to keep on teaching ; but we 
have an excellent schoolmistress. And we have gym- 
nastics." 

" No, thank you, I will not take any more tea," said 
Levin. He felt that he was committing a solecism; but 
he could not keep up the conversation, and he rose in 
confusion. "I am very much interested in what they 
are saying," he added, and went to the other end of 
the table, where the host was talking with the two 
landed proprietors. Sviazhsky was sitting with his side 
toward the table, twirling his cup around with one hand, 
and with the other stroking his long beard, lifting it up 
to his nose and dropping it again as if he were smell- 
ing of it. His bright black eyes were fixed with keen 
amusement on one of the proprietors, a man with a 
white mustache, who was complaining bitterly about 
the peasantry. Levin saw that Sviazhsky had an an- 
swer ready for the worthy gentleman's comical com- 
plaints, and could reduce his arguments to powder if 
his official position did not compel him to respect the 
proprietor's. - 

The proprietor with the white mustache was evidently 
a narrow-minded country gentleman, an inveterate op- 
ponent of the emancipation, and an old-style farmer. 
Levin could see the signs of it in his old-fashioned, 
shiny coat, in his keen, angry eyes, in his well-balanced 
Russian speech, in his authoritative, slow, and studied 



ANNA KARENINA 125 

manner, and his imperious gestures with his large, 
handsome, sunburnt hands, on one of which for sole 
ornament was an old-fashioned wedding-ring. 



CHAPTER XXVII 

" If it only weren't a pity to abandon what has been 
done, — cost so much labor, — it would be better to give 
up, sell out, go abroad, and hear ' La Belle H£lene,' like 
NikolaY Ivanovitch," the old proprietor was saying, while 
his intelligent face lighted up with a pleasant smile. 

" There now ! but still you don't sell out," said Niko- 
laY Ivanovitch Sviazhsky ; " so you must be well off, on 
the whole." 

" I am well off in one way, because I have a home of 
my own, with board and lodging. Besides, one always 
hopes that the peasantry will improve. But would you 
believe it, — this drunkenness, this laziness ! Everything 
goes to destruction. No horses, no cows. They starve 
to death. But try to help them, — take them for farm- 
hands : they manage to ruin you; yes, even before a 
justice of the peace ! " 1 

" But you, too, can complain to the justice of the 
peace," said Sviazhsky. 

" What ! I complain ? Not for the world ! All such 
talk shows that complaints are idle. Here, at the mill, 
they took their handsel, and went off. What did the 
justice of the peace do ? Acquitted them. Your only 
chance is to go to the communal court, — to the starshina. 
The starshina will have the man thrashed for you. He 
settles things in the old-fashioned way. If it were not 
for him you had better sell out, fly to the ends of the 
world ! " 

1 In the Russian mir, or commune, the starshina, or elder, is the chief 
elected every three years. Before the emancipation of the serfs, in 1861, 
each commune had its volostnoi sud, or district court, the decisions of 
which were often very ridiculous. Among the reforms instituted by the 
Emperor Alexander II. was the so-called mirovolsadya, justice or arbiter 
of the peace, — more properly, judge of the peace, — an innovation which 
at first caused much opposition among the peasantry. See Wallace's " Rus- 
sia " and Leroy Beaulieu's " L' Empire des Tsars." — Ed. 



126 ANNA KARENINA 

The proprietor was evidently trying to tease Sviazhsky ; 
but Sviazhsky not only did not lose his temper, but was 
much amused. 

" Well, we carry on our estates without these meas- 
ures," said he, smiling. " I and Levin and he." 

He pointed to the other proprietor. 

" Yes ; but ask Mikhail Petrovitch how his affairs are 
getting along. Is that a rational way ? " x demanded the 
proprietor, especially accenting the word " rational." 

" My way is very simple," said Mikhail Petrovitch, 
" thank the Lord ! My whole business lies in seeing 
that the money is ready for the autumn taxes. The 
muzhiks come, and say, ' Batyushka, help us, father/ 
Well, all these muzhiks are neighbors ; I pity 'em. 
Well, I advance 'em the first third. Only I say, ' Re- 
member, children, I help you ; and you must help me 
when I need you, — sowing the oats, getting in the hay, 
harvesting.' Now, I get along with them as with my 
own family.- To be sure, there are some among them 
who have n't any conscience." 

Levin, who knew of old about these patriarchal tra- 
ditions, exchanged glances with Sviazhsky; and, inter- 
rupting Mikhail Petrovitch, he said, " How would you 
advise?" addressing the old proprietor with the gray 
mustache. " How do you think one's estate ought to be 
managed ? " 

"Well, manage it just as Mikhail Petrovitch does, — 
either give half the land to the muzhiks, or go shares 
with them. That is possible; but, all the same, the 
wealth of the country is growing less and less. Places 
on my lands which in the time of serfage, under good 
management, produced ninefold, now produce only three- 
fold. Emancipation has ruined Russia." 

Sviazhsky looked at Levin with smiling eyes, and 
even f friade a scarcely noticeable gesture to express his 
disdain, but Levin did not find the old proprietor's words 
ridiculous ; he understood them better than he under- 
stood Sviazhsky. Much that the old man said in his 
complaint, that Russia was ruined by the emancipation, 

1 Ratsiojialnoye khozyaistvo* 



ANNA KARENINA 127 

seemed to him true ; for him it was novel and unanswer- 
able. The proprietor evidently expressed his honest 
thought, — a thought which arose, not from any desire 
to show an idle wit, but from the conditions of his life, 
which had been spent in the country, where he could 
see the question practically from every side. 

" The fact is, please to acknowledge," continued the 
old proprietor, who evidently wished to show that he 
was not an enemy of civilization, " all progress is accom- 
plished by force alone. Take the reforms of Peter, of 
Catherine, of Alexander ; take European history itself ; 
still more so for progress in agriculture. The potato, 
for instance, — to introduce potatoes into Russia required 
force. We have not always plowed with iron plows; 
perhaps they have been introduced into our domains, 
but it required force. Now, until recently, when we 
had control over our serfs, we proprietors could conduct 
our affairs with all sorts of improvements : drying-rooms 
and winnowing-machines and dung-carts — all sorts of 
tools — we could introduce, because we had the power ; 
and the muzhiks at first would oppose, and then would 
imitate us. But now, by the abrogation of serfage, they 
have taken away our authority ; and so our estates, 1 
now that everything is reduced to the same level, must 
necessarily sink back to the condition of primitive bar- 
barism. This is my view of it." 

"Yes, but why? If that were rational, then you 
could keep on with your improvements by aid of hired 
labor/' said Sviazhsky. 

" We have no power. How could I ? allow me to 
ask// 

" This — this is the working-force, the chief element 
in the problem before us," thought Levin. 

" With hired men." 

" Hired men will not work well, or work with good 
tools. Our laborers know how to do only one thing, — 
to drink like pigs, and, when they are drunk, to ruin 
everything you intrust them with. They water your 
horses to death, destroy your best harnesses, take the 

1 KkozyaistvQ, 



128 ANNA KARENINA 

tires off your wheels and sell them to get drink, and 
stick bolts into your winnowing-machines so as to render 
them useless. Everything that is not done in their 
way is nauseous to them. And thus the affairs of our 
estates go from bad to worse. The lands are neglected, 
and go to weeds, or else are abandoned to the muzhiks. 
Instead of producing millions of tchetverts x of wheat, 
you can raise only a few hundred thousand. The pub- 
lic wealth is diminishing. If they were going to free 
the serfs, they should have done it gradually.".... 

And he developed his own scheme of emancipation 
whereby all these difficulties would have been avoided. 

This plan did not interest Levin, but when the gen- 
tleman had finished he returned to his first proposition, 
with the hope of inducing Sviazhsky to tell what he 
seriously thought about it. He said, addressing Svia- 
zhsky : — 

" It is very true that the level of our agriculture .is 
growing lower and lower, and that in our present rela- 
tions with the peasantry, it is impossible to carry on our 
estates rationally," he said. 

" I am not of that opinion," said Sviazhsky, seriously. 
■" I only see that we are not up to the point of manag- 
ing our estates, and that on the contrary, since serfage 
was abolished, agriculture has decayed ; I argue that 
in those days it was very wretched, and very low. We 
never had any machines, or good oxen or decent super- 
vision. We did not even know how to make up our 
accounts. Ask a proprietor : he could not tell you what 
a thing cost, or what it would bring him." 

" Italian book-keeping ! " said the old proprietor ironi- 
cally. " Reckon all you please, and get things mixed as 
much as you please, there will be no profit in it." 

"Why get things mixed up? Your miserable flail, 
your Russian topchachek, will break all to pieces ; my 
steam-thresher will not break to pieces. Then your 
wretched nags ; how are they ? A puny breed that 
you can pull by the tails, comes to nothing ; but our Per- 
cherons are vigorous horses, they are worth something. 

1 A tchetvert is 5.775 English bushels. 



ANNA KARENINA 129 

And so with everything. Our agriculture always 
needed to be helped forward." 

" Yes ! but it would need some power, Nikola* Iva- 
nuitch. Very well for you ; but when one has one son at 
the university, and several others at school, as I have, 
he can't afford to buy Percherons." 

" There are banks on purpose." 

" To have my last goods and chattels sold under the 
hammer. No, thank you ! " 

"I don't agree that it is necessary or possible to lift 
the level of agriculture much higher," said Levin. " I 
am much interested in this question ; and I have the 
means, but I cannot do anything. And as for banks, I 
don't know whom they profit. Up to the present time, 
whatever I have spent on my estate, has resulted only 
in loss. Cattle — loss; machines — loss." 

" That is true," said the old proprietor with the gray 
mustache, laughing with hearty satisfaction. 

" And I am not the only man," continued Levin. " I 
call to mind all those who have made experiments in the 
'rational manner.' All, with few exceptions, have come 
out of it with losses. Will you admit that your farming 
is profitable? " he asked, and at that instant he detected 
in Sviazhsky's face that transient expression of embar- 
rassment which he noticed when he wanted to penetrate 
farther into the inner chambers of Sviazhsky's mind. 

However, the question was not entirely fair play on 
Levin's part. His hostess had told him at tea that they 
had just had a German expert up from Moscow, who, 
for five hundred rubles' fee, agreed to put the book- 
keeping of the estate in order ; and he found that there 
had been a net loss of more than three thousand rubles. 
She could not remember exactly how much, but the 
German accountant had calculated it to within forty 
kopeks. 

The old proprietor smiled when he heard Levin's 
question about the profits of Sviazhsky's management. 
It was evident that he knew about the state of his 
neighbors' finances. 

" Maybe it is unprofitable," replied Sviazhsky. " This 



x 3 o ANNA KARENINA 

only proves that either I am a poor manager, or I sink 
my capital to increase the revenue." 

li Oh ! revenue ! " cried Levin, with horror, f Maybe 
there is such a thing as revenue in Europe, where the 
land is better for the labor spent on it ; but with us, the 
more labor spent on it, the worse it is — r that is because 
it exhausts it — so there is no revenue/' 

"How, no revenue ? It is a law." 

" Then we are no exceptions to the law. The word 
renta y revenue, has no clearness for us, and explains 
nothing, but rather confuses. No; tell me how the 
doctrine of revenue can be .... 

" Won't you have some curds ? — Masha, send us some 
curds or some raspberries," said Sviazhsky to his wife. 
" Raspberries have lasted unusually late this year." 

And, with his usual jovial disposition of soul, Svia- 
zhsky got up and went out, evidently assuming that the 
discussion was ended, while for Levin it seemed that it 
had only just begun. 

Levin was now left with the old proprietor, and con- 
tinued to talk with him, endeavoring to prove to him 
that all the trouble arose from the fact that we did not 
try to understand our laborers' habits and peculiarities. 
But -the old proprietor, like all people accustomed to 
think alone and for himself, found it difficult to enter 
into the thought of another, and clung firmly to his own 
opinions. He declared that the Russian muzhik was a 
pig, and loved swinishness, and that it needed force or 
else a stick to drive him out of his swinishness; but we 
are such liberals that we have suddenly swapped off the 
thousandryearrold stick for these lawyers and jails, where 
the good-for-nothing, stinking muzhik gets fed on good 
soup, and has his pure air by the cubic foot. 

"Why," asked Levin, wishing to get back to the 
question, "do you think that it is impossible to reach 
an equilibrium'which will utilize the forces of the laborer, 
and render them productive ? " 

?' That will never come about with the Russian peo- 
ple ; there is no force," replied the proprietor, 
if Why could not new conditions be found?" asked 



ANNA KARENINA 131 

Sviazhsky, who had been eating his curds, and smoking 
a cigarette, and now approached the two disputants. 
"All the needful forms are ready for use, and well 
learned. That relic of barbarism, the primitive com-, 
raune where each member is responsible for all, is fall- 
ing to pieces of its own weight; the right of holding 
serfs has been abolished ; now there remains only free 
labor, and its forms are at hand, — the day-laborer, the 
journeyman, the ordinary farmer, —-and you can't get 
rid of this." 

" But Europe is discontented with these forms." 

" Yes, and perhaps discontent will find new ones, and 
will progress probably." 

"This is all I say about that," said Levin. "Why 
should we not seek for them on our side ? " 

" Because it would be much the same as our pretend- 
ing to invent new methods of constructing railways. 
Our methods are all ready; all we have to do is to 
apply them." 

" But if they do not suit us ? if they are hurtful ? f* 
Levin insisted. 

And again he saw the frightened look in Sviazhsky's 
eyes. 

"Well! this: we throw up our caps, we follow wher- 
ever Europe leads ! All this I know ; but tell me, are 
you acquainted with all that is going on- in Europe 
about the organization of labor ? " 

" No ; I know very little." 

" This question is now occupying the best minds in 
Europe. Schulze-Delitzsch 1 and his school .... then all 
this prodigious literature on the labor question .... the 
tendencies of Lassalle, the most radical of all of them .... 
the Mulhausen organization .... this all is a fact, you 
surely must know." 

1 Hermann Schulze-Delitzsch, who founded the first People's Bank, and 
in the German Parliament labored for constitutional reform, was born in 
Prussian Saxony, August 29, 1808, died at Potsdam, April 29, 1883. At 
the time of his death the United Bank Organization of which he was man- 
ager had thirty-five hundred branches, with fifty million dollars' capital, 
and about a hundred millions of deposits. He was an opponent of Las- 
salle's socialism. — Ed. 



i 3 2 ANNA KARENINA 

" I have an idea of it, but it 's very vague." 

" No, you only say so ; you know all this as well as I 
do. I don't set up to be a professor of social science, 
but these things interest me ; and I assure you, if they 
interest you, you should go into them." 

"But where do they lead you ? " .... 

" Beg pardon." .... 

The two proprietors got up ; and Sviazhsky, again 
arresting Levin in his disagreeable habit of looking into 
the inner chambers of his mind, went out to bid his 
guests good-by. 



CHAPTER XXVIII 

Levin spent the evening with the ladies, and found it 
unendurably stupid. His mind was stirred, as never 
before, at the thought that the dissatisfaction he felt in 
the administration of his estate was not peculiar to him- 
self, but was a general condition into which affairs in 
Russia had evolved, and that an organization of labor, 
whereby the work would be carried on in such a manner 
as he saw at the muzhik's on the highway, was not an 
illusion, but a problem to be solved. And it seemed to 
him that he -could settle this problem, and that he must 
attempt to do it. 

Levin bade the ladies good-night, promising to go 
with them the following morning for a ride to visit some 
interesting spots in the Crown woods. Before going to 
bed he went to the library, to get some of the books on 
the labor question which Sviazhsky had recommended. 

Sviazhsky's library was an enormous room; lined with 
book-shelves, and having two tables, one a massive 
writing-table, standing in the center of the room, and 
the other a round one, laden with recent numbers of 
journals and reviews, in different languages, arranged 
about a lamp. Near the writing-table was a cabinet, 
stoika, containing drawers inscribed with gilt lettering 
for the reception of various documents. 



ANNA KARENINA 133 

Sviazhsky got the volumes, and sat down in a rocking, 
chair. 

"What is that you are looking at?" he asked of 
Levin, who was standing by the round table, and turn- 
ing the leaves of a review. 

Levin held up the review. 

" Oh, yes ! that is a very interesting article indeed. 
It argues/' he continued with gay animation, "that the 
principal culprit in the partition of Poland was not 
Frederic after all. It appears...." and he gave with 
the clearness characteristic of him a digest of these 
new and important discoveries. Although Levin was 
now more interested in the question of farm manage- 
ment than in anything, he asked himself, as he listened 
to his friend : — 

"What is he in reality? and why, why does the par- 
tition of Poland interest him ? " 

When Sviazhsky had. finished, Levin could not help 
saying : — 

" Well, and what of it ? " 

But he had nothing to say. It was interesting simply 
from the fact that it "argued/' 

But Sviazhsky did not explain, and did not think it 
necessary to explain, why it was interesting to him. 

"Well, but the irascible old proprietor interested me 
very much," said Levin, sighing. " He 's sensible, and 
a good deal of what he says is true." 

" Ah ! don't speak of it ! he is a confirmed slave' 
holder at heart, like the rest of them." 

" With you at their head " .... 

" Yes, only I am trying to lead them in the other 
direction," replied Sviazhsky, laughing. 

" His argument struck me very forcibly," said Levin. 
" He is right when he says that our affairs, that is, the 
'rational management,' 1 cannot succeed; that the only 
kind that can succeed is the money-lending system like 
that of the other proprietor, or, in other words, the one 
that is simplest Who is to blame for this ? " 

" We ourselves, of course. But then it is not true 

1 Ratsionalnoe khozyaistvo. 



134 ANNA KARENINA 

that it does not succeed. It succeeds with Vasiltchi* 
kof." 

" The mill .... ,? 

" But still I don't know what surprises you about it. 
The peasantry stand on such a low plane of develop- 
ment, both materially and morally, that it is evident 
they '11' oppose everything that is strange to them. In 
Europe the 'rational management • succeeds because r 
the people are civilized. In the first place, we must 
civilize our peasantry, ^ that 's the point." 

" But how will you civilize them ? " 

"To civilize the people, three things are necessary, **h 
schools, schools, and schools." 

" But you yourself say that the peasantry stand on a 
low plane of material development. What good will 
schools do in that respect ? V 

" Do you know, you remind me of a story of the 
advice given to a sick man : .' You had better try a 
purgative/ He tried it ; he grew worse. * Apply leeches.' 
He applied them; he grew worse. 'Well, then, pray 
tp'God.'' He tried it; he grew worse. So it is with 
you. I say political economy ; you say you 're worse 
for it. I suggest socialism ; worse still. Education ; 
still worse." 

" Yes. But how can schools help ? n 

* f They will create other needs." 

" But this is just the very thing I could never under« 
stand," replied Levin, vehemently. " In what way will 
schools help the peasantry to better their material con- 
dition ? You say that schools — education — will create 
new needs. So much the worse, because they will not 
have the ability to satisfy them ; and I could never see 
how a knowledge of addition and subtraction and the 
catechism could help them to better themselves materi- 
ally. Day before yesterday I met a peasant woman 
with a baby at the breast, and I asked her where she 
was going. She said she had been 'to the babka's; 1 
the child had a crying fit, and I took him to be cured.' 

1 Babha % a peasant grandmother, a popular name for the midwife. It 
is the diminutive olbaba> a peasant woman, especially a muzhik's wife. 



ANNA KARENINA 135 

I asked, ' How did the babka cure the crying fit ? ' € She 
set him on the hen-roost, and muttered something.' " 

" Well there ! " cried Sviazhsky, laughing heartily. 
"You yourself confess it. In order to teach them that 
they can't cure children by setting them on hen-roosts, 
you must .... " 

" Ah no ! " interrupted Levin, with some vexation. 
"Your remddy of schools for the people I only com- 
pared to the babka's method of curing. The peasantry 
are poor and uncivilized ; this we see as plainly as the 
woman saw her child's distress because he was crying. 
But that schools can raise them from their wretched- 
ness is as inconceivable as the hen-roost cure for sick 
children. You must first remedy the cause of the 
poverty." 

"Well! In this at least you agree with Spencer, 
whom you do not like. He says that civilization can 
result from increased happiness and comfort in life, 
from frequent ablutions, but not by learning to read 
and cipher." .... 

- There now ! I am very glad, or rather very sorry, 
if I am in accord with Spencer. But this I have felt 
for a long time : Schools cannot help ; the only help can 
come from some economical organization, whereby the 
peasantry will be richer, will have more leisure. Then 
schools also will come." 

*' Nevertheless, schools are obligatory now all over 
Europe." 

" But how would you h&rmonize this with Spencer*s 
ideas ? " asked Levin. 

But into Sviazhsky's eyes again came the troubled ex- 
pression ; and he said with a smile : — 

" No, this story of the crying fit was capital ! Is it 
possible that you heard it yourself ? " 

Levin saw that there was no connection between this 
man's life and his thoughts. Evidently it was perfectly 
indifferent to him where his conclusions led him. Only 
the process of reasoning was what appealed to him ; 
and it was disagreeable to hini When this process of 
reasoning led him into some stupid, blind alley. This 



136 ANNA KARENINA 

was what he did not like, and he avoided it by leading 
the conversation to some bright and agreeable topic. 

'All the impressions of this day, including those which 
arose from his visit to the old muzhik, and which seemed 
somehow to give a new basis to his thoughts, troubled 
Levin profoundly. This genial Sviazhsky who kept his 
thoughts for general use and evidently had entirely 
different principles for the conduct of his life, keeping 
them hidden from Levin, while at the same time he and 
the majority of men — the throng whose name is legion 
— seemed to be ruled by the general consensus of 
opinions by means of ideas strange to him ; the testy 
old proprietor, perfectly right in his judicious views of 
life, but wrong in despising one entire class in Russia, 
and that perhaps the best ; his own discontent with his 
activity, and the confused hope of setting things right 
at last, — -all this excited and disturbed him. 

Levin retired to his room, and lay down on his 
springy mattress, which unexpectedly exposed his arms 
and legs every time he moved ; but it was long before he 
could get to sleep. His conversation with Sviazhsky, 
though many good things were said, did not interest 
him ; but the old proprietor's arguments haunted him. 
He involuntarily remembered every word that he said, 
and his imagination supplied the answer. 

" Yes, I ought to have replied to him, ' You say that 
our management is not succeeding because the muzhik 
despises all improvements, and that force must be ap- 
plied to them. But if our estates were not retrograding, 
even where these improvements are not found, you 
would be right; but advance is made only where the 
laborer works in conformity with his own customs, as at 
the old man's by the roadside. Our general dissatisfac- 
tion with our management proves that either we or the 
laborers are at fault. We have long been losing, both 
by • our own methods and by European methods, by 
neglecting the qualities of the laboring force. Let us 
be willing to acknowledge that the laboring force is not 
ideal as a force, but is the Russian muzhik with his in- 
stincts, and we shall then be able to manage our estates 



ANNA KARENINA 137 

in conformity with this.' I should have said to him . 
* Imagine that you were carrying on an estate like that 
of my old man by the roadside, that you had found a 
way of interesting your laborers in the success of their 
work, and had found that by means of 'improvements 
such as they would acknowledge to be improvements, 
you had succeeded in doubling or trebling your returns 
without exhausting the soil ; then suppose you make a 
division and give a half to your working force. The 
residue which you would have would be larger, and that 
which would come to the working force would be larger.' 
But to do this, there must be a coming down from any- 
thing like ideal management and the laborers must be 
interested in the success of the management. How can 
it be done ? This is a question of details, but there is 
no doubt that it is possible." 

This idea kept Levin in a state of agitation. Half 
the night he did not sleep, thinking of the details con- 
nected with carrying out his new plans and schemes. 
He had not intended to leave so soon, but now he 
decided to go home on the morrow. Moreover, the 
memory of the young lady with the open dress came 
over him with a strange sense of shame and disgust. 
But the main thing that decided him was his desire to 
lay before his muzhiks his new project before the autumn 
harvests, so that they might reap under the new condi 
tions. He decided to reform his whole method of ad- 
ministration. 

CHAPTER XXIX 

The carrying out of Levin's plan offered many diffi- 
culties ; but he persevered, and finally succeeded in 
persuading himself without self-deception that the en- 
terprise was worth the labor even though he should not 
succeed in doing all that he wanted to do. One of the 
principal obstacles which met him was the fact that his 
estate was already in running order, and that it was im- 
possible to come to a sudden stop and begin anew, but 
that he had to remodel his machine while it was going. 



138 ANNA KARENINA 

When he reached home in the evening, he summoned 
his overseer, and explained to him his plans. The over- 
seer received with undisguised satisfaction all the details 
of this scheme as far as they showed that all that had 
been done hitherto was absurd and unproductive. The 
overseer declared that he had long ago told him so, but 
that no one would listen to him. But when it came to 
Levin's proposition to share the profits of the estate 
with the laborers, on the basis of an association, the 
overseer put on an expression of the deepest melan- 
choly, and immediately began to speak of the necessity 
of bringing in the last sheaves of wheat, and commenc- 
ing the second plowing ; and Levin felt that now was 
not a propitious time. 

On conversing with the muzhiks about his project of 
dividing with them the products of the earth, he found 
that here his chief difficulty lay in the fact that they 
were tod much occupied with their daily tasks to com- 
prehend the advantages and disadvantages of his enter- 
prise. 

A simple-minded muzhik, Ivan the herdsman, seemed 
to comprehend and to approve Levin's proposal to share 
with him in the profits of the cattle ; but whenever Levin 
went on to speak of the advantages that would result, 
Ivan's face grew troubled, and, without waiting to hear 
Levin out, he would hurry off to attend to some work 
that could not be postponed, — either to pitch the hay 
from the pens, or to draw water, or to clear away the 
manure. 

Another obstacle consisted in the inveterate distrust 
of the peasants, who would not believe that a proprietor 
could have any other aim than to get all he could 6ut 
of them. They were firmly convinced, in spite of all 
he could say, that his real purpose was hidden. They, 
on their side, in expressing their opinions had much 
to say ; but they carefully guarded against telling what 
their actual object was. 

Levin came to the conclusion that the irate proprietor 
was right in saying that the peasants demanded, as the 
first and indispensable condition for any arrangement, 



ANNA KARENINA 139 

that they should never be bound to any of the new agri- 
cultural methods, or to use the improved tools. They 
agreed that the new-fashioned plow worked better, that 
the weed-extirpator was more successful ; but they in- 
vented a thousand reasons why they should not use 
them ; and, although he had made up his mind that 
there must be a coming down from anything like ideal 
management, he felt deep regret to give up improve- 
ments the advantages of which were so evident. But 
in spite of all these difficulties, he persevered ; and by 
autumn the new arrangement was in working order, or 
at least seemed to be. 

At first Levin intended to give up his whole domain * 
just as it was to the muzhiks t— the laborers — and over- 
seer on the new conditions of association. But very 
soon he found that this was impracticable; and he 
made up his mind to divide the management of the 
estate. The cattle, the garden, the kitchen-garden, 
the hay-fields, and some lands fenced off into several 
lots were to be reckoned as special and separate divis- 
ions. 

Ivan, the simple-minded herdsman, who seemed to 
Levin better fitted than any one else, formed an artel, 
or association, composed of members of his family, and 
took charge of the cattle-yard. A distant field, which 
for eight years had been lying fallow, was taken by the 
shrewd carpenter Feodor Rezunof, who joined with him 
seven fa,milies of muzhiks ; and the muzhik Shuraef en- 
tered into the same arrangements for superintending the 
gardens. All the rest was left as it had been;- but these 
three divisions constituted the beginning of the new ar- 
rangement, and they kept Levin very busy. 

It was true that matters were not carried on in the 
cattle-yard any better than before, and that Ivan was 
obstinate in his opposition to giving the cows a warm 
shelter, and to butter made of sweet cream, asserting 
that cows kept in a cold place required less feed, and 
that butter made of sour cream w^s made quicker; and 
he demanded his wages as before, and he was not at 

1 Khozydistvo* 



i 4 o ANNA KARENINA 

all interested in the fact that the money that he re- 
ceived was not his wages but his share of the profits 
of the association. 

It was true that Rezunof and his associates did not 
give the field a second plowing, as they had been ad- 
vised to do, and excused themselves on the ground that 
they had no time. It was true that the muzhiks of this 
company, although they had agreed to take this work 
under the new conditions, called this land, not common 
land, but shared land, and the muzhiks and Rezunof 
himself said to Levin : " If you would take money for 
the land it would be less bother to you and that would 
let us out. M 

Moreover, these muzhiks kept putting off under vari- 
ous pretexts the building of the cattle-yard and barn, and 
did not get it done till winter, though they had agreed 
to build it immediately. 

It was true that Shuraef tried to exchange for a trifle 
with the muzhiks the products of the gardens which he 
had undertaken to manage. He evidently had a wrong 
notion and a purposely wrong notion of the conditions 
under which he had taken the land. 

It was true that often in talking with the muzhiks 
and explaining to them all the advantages of the under- 
taking, Levin was conscious that all they heard was the 
sound of his voice, that they were firmly convinced that 
they were too shrewd to let him deceive them. He 
was especially conscious of this when talking with the 
cleverest of the muzhiks, Rezunof. He noticed in the 
man's eye a gleam which betrayed evident scorn for 
Levin and a firm conviction that if any one was to be 
cheated it was not he — Rezunof. 

But, in spite of all these drawbacks, Levin felt that 
he was making progress, and that if he rigorously kept 
his accounts and persevered he should be able to show 
his associates at the end of the year that the new order 
of things could bring excellent results. 

All this -business, together with his work in connec- 
tion with the rest of his estate, which still remained in 
his own hands, and together with his work in the library 



ANNA KARENINA. 141 

on his. new book, so filled his time during the summer 
that he scarcely ever went out, even to hunt. 

Toward the end of August he learned through the 
man that brought back the saddle that the Oblonskys 
had returned to Moscow. By not having replied to 
Darya Aleksandrovna's letter, by his rudeness which he 
could not remember without a flush of shame, he felt 
that he had burnt his ships and he never again could 
go to them. In exactly the same way he owed apolo- 
gies to Sviazhsky for having left his house without bid- 
ding him good-by. Neither would he again dare to 
go to Sviazhsky's. But now all- this was a matter of 
indifference to him. He was more interested and ab- 
sorbed in his new scheme of managing his estate than 
in anything that he had ever attempted. 

He finished the books which Sviazhsky had lent him, 
and others on political economy and socialism, which 
he had sent for. In the books on political economy, 
in Mill, for example, which he studied first with eager- 
ness, hoping every minute to find a solution of the ques- 
tions which occupied him, he found laws deduced from 
the position of European husbandry ; but he could not 
see how these laws could be profitably applied to Rus- 
sian conditions. He found a similar lack in the books 
of the socialist writers. Either they were beautiful but 
impracticable fancies, such as he dreamed when he was 
a student, or modifications of that situation of things 
applicable to Europe, but offering no solution for the 
agrarian question in Russia. 

Political economy said that the laws by which the 
wealth of Europe was developed and would develop 
were universal and fixed ; socialistic teachings said that 
progress according to these laws would lead to destruc- 
tion ; but neither school gave him any answer or as 
much as a hint on the means of leading him and all the 
Russian muzhiks and agriculturists, with their millions 
of hands and of desyatins, to more successful methods 
of reaching prosperity. 

As he was already involved in this enterprise, he con- 
scientiously read through everything that bore on the 



i 4 ? ANNA KARENINA 

subject and decided in the autumn to go abroad and 
study the matter on the spot, so that he might not 
have with this question the experience that had so often 
met him with various questions in the past. How 
many times in a discussion he had just begun to under- 
stand his opponent's thought and to expound his own, 
when suddenly the question would be asked: "But 
Kaufmann, Jones, Du Bois, Mitchell ? You have not 
read them? Read them, they have worked out this 
question." 

He saw clearly now that Kaufmann and Mitchell 
could not tell him anything. He knew what he wanted. 
He saw that Russia possessed an admirable soil and 
admirable workmen, and that in certain cases, as with 
the muzhik by the roadside, the land and the laborers 
could produce abundantly, but .that in the majority of 
cases when capital was spent upon them in the Eu- 
ropean manner, they produced little, and that this re- 
sulted entirely from the fact that the laborers like to 
work, and work well only in their own way, and that 
this contrast was not the result of chance, but was per- 
manent and based on the very nature of the people. 
He thought that the Russian people, which was des- 
tined to colonize and cultivate immense unoccupied 
spaces, would consciously, until all these lands were 
occupied, hold to these methods as necessary to them, 
and that these methods were not so bad as they were 
generally considered. And he , wanted to demonstrate 
this theoretically in his book, and practically on his 
estate, 



CHAPTER XXX 

Toward the end of September the lumber was 
brought for the construction of a barn on the artel 
land, and the tetter was sold, and showed a profit. 
The new administration, on the whole, worked admi- 
rably in practice;, pr at least it seemed so to Levin. 

But in order to explain the whole subject into a clear 



ANNA KARENINA 143 

iight theoretically, and to finish his treatise, which Levin 
imagined was likely not only to revolutionize political 
economy, but even to annihilate this science, and to 
make the beginnings of a new one, treating of the 
relations of the peasantry to the soil, he felt that it was 
necessary to go abroad, and to learn, from observation 
on the spot, all that was going on in that direction, and 
to find conclusive proofs that all that was done there 
was not the right thing. 

He was only waiting for the delivery of the wheat to 
get his money, and make the journey. But the autumn 
rains set in, and portions of the wheat and potatoes 
were not as yet garnered. All work was at a stand- 
still, and it was impossible to deliver the wheat. The 
roads were impracticable, two mills were washed away 
by the freshet, and the weather kept growing worse and 
worse. 

But on the morning of October 12 the sun came out; 
and Levin, hoping for a change in the weather, began 
resolutely to prepare for his journey. He sent the 
overseer to the merchant to negotiate for the sale of 
the wheat, and he himself went out for a tour of inspec- 
tion of the estate, in order to make the last remaining 
arrangements for his journey. 

Having accomplished all that he wished, he returned 
at nightfall, wet from the rivulets that trickled from his 
waterproof down his neck and inside his high boots, 
but in a happy and animated frame of mind. Toward 
evening the storm increased ; the .hail pelted so vio- 
lently the drenched horse, that she shook her ears and 
her head, and went sidewise ; but Levin, protected by 
his bashluik, felt comfortable enough, and he cheer- 
fully gazed around him, — now at the muddy streams 
running down the wheel-tracks ; now at the raindrops 
trickling down every bare twig ; now at the white spots 
where the hail had not yet melted on the planks of the 
bridge ; now at the dry but still pulpy leaf, clinging 
with its stout stem to the denuded elm. In spite of 
the gloomy aspect of nature, he felt in particularly 
good spirits. His talks with the peasants in a distant 



i 4 4 ANNA . KARENINA 

village convinced him that they were beginning to get 
used to his new arrangements ; and an old dvornik, 
at whose house he stopped to dry himself, evidently 
approved of his plan, and wanted to join the association 
for the purchase of cattle. 

" What is required is to go straight to my goal, and 
I shall succeed," thought Levin; "but the labor and 
the pains have an object. I am not working for my- 
self alone, but the question concerns the good of all. 
The whole way of managing our estates, the condition of 
all the people, must be absolutely changed. Instead 
of poverty, universal well-being, contentment; instead 
of enmity, agreement and union of interests ; in a word, 
a bloodless revolution, but a mighty revolution,- begin- 
ning in the little circuit of our district, then reaching the 
province, Russia, the whole world ! The conception is 
so just that it cannot help being fruitful. Yes, indeed, 
this goal is worth working for. And there is abso- 
lutely no significance in the fact that I, Kostia Levin, 
my own self, a man who went to a ball in a black neck- 
tie, and was rejected by a Shcherbatsky, am a stupid 
and a good-for-nothing ; that is neither here nor there. 
I believe that Franklin felt that he was just such 
a good-for-nothing, and had just as little faith in him- 
self, when he took everything into account. And, prob- 
ably, he had his Agafya Mikha'flovna also, to whom he 
confided his secrets." 

With such thoughts, Levin reached home in the dark. 
The overseer, who had been to the merchant, came and 
handed him a part of the money from the wheat. The 
agreement with the dvornik was drawn up ; and then 
the overseer told how he had seen wheat still standing 
in the field by the road, while his one hundred and sixty 
stacks, not yet brought in, were nothing in comparison 
to what others had. 

After supper Levin sat down in his chair, as usual, 
with a book ; and as he read he began to think of his 
projected journey, especially in connection with his 
book. That evening the whole significance of his un- 
dertaking presented itself to him with remarkable clear- 



ANNA KARENINA 145 

ness, and his ideas fell naturally into flowing periods, 
which expressed the essence of his thought. 

" I must write this down," he said to himself. " It 
must go into a short introduction, though before I 
thought that was unnecessary." 

He got up to go to his writing-table; and Laska, who 
had been lying at his feet, also got up, and, stretching 
herself, looked at him, as if asking where he was going. 
But he had no time for writing ; for the various super- 
intendents came for their orders, and he had to go to 
meet them in the anteroom. 

After giving them their orders, or rather, having 
made arrangements for their morrow's work, and hav- 
ing received all the muzhiks who came to consult with 
him, Levin went back to his library, and sat down to 
his work. Laska lay under the table ; Agafya Mikhaf- 
lovna, with her knitting, took her usual place. 

After writing some time, Levin suddenly arose, and 
began to walk up and down the room. The memory 
of Kitty and her refusal, and the recent glimpse of her, 
came before his imagination with extraordinary vividness. 

" Now, there 's no need of your getting blue," said 
Agafya Mikhailovna. " Now why do you stay at home ? 
You had better go to the warm springs if your mind is 
made up." 

" I am going day after to-morrow, Agafya Mikhat- 
lovna; but I had to finish up my business." 

"Your business, indeed! Haven't you given these 
muzhiks enough already ? And they say, ' Our barin 
is trying to buy some favor from the Tsar ; ' and strange 
it is : why do you bother yourself so about the muzhiks ? " 

" I am not bothering myself about them ; I am doing 
it for my own good." 

Agafya MikhaTlovna knew all the details of Levin's 
plans, for he had explained them to her, and he had 
often had discussions with her and had not agreed with 
her comments; but now she entirely misapprehended 
what he said to her. 

" For your own soul it is certainly important ; to think 
of that is above everything," said she, with a sigh. 



146 ANNA KARENINA 

" Here is Parfen Denisuitch : although he could not 
read, yet may God give us all to die as he did ! " said 
She, referring to a household servant who had recently 
died. "They confessed him and gave him extreme 
unction." 

' " I did not mean that," said he ; "I mean that I am 
working for my own profit. It will be more profitable 
to me if the muzhiks will work better." 

" There ! you will only have your labor for your pains. 
The lazy will be lazy and always do things over his left 
shoulder. Where he has a conscience, he *11 work ; if 
not," nothing will be done." 

'"Well, well! But don't you yourself say that Ivan 
is beginning to look out for the cows better ? " 

f " I say this one thing," replied Agafya Mikhailovna, 
evidently not at random but with a keen logical connec- 
tion of thought : " You must get married, that 's what." 

Agafya MikhaTlovha's observation about the very 
matter that preoccupied him angered him and insulted 
him. He frowned, and, without replying, sat down to 
his work again, repeating to himself all that he had 
thought about the importance of his work. Occasion- 
ally amid the silence he noticed the clicking of Agafya 
MikhaYlovna's needles; and, remembering what he did 
not wish to remember, he would frown. 

At nine o'clock the sound of bells was heard, and the 
heavy rumbling of a carriage on the muddy road. 

" There ! here 's some visitors coming to see you : 
you won't be bored any more," said Agafya Mikhai- 
loVna, rising, and going to the door. But Levin stepped 
ahead of her. His work did not progress now, and he 
was glad to see any guest. 



CHAPTER XXXI 

Before Levin got halfway down-stairs he heard in 
the vestibule the sound of a familiar cough ; but the 
sound was covered by the noise of his own footsteps, 
and he hoped that he was mistaken. Then he saw the 



ANNA KARENINA 147 

tall bony figure which he knew so well. But even now, 
when there seemed to be no possibility of deception, he 
still hoped that he was mistaken, and that this tall man 
who was divesting himself of his shuba, and coughing, 
was not his brother Nikolai. 

Levin loved his brother, but it was always extremely 
disagreeable to live with him. Now especially, when 
Levin was under the influence of the thoughts and 
suggestions awakened by Agafya Mikhaiflovna, and 
was in a dull and melancholy humor, the presence of 
his brother was indeed an affliction. Instead of a gay, 
healthy visitor, — some stranger, who, he hoped, would 
drive away his perplexities, — he was obliged to receive 
his brother, who knew him through and through, who 
could read his most secret thoughts, and who would 
oblige him to share them with him. And this he did 
not like to do. 

Angry with himself for his unworthy sentiments, 
Levin ran down into the vestibule ; and, as soon as he 
saw his brother close at hand, the feeling of personal 
discomfort instantly disappeared, and was succeeded by 
a feeling of pity. Terrible as his brother Nikolat had 
been when he saw him before by reason of his emacia- 
tion and illness, he was now still more emaciated, still 
more feeble. He was like a skeleton covered with skin. 

He was standing in the vestibule stretching out his 
long, thin neck and unwinding a scarf from it ; and he 
smiled with a strange melancholy smile. When Levin 
saw his brother's humble and pitiful smile, he felt a 
choking sensation. 

"Well! I have come to you," said Nikolaf, in a thick 
voice, and not for a second taking his eyes from his 
brother's face, " I have been wanting to come for a long 
time ; yes, I have, but I have been so ill. Now I am 
very much better," he added, rubbing his beard with his 
great bony hand. 

"Yes, yes," replied Levin; and it was still more ter- 
rible to him when, as he touched his brother's shriveled 
cheeks with his lips, he felt his fever flush, and saw the 
gleam of his great, strangely ,brilliant eyes\ 



148 ANNA KARENINA 

Some time before this, Konstantin Levin had written 
his brother that, having disposed of the small portion 
of their common inheritance, consisting of personal 
property, a sum of two thousand rubles was due as his 
share. 

Nikola* said that he had come to get this money, and 
especially to see the old nest; to put his foot on the 
natal soil, so as to get renewed strength, like the heroes 
of ancient times. Notwithstanding his tall stooping 
form, notwithstanding his frightful emaciation, his move- 
ments were, as they had always been, quick and impetu- 
ous. Levin took him to his room. 

Nikolai changed his dress, and took great pains with 
his toilet, which in former times he neglected. He 
brushed his thin shaven hair, and went up-stairs smiling. 

He was in the gayest and happiest humor, just as 
Konstantin had seen him when he was a child. He 
even spoke of Sergyef Ivanovitch without bitterness. 
When he saw Agafya MikhaKlovna, he jested with her, 
and questioned her about the old servants. The news 
of the death of Parfen Denisuitch made a deep impres- 
sion on him. A look of fear crossed his face, but he 
instantly recovered himself. 

" He was very old, was he not ? " he asked, and 
quickly changed the conversation. "Yes, I am going 
to stay a month or two with you, and then go back to 
Moscow. You see, Miagkof has promised me a place, 
and I shall enter the service. Now I have turned over 
a new leaf entirely/' he added. V You see, I have sent 
away that woman." 

" Marya Nikolayevna ? How ? What for ? V 

" Ah ! she was a wretched woman ! She caused a 
heap of tribulations/* 

But he did not tell what the tribulations were. He 
could not confess that he had sent Marya Nikolayevna 
away because she made his tea too weak, still less be- 
cause she insisted on treating him as an invalid. 

"Then, besides, I wanted to begin an entirely new 
kind of life. Of course, I, like everybody else, have 
committed follies; but the present, — I mean the last 



ANNA KARENINA 149 

one, — I don't regret it, provided only I get better; and 
better, thank the Lord ! I feel already." 

Levin listened, and tried, but tried in vain, to find 
something to say. Apparently Nikola* had somewhat 
the same feeling ; he began to ask him about his affairs ; 
and Konstantin was glad to speak about himself because 
he could speak without any pretense. He frankly re- 
lated his plans and his experiments. 

Nikola'f listened, but did not show the least interest. 

These two men were so related to each other, and 
there was such a bond between them, that the slightest 
motion, the sound of their voices, spoke more clearly 
than all the words that they could say to each other. 

At this moment both were thinking the same thought, 
— Nikolai's illness and approaching death — dwarfing 
everything else into insignificance. Neither of them 
dared make the least allusion to it, and therefore all that 
either of them said failed to express what really occu- 
pied their minds — and was therefore false. Never 
before had Levin been so glad for an evening to end, 
for bedtime to come. Never, even when obliged to pay 
casual or official visits, had he felt so false and unnatu- 
ral as that evening. And the consciousness of this un- 
naturalness, and his regret, made him more unnatural 
still. His heart was breaking to see his beloved dying 
brother ; but he was obliged to dissemble, and to talk 
about various things as if his brother was going to 
live. 

As at this time the house was damp and only his own 
room was warm, Levin offered to share it, with a parti- 
tion between them, with his brother. 

Nikolai went to bed, and slept the uneasy sleep of an 
invalid, turning restlessly from side to side, and con- 
stantly coughing. Sometimes when he could not raise 
the phlegm, he would cry out, " Akh ! Bozhe mo'f ! " 
Sometimes, when the dampness choked him, he would 
grow angry, and cry out, " Ah, the devil ! " 

Levin could not sleep as he listened to him. His 
thoughts were varied, but they always returned to one 
theme, — death. 



1 5 o ANNA KARENINA 

Death, the inevitable end of all, for the first time 
appeared to him with irresistible force. And death was 
here, with this beloved brother, who groaned in his 
sleep, and called now upon God, now upon the devil. 
It was with him also : this he felt. If not to-day, then 
to-morrow ; if not to-morrow, then in thirty years ; was 
it not all the same ? And what this inevitable death 
was, — not only did he not know, not only had he never 
before thought about it, but he had not wished, had not 
dared, to think about it. 

" Here I am working, wanting to accomplish some- 
thing, but I forgot that all must come . to an end, — > 
death." 

Me was lying in bed in the darkness, curled up, 
holding his knees, scarcely able to breathe/ so great was 
the tension of his mind. The more he thought, the 
more clearly he saw that from his conception of life he 
had omitted nothing except this one little factor, death, 
which would come and end all, and that there was no 
help against it — not the least. Yes, this is terrible, 
but so it is ! 

" Yes, but I am still alive. Now, what can be done 
about it ? what can be done ? " he asked in despair. 
He lighted a candle, and softly arose, and went to the 
mirror, and began to look at his face and * his hair. 
Yes ! on the temples a few gray hairs were to be 
seen. He opened his mouth. His back teeth showed 
signs of decay. He doubled up his muscular arms. 
" Yes, there 3 s much strength. But this poor Niko- 
lenka, who is breathing so painfully with the little that 
is left of his lungs, also had at one time a healthy body." 
And suddenly he remembered how when they were 
children, and were put to bed, they would wait until 
Feodor Bogdanuitch got out of the door, and then begin 
a pillow fight, and laugh, laugh so unrestrainedly, that 
hot even the fear of Feodor Bogdanuitch could quench 
this exuberant and intoxicating sense of the gayety of 
life. " But now there he lies in bed with his poor 
hollow chest — and I< — ignorant why, and what will 
become of me." .... 



ANNA KARENINA 151 

" Kah ! kah ! ah ! what the devil are you doing ? 
Why don't you go to sleep ? " demanded his brother's 
voice. 

" I don't know; insomnia, I guess." 

" But I have been sleeping beautifully. I have not 
had any sweat at all. Just feel — no sweat." 

Levin felt of him, then he got into bed again, put out 
the candle, but it was long before he went to sleep. 
Still in his mind arose this new question, how to live 
so as to be ready for the inevitable death ? 

" There! he is dying! Yes! he will die in the 
spring. How can I aid him ? What can I say to him ? 
What do I know about it? I had even forgotten that 
there was such a thing." 

Levin had long before made the observation that 
often people who surprise you by an abrupt transition 
grow unendurable by reason of their, gentleness and 
excessive humility, unreasonableness, and peremptory 
ways. He foresaw that this would be the case with 
his brother; and, in fact, Nikolai's sweet temper was 
not of long duration. On the very next morning he 
awoke in an extremely irritable temper, and immediately 
began to pick a quarrel with his brother by touching 
him on the most tender points. 

Levin felt himself to blame, but he could not be 
frank. He felt that if they had not both dissimulated 
their thoughts, but had spoken from their very hearts, 
they would have looked into each other's eyes, and he 
would have said only thjs : " You are going to die, you 
are going to die;" find NikolaT would have answered 
only this : " I know that I arn dying, and I am afraid, 
afraid, afraid. V 

And they would have said nothing more if they had' 
spoken honestly from their hearts. But as this sincerity 
was not possible, Konstantin tried to do what all his 
life long he had never succeeded in doing, though he 
had observed that many persons could do it and that 
without doing it life was almost impossible, — he tried 
to talk about something that was not in his mind, and 
he felt; that his brother divined his insincerity, and was 



152 ANNA KARENINA 

therefore irritated and angry, and found fault with all 
that he said. 

On the third day Nikolai began to discuss the ques- 
tion of his brother's reforms, and to criticize them, and 
in a spirit of contrariety to confound his scheme with 
communism. 

"You have only taken your idea from some one else; 
and you distort it, and want to apply it to what is not 
suited to receive it." 

" Yes, but I tell you that the two have nothing in 
common. I have no thought of copying communism, 
which denies the right of property, of capital, of inheri- 
tance ; but I do not disregard these stimuli" It went 
against Levin's grain to use these terms, but since he 
had begun his treatise he found himself, in spite of him, 
compelled to use non-Russian words. "All I want is 
to regulate labor." 

" In other words, you borrow a foreign idea ; you 
take away from it all that gives it force, and you pre- 
tend to make it pass as new," said Nikola'f, angrily 
craning his neck in his cravat. 

"Yes, but my idea has not the slightest resem- 
blance*.... " 

"This idea," interrupted NikolaY, smiling ironically, 
and with an angry light in his eyes, — " communism, — 
has at least one attractive feature, — and you might 
call it a geometrical one — it has clearness and logical 
certainty. Maybe it is Utopia. But let us agree that 
it can make a tabula rasa of the past, so that there 
shall be no property of family, but only freedom of 
labor. But you don't accept this .... " 

" But why do you confound them ? I never was a 
communist."' 

"But I have been; and I believe that if communism 
is premature, it is, at least, reasonable ; and it is as sure 
to succeed as Christianity was in the early centuries." 

" And I believe that labor must be regarded from the 
scientific standpoint ; in other words, it must be studied. 
Its constitution must be known and ...." ' 

"Now, that is absolutely idle. This force goes of it- 



ANNA KARENINA 153 

self, and takes different forms, according to the degrees 
of its development. Everywhere this order has been 
followed, — slaves, then metayers, free labor, and, here 
in Russia, we have the farm, the arend or leasehold, our 
system of apprenticeship. What more do you want ? " 

Levin took fire at these last words, the more because 
he feared in his secret soul that his brother was right in 
blaming him for wanting to discover a balance between . 
communism and the existing forms, — a thing which was 
scarcely possible. 

" I am trying to find a form of labor which will be 
profitable for all, — for me and the laborer," he replied 
warmly. 

" That is not what you wish to do ; it is simply this : 
you have, all your life long, sought to be original ; and 
you want to prove that you are not exploiting the muzhik, 
but are working for a principle." 

"Well, since you think so let's end it," replied Kon- 
stantin, feeling the muscles of his right cheek twitch in- 
voluntarily. 

" You never had, and you never will have, any convic- 
tions, and you only wanted to flatter your conceit." 

"That is very well to say ....but let's end the mat- 
ter." 

" Certainly I will. It was time long ago. You go to 
the devil ! and I am very sorry that I came." 

Levin tried in vain to calm him. NikolaY would not 
listen to a word, and persisted in saying that they had 
better separate ; and Konstantin saw that it was not pos- 
sible to live with him. 

Nikolai had already made his preparations to depart, 
when Konstantin came to him, and begged him, in a way 
that was not entirely natural, for forgiveness, if he had 
offended him. 

" Ah, now ! here 's magnanimity," said Nikola'f, smil- 
ing. " If you are very anxious to be in the right, then 
let us agree that this is sensible. You are right, but I 
am going all the same." 

At the last moment, however, as NikolaY kissed his 
brother, a strange look of seriousness came on him. 



i 5 4 ANNA KARENINA 

" Kostia," he said, " don't harbor any animosity against 
me." And his voice trembled. 

These were the only words which were spoken sin- 
cerely. Levin understood that they meant : " You see 
and know that I am miserable, and we may not meet 
again/' 

Levin understood this, and the tears came into his 
eyes. Once more he kissed his brother, but he could 
not find anything to say. 

On the third day after his brother's departure, Levin 
went abroad. At the railway station he met Shcher- 
batsky, Kitty's cousin, and astonished him greatly by 
his melancholy. 

" What is the matter ? " asked Shcherbatsky. 

"Well, nothing, except that there is little happiness 
in this world." 

" Little happiness ? Just come with me to Paris in- 
stead ot going to some place like Mulhouse. I '11 show 
you how gay it is." 

" No, I am done for. I am ready to die." 

" What a joke ! " said Shcherbatsky, laughing. " I 
am just learning how to begin." 

"I felt the same a little while ago, but now I know 
that my life will be short." 

Levin said what he honestly felt at this time. All 
that he saw before him was death or its approach. But 
still he was just as much interested as ever in his proj- 
ects of reform. It was necessary to keep his life occu-, 
pied till death should come. Darkness seemed to cover 
everything ; but by reason of this darkness he felt that 
the only guiding thread through its labyrinth was to oc- 
cupy himself with his labors of reform, and he clung 
;o them with all the force pf his character. 

y 



a. i 



PART FOURTH 



CHAPTER I 

KARENIN and his wife continued to live in the 
same house, and to meet every day, and yet they 
remained entire strangers to each other. Aleksef Alek- 
sandrovitch made a point every day to be seen with his 
wife so that the servants might not have the right to 
gossip, but he avoided dining at home. Vronsky was 
never seen there ; Anna met him outside, and her hus- 
band knew it. 

All three suffered from a situation which would have 
been intolerable for a single day had not each believed 
it to be transitory. AlekseY Aleksandrovitch expected 
to see this passion, like everything else in the world, 
come to an end arid thus his name would not be dis- 
honored. Anna, the cause of all the trouble, and the 
one on whom the consequences weighed the most cruelly, 
accepted her position simply and solely because she ex- 
pected — nay, was firmly convinced — that the matter 
would soon be explained and settled. She had not the 
least idea how it would come about, but she was certain 
that it would now come about very speedily. 

Vronsky in spite of himself, submitting to her views, 
was also awaiting something to happen independent of 
himself, which should resolve all their difficulty. 

Toward the middle of the winter Vronsky had to 
spend a very tiresome week. He was delegated to show 
a foreign prince about Petersburg, Vronsky himself 
was a representative Russian. Not only was he irre- 
proachable in his bearing but he was accustomed to the 
society of such exalted personages ; therefore he was 
given the charge of the prince. But this responsibility 
was very distasteful to him. The prince did not want to 

i55 



1 56 ANNA KARENINA 

let anything pass concerning which he might be asked 
on his return, "Did you see that in Russia?" And 
moreover he wanted to enjoy as far as possible all the 
pleasures peculiar to the country. Vronsky was obliged 
to be his guide in .the one and in the other. In the morn- 
ing they went out to see the sights ; in the evening they 
took part in the national amusements. 

This prince enjoyed .exceptionally good health, even 
for a prince ; and, owing to his gymnastic exercises and 
the scrupulous care he took of himself, notwithstanding 
the excesses to which he let his love for pleasure carry 
him, he remained as fresh as a great, green, shiny 
Dutch cucumber. 

He had been a great traveler, and had found that 
one of the great advantages of easy modern communi- 
cation consisted in the fact that it brought national 
amusements into easy reach. In Spain he had given 
serenades, and fallen in love with a Spanish girl who 
played the mandolin; in Switzerland he had killed a 
chamois ; in England leaped ditches in a red shooting- 
jacket, and shot two hundred pheasants on a wager; in 
Turkey he had penetrated a harem; in India he had 
ridden the elephant ; and now he wanted to taste the 
special pleasures that Russia afforded. 

Vronsky, as master of ceremonies, arranged, with no 
little difficulty, a program of amusements truly Russian 
in character. There were races and blinui> or carnival 
cakes, and bear-hunts and troika parties and gipsies, 
and feasts set forth with Russian dishes, and the prince 
with extraordinary aptitude entered into the spirit of 
these Russian sports, broke his waiter of glasses with 
the rest, took a gipsy girl on his knee, and apparently 
asked himself if the, whole Russian spirit consisted only 
in this, without going further. 

In reality, the prince took more delight in French 
actresses, ballet-dancers, and white-seal champagne, than 
in all the other pleasures which the Russians could offer 
him. 

Vronsky was accustomed to princes, but either be- 
cause he had changed of late, or else because he had 



ANNA KARENINA 157 

too close a view of this particular prince, this week 
seemed terribly burdensome to him. During the whole 
week, without cessation, he experienced a feeling like 
that of a man placed in charge of a dangerous lunatic, 
who dreaded his patient, and, at the same time x from 
very force of proximity, feared for his own reason. 
Vronsky was constantly under the necessity of keeping 
up the strictest barriers of official reserve in order not to 
feel insulted. The prince's behavior toward the very per- 
sons who, to Vronsky's amazement, were ready to crawl 
out of their skin to give him experiences of Russian 
amusements, was scornful. His criticism on the Russian 
women whom he wanted to study more than once made 
Vronsky grow red with indignation. What irritated 
Vronsky most violently about this prince was that he 
could not help seeing himself in him. And what he 
saw in this mirror was not flattering to his vanity. What 
he saw there was a very stupid, and a very self-confi- 
dent, and very healthy, and very fastidious man, and 
that was all. He was a gentleman} and Vronsky could 
not deny the fact. He was smooth and frank with his 
superiors, free and easy with his equals, coolly kind 
toward his inferiors. Vronsky himself was exactly the 
same, and was proud of it ; but in his relations to the 
prince he was the inferior, and this scornfully good- 
natured treatment of himself nettled him. 

" Stupid ox ! Is it possible that I am like him ? V he 
thought. 

However this may have been, at the end of the week, 
when he took leave of the prince, who was on his way 
to Moscow, he was delighted to be delivered from this 
inconvenient situation and this disagreeable mirror. 
They went directly to the station from a bear-hunt, 
which had occupied all the night with brilliant exhibi- 
tions of Russian daring. 

1 Buil dzkentFmen, 



158 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER II 

On his return home, Vrohsky found a note from 
Anna. She wrote : — 

• I am ill and unhappy ; I cannot go out, and I cannot live 
longer without seeing you. Come this evening. Aleksei Alek- 
sandrovitch will be at the council from seven o'clock till ten. 

This invitation, given in spite of her husband's formal 
prohibition, seemed strange to him ; but he finally de- 
cided to go to Anna's. 

Since the beginning of the winter, Vronsky had been 
promoted as colonel ; he had left the regiment and was 
living alone. After having finished his breakfast, he 
stretched himself out on the divan, and in five minutes 
the recollection of the wild scenes of the preceding days 
became; curiously mingled in hifc mind with Anna and a 
peasant whipper-in, who had performed an important 
part in the bear-hunt; finally he fell asleep. He awoke; 
night had come. Shivering with apprehension, he has- 
tily lighted a candle. "What has happened to me? 
What terrible dream have I had ? " he asked himself. 
"Yes, yeS, the peasant, a dirty little man, with a dis- 
heveled beard, bent something or other up double, and 
pronounced sortie strange words in French. I did n't 
dream anything elsd ; why am I so terrified ? " 

But, in recalling the peasant and his incomprehensi- 
ble French words, a sertfce of Something horrible sent 
a cbld §hivef down his bade. 

" What rtonsfchse ! " he thought as he looked at his 
watch. It Was already half-past eight; he ""(Jailed his 
man, dressed quickly, Went but, and, entirely forgetting 
his drearri, thcttight only rjf being late. 

As he approached the Kareniiis' house; he again 
looked at his watch, and saw that it lacked ten minutes 
of nine. A high, narrow carriage, drawn by two gray 
horses, stood in front of the door ; he recognized Anna's 
carriage. 

"She was coming to my house," he said to himself; 



ANNA KARENINA 159 

" and it would be better. It is disagreeable for me to, go 
into this house, but it rnakes no difference to me, I can- 
not conceal myself;" and, with the manner of a man 
accustomed from childhood to act a.bqye board, he left 
his sleigh, and mounted the steps. The door opened, 
and the Swiss, carrying a pUid, n^ptioned to the carriage 
to draw near. Vronsky, who was not accustomed tp 
observe details, was struck by the Jpok of astonishment 
which the Swiss gave him. At the door Vronsky came 
near running into Alekse'j' Aleksandrovitch. A gaslight 
placed at the entrance of the vestibule threw full light 
on his pale, worn face. He wore a black hat, and a 
white cravat showing under a fur collar. Karenin's 
gloomy, dull eyes fixed themselves on Vronsky, who 
bowed. Aleksef Aleksandrovitch, drawing his lips to- 
gether, raised his hand to his hat, and passed. Vronsky 
saw him get into his carriage without turning round, 
take his plaid and opera-glass, which the Swiss servant 
handed through the door, and disappear. 

Vronsky went into the anteroom. His brows were 
contracted, and his eyes flashed with anger and out- 
raged pride. 

" What a situation ! " thought Vronsky. " If he would 
fight to defend his honor, I should know what to do to 
express my sentiments ; but this weakness or cowar- 
dice.... He places me in the position of a deceiver, 
which I never was and never will be.'' 

Since the explanation that he had had with Anna in 
the Vrede garden, Vronsky's idea had greatly changed. 
Involuntarily overcome by Anna's weakness, — for she 
had given herself to him without reserve and expected 
from him only the decision as to her future fate, — 
Vronsky had Jong ceased to think that this liaison 
might end as he had supposed it would. His ambitious 
plans had again been relegated to the background, 
and he, feeling that he had definitely left that circle 
of activity where everything was determined, gave him- 
self up entirely to his feeling, and this feeling drew 
him more and more vigorously toward her. 

Even in the reception-room, he heard her footsteps 



160 ANNA KARENINA 

drawing near. He knew that she was waiting for him 
and had just entered the drawing-room near by, to watch 
for him. 

" No," she cried, seeing him enter, " things cannot 
go on in this way ! " And at the sound of her own 
voice, her eyes filled with tears. " If this is going on this 
way, it would be far better if it had ended long ago ! " 

" What is the matter, my friend ? " 

" The matter ! I have been waiting in torture for 

two hours ; but no, I do not want to quarrel with you 

Of course you could not come. No, I will not scold 
you any more." 

She put her two hands on his shoulders, and looked 
at him long, with her eyes deep and tender, although 
searching. She studied his face for all the time that 
she had not seen him. As always happened every time 
they met, she tried to compare her imaginary present- 
ment of him — it was incomparably better because it 
was impossible in reality — with him as he really was. 



CHAPTER III 

"Did you meet him?" she asked, when they were 
seated under the lamp by the drawing-room table. 
" That is your punishment for coming so late." 

" Yes ; how did it happen ? Should he not have 
been at the council ? " 

"He went there, but he came back again, and now 
he has gone off somewhere again. But that is no mat- 
ter; let us talk no more about it; where have you 
been ? All this time with the prince ? " 

She knew the most minute details of his life. 

He wanted to reply that as he had no rest the night 
before, he allowed himself to oversleep ; but the sight 
of her happy, excited face, made this acknowledgment 
difficult, and he excused himself on the plea of hav- 
ing been obliged to go and present his report about the 
prince's departure. - 

" It is over now, is it? - Has he gone ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 161 

" Yes, thank the Lord, it is all done with ! You have 
no idea how intolerable this week has seemed to me." 

" Why so ? Here you have not been leading the life 
customary to young men," she said, frowning, and, with- 
out looking at Vronsky, she took up some crocheting 
that was lying on the table and pulled out the needle.^ 

" I renounced that life long ago," he replied, wonder- 
ing at the sudden change in her beautiful face, and try- 
ing to discover what it portended. " I assure you/' he 
added, smiling, and showing his white teeth, " that it was 
overpoweringly unpleasant to me to look at that old life 
again, as it were, in a mirror. " 

She kept her crocheting in her hand, though she did 
not work, but looked at him with strange, brilliant, not 
quite friendly eyes. 

"Liza came to see me this morning — they are not 
yet afraid to come to my house, in spite of the Coun- 
tess Lidya Ivanovna " — and here she stood up — " and 
told me about your Athenian nights. What an abomi- 
nation ! " 

" I only wanted to tell you that .... " 

She interrupted him : — 

" That it was Therese whom you used to know ? " 

" I was going to say .... " 

" How odious you men are ! How can you suppose 
that a woman forgets ? " said she, growing more and 
more animated, and then disclosing the cause of her 
irritation, — " and above all a woman who can know 
nothing of your life ? What do I know ? What can 
I know ? " she kept repeating. " What can I know 
except what you wish to tell me? And how can I 
know whether it is the truth ? " .... 

" Anna, you insult me ! have you no longer any faith 
in me? Have I not told you that I have no thoughts 
which I would conceal from you ? " 

" Yes, yes," she said, trying to drive away her jealous 
fears ; " but if you only knew how I suffer ! I believe 

in you, I do believe in you But what did you want to 

say to me ? " 

But he could not instantly remember what he wanted 

VOL. II. — II 



16a ANNA KARENINA 

to say. Anna's fits of jealousy were becoming more 
and more frequent, an4, however rnuch he triecj to con- 
ceal it, these scenes nig4e him grow ppol toward her, 
although he knew that the cause of the jealousy was 
her very love fpr him* How many times ha4 he not 
said to himself that happiness exists for him only in 
this love ; and now that she Joved him as only a woman 
can love for whom love outweighs all other treasures in 
life; happiness seemed farther off than when he had fol- 
lowed her from Moscow. Then he considered himself 
unhappy, but happiness was in sight ; now he felt that 
their highest happiness was in the past. She was en- 
tirely different from what she had been when he first 
saw her. Both morally and physically she had changed 
for the worse. The beauty of her form was gone, and 
when she spoke about the French actress a wicked ex- 
pression came over her face which spoiled it. He 
looked at her as a man looks at a flower which he has 
plucked and which has faded, and he finds it hard to 
recognize the beauty for the sake of which he has 
plucked it and despoiled it. And yet he felt that at 
the time when his passion was more violent, he might, 
if he had earnestly desired it, have torn his love out of 
his heart ; but now, at the very time when it seemed to 
him that he felt no love for her, he knew that the tie 
that bound him to her was indissoluble. 

" WelJ, well, tell me what you have to say about the 
prince," replied Anna. " I have driven away the demon, 
I have driven him away," she added. Between them- 
selves they called her jealousy the demon. " You began 
to tell me something about the prince. Why was it so 
disagreeable to you ? " 

rfjtfOh, it was unbearable," replied Vronsky, trying to 
pick up the thread of his thought again. "The prince 
doesn't improve on close acquaintance. I can only 
compare him to one of. those highly fed animals which 
take first prizes at exhibitions," he added, with an air of 
vexation, -which seemed to interest Anna. 

" No, but how ? Is he not a cultivated man, who has 
seen much of the world ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 163 

" It is an entirely different kind of cultivation — their 
cultivation ! One would say that he was cultivated only 
for the sake of scorning cultivation, as he scorns every- 
thing else, except animal pleasures." 

" But are you not also fond of all these animal pleas- 
ures yourself?" said Anna, and once more he noticed 
the gloomy look in her eyes which avoided his. 

f( Why do you defend him ? " he asked, smiling. 

" I am not defending him; it is all absolutely indiffer- 
ent to me. But it seems to me if you did not like these 
pleasures, you might dispense with them. But you 
enjoyed going to see that Th^r^se in the costume of 
Eve.".... 

" There is the demon again," said Vronsky, taking her 
hand which lay on the table and kissing it. 

" Yes ; but I can't help it. e You can't imagine what 
I suffered while I was waiting for you. I do not think 
I am jealous; I am not jealous : when you are here with 
me I believe in you ; but when you are away, leading a 
life, so incomprehensible to me...." 

She drew away from him, drew the crochet-needle out 
of her work, and speedily, with the help of her index 
finger, the stitches of white wool gleaming in the lamp- 
light began one after the other to take form, and 
swiftly, nervously, the delicate wrist* moved back and 
forth in the embroidered cuff. 

" Tell me, how was it ? where did you meet Alekseif 
Aleksandrovitch," she asked suddenly, in a voice still 
sounding unnatural. 

" We ran against each other at the door." 

" And did he greet you like this ? " 

She drew down her face and, half closing her eyes, 
instantly changed her whole expression, and Vronsky 
suddenly saw the same look in her pretty features which 
Alekser Aleksandrovitch had worn when he bowed to 
him. He smiled, and Anna began to laugh, with that 
fresh, ringing laugh which was one of her greatest 
charms. 

" I really do not understand him," said Vronsky. " I 
should have supposed that after your explanation at the 



164 ANNA KARENINA 

datcha, he would have broken off with you, and pro- 
voked a duel with me ; but how can he endure such a 
situation ? He surfers, that is evident." 

" He ? " said she, with a sneer. " Oh ! he is perfectly 
content." 

"Why should we all torture ourselves in this way, 
when everything might be so easily arranged ? " 

" Only that does n't suit him. Oh, don't I know him, 
and the falsity on which he subsists. How could he 
live as he lives with me if he had any feelings ? He has 
no susceptibilities, no feelings ! Could a man of any 
susceptibilities live in the same house with his guilty 
wife? How can he talk with her? How can he address 
her familiarly?" 1 

And again she imitated the way her husband would 
say, " Tut, ma chire % titi, Anna." 

" He is not a man, I tell you ; he is a puppet. No 
one knows it, but I know it. Oh, if I had been in his 
place, I would long ago have killed, have torn in pieces, 
a wife like myself, instead of saying, ' Tui, ma chkre 
Anna, to her; but he is not a man ; he is a ministerial 
machine. He does not understand that I am your wife, 

that he is nothing to. me, that he is in the way No, no, 

let us not talk about him." 

" You are , unjust, my dear," said Vronsky, trying 

to calm her; "but all the same, let us not talk any 

more about him. Tell me how you do. How are 

you ? You wrote me you were ill ; what did the doc- 

. tor say ? " 

She looked at him with gay raillery. Evidently she 
still saw ridiculous and abominable traits in her hus- 
band, and would willingly have continued to speak 
about them. 

But he added : — 

" I suspect you were not really ill, but that it comes 
from your cpndition .... when will it be ? " 

The sarcastic gleam disappeared from Anna's eyes, 

&>} Literally, "say /«**, thou, to her." In Russian, as in French and 
erman, the second person singular is used in familiar intercourse among 
relatives and friends, — Ed. ' 



ANNA KARENINA 165 

but suddenly a different kind of smile — the token of a 
gentle melancholy, of some feeling he could not com- 
prehend — took its place. 

" Soon, very soon. You said our position is. painful, 
and that it must be changed. If you knew how 
hard it is for me, what I would give to be able to 
love you freely and openly! I should not torment my- 
self and I should not torment you with my jealousy 

And this will be soon, but not in the way we think." 

And at the thought of how this would take place she 
felt such pity for herself that the tears filled her eyes 
and she could not go on. She put her white hand, with 
the rings sparkling in the lamplight, on Vronsky's arm. 

" This will not be as we think. I did not intend to 
speak to you about this, but you compel me to. Soon, 
soon, every knot will be disentangled, and all of us, all, 
will be at peace, and we shall not be tormented any more." 

" I don't know what you mean," he said ; yet he 
understood her. 

" You ask, ' When will it be ? ' Soon. And I shall 
not survive it Don't interrupt me!" 

And she went on speaking rapidly : — 

" I know it, I am perfectly certain I am going to die; 
and I am glad to die, and to free myself and you." 

Her tears continued to fall. Vronsky bent over her 
hand and began to kiss it, and tried to conceal his own 
emotion, which he knew he had no ground for feeling, 
but which he could not overcome. 

" It is better that it should be so," she said, pressing 
his hand fervently. " It is the only thing, the only thing 
left for us." 

"What a foolish idea! " said Vronsky, lifting up his 
head and regaining his self-possession. " What utter 
nonsense you are talking ! " 

" No ; it is the truth." 

" What do you mean by the truth ? " 

" That I am going to die. I have seen it in a 
dream." 

" In a dream ? " repeated Vronsky, involuntarily re- 
calling the muzhik of his nightmare. 



166 ANNA KARENINA 

tf Yes, in a dream," she continued. " I had this dream 
a long time ago. I dreamed that I r^n intq my room to 
get something or other. I was searching ^.bovit, yotj Jtnow, 
43 one does in dreams," said she, opening h§r eye§ wide 
with horror, " and I noticed something stencjing iji the 
corner of my room.'' 

"What nonsense ! How dp you suppose .... " 

But she would not let him interrupt her; what she 
was telling was too important to her, 

''And this something turned around, and I saw a 
little dirty muzhik, with an unkempt beard. I wanted to 
run away, but he bent toward a bag, in which he moved 
some object.'' 

She made the motion of a person rummaging in a 
bag ; terror was depicted on her face ; and Vronsky, 
recalling his own dream, felt the same terror seize his 
soul. 

" And all the while he was searching, he talked fast, 
very fast, in French, lisping, you know, ' II fan t le battre, 
lefer, le broyer, le pe'trir.... ' I tried to wake up, but I 
only woke up in my dream, asking what it could mean. 
And Karne'i said to me, ' You are going to die, you 
are going to die in child-bed, matushka/ And at last I 
woke up. 7 '.... 

. * What an absurd dream ! " said Vronsky, but he 
himself felt that there was no conviction in his voice. 

" But let us say no more about it. Ring ; I am going 
to give you some tea, so stay a little longer. It is a 
Jong time since I .... " 

She suddenly ceased speaking. The expression of 
her face instantly changed. Horror and emotion disap- 
peared from her face, which assumed an expression of 
gentle, serious, and affectionate solicitude. He could 
not understand the significance of that change. 

She had felt within her the motion of a new life. 



ANNA KARENINA 167 



CHAPTER IV 

After meeting Vronsky on the porch, AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch went, as he had planned, to the Italian 
opera. He sat through two acts, and saw every one 
whom he needed to see. Returning home, he looked 
carefully at the hat-rack, and, having assured himself 
that there was no uniform overcoat in the vestibule, 
went straight to his chamber. 

Contrary to his usual habit, instead of going to bed, 
he walked up and down his room till three o'clock in 
the morning. Anger kept him awake, for he could not 
forgive his wife for not being willing to observe the pro- 
prieties, and for not fulfilling the one condition that he 
had imposed on her, — that she should not receive her 
lover in his house. She had not complied with his 
requirement, and he felt bound to punish her, carry 
out his threat, demand a divorce, and take away his son 
from her. He knew all the difficulties that would attend 
this action, but he had said that he should do it, and 
now he was bound to carry out his threat. The Coun- 
tess Lidia had often said that this was the Easiest way 
out of his position ; and recently the practice of divorce 
had reached such a pitch of perfection that Aleksef 
Aleksandrovitch saw in it a means of escaping . its 
formal difficulties. 

Moreover, misfortunes hever come Single ; and the 
trouble arising from the organization of the foreign 
population, and the irrigation of the fields in the gov- 
ernment of Zata'f, had caused Aleksei Aleksandrovitch 
so much tttipleasanthess in his office that for some time 
he had been in a perpetual state of irritation. 

He passed the night without sleeping, and his anger 
increasing all the while in a sort of colossal system of 
progression, by morning was directed even to the rriost 
trivial object. He dressed hastily, ahd went to Anna 
as soon as he knew she was up. He was afraid of los- 
ing the energy which he needed for his explanation with 



168 ANNA KARENINA 

his wife; it was as if he carried a full cup of wrath 
and was afraid of spilling it. 

Anna believed that she thoroughly knew her hus- 
band ; but she was amazed at his appearance as he came 
in. His brows were contracted, and his eyes looked 
gloomily straight ahead, avoiding hers. His lips were 
firm and scornfully compressed. Never had his wife 
seen so much decision as she saw now in his gait, in 
every motion, in the sound of his voice. He entered 
without wishing her good morning, and went directly 
to her writing-desk, and, taking the key, opened the 
drawer. 

" What do you want ? " cried Anna. 

/'Your lover's letters." 

" They are not there/' she said, closing the drawer. 
But he knew by her action that he had guessed aright, 
and, roughly pushing away her hand, he quickly seized 
the portfolio in which he knew Anna kept her important 
papers. She attempted to regain it, but he held it at a 
distance. 

" Sit down ; I want to speak to you," he said, placing 
the portfolio under his arm, and holding it so firmly 
with his elbow that his shoulder was raised by it. 

-Anna looked at him, astonished and frightened, but 
said nothing. 

" I told you that I would not permit you to receive 
your lover in this house." 

" I needed to see him to .... " 

She stopped, unable to find a plausible explanation. 

" I will not enter into details, and have no desire to 
know why a woman needs to see her lover." 

" I wished, I only .... " she said, flashing up, and feel- 
ing that her husband's rudeness made her bold — " is it 
possible that you are not aware how easy it is for you 
to insult me ? " 

" One can insult only an honest man or an honest 
woman ; but to tell a thief that he is a thief, is only la 
constatation cCunfait- — the statement of a fact." 

" That is a degree of cruelty that I never recognized 
in you." 



ANNA KARENINA 169 

" Ah ! you find a" husband cruel because he gives his 
wife perfect freedom, gives her the protection of an 
honest, noble name on the sole condition that she re- 
spect the laws of propriety ? You call that cruelty ? " 

" It is worse than cruelty ; it is cowardice, if you 
insist on knowing/' cried Anna, with an outburst of 
anger, and rising, she started to go. 

" No," cried he, in his piping voice, which was now 
a tone higher than usual ; and seizing her by the arm 
with his great, bony fingers so roughly that one of 
Anna's bracelets left a red print on her flesh, he forced 
her back into her place. 

" Cowardice, indeed ! If you wish to employ that 
word, apply it to her who abandons her son and hus- 
band for a lover, and nevertheless eats her husband's 
bread." 

Anna bowed her head ; she not only did not say what 
she had said the evening before to her lover, that he 
was her husband while her husband was in the way — 
she did not even think it. She appreciated all the 
justice of his words, and she replied in a low voice : — 

" You cannot judge my position more severely than 
I do myself ; but why do you say all this ? " 

" Why do I say this ? " continued he as angrily as 
ever ; " so that you may know that, since you have paid 
no attention to my wishes, and have broken the rules 
of propriety, I shall take measures to put an end to 
this state of affairs." 

" Soon, very soon, it will terminate itself," said Anna, 
and again at the thought of that death which she felt 
near at hand, and now so desirable, her eyes filled with 
tears. 

" Sooner even than you and your lover have dreamed 
of ! You need to make atonement by keen suffer- 
ing.... " 

"Aleksef Aleksandrovitch ! I do not say that this 
is not magnanimous ; but it is not gentlemanly to strike 
one who is down." 

" You only think of yourself : the suffering of one 
who has been your husband is of little interest to you ; 



iyo ANNA KARENINA 

it is a matter of indifference to you that his life has been 
overthrown, that he su....su.... suffers ...." 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch spoke so rapidly that he 
stammered, and could not speak the word. 1 

This seemed ridiculous to Anna, but she immediately 
was ashamed of herself because anything could seem 
to her ridiculous at such a moment. For the first 
time, and for a moment, she felt for him, and entered 
into his feelings and pitied him. But what could she 
say or do? She bowed her head and was silent. 
He also was silent for. a little, then began again in 
a less piercing and colder voice, emphasizing words of 
no special importance : — 

" I came to tell you uu " 

She glanced at him. " No, that proves it to me," she 
said to herself, as she remembered the expression of his 
face as he stammered over the word suffered. (i No, how 
can a man, with his dull eyes, so full of calm self-satis- 
faction, feel anything.'' 

" I' cannot change," she murmured. 

" I have come to tell you that to-morrow I am going 
to. Moscow, and that I shall not enter this house again. 
You will learn of my determination from the lawyer 
who will have charge of the preliminaries of the divorce. 
My son will go to my sister," he added, recalling with 
difficulty what he wanted to say about the child* 

" You want to take Serozha away so as to cause me 
pain," she cried, glaring at him ; " you do not love him .... 
leave Serozha ! " 

" Yes, I have ev£n lost my love for my son because 
the repulsion you inspire in me includes him ; but I 
shall keep him, nevertheless. Good morning." 

He was about to go* but she detained him. 

"Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, leave Serozha with me," 
she whispered again; "that is all I ask of you; leave 
him with me tillmy;.i. I shall soon be confined. Leave 
him with me!" 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch flushed with indignation, 
pushed away the afm that held him back, and left her 
without replying, I 

1 Pele ,„.pele ....pelestradal. 



ANNA KARENINA 171 



CHAPTER V 

The reception-room of the celebrated Petersburg 
lawyer was full* of people when Alekse'f Aleksandro- 
vitch entered it. Three ladies, one old, another young, 
and a merchant's wife ; three men, a German banker 
with a ring on his hand, a merchant with a beard, and 
a sullen-looking official in undress-uniform with a deco- 
ration around his neck, had apparently been waiting a 
long time. 

Two clerks were writing with scratching pens. Their 
writing utensils — and Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch was a 
connoisseur of such things — were of unusual excellence. 
Alekse'f could not fail to take note of that fact. One 
of the clerks turned his head, with an air of annoyance, 
toward the newcomer, and, without rising, asked him, 
with half-closed eyes : — 

" What do you want ? " 

" I have business with the lawyer." 

" He is busy/' replied the clerk severely, pointing with 
his pen toward those who were already waiting ; and 
he went back to his writing. 

" Will he not find a moment to receive me ? " asked 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch. 

" He is not at liberty a single moment ; he is always 
busy : have the goodness to wait." 

" Be so good as to give him my card," said Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch, with dignity, seeing that it was im- 
possible to preserve his incognito. 

The secretary took his card, and, evidently not approv- 
ing of it, left the room. 

Aleksef Aleksandrovitch, on principle, approved of 
public courts, but he did not fully sympathize with cer- 
tain details of its application in Russia, because of his 
acquaintance with its working in the best official rela- 
tions, and he criticized them as far as he could criticize 
anything that received the sanction of the supreme 
power. His whole life was spent in administrative 
activity, and consequently when he did not sympathize 



172 ANNA KARENINA 

with anything, his lack of sympathy was modified by 
his recognition of the fact that errors were unavoidable/ 
but that some things might be remedied. In the new 
judicial arrangement he did not approve of the condi- 
tions in which the lawyers were placed. Hitherto he 
had not had occasion to deal with lawyers, and so he had 
disapproved of the system only theoretically. But now 
his disapprobation was greatly increased by the dis- 
agreeable impression made on him in the lawyer's re- 
ception-room. 

" The lawyer will be out immediately/' said the clerk; 
and in reality in about two minutes the door opened, 
and the lawyer appeared, together with a tall justice of 
the peace. 

The lawyer was a short, thick-set man, with a bald 
head, a dark reddish beard, a prominent forehead, and 
long, shiny eyebrows. His dress, from his necktie and 
double watch-chain down to his polished boots, was that 
of a dandy. His face was intelligent, but vulgar ; his 
manner pretentious and in bad taste. 

"Be so good as to walk in," said he, addressing 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch; and gloomily ushering him 
into the next room, he closed the door. 

.¥ Will you not sit?" 

He pointed to an arm-chair near his desk covered 
with papers, and rubbing his short, hairy hands together, 
he settled himself in front of the desk, and bent his head 
to one side. But he was hardly seated when a moth- 
miller flew on the table, and the little mah, with unex- 
pected liveliness, caught it on the wing ; then he quickly 
resumed his former attitude. 

" Before beginning to explain my business," said 
Alekser Aleksandrovitch, following the movements of 
the lawyer with astonishment, " I must inform you that 
the subject .which brings me here is to be kept secret." 

An imperceptible smile slightly moved the lawyer's 
projecting reddish mustache. 

" If I were not capable of keeping the secrets in- 
trusted to me, I should not be a lawyer," said he ; " but 
if you wish to be assured.;.." 



ANNA KARENINA 173 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch glanced at him and noticed 
that his gray eyes, full of intelligence, had apparently 
read all that he had to tell. 

" Do you know my name ? " asked AlekseY Aleksan- 
drovitch. 

" I know you and how valuable " — here again he caught 
a miller — "your services are, as every Russian does/' 
replied the lawyer, bowing. 

Aleksef Aleksandrovitch sighed; with difficulty he 
brought himself to speak ; but when he had once begun, 
he continued unhesitatingly, in a clear, sharp voice, em- 
phasizing certain words. 

"I have the misfortune to be a deceived husband. I 
wish to obtain legal separation from my wife, — that is, 
a divorce, — and, above all, to separate my son from his 
mother." 

The lawyer's gray eyes did their best to remain seri- 
ous, but they danced with unrestrained delight, and 
Aleksef Aleksandrovitch saw that they were full of an 
amusement not caused solely by the prospect of a good 
suit ; they shone with enthusiasm, with triumph, — some- 
thing like the brilliancy he had noticed in his wife's 
eyes. 

"You wish my assistance to obtain the divorce ?" 

" Yes, exactly ; but I must warn you that I run the 
risk of wasting your time, I have only come to ask pre- 
liminary advice. I wish a divorce, but for me certain 
forms are essential in which it is possible. Very possi- 
bly I shall give up the idea of any legal attempt if 
these forms do not coincide with my requirements." 

" Oh, that is always the way," said the lawyer ; " you 
will always remain perfectly free." 

The little man, that he might not offend his client by 
the delight which his face ill concealed, fixed his eyes 
on Aleksef Aleksandrovitch's feet. He saw a moth fly- 
ing in front of his nose and he put out his hand, but he 
restrained himself, out of respect to AlekseY Aleksandro- 
vitch's situation. 

" The general features of the laws of divorce are well 
known to me," continued Aleksef Aleksandrovitch; "but 



i 7 4 ANNA KARENINA 

I should like to have a, general knowledge of the for- 
malities which are employed in the practical settlement 
of affairs of this kind." 

"You wish;" replied the lawyer, not raising his eyes 
and entering with no little satisfaction into the spirit of 
his client's words, "you wish me to expound for you the 
way whereby your wishes may be fulfilled." 

And, as Alekseif Aleksandrovitch assented with an 
inclination of his head, he continued, casting a furtive 
glance now and then at his face, which was flushed with 
red spots. 

" Divorce, according to our laws," said he, with a slight 
Shade of disdain for our laws, " is possible, as you know, 
in the following cases .... Let them wait ! " he cried, 
seeing his clerk open the door. However, he rose, went 
to say a few words to him, came back, and sat down 
again: "....in the following cases: physical defect of 
one of the parties; next, the unexplained absence of 
one of them for five years," — in making this enumera- 
tion he bent down his short, hairy fingers, one after 
another, — "and finally, adultery." This word he pro- 
nounced with evident satisfaction. " The categories are 
as follows : " — he kept on doubling over his fat fingers, 
although, the , case before him and the categories, it 
Wis 'plain enough, could not be classified together, — 
"physical incapacity of husband or wife, then adultery 
of husband or wife." Then as all his fingers were closed 
he raised them 'all again and proceeded : " This is the 
theoretical view, but I think that, in doing me the honor 
to consult me, you desire to know the practical side, do 
you not ? And therefore, guiding myself by antecedents, 
it is my duty to inform you that as this case is neither 
one of physical defect, nor absence of one of the parties, 
as I understand ? " .... 

Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch bowed his head in confirma- 
tion of this. 

"The reason last named remains, — adultery, — and 
the conviction of the guilty party by mutual consent, and 
Without mutual consent, compulsory conviction. I must 
say that the last case is rarely met with in practice," 



ANNA KARENINA 175 

said the lawyer ; and he glanced at his client and waited 
like a gunsmith who explains to a purchaser the use of 
two pistols of different caliber, leaving him free to choose 
between them. 

But AlekseT Aleksandrovitch remaining silent, he 
continued : — 

" The commonest, simplest, and most reasonable way, 
in my opinion, is to recognize the guilt by mutual agree- 
ment. I should not allow myself to say this if I were 
talking to a man of less experience than yourself," said 
the lawyer, " but I suppose that this is comprehensible 
to you." 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, however, was so troubled 
that he did not at the first moment realize the reason- 
ableness of " adultery, by mutual agreement," and this 
uncertainty was to be read in his eyes ; but the lawyer 
came at once to his aid. 

" Suppose that a man and wife can no longer live 
together ; if both consent to a divorce, the details and 
formalities amount to nothing. This is the simplest 
and surest way." 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch understood now, but he had 
religious convictions which stood in the way of his em- 
ploying this measure. 

" In the present case this means is out of the ques- 
tion," said he. "Here only one case is possible: com- 
pulsory conviction, supported by letters which are in 
my possession." 

At the mention of letters, the lawyer, pressing his 
lips together, uttered an exclamation both of pity and 
disdain. 

" Please take notice," he began, " affairs of this sort 
are, as you well know, decided by the upper clergy," he 
said. " Our Fathers the protopopes are great connois- 
seurs in affairs of this kind' and attend to the minutest 
details," said he, with a smile which showed his sympa- 
thy for the protopopes. " Letters undoubtedly might 
serve as partial evidence. But proofs must be furnished 
in the right way — by witnesses. However, if you do 
me the honor to grant me your confidence, you must 



176 ANNA KARENINA 

give me the choice of measures to be pursued. Where 
there is a will, there is a way." 

"If that is so...." began Alekset Aleksandrovitch, 
suddenly growing very pale. But at that instant the 
lawyer again ran to the door, to reply to a fresh interrup- 
tion from his clerk. 

" Tell her, then, that this is not a cheap shop," said 
he and returned to Alekset Aleksandrovitch. As he 
returned to his place he caught another moth. 

" My reps will be in a fine condition by summer ! " 
he said to himself, scowling. 

" You were kind enough to say .... " 

" I will communicate to you my decision by letter," 
replied AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, standing up and lean- 
ing his hand on the table. After standing for a moment 
in thought, he said : — 

" From your words I conclude that a divorce is possi- 
ble. I shall be obliged to you if you will make your 
conditions known to me." 

" Everything is possible if you will give me entire 
freedom of action," said the lawyer, eluding the last 
question. " When may I expect a communication from 
you ? " asked he, moving to the door with eyes as shiny 
as his boots. 

" Within a week. You will then have the goodness 
to let me know whether you accept the case, and on 
what terms ? " , 

" Very good." 

The lawyer bowed respectfully, conducted his client 
to the door, and when he was left alone, he gave vent 
to his feelings of joy ; he felt so gay that, contrary to 
his principles, he made a deduction to a lady skilled in 
the art of making a bargain, and neglected to catch a 
moth, resolving definitely that he would have his furni- 
ture upholstered the next winter with velvet, as Sigonin 
had. 



ANNA KARENINA 177 



CHAPTER VI 

Aleksei" Aleksandrovitch had won a brilliant vic- 
tory at the session of the Commission of August 29, but 
the consequences of his victory were injurious to him. 
The new committee appointed to study the situation of 
the foreign population had been constituted and had 
gone to its field of action with a promptness and energy 
surprising to Alekset Aleksandrovitch ; at the end of 
three months it presented its report 

The condition of this population had been studied 
from a political, administrative, economical, ethnographi- 
cal, material, and religious point of view. Each ques- 
tion was followed by an admirably concise reply, leaving 
no room to doubt that these answers were the work, not 
of a human mind, always liable to mistake, but of an 
experienced bureaucracy. These answers were based 
on official data, such as the reports of governors and 
archbishops, based again on the reports of heads of 
districts and ecclesiastical superintendents, in their turn 
based on the reports from communal administrations 
and country priests. And therefore their correctness 
could not be doubted. Questions such as these, " Why 
are the harvests poor ? " and, "Why do the inhabitants 
of certain localities persist in their beliefs ? " and the like 
— questions which without the help of the official ma- 
chine could never be solved, and to which ages would not 
have found a reply — were clearly solved, in conformity 
with the opinions of Alekse? Aleksandrovitch. 

But Stremof, feeling that he had been touched to 
the quick at the last session, had employed for the recep- 
tion of the committee's report a stratagem unexpected 
by Aleksef Aleksandrovitch. Taking with him several 
other members, he suddenly went over to Karenin's 
side, and, not satisfied with warmly supporting the 
measures proposed by Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, he pro- 
posed others, of the same nature. These measures, 
which were of such a radical nature as to be entirely 
opposed to Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch's intention, were 
vol. 11. — 12 



178 ANNA KARENINA 

adopted and then Stremof s tactics were revealed. Car- 
ried to extremes, these measures seemed so ridiculous 
that the government officials, and public opinion, and 
ladies of influence, and the daily papers, all attacked 
them and expressed the greatest indignation both at 
the measures themselves and at their avowed promoter, 
Alekset Aleksandrovitch. 

Stremof slipped out of sight, pretending that he only 
blindly followed Karenin's plan, and that he himself 
was amazed and dumfounded at what had happened. 
This greatly weakened AlekseY Aleksandrovitch. But 
notwithstanding his enfeebled health, notwithstanding 
his family annoyances, he did not give up. The com- 
mittee was split into two factions : some of them, with 
Stremof at their head, explained their mistake by the 
fact that they had placed full confidence in the Revi- 
sionary Committee which, under the lead of AlekseY 
Aleksandrovitch, had brought in its report, and they 
declared the report of this committee of inspection was 
rubbish and so much wasted paper. Aleksel" Alek- 
sandrovitch, with a party of men who saw the peril of 
such a revolutionary reference to documents, continued 
to support the data worked out by the Revisionary 
Committee. 

As a result of this, the highest circles and even so- 
ciety was thrown into confusion, and although this 
was a question of the greatest interest to every one, 
no one could make out whether the foreign popula- 
tions were in reality suffering and dying out or flourish- 
ing. 

Karenin's position in consequence of this and partly 
in consequence of the contempt which people felt 
for him by reason of his wife's unfaithfulness became 
very precarious. In this state of affairs he made 
an important resolution : to the great astonishment 
of the commission, he announced that he demanded 
the right to go and study these questions himself 
on the spot ; and, permission having been granted him, 
Alekset Aleksandrovitch set out for the distant prov- 
inces. 



ANNA KARENINA 179 

His departure made a great sensation, especially from 
the fact that, at his very departure, he officially refused 
the traveling expenses required for twelve post-horses, 
to take him to the places of inspection. 

" I think that was very noble of him," said Betsy to 
the Princess Miagkaya. "Why should they pay for 
post-horses, when every one knows that you can go 
everywhere nowadays by rail ? " 

But the Princess Miagkaya did not agree with her, 
and she was greatly wrought up by the Princess Tver- 
skaya's remark. 

" This is very well for you to say," she replied, " when 
you have I don't know how many millions, but I like 
it very much when my husband goes off on a tour of 
inspection in the summer. It is very healthy and 
agreeable for him to go driving about, but I have made 
it a rule to keep that money for my own horse-hire and 
izvoshchiks ! " 

On his way to the distant provinces, AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch stopped at Moscow three days. 

The next day after his arrival, he was coming from a 
call on the governor-general. At the crossing of the 
GazetnoY Street, where carriages of every description 
are always thronging, he heard his name called in such 
a gay, sonorous voice, that he could not help stopping. 
There stood Stepan Arkadyevitch on the sidewalk, in a 
short, stylish paletot, with a stylish hat set on one 
side, with a radiant smile which snowed his white teeth 
between his red lips, gay, youthful-looking, brilliant. 
He kept calling to him and beckoning to him to 
stop. He was holding by one hand to the window of 
a carriage which had drawn up to the sidewalk, and in 
the carriage was a woman in a velvet hat, with two 
little ones ; she also beckoned to him and smiled. 

It was Dolly and her children. 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch had not counted on seeing 
in Moscow any one whom he" knew, and least of all his 
wife's brother. He took off his hat and would have 
proceeded, but Stepan Arkadyevitch motioned to the 



180 ANNA KARENINA 

coachman to stop, and ran through the snow to the 
carriage. 

" How long have you been here ? What a sin not to 
let us know you were coming ! I was at Dusseaux's last 
evening, and I saw the name of Karenin on the list of 
arrivals, but it never occurred to me that it was you, 
else I should have looked you up," said he, passing his 
head through the door. " How glad I am to see you," 
he went on to say, striking his feet together to shake 
off the snow. "What a sin not to let us know." 

"I hadn't time. I am very busy," replied Alekseif 
Aleksandrovitch, curtly. 

" Come and speak to my wife ; she wants to see you 
very much." 

Alekseif Aleksandrovitch threw off the plaid which 
covered his chilly limbs, and, leaving his carriage, made 
a way through the snow to Darya Aleksandrovna. 

"Why, what has happened, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, 
that you avoid us in this way ? " said she, smiling. 

" I was very busy. I am delighted to see you," re- 
plied Karenin, in a tone which clearly proved' that he 
was annoyed. " How is your health ? " 

" How is my dear Anna ? "„ 

Alekseif Aleksandrovitch muttered a few words, and 
was about to leave her, but Stepan Arkadyevitch de- 
tained him. 

"Do you know what we are going to do to-morrow? 
Dolly, invite him to dine. Have Koznuishef and Pestsof, 
so as to regale him with the representative intellects of 
Moscow." 

, "Oh, please come! " said Dolly; "we will name any 
hour that is convenient — five or six, as you please. 
But how is my dear Anna ? It is so long ...." 

"She is well," muttered Alekseif Aleksandrovitch 
again, frowning. " Very happy to have met you." 

And he went back to his carriage. 

" Will you come ? " cried Dolly again. 

Alekseif Aleksandrovitch said something in reply 
which Dolly could not hear in the rumble of car- 
riages. 



ANNA KARENINA 181 

" I am coming to see you to-morrow ! " cried Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch shut himself up in his car- 
riage, and crouched down in one corner so as not to see 
and not to be seen. 

"What a strange fellow ! " said Stepan Arkadyevitch 
to his wife ; and looking at his watch he made an affec- 
tionate sign of farewell to his wife and children, and 
started off down the sidewalk at a brisk pace. 

" Stiva, Stiva ! " cried Dolly, blushing. He came 
back. 

" I must have some money for the children's cloaks. 
Give me some." 

" No matter about that. Tell them that I will settle 
the bill." 

And he disappeared, gayly nodding to some acquain- 
tance as he went. 



CHAPTER VII 

The next day was Sunday, and Stepan Arkadyevitch 
went to the Bolshoi or Great Theater, to attend the 
rehearsal of the ballet, and gave the coral necklace to 
Masha Chibisovaya, the pretty dancing-girl who was 
making her dtbut under his protection, as he had prom- 
ised the day before, and behind the scenes in the dim 
twilight of the theater he seized his opportunity and 
kissed her pretty little face glowing with pleasure at his 
gift. Besides fulfilling his promise as to the coral neck- 
lace, he wanted to arrange with her for an assignation 
after the ballet. Having explained to her that he could 
not possibly manage to be present at the beginning of 
the ballet, he promised to come for the next act and 
take her out for supper. 

From the theater Stepan Arkadyevitch went to the 
Okhotnui Ryad, himself selected a fish and asparagus 
for the dinner ; and at noon he went to Dusseaux's, 
where three travelers, friends of his, by happy chance 
were stopping, — Levin, just returned from his journey 



1 82 ANNA KARENINA 

abroad ; his new nachalnik or chief, who had just been 
appointed, and had come to Moscow to look into affairs ; 
and lastly, his brother-in-law, Karenin, whom he was 
bound to invite to dinner. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch liked to go out to dinner, but 
what he liked better still was to give a choice little 
dinner-party with a few select friends. The program 
that he made out for this day pleased him, — fresh 
perch, with asparagus, and a simple but superb roast of 
beef, as pike de resistance, and the right kinds of wine. 
Among the guests he expected Kitty and Levin, and, 
to offset them, a cousin and the young Shcherbatsky ; 
the pikes de resistance among the guests were to be 
SergyeT Koznuishef, a Muscovite and philosopher, and 
Karenin, a Petersburger and man of affairs. More- 
over he would invite the well-known Pestsof, a comical 
fellow, a youth of fifty years, an enthusiast, a musician, 
a ready talker, a historian and a liberal, who would be 
the sauce or garnish for Koznuishef and Aleksei' Alek- 
sandrovitch. He would put every one in good spirits 
and stir them up. 

The second instalment of money from the sale of the 
wood had been recently received and was not all gone ; 
Dolly for some time had been lovely and charming; 
and the thought of this dinner in every respect delighted 
Stepan Arkadyevitch. He was in the happiest frame 
of mind. There were two things which were rather dis- 
agreeable. But these two circumstances were drowned 
in the sea of joviality which rolled its billows in Stepan 
Arkadyevitch's soul. These two circumstances were: 
in the first place, when the evening before he had met 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch on the street, he had perceived 
that he was stern and cold; and uniting the fact that 
Alekser Aleksandrovitch had not called or sent word of 
his presence with certain rumors that had reached his 
ears about his sister's relations with Vronsky, Stepan 
Arkadyevitch suspected serious trouble between the 
husband and wife. This was one unpleasant thing. 

The second slight shadow was the fact that the new 
nachalnik, like all new chiefs, had the reputation of be- 



ANNA KARENINA 183 

ing a terribly exacting man, who got up at six o'clock, 
worked like a horse, and demanded similar zeal from his 
subordinates. Moreover, this new nachalnik had the 
reputation of being a regular bear in his manners and 
was, according to rumor, a man of the opposite party 
from that to which his predecessor had belonged, and to 
which Stepan Arkadyevitch himself had up to that time 
also belonged. 

The afternoon before, Stepan Arkadyevitch had ap- 
peared at the office in full uniform and the new nachal- 
nik had been very cordial and had talked with Oblonsky 
as with an old friend. Consequently he thought it his 
duty to pay him an unofficial visit. The thought that 
the new nachalnik might not receive him cordially was 
the second disturbing element. But Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch felt instinctively that all would be arranged to per- 
fection. 

" All people, all men, are transgressors as well as we. 
Why get angry and quarrel ? V he said to himself as he 
went to the hotel. 

" How are you, Vasili ? " said he, as he went through 
the corridor with his hat cocked on one side, and met a 
lackey of his acquaintance ; " have you sacrificed your 
whiskers ? Levin ? in number seven ? Please show me. 
Thanks ! Do you know, is Count Anitchkin at home ? " 
This was the new nachalnik. 

" At your service," said Vasili, with a smile. " We 
have not seen you for a long time." 

"I was here, yesterday, but came up another stair- 
way. Is this number seven ? " 

When Stepan Arkadyevitch entered, Levin was stand- 
ing in the middle of his room with a muzhik from Tver, 
measuring a bear-skin. 

" Ah ! did you kill him ? " cried Stepan Arkadyevitch. 
" Splendid skin ! A bear ! How are you, Arkhip ?" 

* He held out his hand to the peasant, and then sat 
down in his paletot and hat. 

" Take off your coat, and stay awhile," said Levin, 
taking his hat. f 

" I have n't time. I only came in for a little second/' 



i8 4 ANNA KARENINA 

replied Oblonsky. He unbuttoned his paletot, then 
took it off, and stayed a whole hour to talk with Levin 
about the hunt and other subjects. 

" Well now ! Tell me, please, what you did while you 
were abroad ; where have you been ? " he asked after 
the peasant had gone. 

" I went to Germany, to France, and England, but 
only to the manufacturing centers, and not to the capi- 
tals. I saw a great deal that was new. I am glad I 
went." 

" Yes, yes, I know your ideas about organized labor. " 

" Oh, no ! in Russia there can be no labor question. 
The question of the workingman does n't concern us ; 
the only important question for Russia is the relation of 
the workman to the soil ; the question exists there, but 
it is impossible to remedy it there, while here .... " 

Oblonsky listened attentively. 

" Yes, yes," said he, " it is possible that you are right, 
but I am glad that you are in better spirits ; you hunt 
the bear, you work, you are enthusiastic. Shcherbatsky 
told me that he had found you blue and melancholy, 
talking of nothing but death," .... 

" What of that ? I am continually thinking of death," 
replied Levin. " It 's true that there is a time to die, 
and that all is vanity. But I will tell you honestly I 
set great value on my thought and work ; but think of 
this world — just take notice! — this world of ours, a 
little mold making the smallest of the planets ! and 
we imagine that our ideas, our works, are something 
grand. It's all grains of dust!".... 

" All that is as old as the hills, brother ! " 

" It is old ; but you see when this idea becomes clear 
to us, how miserable life seems ! When we know that 
death will surely come, and that there will be nothing 
left of us, the most important things seem as insignifi- 
cant as the turning over of this bear-skin. And so in 
order to keep away thoughts of death, we hunt and work 
and try to divert ourselves." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch smiled, and gave Levin one of 
his affectionate looks. 



ANNA KARENINA 185 

" Well, of course ! Here you come to me and you 
pounce on me because I seek pleasure in life ! Be not 
so severe, O moralist ! " 

"All the same, there is some good in life," replied 
Levin, becoming confused. "Well, I don't know. I 
only know that we must soon die." 

" Why soon ? " 

" And you know there is less charm in life when we 
think of death, but more restfulness." 

" On the contrary, we must enjoy what there is of it, 

anyway But," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, rising for 

the tenth time, " I must go." 

" Oh, no ! stay a little longer," said Levin, holding 
him back ; " when shall we see each other again ? I 
leave to-morrow." 

"I am a queer fellow. This is what I came for!.... 
Don't fail to come and dine with us to-day. Your 
brother will be with us ; my brother-in-law, Karenin, will 
be there." 

" Is he here ? " asked Levin, and he wanted to ask 
about Kitty ; he had heard that she had been in Peters- 
burg at the beginning of the winter, visiting her sister, 
the wife of a diplomatist, and he did not know whether 
she had returned or not, but he hesitated about asking. 

"Whether she has come back or not, it's all the 
same. I will accept," he thought. 

" Will you come ? " 

"Well! Of course I will." 

" At five o'clock, in ordinary dress." 

And Stepan Arkadyevitch rose, and went down to 
see the new nachalnik. Instinct had not deceived him : 
this dreadful man proved to be a good fellow ; Stepan 
Arkadyevitch lunched with him, and stayed so long to 
talk that it was nearly four o'clock when he got to 
Aleksei Aleksandrovitch's room. 



1 86 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER VIII 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, after he returned from 
mass, spent the morning in his room. He had two 
things to accomplish on this day : first, to receive a 
deputation of the foreign population which was on its 
way to " Petersburg, and happened just at that time to 
be at Moscow, and he wanted to instruct them as to 
what they should say ; and then to write to his lawyer, 
as he had promised. 

The deputation, although it had been appointed at 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch's invitation, was likely to cause 
great embarrassment and even to be a source of peril, 
and Aleksei* Aleksandrovitch was very glad to meet it 
in Moscow. The members of the deputation had not 
the slightest comprehension of their duties and obliga- 
tions. They were perfectly persuaded that their work 
consisted in exposing their needs and explaining the ac- 
tual state of affairs and asking governmental assistance ; 
and they really could not' comprehend that some of their 
statements and demands gave color to the arguments of 
the hostile party, and therefore spoiled the whole business. 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch had a long discussion with 
them, made out a program, from which they were not 
to deviate on any account in their dealings with the 
government, and, when they left him, gave them letters 
of introduction to various persons in Petersburg, so that 
they might be prbperly treated. The Countess Lidya 
Ivanovria would be his principal auxiliary in this mat- 
ter; she had a specialty for deputations, and knew 
better than anybody else how to manage them. 

When he had finished this business, AlekseY Aleksan- 
drovitch wrote to his lawyer. Without the slightest mis- 
giving, he gave him full power to do as he thought best, 
and sent three notes from Vronsky to Anna, which he had 
found in the portfolio. Since Aleksei Aleksandrovitch 
had left home with the intention of never returning to 
his family, and since his interview with the lawyer, when 
he had confided to one person at least his intentions, 



ANNA KARENINA 187 

and especially since he had transferred this episode of 
his life to a documentary basis, he had become more 
and more settled in his convictions, and was now per- 
fectly clear in his mind that what he wished could be 
accomplished. 

Just as he was sealing- his letter, he heard Stepan 
Arkadyevitch's loud voice asking the servant if his 
brother-in-law was at home, and insisting on being 
announced. 

" It 's all the same," thought Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, 
" or rather, so much the better. I will explain to him 
my position in regard to his sister, and he will under- 
stand that it is impossible for me to dine at his house." 

" Come in," he cried, gathering up his papers and 
pushing them into a writing-case. 

" There now, you see you lied, and he is at home," 
said Stepan Arkadyevitch to the servant, who would not 
let him in ; then, taking off his overcoat as he walked 
along, he came into Alekse* Aleksandrovitch's room. 

"I am delighted to find you...," he began gayly. 
"I hope...." 

" I cannot go," said AlckseT Aleksandrovitch, coldly, 
receiving .his brother-in-law standing, and not asking 
him to sit down. Aleksel Aleksandrovitch resolved to 
adopt with his wife's brother the cool relations which 
seemed proper since he had decided to get a divorce. 
But he did not reckon on that sea of kind-heartedness 
which was always overflowing its banks in Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch's heart. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch opened wide his bright, clear 
eyes. 

"Why can't you come? What do you mean?" he 
asked in French with some hesitation. " But you prom- 
ised to come, and we all are counting on you." 

" I wish to tell you that I cannot come because our 
family relations must be broken." 

" How is that ? Why ? " said Oblonsky, with a smile. 

V Because I have commenced an action for getting a 
divorce from my wife, your sister. I must .... " 

But Aleksei Aleksandrovitch did not finish his sen- 



1 88 ANNA KARENINA 

tence — for Stepan Arkadyevitch acted in a manner 
quite contrary to his expectations. Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch sank into an arm-chair, with a deep sigh. 

"Aleksei* Aleksandrovitch, it can't be possible," he 
cried, with pain expressed in his face. 

" It is true." 

" Pardon me. I cannot, I cannot believe it." 

Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch sat down ; he felt that his 
words had not produced the effect that he had looked 
for, and that whatever explanation he might make his 
relations with Oblonsky would remain the same. 

4 " Yes, it is a cruel necessity, but I am forced to de- 
mand the divorce," he replied. 

" I will say only one thing to you, Alekse'f Aleksan- 
drovitch. I know that you are a man of principle, and 
I know Anna is one of the best of women, — excuse me 
if I cannot change my opinion of her, — I cannot 
believe it ; there must be some misunderstanding ! " 

" Yes ; if it were only a misunderstanding ! " .... 
* " Excuse me ; I understand ; but I beg of you, I beg 
of you, do not be in haste," interrupted Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch. 

" I have done nothing hastily," said Aleksef Aleksan- 
drovitch, coldly; "but in such a case, one cannot ask 
advice of anybody; I am decided." 

"This is terrible," exclaimed Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
with a deep sigh. " I would do one thing, Alekset 
Aleksandrovitch. I beseech you to do this ! " said he. 
" Proceedings, as I understand, have not yet begun. 
Before you do anything talk with my wife. She loves 
Anna like a sister, she loves you, and she is a woman 
of good sense. For God's sake, talk with her. Do me 
this favor, I beg of you." 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch deliberated, and Stepan Ar- 
kadyevitch looked at him sympathetically, not breaking 
in on his silence. 

" Will'vou come to her ? " 

"Well, I don't know. That is the reason I did not 
call at your house. I suppose our relations ought to be 
broken off." 



ANNA KARENINA 189 

" Why should they be ? I don't see that. Allow me 
to believe that apart from our family connection, you 
have toward me, to a certain extent at least, the same 
friendly sentiments which I have always felt toward 

you Andgenuine regard....*' said StepanArkadyevitch, 

pressing his hand. " Even if your worst surmises were 
justified, I should never take it on myself to criticize 
either side, and I see no reason why our relations should 
be changed. But now do this, — come and see my wife." 

" Well, you and I look on this matter differently," said 
AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, coldly. " However, we will 
not discuss it." 

" No, but why should you not come and dine with us, 
at least to-day ? My wife expects you. Please come ! 
and above all talk with her; she is, I assure you, a 
superior woman. For God's sake come, I beg you on 
my knees." 

" If you wish it so much, I will go," said AlekseY 
Aleksandrovitch, sighing. And to change the conver- 
sation, he asked Stepan Arkadyevitch about a matter 
which interested them both : about the new nachalnik, a 
man still young, who had suddenly received such an 
important appointment. 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch had never liked Count 
Anitchkin, and had always differed with him about many 
questions ; and now he could not help a feeling of envy 
natural to an official who had suffered defeat in his work 
and saw a younger man receiving advancement. 

"Well, have you met him yet?" asked AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch, with a venomous smile. 

" Oh, yes ; he was with us yesterday at the session. 
He seems like a man very well informed and very active." 

" Active ? but how does he employ his activity ? " ex- 
claimed AlekseY Aleksandrovitch. " Is it in doing his 
work, or in destroying what others have done before 
him ? The plague of our government is this scribbling 
bureaucracy, of which Anitchkin is a worthy representa- 
tive." 

"Truly I don't know how this criticism applies to him. 
I don't even know his tendencies ; at any rate, he is a 



190 



ANNA KARENINA 



vqry gogd fellow," replied Stepan Arkadyevitch. " I 
have Just been with him ....a very good fellow; we 
lunched together, and I taught him how to make a drink, 
you know — wine and oranges. He liked it very much. 
No, he is a fine young man." 

Stepan Arkadyevitqh looked at his watch. 

" Akh batiushki ! it is after four o'clock ! and I have 
still to see Dolgovushin. . It is decided, then, that you 
will dine with us, is n't it ? Both my wife and myself 
will feel really hurt if you refuse to come." 

Alekse/f Aleksandrovitch took leave of his brother-in- 
law very differently from the way in which he had 
greeted him. 

" I have promised, and I will come," he replied in a 
melancholy tone. 

" Believe me, I appreciate it; and I hope you will not 
regret it," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, with a smile. 

And putting on his overcoat in the hall, he shook his 
fist at the servant's head, laughed, and went out. 

" t At five o'clock, remember, and in ordinary dress," he 
called back once more, returning to the door. 



t ) / CHAPTER IX 

It was already six o'clock and several guests had 
come when the master of the house entered, meeting 
SergyeY ^vanovitch Koznuishef and Pestsof at the door. 

These were the two chief representatives of Moscow in- 
tellect, as Oblonsky had called them, and were men of 
distinction both by wit and character. They valued each 
other, but on almost every topic were absolutely and 
hopelessly at odds, not because they belonged to oppos- 
ing parties but precisely because they were of the same 
camp, — their enemies confounded them in one, — but 
in this camp they each had their shades of opinion. Now 
there is nothing more conducive to disagreement than 
dissent in small particulars, and so they not only never 
agreed in their opinions, but never failed to laugh at each 
pther good-naturedly for their incorrigible mistakes. 



ANNA KARENINA 191 

They reached the door, talking about the weather, just 
as Stepan Arkadyevitch overtook them. 

The old Prince Aleksandr Dmitrievitch Shcherbatsky, 
young Shcherbatsky, Turovtsuin, Kitty, and Karenin 
were already in the drawing-room. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch instantly perceived that matters 
in the drawing-room were going badly without him* 
Darya Aleksandrovna, in her best gray silk gown, es- 
pecially preoccupied with the children, who should have 
been eating their supper in the nursery by themselves, 
and anxious because her husband was late, did not 
succeed very well in entertaining her guests. All were 
sitting "like a pope's daughters making a call," as the 
old prince expressed it, evidently perplexed to know 
why they had come and with difficulty finding a few 
words so that the silence might not be absolute. The 
good-natured Turovtsuin apparently felt out of his 
sphere and the smile on his thick lips when he greeted 
Stepan Arkadyevitch spoke louder than words: "Well, 
my dear fellow, you have got me here with clever 
people ! We are making merry here. It is a regular 
ch&tean des fleurs / .... I am doing my part." 

The old prince was sitting in silence looking out of 
the corner of his bright eyes at Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
and Stepan Arkadyevitch perceived that he was trying 
to think up something worth saying to make aninVpi*es- 
sion on this great statesman who was being served up 
like a sterlet for the benefit of the guests. Kitty kept 
glancing at the door, trying with all her might not to be 
caught blushing when Konstantin Levin should appear. 
Young Shcherbatsky, who had not been presented to 
Karenin, was trying to show that this did not cause 
him any constraint. 

Karenin himself was in black coat and white necktie, 
according to the Petersburg custom, and Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch perceived by his face that he had come only to 
keep his promise and by mingling in this society was per- 
forming a burdensome task. He more than any one else 
was the cause of the chill which froze all the guests into 
silence until Stepan Arkadyevitch made his appearance. 



i 9 2 ANNA KARENINA 

As soon as Stepan Arkadyevitch entered the drawing- 
room, he made his excuses and explained that he had 
been detained by a certain prince who was always his 
scapegoat for all his delays and absences. In a twin- 
kling he presented his guests to one another, furnished 
Koznuishef and Karenin a subject of conversation, — 
the Russification of Poland, which they instantly grap- 
pled with, also enlisting Pestsof in the discussion. 
Then/tapping Turovtsuin on the shoulder, he whispered 
some jest into his ear and sat him down between his 
wife and Prince Shcherbatsky. Then he complimented 
Kitty on her beauty and introduced young Shcherbatsky 
to Karenin. In a twinkling he had so worked on all 
this mass of social dough that it began to seem like a 
salon and the voices intermingled in gay confusion. 

Konstantin Levin was the only guest not on hand. 

But even this was a fortunate circumstance, because 
when Stepan Arkadyevitch went into the dining-room 
he discovered to his dismay that the port and sherry 
had come from Des Pres and not from Ldvy, and he 
seized the opportunity to send the coachman in all 
haste to Levy's, and then he returned to the drawing- 
room. ■> 

Levin met- him at the door of the dining-room. 
■ " I am not late, am I ? " 

" How could you be ? " replied Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
taking him by the arm. j t 

' " Are there many people here ? Who are they ? " 
asked Levin/ blushing involuntarily, and with his glove 
brushing away the snow from his hat. 

" No one but relatives. Kitty is here. Come and let 
me present you to' Karenin." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch, notwithstanding his liberal views, 
knew that a presentation to Karenin could not fail to be 
flattering, and therefore he regaled his best friends with 
this pleasure. But at this moment Konstantin Levin 
was not in a condition to appreciate all the satisfaction 
which this acquaintance would afford. 

He had not seen Kitty since that well-remembered 
evening when he met Vronsky, except for that glimpse 



ANNA KARENINA 193 

of her which he had, as she sat in her carriage. In the 
depth of his heart he knew that he was to see her this 
evening. But in his attempt to preserve all the freedom 
of his thoughts, he had tried to persuade himself that he 
did not know it. And now as he learned that she was 
there, he suddenly felt such timidity and at the same 
time such terror that he could hardly breathe, and he 
found it impossible to say what he wanted to say. 

" How will she seem ? Just as she used to? Suppose 
Darya Aleksandrovna was right ! Why was n't she 
right?" he thought. 

" Oh ! present me to Karenin, I beg of you," he suc- 
ceeded in stammering, as he entered the drawing-room 
with the courage of despair and saw her. 

She .was neither as she had been in old time nor as 
she had been in the carriage : she was altogether differ- 
ent ; she was nervous, timid, modest, and therefore even 
more charming than ever. 

She saw him the moment he entered the drawing- 
room. She had been watching for him, and she felt so 
glad and so confused by reason of her gladness that at 
one moment especially when, after greeting Dolly, he 
looked at her, she was afraid of bursting into tears. 
Levin and Dolly both noticed it. She blushed and 
turned pale and blushed again; she was so agitated 
that her lips trembled. 

Levin approached her, and bowed and silently offered 
his hand. Had it not been for the slight trembling of 
her lips and the moisture that suffused her eyes and 
increased their brilliancy, her smile would have been 
almost serene as she said : — 

" How long it is since we have met ! " And at the 
same time with a sort of desperate resolution put her 
cold hand into his. 

" You have not seen me ; but I saw you one day," 
said Levin, with a smile of radiant happiness. " I saw 
you when you were going from the railway station to 
Yergushovo." 

"When was it ? " asked she, in surprise. 

" You were on your way to Yergushovo," said Levin, 
vol. 11. — 13 



i 9 4 ANNA KARENINA 

feeling that the joy which flooded his soul was suffocat- 
ing him. "How," thought he, "could I have dared to 
associate anything but innocence with this fascinating 
Creature ? Yes, Darya Aleksandrovna was right.*' 

Stepan Arkadyevitch came to conduct him to Karenin. 

" Allow me to make you acquainted," said he, calling 
each by name. 

" It is very pleasant to meet you again," said Alekseif 
Aleksandrovitch, coolly, as he took Levin's hand. 

"What! do you already know each other?" asked 
Oblonsky, with surprise. 

"We traveled together for three hours," said Levin, 
smiling, "but we parted as from a masked ball, very 
much mystified ; at least, it was the case with me." 

" Really ?.... Will you pass into the dining-room?" 
said Stepan Arkadyevitch, pointing toward the door. 

The gentlemen walked into the dining-room, and went 
to a table laden with the zakuska, which was composed of 
six kinds of vodka, as many'varieties of cheese with silver 
shovels and without, caviare, herring, preserves of differ- 
ent kinds, and platefuls of French bread sliced thin. 

The men stood around the table ; and, while waiting for 
the dinner, the conversation between SergyeY Ivanovitch 
Koznuishef, Karenin, and Pestsof, about the Russifica- 
tion of Poland, began to languish. Sergyei Ivanovitch, 
who had a faculty peculiar to himself for ending even 
the most absorbing and serious dispute, by an unex- 
pected infusion of Attic salt and so putting the dis- 
putants into a better frame of mind, did this now. 
Alekser Aleksandrovitch was trying to prove that the 
Russification of Poland could be accomplished only by 
means of the highest principles, and that these ought to 
oe r introduced by the Russian administration. Pestsof 
maintained that one nation could only assimilate another 
by surpassing it in density of population. 

Koznuishef, with certain restrictions, shared the opin- 
ions of both ; and to close this serious conversation with 
a joke, he added as they left the drawing-room, smiling: — 

"The most logical way, then, for us to assimilate for- 
eigners, it seems to me, is to have as many children as 



ANNA KARENINA 195 

possible. It is there where my brother and I are in 
fault ; while you married gentlemen and especially you, 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, are acting the part of good patri- 
ots. How many have you?" he asked of the host, 
handing him a very diminutive glass. 

Everybody laughed, and Oblonsky most of all. "Yes, 
that is certainly the best means ! " said he, taking a bite 
of cheese and pouring some special kind of vodka into 
the glass that Koznuishef offered him. But the jest 
really served to bring the discussion to a close. 

" This cheese is not bad ; what do you say ? " remarked 
the host. 

" Do you still practise gymnastics ? " said Oblonsky, 
addressing Levin, and with his left hand feeling his 
friend's muscles. 

Levin smiled and doubled up his arm, and Stepan Ar- 
kadyevitch felt how under his fingers the biceps swelled 
up like a round cheese beneath the smooth cloth of his 
coat. 

II What biceps ! a Samson," said he. 

II I suppose it is necessary to be endowed with re- 
markable strength, to hunt bears, is n't it ? " said Aleksel 
Aleksandrovitch, smearing some cheese on a piece of 
bread as thin as a cobweb. His ideas about hunting 
were of the vaguest. 

Levin smiled. 

" No ; on the contrary, a child could kill a bear ; " — 
and he drew back, with a slight bow, to make room for 
the ladies, who with the hostess were coming to the 
zakuska table. 

" I hear that you have just killed a bear," said Kitty, 
vainly trying to put her fork into a recalcitrant mush- 
room which kept flying about on the plate, and as she 
threw back the lace in her sleeve there was a glimpse 
of a white arm. "Are there really bears where you 
live ? " she added, half turning her pretty face toward 
him and smiling. What she said had no especial im- 
portance, but what significance inexpressible in words 
there was for him in the sound of her voice, in every 
motion of her lips, of her eyes, hands, wjien she said it I 



196 ANNA KARENINA 

It implied an entreaty for forgiveness and expression 
of faith in him, a sweet and timid caress, and a promise, 
and a hope, and love for him, and he could not help 
believing in it and his heart was filled with happi- 
ness. 

" Oh, no ! we were hunting in the government 'of 
Tver ; and on my way from there, I met your brother- 
in-law — Stiva's brother-in-law — in the train," said he, 
smiling. "The meeting was very funny." 

And he gave a lively and amusing description of how, 
after having been awake all night, he forced his way 
into Karenin's car in his sheepskin jacket. 1 

"The conductor, contrary to the proverb, judging by 
first impressions wanted to put me out, and there I was 
beginning to express myself in sublime style and .... 
well, sir, you also — r " said he, addressing Karenin and 
not recollecting his name, "you got your first impres- 
sion from my polushubok and were for expelling me, but 
afterward you took my part, for which I felt very 
grateful to you." r . 

" Travelers' rights to their choice of place, are gen- 
erally too little considered/' said AlekseY Aleksandro- 
vitch, wiping the ends of his fingers with his napkin. 

"Oh! I noticed that you were dubious about me," 
replied Levin, smiling good-naturedly ; " that was why 
I. hastened to open a serious subject of conversation, to 
make you forget my sheepskin." 

Koznuishef, who was talking with the mistress of the 
house, and at the same time listening with one ear to 
what his brother said, glanced at him. 

" What is the matter with him to-night? What makes 
him look so triumphant ? " he asked himself. 

He did not know Levin felt as if he had wings. 
Levin knew that she was listening to him, she was tak- 
ing pleasure in what he said ; and this was the only 
thing that interested him. He was alone with her, not 
only in this room, but in the whole world. He felt that 
he was on a dizzy height, and there far below him were 

1 Polushubok y half shuba; a short coat or cloak made of sheepskin or 
lined with fur. # 



ANNA KARENINA 197 

all those excellent people, — Oblonsky, Karenin, and the 
rest of humanity. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch seemed entirely to forget Levin 
and Kitty in placing his guests at table until all but two 
of the seats were assigned ; then he put them side by 
side. 

"Well, you can sit there," said he to Levin. 

The dinner was as elegant as the appointments; 
for Stepan Arkadyevitch was a great connoisseur in 
such matters. The Marie-Louise soup was perfect, the 
little pirogi or pasties which melted in the mouth were 
irreproachable ; and Matve, with two waiters in white 
cravats, skilfully and noiselessly served the roast and 
the wine. 

On the material side the dinner was a success ; it was 
not less so on the non-material side. The conversation 
was sometimes general, sometimes special, but it never 
lagged ; and toward the end of the dinner it had grown 
so animated that when they left the table the men could 
not drop their interesting topics, and even Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch was thawed out. 



CHAPTER X 

Pestsof, who liked to discuss a question thoroughly, 
was not satisfied with what Koznuishef had said ; he 
felt that he had not been allowed to express his thought 
sufficiently. 

"In speaking of the density of the population," said 
he, after the soup, addressing Alekse* Aleksandrovitch, 
" I did n't intend to make it the principle of an assimila- 
tion, but only a means." 

" It seems to me that that amounts to the same thing," 
replied Karenin, slowly and indolently. " In my judg- 
ment, a people can have no influence over another people 
unless it has the highest development which ...." 

"That is precisely the question," interrupted Pestsof, 
who always spoke with so much ardor that he seemed 
to put his whole soul into defending his own opinions 



198 ANNA KARENINA 

" How is one to decide on what is the highest develop* 
ment ? Which stands on the highest plane of civiliza- 
tion, the English, the French, or the Germans ? Which 
nation is to naturalize the others ? We have seen the 
Rhine made French; but are the Germans inferior? 
No; there is some other law," he cried in his bass 
voice. 

u I believe that the balance will always turn in favor of 
true civilization/' said Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, slightly 
raising his brows. 

" But what are the signs of this true civilization ? " 
demanded Pestsof. 

H I suppbse these signs are known," replied AlekseX 
Aleksandrovitch. 

" But are they really known ? " suggested Ser^yeT 
Ivanovitch, with a subtle smile. "It is now admitted 
that 6ur present civilization can't be anything else than 
Classical, but we have furious debates on this point, 
and it cannot be denied that each side brings forward 
strong proofs in its favor." 

" Are you in favor of thfe classics, Sergyel Ivanovitch ? " 
said Oblonsky " Shall I give you some claret ? " 

" I am not expressing my personal opinions regarding 
either form of civilization," replied Koznuishef, with a 
smile of condescension such as he would have shown a 
child, as he reached out his glass. " I only say that both 
sides have strong arguments," continued he, addressing 
Alekset Aleksandrovitch/ " My education was classical ; 
but in this controversy I personally cannot find any 
room to stand. I do not see any clear proofs that the 
classics must take precedence over the sciences." 

"The natural' sciences tend just as much to the 
pedagogical development of the human mind," replied 
Pestsof. " Take astronomy, take botany, and zoology, 
each with its system of general laws I " 

" It seems to me impossible to deny that the very 
process of learning the ' forms of languages has a 
specially beneficial influence on mental development. 
Moreover, it must be admitted that the influence of the 
classic writers is eminently moral ; while, unfortunately 



ANNA KARENINA 199 

for us, the study of the natural sciences has been com- 
plicated with false and fatal doctrines, which are the 
bane of our time." 

Sergyei' Ivanovitch was going to reply, but Pestsof 
interrupted him in his deep voice. He began heatedly 
to demonstrate the incorrectness of this statement. Koz- 
nuishef calmly waited his chance to speak, evidently 
feeling that it would be a victorious rejoinder. 

" But," said he, smiling shrewdly, and addressing 
Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, "it cannot be denied that it is 
a difficult matter completely to balance all the advan- 
tages and disadvantages of the two systems of science, and 
that the question which is preferable could not be decided 
so quickly and definitely if there were. not on the side 
of the classical civilization that advantage which you 
just called the moral — disons le mot — the anti-nihilistic 
influence." 

" Undoubtedly." 

" If it were not for this advantage of the anti-nihilistic 
influence wielded by classic education, we should . rather 
hesitate, we should weigh the arguments of both sides," 
said SergyeT Ivanovitch, with his shrewd . smile. "We 
should give scope to both tendencies. But now we 
know that in classical education lies the medical power 
of anti-nihilism and we boldly administer it like a pill 

to our patients But are we perfectly sure of the 

healing properties of these pills ? " he said in conclusion, 
pouring out his Attic salt. 

Serger Ivanovitch's "pills" made every one laugh, 
Turovtsuin more boisterously and heartily than the rest ; 
for he had been on the lookout for something amusing 
to laugh at ever since the conversation began. 

Stepan Arkady evitch had made no mistake in count- 
ing on Pestsof. Pestsof never allowed an intellectual con- 
versation to flag for a moment. Koznuishef had hardly 
finished with his jest when Pestsof began again : — 

" One cannot even agree with this idea," said he, 
" that morality has this aim. Morality is evidently con- 
trolled by general considerations and remains indiffer- 
ent to the influences of the measures which may be 



2oo ANNA KARENINA 

taken. For example, the question of higher education 
for women should be regarded as dangerous, yet the 
government opens the public lectures and the univer- 
sities to women." 

And the conversation immediately leaped to the new 
theme of the education of women. 

Aleksef Aleksandrovitch expressed the thought that 
the education of women was too much confused with 
the question of the emancipation of women, and could 
be considered dangerous only from that point of view. 

" I believe, on the contrary, that these two questions 
are intimately connected," said Pestsof. " It is a vicious 
circle ! Woman is deprived of rights because she is de- 
prived of education, and her lack of education comes 
from the absence of rights. Let us not forget that the 
bondage of woman is so ancient, so interwoven with 
our customs, that we are very often incapable of under- 
standing the legal abyss that separates her from us." 

"You speak of rights," said SergyeT Ivanovitch, as 
soon as, he had a chance to put in a word; "is it a 
right to fulfil the functions of juror, of municipal coun- 
selor, of president of the tribunal, of public function- 
ary, of member of parliament ? " .... 

"Without doubt." 

" But if women can exceptionally fill these functions, 
then it seems to me we make a mistake in using the 
word rights. It would be fairer to say duties. Every 
one agrees that in fulfilling the functions of a juror, of 
town counselor, of telegraph employer, we are fulfilling 
a duty. Let us say, then, that women are seeking for 
duties, and legitimately enough; in this case we may 
sympathize with their desire to take part in man's work." 

"That is perfectly fair," affirmed AlekseY Aleksan- 
drovitch ; " the question, I suspect, consists in deciding 
whether they are capable of fulfilling these duties." 

u They will be, certainly, as soon as they have been 
generally educated," said Stepan Arkadyevitch. " We 
see it .... " 

- "And the proverb?" asked the old prince, whose lit- 
tle, scornful eyes shone as he listened to this conver- 



ANNA KARENINA 201 

sation. " I may repeat it before my daughters : ' Long 
hair.../" 1 

"That is the way we judged the negroes before their 
emancipation ! " said Pestsof, with dissatisfaction. 

"What astonishes me," said Sergyet Ivanuitch, "is 
that women are seeking new duties, when we see, un- 
fortunately, that men generally shirk theirs." 

" Duties are accompanied by rights ; honor, influence, 
money, these are what women are after," said Pestsof. 

" Exactly as if I solicited the right to become a wet 
nurse, and found it hard to be refused, while women are 
paid for it," said the old prince. 

Turovtsuin burst out laughing, and Sergyei Ivanovitch 
regretted that he had not said that. Even Alekse* 
Aleksandrovitch smiled. 

" Yes, but a man can't be a wet nurse," said Sergye'f 
Ivanuitch. " But a woman .... " 

" But what is a young girl without any family going 
to do ? " asked Stepan Arkadyevitch, who found reason 
to sympathize with Pestsof, as he thought of his little 
ballet girl, Chibisovaya. 

" If you look closely into the lives of these young 
girls," said Darya Aleksandrovna, unexpectedly taking 
part in the conversation and showing some irritation, 
for it was evident that she suspected what sort of women 
Stepan Arkadyevitch meant, "you will doubtless find 
that they have left a family or a sister, and that women's 
work was within their reach." 

" But we are defending a principle, an ideal," an- 
swered Pestsof, in his ringing bass. " Woman claims 
the right to be independent and educated ; she suffers 
from hqr consciousness of being unable to accomplish 
this." 

"And I suffer from not being admitted as nurse to 
the foundling asylum," repeated the old prince, to the 
great amusement of Turovtsuin, letting the large end 
of a piece of asparagus fall into his sauce. 

1 Volos dotog, da um korotok : where the hair is long, the intellect is 
short; said of women. 



202 ANNA KARENINA 

CHAPTER XI 
ibHj *•■*»! 

All took part in the general conversation except 
Kitty and Levin. 

At first, when they were talking about the influence 
of one people over another, Levin recalled what he 
had to say on this subject; but his thoughts, which at 
one time had seemed to him very important, simply 
flashed through his mind like notions in a dream, and 
now had not the least interest for him ; he even thought 
it strange that people could trouble themselves about 
such useless questions. , 

Kitty, for her part, ought to have been interested in 
what was said about women's rights and education. 
How many times had she pondered over these subjects 
as she remembered her friend Varenka, whose depend- 
ence was so hard to bear ! How many times had she 
thought what she herself would do in case she should not 
marry ! How often had she disputed with her sister on 
the subject ! But now it did not interest her in the least. 

She and Levin had their own talk, and yet it was not 
a r conversation so much as it was a mysterious affinity, 
which brought them nearer and nearer to each other, 
and filled them with a joyful timidity before the unknown 
which they were about to enter. 

At first Kitty asked how he happened to see her in 
the summer, and Levin told her that he was returning 
from the hay-fields by the highway after the mowing : — 

" It was very early in the morning. You had proba- 
bly just' waked. Your maman was asleep in her corner. 
It was a -marvelous morning. I was walking along, 
saying to myself, 'A carriage with four horses ! Whose 
can it be? ' They were four fine horses with bells. And 
quick as a flash you passed by. I saw you through 
the door ; you were sitting like this, holding the ribbons 
of your bonnet in your hands, and you seemed awfully 
deep in thought. How I wished I could know," he 
added with a smile, "what you were thinking about) 
Was it something very important ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 203 

" Was n't my hair in disorder ? " thought Kitty, but 
seeing the enthusiastic smile that lighted up Levin's 
face, she felt that on the contrary the impression she 
had produced was good, and she replied, blushing and 
laughing merrily : — 

" Truly, I don't remember." 

" How heartily Turovtsuin laughs ! " said Levin, 
looking at his moist eyes and his sides shaking with 
laughter. 

" Have you known him long ? " asked Kitty. 

" Who does n't know him ? " 

" And I see that you think that he is a bad man." 

" Not bad ; but he does n't amount to much." 

"That is unjust. I beg you not to think so any 
more," said Kitty. " I, too, once had a very poor 
opinion of him; but he is a sweet-tempered and wonder- 
fully good man. His heart is gold." 

" How can you know what kind of a heart he has ? " 

" We are great friends. I know him very well. Last 
winter, a short time after — after you were at our 
house," said she, rather guiltily, but with a confiding 
smile, "Dolly's children had the scarlatina, and one day 
Turovtsuin happened to call on my sister. Would you 
believe it?" she said, lowering her voice: "he was so 
sorry for her that he stayed to take care of the little 
invalids. For three weeks he played nurse to the chil- 
dren I am telling Konstantin Dmitritch of Turovt- 

suin's kindness at the time of the scarlatina," said she, 
turning to her sister. 

"Yes, it was remarkable; it was lovely!" replied 
Dolly, looking with a grateful smile at Turovtsuin, who 
was conscious that they were talking about him. Levin 
also looked at him, and was surprised that he had never 
understood him till then. 

" I plead guilty, and I will never again think ill of 
people," said he, gayly, speaking honestly, exactly as he 
thought at the time. 



20 4 ANNA KARENINA 



a 



CHAPTER XII 



The discussion about the emancipation of women led 
to talk about the inequality of rights in marriage, and 
this was a ticklish subject to speak about in the presence 
of the ladies. Pestsof during the dinner several times 
touched on this question, but SergyeT Ivanovitch and 
Stepan Arkadyevitch warily diverted him from it. But 
as soon as dinner was over and the ladies had retired, 
Pestsof addressed Aleksei" Aleksandrovitch and at- 
tempted to explain the chief cause of this inequality. 
The inequality of rights between husband and wife in 
marriage depended, in his opinion, on the fact that the 
infidelity of a wife and that of a husband was' unequally 
punished, both by law and by public opinion. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch hastened over to Aleksei Alek- 
sandrovitch and offered him a cigar. 

" No, I do not smoke," replied Karenin, calmly; and as 
if to prove that he was not afraid of this conversation, 
he turned toward Pestsof with his icy smile : — 

" I imagine that such a view is based on the very 
nature of things," said he, and he started to go to the 
drawing-room ; but here Turovtsuin suddenly spoke up, 
addressing Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch. 

"Have you heard the story about Priatchnikof ? " he 
asked. He was animated by the champagne, and had 
been impatiently waiting for a chance to break a silence 
which weighed heavily on him. " Vasia Priatchnikof?" 
he repeated, with a good-natured smile on his thick lips, 
red and moist, and he addressed Aleksei Aleksandro- 
vitchj as the most important guest. "I was told this 
morning that he fought a duel at Tver, with Kvitsky, 
and killed him." 

As it always seems as if a sore spot were peculiarly 
liable to be hit, so now Stepan Arkadyevitch thought 
the conversation was fated every moment to touch Alek- 
sei Aleksandrovitch on the sore spot. He was on the 
point of going to his brother-in-law's assistance; but 
Aleksef Aleksandrovitch asked, with curiosity : — 



ANNA KARENINA 205 

"Why did Priatchnikof fight a duel?" 

" On account of his wife ; he behaved bravely about 
it, — he challenged the other man, and killed him." 

" Ah ! " said Aleksef Aleksandrovitch, with uncon- 
cern ; and, raising his eyebrows, he went to the drawing- 
room. 

Dolly met him in a little parlor leading into the draw- 
ing-room, and said, smiling timidly: — 

" How glad I am that you came ! I want to talk with 
you. Let us sit down here." 

Aleksel Aleksandrovitch, preserving the air of indif- 
ference caused by his elevated eyebrows, sat down near 
her, pretending to smile. 

"All the more willingly," said he, "as I wish to ask 
you to excuse me for leaving you as soon as possible. 
I have to go away to-morrow morning." 

Darya Aleksandrovna was firmly convinced of Anna's 
innocence, and she was conscious of growing pale and 
trembling with anger before this heartless, unfeel- 
ing man, who coolly proposed to ruin her innocent 
friend. 

"Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch," she said with desperate 
firmness, looking him full in the face, " I asked you 
about Anna, and you did not reply ; how is she ? " 

" I think that she is well, Darya Aleksandrovna," 
replied Karenin, without looking at her. 

" Pardon me, if I have no right to insist on it .... but I 
love Anna like a sister; tell me, I beseech you, what 
has happened between you and her, and what do you 
accuse her of." 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch frowned, and bent his head, 
almost closing his eyes : — 

" Your husband must have told you, I think, the rea- 
sons which oblige me to break fny relations with Anna 
Arkadyevna," said he, avoiding her eyes but casting a 
glance of annoyance at Shcherbatsky, who was passing 
through the room. 1 

" I do not believe it, I do not believe it ! and I can- 
not believe it ! " murmured Dolly, pressing, her thin hands 
together energetically. She rose quickly, and, touching 



2 o6 ANNA KARENINA 

v. 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch's arm, said, "We shall be dis- 
turbed here; let us go in. there, please." 

Dolly's emotion communicated itself to AlekseT Alek- 
sandrovitch; he arose, and submissively followed her 
into the children's schoolroom.- They seated themselves 
at a table covered with an oil-cloth, hacked with, pen- 
knives. 

" I don't believe it, I don't believe it ! V repeated 
Dolly, trying to catch his eye, which avoided hers. 

" One cannot deny facts, Darya Aleksandrovna," said 
he; dwelling on the word facts. 

"But what has she done?" insisted Darya Aleksan- 
drovna, " precisely what has she done ? " 

" She has failed to do her duty, and been false to her 
husband. That is what' she has done," said he. 

"No, no! it is impossible! no, thank the Lord, you- 
are mistaken ! " cried Dolly, putting her hands to her 
temples, and closing her eyes. 

Alekseif Aleksandrovitch smiled coldly with his lips 
only ; he wished to prove to Dolly, and to prove to him- 
self, the firmness of his conviction. But this heated de- 
fense of his wife, though it did not shake him, irritated 
his wound. He spoke with more animation : — 

" It is difficult to make a mistake when a woman her- 
self declares to her husband that eight years of married 
life and a son count for nothing, and that she wishes to 
begin life over again/* he replied angrily, dilating his 
nostrils. 

M Anna and vice ! I cannot associate the two ideas ; I 
cannot believe it." 

"Darya Aleksandrovna !" — said he, angrily, now 
looking straight at Dolly's distressed face, and feeling 
his tongue involuntarily unloosed, — "I would give a 
great deal to be able stnl to have any doubts ! When I 
was in doubt about it, it was hard for me, but easier 
than it is now. When I doubted, there was still hope. 
Now there is no hope, and I have doubted everything. 
I am so full of doubt that I detest my son, and some- 
times I do not believe that he is my son. I am very 
unhappy!" V % , >j 



ANNA KARENINA 207 

He had no need to say that. Darya Aleksandrovna 
understood it as soon as she looked into his face. She 
pitied him, and her faith in her friend's innocence was 
shaken. 

" Oh ! it is terrible, terrible ! but is it true that you are 
really decided about the divorce? " . 1 

"I have decided to take this last measure. There 
was nothing else for me to do." 

" Don't do it ! Don ? t do it ! " cried Dolly, with tears 
in her eyes. " No, don't do it ! " 

" The most dreadful thing about a misfortune of this 
kind is that one cannot bear his cross as in any other, 
— a loss or a death, — and here one must do something," 
said he, apparently divining Dolly's thought. " One must 
escape from the humiliating position in which one is 
placed ; on ne pent vivre ct trots / " 

" I understand, I understand perfectly," replied Dolly, 
bowing her head. She was silent, thinking of herself, 
of her own domestic troubles ; but suddenly with an en- 
ergetic movement she raised her head, and with a suppli- 
cating gesture she folded her hands. 

"But wait," she said; "you are a Christian, think of 
her ! What will become of her if you abandon her ? " 

" I have thought of it, Darya Aleksandrovna. I have 
thought a great deal about it," said Aleksei' Aleksan- 
drovitch. His face was covered with red blotches and 
his troubled eyes looked straight at her. Darya Alek- 
sandrovna pitied him now from the bottom of her heart. 
" I did this very thing after she herself had told me of 
her disgrace. I put everything on the old footing. I 
gave her the chance of reformation. I tried to save her. 
What did she do then ? She paid no attention to the 
easiest of demands, — observance of propriety ! " he 
added, choking.. " One can save a man who does not 
want to perish ; but if his whole nature is so corrupt, so 
rotten, that ruin itself seems salvation, what can be 
done?" 

"Everything, except divorce," replied Darya. Alek- 
sandrovna. 

" What do you mean by everything ? " 



208 ANNA KARENINA 

" No, that is horrible ! She will .no longer be any 
one's wife. She will be lost ! " 

''What can I do ? " replied Karenin, raising his shoul- 
ders and his eyebrows ; and the memory of his wife's 
last offense so angered him that he became as cool as 
at the beginning of the conversation. " I am. very grate- 
ful to you for your sympathy, but I must go," he added, 
rising. 

"No, wait a moment ! you must not give, her up:, 
listen to me; I speak from experience. I, too, was 
married, and my husband deceived me : in my jealousy 
and indignation, I wished to abandon everything ; but I 
considered the matter, and who saved me? Anna! 
Now I am living again. Now my children are growing 
up, my husband has returned to his family, regrets his 
wrong-doing, is growing better, nobler. I live, I have 
forgiven him ; and you ought to forgive her ! " 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch listened ; but Dolly's words 
had no effect on him. Again in his soul arose the anger 
of that day when he decided on a divorce. He shook 
himself and spoke in a loud, penetrating voice : — 

" I cannot', nor do I wish to forgive her. It would be 
unjust. I have done what was next to impossible for 
this woman, and she has trampled everything into the 
mire, which seems to be her element. I am not a bad 
man, and I have never hated anybody before ; but her I 
hate with all the strength of my soul, and I cannot for- 
give her, for I hate her too much for all the wrong she 
has done me ! " and tears of anger trembled in his voice. 

" Love them that hate you," murmured Dolly, almost 
ashamed. 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch smiled scornfully. He was 
familiar with these words, but they did not apply to his 
case. 

"We can love those who hate us, but to love those 
whom we hate is impossible. I beg your pardon for 
having troubled you : sufficient unto every man is his 
ownburden." And having recovered his self-possession, 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch calmly took leave of Dolly, 
and went away. # s . -a i 



ANNA KARENINA 209 



CHAPTER XIII 

When the company arose from dinner Levin wanted 
! to follow Kitty into the drawing-room, but he was afraid, 
not that it would be disagreeable to her, but that it would 
be too obvious a wooing of her. So he remained with 
the men, and took part in the general conversation. 
And without looking at Kitty, he was conscious of her 
motions, of her glances, and of the place where she was 
in the drawing-room. Without the least effort he im- 
mediately began to fulfil the promise that he had made 
her to love all men, and to think nothing but good of 
them. 

The conversation turned on the commune in Russia, 
which Pestsof considered as the beginning of what he 
called a new order of things. Levin agreed as little 
with him as he did with SergyeV Ivanovitch, who it 
seemed to him recognized, and at the same time denied, 
the- value of this institution ; but he talked with them, 
trying only to reconcile them and tone down their ex- 
citability. He was not in the least interested in what 
he himself said and was still less interested in what 
they said, but his one desire was, to see all of them 
happy and contented. He now realized what one thing 
was important. And that one was at first yonder in the 
drawing-room and afterward moved about and was now 
near the door. Without turning around he was con- 
scious of a look and a smile fixed on him, and he could 
not help looking. She was standing there with Shcher- 
batsky, and looking at him. 

" I thought you were going to the piano/' said he, 
approaching her. " Music is what I have to do without 
in the country." 

" No, we merely came to find you ; and I thank you 
for coming to us," she replied, recompensing him with 
a smile. " What pleasure can there be in discussing ? 
Really, no one ever convinced another." 

" Yes ; that is true ! " said Levin. " It generally hap- 
pens that you get excited in a discussion simply from 
VOL. 11. — 14 



aio ANNA KARENINA 

the fact that you can never tell exactly what your oppo 
nent is trying to show." 

Levin had many times noticed that in discussions 
among clever people, after an immense output of energy, 
an immense array of logical terms and subtleties, the' 
disputants came at last to an acknowledgment that 
what they had been so interminably striving to prove 
to each other, was a matter of common knowledge from 
the very beginning, but that they liked something dif- 
ferent and therefore were not willing to acknowledge 
what they liked, so as not to be controverted. He had 
often met with the experience that in the midst of a 
dispute you find what your opponent likes, and sud- 
denly you find that you yourself like the same thing, 
arid you immediately agree, and then all* your argu- 
ments fall to the ground as useless. But sometimes 
he had had the opposite experience: you at last say 
what you like and evolve your arguments and if per- 
chance you speak well and sincerely, suddenly your 
opponent assents and ceases to uphold the other side. 
This is exactly what he meant. 

She wrinkled her brows, trying to comprehend. But 
as soon as he began to explain, her mind grasped his 
meaning. " I understand : one must make sure why 
he is disputing, what he likes .... if possible .... " 

She had fully grasped and expressed his badly 
phrased idea. 

Levin smiled with rapture ; so striking was the tran- 
sition from the complicated prolix discussion between 
Pestsof and his brother to this clear, laconic, almost 
wordless communication of the most abstruse thoughts ! 

Shcherbatsky stepped away; and Kitty, going to a 
card-table, sat down, and taking a piece of chalk in 
her hand began to draw circles on the green cloth. 

They took up the topic which was under discussion at 
dinner : as to the emancipation and occupation of women. 
Levin was inclined to agree with Darya Aleksandrovna, 
that a girl who was not going to marry would find femi- 
nine "occupations in some family. He urged that not a " 
single family can get along without some female help; 



ANNA KARENINA 211 

that every family, however poor or rich, has and must 
have some one to look after the children. 

" No," said Kitty, blushing but looking at him frankly 
with her honest eyes ; " a girl may be so situated that 
she cannot without humiliation go into a family, but she 
herself...." 

He understood what she hinted at. 

" Oh, yes," he said ; " yes, yes, yes, you are right." 

And he realized all that Pestsof was trying to prove 
at dinner about the freedom of women merely by the 
fact that he saw in Kitty's heart a maiden's dread of 
humiliation, and, loving her, he experienced this dread 
and this humiliation, and immediately renounced his 
former arguments. 

A silence ensued. She went on making designs with 
the chalk on the table. Her eyes shone with a gentle 
gleam. Submitting to her mood, he felt in his being 
all the increasing tension of happiness. 

" Akh ! I have covered the table with my scrawls," 
said she, laying down the chalk, with a movement as if 
she were going to rise. 

" How can I stay alone without her?" thought Levin, 
terrified, and picking up the chalk. 

" Wait," said he, sitting down at the table. " I have 
wanted for a long time to ask you something." 

He looked straight into her affectionate but never- 
theless startled eyes. 

" Please, what is it ? " 

"This is it," said he, taking the chalk, and writing 
the letters w, y> s f z, i\ z, w, z, z, t, o t a ? These letters 
were the initials of the words, " When you said, * It is 
impossible,' was it impossible then, or always V 

It was not at all likely that Kitty would be able to 
make out this complicated question. Levin looked at 
her, nevertheless, as if his life depended on whether 
she could guess these words or not. 

She looked at him gravely, then rested her forehead 
on her hand and tried to decipher it. Occasionally she 
would look up at him, asking him with her eyes : " Isr 
what I think right? " 



212 ANNA KARENINA 

" I know what it is," said she, blushing. 

"What is this word?" he asked, pointing to the i of 
the" word impossible. 

, " That letter stands for impossible. The word is not 
right,'' she replied. 

He quickly rubbed out what he had written, gave the 
chalk to her, and stood up. 

She wrote : t, /, c, ?i, a, d. 

Dolly, seeing her sister with the chalk in her hand, a 
timid and happy smile on her lips, raising her eyes to 
Levin, who was leaning over the table, beaming now 
at her, now at the cloth, felt consoled for the grief 
caused by her conversation with Alekse'f Aleksan- 
drovitch. His face suddenly grew radiant; he had 
understood the reply: "Then I could not answer differ- 
ently" 

He looked at Kitty timidly and inquiringly. 

" Only then ? " 

" Yes/' replied the young girl's smile. 

"B, n — but now?" he asked. 

" Read this. I will tell you what I wish, what I wish 
very much ; " and she quickly traced the initials, t, y, m, 
fa y fw,t f p. 

This meant : " That you might forgive and forget 
what took place." 

He seized the chalk in turn, with his excited, trem- 
bling fingers, and crushing it wrote down the initials of 
these words: " I have nothing to forgive and forget. I 
have ?ievcr ceased to love you" 

Kitty looked at him, and her smile died away. 

"I understand," she murmured. 

He sat down and wrote a long phrase. She compre- 
hended it and without even asking is it thus and so, 
took the chalk and instantly replied. 

It was some time before he made out what she wrote 
and had to keep looking into her eyes. His wits were 
dulled by his happiness. He could not supply the 
words which she intended ; but in her lovely eyes, radiant 
with joy, he understood all that he needed to know. 
And he wrote three letters. But he had not finished 



ANNA KARENINA 213 

writing them ere she read them under his hand and her 
self finished the sentence and answered it! 

"Yes." 

"You are playing secretaire, are you," said the old 
prince, coming up to them. "Well, if you are going 
to the theater it is time to start." 

Levin rose and accompanied Kitty to the door. 

This conversation decided everything; Kitty had 
acknowledged her love for him, and had given him per- 
mission to come the next morning to speak to her 
parents. 

CHAPTER XIV 

After Kitty had gone and Levin was left alone, he 
felt such a restlessness and such an unendurable long- 
ing for the morning to come when he might see her 
again and settle his destiny forever, that he dreaded, as 
he dreaded death, the fourteen hours which he should 
have to endure without her. He felt it absolutely neces- 
sary to be with and to talk with some one so as not to 
remain alone, so as to cheat the time. Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, whom he would have liked to keep with him, 
was going, so he said, to a reception, but in reality to 
the ballet. Levin could only tell him that he was 
happy, and should never, never forget what he owed 
to him. Stepan Arkadyevitch's eyes and smile showed 
Levin that he suitably appreciated his feelings. 

" What ! Then you have nothing more to say about 
dying ? " said Oblonsky, pressing his friend's hand affec- 
tionately. 

" N-n-n-no," replied the latter. 

Darya Aleksandrovna, too, almost congratulated him 
when she bade him good night. She said, " How glad 
I am that you have made up with Kitty ; we ought 
to prize old friends ! " and her words displeased Levin. 
She could not comprehend how lofty and inaccessible 
to her all this was for him, and she should not have 
dared to refer to it. Levin took his departure, but, to 
avoid being alone, he joined his brother. 



2i 4 ANNA KARENINA 

" Where are you going?" 

"To a meeting.'" 

" Well ! I '11 go with you. May I ? " 

"Why not ? " said Sergye'f Ivanovitch, smiling. "What 
has happened to you. to-day ?" 

"What has happened?" Good fortune," said Levin, 
letting down the carriage-window. " Have you any 
objection? I am suffocating. Good fortune has hap- 
pened to me ! Why have you never been married ? " 

Sergye'f Ivanovitch smiled. 

" I am delighted ; she seems like a splendid gi...." he 
began. 

" No, don't say anything about it, don't say anything 
about it! " cried Levin, clutching the collar of his shuba 
with both hands, and covering his face with the fur. A 
splendid girl; what commonplace words ! and how 
feebly they corresponded to his feelings! 

Sergye'f Ivanovitch laughed a gay laugh ; this was a 
rare occurrence with him. 

" I should think I might say that I am very glad of 
this ! " 

" To-morrow, to-morrow you may speak ; but not an- 
other word now, not another word, not another word ! 
Be silent," said Levin, and pulling his shuba still higher 
round his face, he added : " I love you very much. 
But tell me, may I go to your meeting?" 

" Of course you may." 

" What is your subject for discussion to-night?" asked 
Levin, .still smiling. 

They reached their destination. Levin heard the 
secretary stammer through the report, which evidently 
he did not understand; but he could see, from this 
secretary's face, that he was a good, amiable, sympa- 
thetic-fellow; it was evident from the way that he hesi- 
tated and became confused while reading. * 

Then came the debates. They discussed about the 
disposal of certain sums of money, and the laying of 
certain sewer-pipes. Sergyei Ivanovitch attacked two 
members of the commission, and made a long, trium- 
phant speech against them ; after which another mem- 



ANNA KARENINA 215 

ber, reading from a paper, after some timid hesitation, 
replied briefly in a charming though bitter fashion ; and 
then Sviazhsky, — he too was there, — in his turn, ex- 
pressed his opinions nobly and eloquently. 

Levin listened and clearly saw that neither the money 
to be expended nor the sewer-pipes were of serious im- 
portance ; and that they were not really quarreling but 
were all such pleasant, congenial people, and conse- 
quently all was serene among them. They interfered 
with no one and all seemed happy. Levin noticed with 
surprise that they all seemed to him to-day transparent, 
that' — from some trifling incidents which once would 
have Entirely escaped his notice— -he could .read their 
souls, and see how good they all were. Especially did they 
seem to like him, Levin. This was shown by the way 
they talked with him, and even those who did not know 
him looked at him pleasantly and in a friendly manner. 

" Well, how do you like it? " asked Sergyef Ivanovitch. 

"Very much; I ndver should have believed that it 
would be so interesting. It is splendid." 

Sviazhsky approached Levin and invited him to come 
and take a cup of tea at his house. Levin could not 
for the life of him comprehend or remember why he 
had been prejudiced against Sviazhsky, or what he had 
seemed to him to lack. He was a clever and wonder- 
fully good fellow. 

" I should be delighted," replied Levin, and he imme- 
diately inquired after Madame Sviazhsky and her sister. 
By a strange association of ideas, as Sviazhsky's sister- 
in-law suggested marriage, he concluded that nobody 
would be more interested than she and her sister to hear 
of his happiness. So he was very much pleased with 
the idea of going to see them. 

Sviazhsky questioned him about his affairs, always 
refusing to admit that anything could be discovered 
which had not already been discovered in Europe ; but 
now his theory did not arouse Levin's opposition. On 
the contrary, he felt that Sviazhsky was right, and 
Levin admired the gentleness and delicacy with which 
he avoided the expression of his arguments, ufi I. 



216 ANNA KARENINA 

The ladies were especially charming. It seemed to 
Levin that they knew all, and that they shared his joy, 
but that they avoided speaking of it from discretion. 
He remained for three hours, talking on various sub- 
jects, and continually alluding to what filled his soul, 
without noticing that he was mortally tiring his friends, 
and that they were falling asleep. 

At last, Sviazhsky, yawning, accompanied him to the 
vestibule, very much surprised at the strange state of 
mind in which his friend seemed to be. It was two 
o'clock ! Levin reached his hotel and was aghast at 
the thought of passing the next ten hours alone, a prey 
to his impatience. The watchman who was on duty in 
the corridor lighted his candles, and was about to with- 
draw when Levin stopped him. This fellow, who was 
called Yegor and whom Levin had never before noticed, 
seemed like a good, intelligent man, and, above all, kind- 
hearted. 

" Tell me, Yegor, don't you find it hard to go without 
your sleep ? " 

" What can I do about it ? It is our calling. We 
have an easier time in gentlemen's houses, but here we 
get larger wages." 

It seemed that Yegor was the father of a family of 
four children, — three boys, and a girl trained as a seam- 
stress, whom he hoped to marry to a harness-maker's 
clerk. 

Levin seized this opportunity to communicate his ideas 
about love in marriage to Yegor, remarking that people 
are always happy where there is love, because their hap- 
piness' is in themselves. 

Yegor listened attentively, and evidently understood 
Levin's meaning ; but he confirmed it by an unexpected 
reflection, — that when he, Yegor, had served good mas- 
ters, he had always been satisfied with them, and that he 
was contented with his master now, although he was a 
Frenchman. ' 

" What a wonderfully good fellow ! " thought Levin. 
* Well, and did you love your wife, Yegor, when you 
married her ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 217 

"Why shouldn't I have loved her?" replied Yegor. 

And Levin noticed Yegor also grew very enthusiastic 
and was eager to confide to him his inmost thoughts. 

" My life, too, has been extraordinary/' he began, his 
eyes shining, overcome by Levin's enthusiasm as one 
catches a yawning fit. " From my childhood .... " 

But the bell rang; Yegor departed, and Levin was 
left alone. 

He had eaten scarcely anything at dinner. He had 
refused to take any tea or supper at Sviazhsky's, yet even 
now he could not think of eating. He had not slept the 
preceding night, yet he did not think of sleeping now. His 
room was cold, but it seemed so stifling that he could 
not breathe. He opened both casements, and sat down 
on a table in front of one. Above the roofs covered 
with snow rose the carved cross of a church, and higher 
still were the triangular constellation of the Charioteer 
and the bright yellow Capella. He breathed in the 
cold air which filled his room, and looked now at the 
cross, now at the stars, rising as in a dream among 
the figures and memories called up by his imagination. 

Toward four o'clock in the morning he heard footsteps 
in the corridor ; he opened his door, and saw a gambler 
named Miaskin, whom he knew, returning from his club. 
He walked along, coughing, gloomy, and scowling. 

"Poor, unfortunate fellow!" thought Levin, and his 
eyes filled with tears of pity and love for that man. He 
wanted to stop him, to speak to him, and console him ; 
but, remembering that he was undressed, he thought 
better of it, went back, and sat down to bathe himself in 
the icy air, and to look at the silent, foreign-looking 
cross, so full of meaning to him, and at the brilliant, 
yellow star poised above it. 

Toward seven o'clock the men polishing the floors 
began to make a noise, the bells rang for early morning 
service, and Levin began to feel that he was taking cold. 
He closed the window, made his toilet, and went out. 



ai8 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XV 

The streets were still deserted. Levin walked to the 
Shcherbatskys' house.. The principal entrance was still 
closed, and every one was asleep. 

He returned to the hotel, went to his room, and asked 
for coffee. The day watchman, and not Yegor, brought 
it to him. Levin wished to enter into conversation 
with him ; but some one rang for him, and he went out. 

Then Levin tried to take his coffee, and put a piece 
of kalatch into his mouth, but his mouth did not know 
what to do with the bread ! He eschewed it and put 
on his overcoat, and went out to walk again. It was just 
ten o'clock when he reached the Shcherbatskys' steps 
for the second time. They were beginning to get up ; 
the cook was going to market. He would have to wait 
at least two hours longer. 

Levin had passed the whole night and the morning 
completely oblivious of the material conditions of exist- 
ence: he had neither eaten nor slept; had been exposed, 
with almost no clothing, to the cold for several hours ; 
and he not only was fresh and hearty, but he was uncon- 
scious of his body; he moved without using his muscles, 
and felt capable of doing anything. He was persuaded 
that he could fly through the air or jump over the top 
of a house if it were necessary. He roamed about the 
streets to pass away the time, consulting his watch every 
moment or two, and looking about him. 

What he saw that day he never saw again. He was 
particularly struck by the children on their way to school; 
the dark blue pigeons flying from the roof to the side- 
walk; the sa'ikas or little cakes powdered with flour 
that an . invisible hand was arranging in a window. 
These cakes, these pigeons, and two little lads were 
celestial objects. All this happened at once : one 
of the little lads ran toward a pigeon, and looked at 
Levin, smiling ; the pigeon flapped its wings, and flew 
off glittering in the sunlight through a cloud of fine 
snow; and the smell of hot bread came through the 



ANNA KARENINA 219 

window where the saYkas were displayed. All these 
things, taken as a whole, produced so lively an impres- 
sion on Levin that he laughed aloud until the tears 
came. After going around by the Gazetnaya and Kis- 
lovka streets, he went back to the hotel, sat down, 
placed his watch before him, and waited till the hands 
pointed to the hour of noon. 

In the next room some one was talking about ma- 
chines and hoaxes, and some one coughed a morning 
cough. The person did not know that the hour hand/ 
was approaching twelve. 

The hour pointed to twelve. Levin went to the steps 
of the hotel. The izvoshchiks evidently knew all about 
it. With happy faces they surrounded him, with eager 
emulation offering their services; striving not to offend 
the others and promising to take them some other time; 
he made his choice and ordered the man to drive to 
the Shcherbatskys'. The izvoshchik was charming, 
with his white shirt-collar above his kaftan surrounding 
his strong, red neck. He had a comfortable sleigh, 
more comfortable than ordinary sleighs, — such a sleigh 
as Levin had never seen before, and the horse was 
good, and did his best to run, but did not stir from" the 
spot! The izvoshchik knew the Shcherbatsky house; 
he stopped before the door flourishing his arms, and 
turned respectfully toward Leyin, saying " tprru " to 
his horse. 

The Shcherbatskys' Swiss knew all about it, surely ; 
that was plain from the look in his eyes and the way he 
said : — 

" Well ! it is a long time since you have been here, 
Konstantin Dmitritch." 

Not only did he know what had happened, but he 
was full of delight, and tried to conceal his joy. Levin 
felt a shade happier when he caught the old man's good- 
natured eyes. 

" Are they up ? " 

" Please come in. Leave that here," added the Swiss 
as Levin was turning back to get his cap. That surely 
had some significance. 



220 ANNA KARENINA 

" To whom shall I announce you, sir ? " asked a 
Jackey. 

This lackey, though young, new in the house, and 
with some pretension to elegance, was very obliging, 
very attentive, and he, too, seemed to understand the 
situation." 

"To the princess .... I mean the prince .... no, the 
young princess," I replied Levin. 

The first person whom he met was Mademoiselle 
Linon. She was passing through the "hall," radiant 
in her little curls and her shining face. He had hardly 
spoken to her when the rustling of a dress was heard 
at the door. Mademoiselle Linon disappeared from 
before his eyes, and a joyous trepidation at the thought 
of the happiness so near took possession of him. Made- 
moiselle Linon hastened away and vanished through 
another door. She had hardly gone when swift light 
steps were heard pattering on the inlaid floor, and 
his happiness, his life, the better part of himself, that 
which he had yearned for so long, drew near. She did 
not walk; some invisible power seemed to bring her 
toward him. 

He saw only her bright, truthful eyes, filled with the 
same timid joy of love that filled his own heart. These 
eyes, shining nearer and nearer to him, almost blinded 
him with their light of |ove. 

She stood before him, almost touching him ; then she 
placed her two hands gently on his shoulders. 

She did all that she could: she went to him; she 
gave herself to him, trembling and happy. He folded 
her in his arms/ and pressed his lips to hers, expectant 
of his kiss. 

She, too, had not slept at all that night, and she had 
been waiting for him all the morning. 
- Her parents were perfectly agreed, and happy in her 
happiness. She had been on the watch for his coming. 

1 ICnyaginya, knyaz\ knyazhna. Knyaginya is the Russian title of a 
married princess ; it also means in popular usage a bride, as knyaz* 
means prince and bridegroom ; knyazhna is applied to an unmarried 
princess. 



ANNA KARENINA 221 

She wanted to be the first to tell him of their happiness. 
She was prepared to meet him alone, and she was full 
of joy at the thought, and yet she was shy and con- 
fused, and hardly knew what she was going to do. She 
had heard his steps and voice, and hid herself behind the 
door to wait till Mademoiselle Linon had gone. Made- 
moiselle Linon went. Then without any delay, without 
questioning further, she came to him and did as she did. 

" Now, let us find mamma," said she, taking his hand. 

For a long time he could not utter a word, not so 
much because he was afraid of lessening the intensity 
of his joy by words, but because every time he tried to 
say anything he felt that instead of words, tears of joy 
burst forth ; his tears choked him. He took her hand, 
and kissed it. 

" Is it really true ? " he said at last in a husky voice. 
" I cannot believe that you love me." 

She smiled at the way he used the second person 
singular, and at the timidity with which he looked at 
her. 

"Yes," she replied, slowly lingering on this word. 
" I am so happy ! " 

Without letting go his hand, she went with him into 
the drawing-room. As soon as the princess saw them, 
she began to breathe fast and then she burst into tears, 
and then she laughed, and with an energetic movement 
which Levin was not prepared for she ran to him, seized 
his head, and kissed him, bedewing his face with her 
tears. 

" So all is settled ? I am delighted. Love her. I 
am so glad .... for you .... Kitty ! " 

" It did n't take you long to arrange matters," said the 
old prince, trying to appear calm ; but Levin saw his 
eyes were full with tears, as he looked at him. 

" It is something I have long been anxious for," 
said the prince, taking Levin's hand and drawing him 
toward him. " And even when this little giddy-pate 
thought .... " 

V Papa ! " cried Kitty, putting her hand over his 
mouth. 



222 ANNA KARENINA 

"Well, I won't say anything," said he. " I am very 
.... very .... hap .... Akh ! how stupid I am!" 
i And he took Kitty in his arms, kissed her face, her 
hands, and then her face again, blessing her with the 
sign of the cross. 

And Levin was filled by a new feeling of affection 
for the old prince when he saw how tenderly and fer- 
vently Kitty kissed his great, strong hand. 



CHAPTER XVI 

The princess was sitting in her easy-chair, silent and 
beaming ; the prince was sitting beside her ; Kitty was 
standing near her father, holding his hand. All of 
them were silent. 

The princess was the first to bring their thoughts and 
feelings back to the affairs of real life ; and the transi- 
tion gave each of them, for a moment, a strange and 
painful impression. 

" When shall the wedding be ? We must announce 
the marriage, and have them betrothed. But when 
shall the wedding be ? What do you think about it, 
Aleksandr ? " 

" There is the person most interested," said the prince, 
pointing to Levin. 

" When ? " replied the latter, reddening. " To-mor- 
row ! If you wish my opinion ; to-day, the betrothal ; 
to-morrow, the wedding." 

"There, there, that'll do, mon cher; no nonsense! " 

" Well, in a week, then.! 1 

"One would really suppose that you had lost your 
senses." 

" But why not ? " 

" Mercy on us ! " said the mother, smiling gayly at his 
impatience. " And the trousseau ? " 

"Is it possible that a trousseau and all the rest are in- 
dispensable?" thought Levin, with alarm. " However, 
neither the trousseau, nor the betrothal, nor anything 
else, can spoil my happiness! Nothing can do that!" 



ANNA KARENINA 223 

He looked at Kitty, and noticed that the idea of the 
trousseau did not offend her at all. " It must be very 
necessary," he said to himself. " I admit that I know 
nothing about it. I have merely expressed my desire," 
said he, excusing himself. 

"We will consider the matter; now we will have the 
betrothal, and announce the marriage. That is what 
we will do." 

The princess stepped up to her husband, kissed him, 
and was about to move away again ; but he held her, 
and kissed her again and again, like a young lover. 
The two old people seemed agitated, and ready to be- 
lieve that it was not their daughter who was to be mar- 
ried, but themselves. 

When the prince and princess had gone out, Levin 
approached his fiancfo, and took her hand ; he had re- 
gained his self-possession, and could speak ; he had 
many other things on his mind to tell her, but he did 
not say at all what he intended to say. 

" I knew that it would be like this ; at the bottom of 
my heart I was sure of it, without ever daring to hope. 
I believe that it was predestined." 

"And I," replied Kitty, "even when," — she hesi- 
tated, then continued, looking at him resolutely out of 
her sincere eyes, — "even when I rejected my happi- 
ness. I never loved anybody but you ; I was led away. 
I ought to tell you.... I must ask you, can you for- 
get it ? " 

" Perhaps it was best that it should be so* You, too, 
will have to pardon me, for I must confess to you." .... 

This was one of the things he had on his mind to tell 
her. He had decided to confess everything to her, from 
his earliest life, — first, that he was not so pure as she, 
and then that he was not a believer. This was cruel, 
but he thought it his duty to make these confessions to 
her. 

" No, not now ; later," said he. 

" Very well, later, but be sure to tell me. I am not 
afraid of anything. I want to know all, everything, 
now it is decided ! " 



22 4 ANNA KARENINA 

" Is it decided/' he interrupted, " that you take me 
just as I am ? you do not take back your word ! 7 

"No, oh, no!" 

Their conversation was interrupted by Mademoiselle 
Linon, who, trying to look properly serious, came to 
congratulate her favorite pupil. She had not left the 
drawing-room before the servants came to offer their 
congratulations. Next came the relatives and friends ; 
and this was the beginning of that absurdly happy 
period, from which Levin did not emerge till the day 
after his marriage. 

Although he felt constrained and ill at ease all the 
time, yet the force of his happiness kept increasing. 
He felt all the time that much which he knew nothing 
about would be required of him, and he did everything 
that he was told to do, and all this served to increase 
his joy. He imagined that his engagement would not 
be in the least like others ; that the ordinary conditions 
of an engagement would destroy his especial happiness. 
But it came about that he did exactly as everybody 
else did in such cases, and his happiness for this very 
reason kept increasing and grew more and more peculiar 
and did not change, and was in no respect like that of 
other men. * 

" Now," said Mademoiselle Linon, " we shall have all 
the candy we wish for;" and Levin ran to buy candy. 

"Well, very glad!" said Sviazhsky. "I advise you 
to get your bouquets at Fomin's." 

" Do you ? " said Levin ; and he went to Fomin's. 

His brother told him he would have to borrow money, 
because there would be many expenses for presents and 
other things. 

" For presents ? Really?" and he started off on the 
run to buy jewelry at Fulda's. 

At the confectioner's, at Fomin's, at Fulda's, he 
found that every one expected him, and every one 
seemed glad and rejoiced in his happiness, as did every 
one with whom he had to do those days. It was an 
extraordinary thing that not only did they all love him, 
but, strange as it may seem, even those who before had 



ANNA KARENINA 225 

seemed cold, unsympathetic,; and indifferent approved 
of him in every way, treated his feelings with delicacy 
and gentleness, and shared his convictions that he was 
the happiest man in the world, because his " bride " was 
the pink of perfection. 

Kitty also had the same feeling. 

When the Countess Nordstone alluded to the more 
brilliant hopes that she had conceived for her friend, 
Kitty became angry, and declared so vehemently that 
no one in the world could be better than Levin, that the 
countess had to confess it, and when Kitty was present 
she never met Levin without smiling enthusiastically. 

The confession which he had promised was a very 
trying incident of this period. He consulted the old 
prince, and, acting on his advice, Levin gave Kitty his 
journal in which were written out all. the matters 
that troubled him. He had written this diary pur- 
posely to show to the one whom he should marry. 
Two things tormented him : his sins against virtue and 
his unbelief. 

The confession of his unbelief passed almost un- 
noticed. She was religious and had never doubted . the 
truths of her religion, but her lover's superficial skepti- 
cism did not trouble her very much. She knew through 
love his whole soul and in his soul she found all that 
she wanted. It was of little importance to her that 
he termed the state of his soul incredulity. But the 
second acknowledgment caused her to shed bitter tears. 

Levin had a great struggle with himself before he 
decided to let her read his diary. He knew that be- 
tween him and her there could be and should be no 
secrets, and therefore he resolved that he must do it; 
but he did not realize what an effect it would have on a 
young girl. 

Only when, as he entered Kitty's room one evening 
before going to the theater, and saw her lovely face 
bathed in tears and unhappy with the irreparable woe 
that he had caused, did he perceive the abyss that sepa- 
rated his shameful past from her dovelike purity, and 
he was horror-stricken at what he had done. 
vol. 11. — 15 



226 ANNA KARENINA 

r " Take back these terrible papers, take them back ! " 
she said, pushing away the sheets lying on the table. 
" Why did you give them to me ? However, perhaps 
it was for the best/ 5 she added, seized with pity at the 
sight of Levin's despairing face. "But it is terrible, 
terrible!" 

He hung. his head, and had nothing to say. 
1 ";You will not forgive me ! " he murmured. 
" Yes, I have forgiven you ; but it is terrible ! " 
However, his happiness was so immense that this con- 
fession did not diminish it, but only served to add a 
shade more to it. She forgave him. From that time 
he counted himself still more unworthy of her ; morally, 
he bowed down still lower before her and treasured the 
happiness that he had gained still higher. He under- 
stood the worth of it still better after this pardon. 

CHAPTER XVII 

When he returned to his lonely room, AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch involuntarily recalled, little by little, the con- 
versations that had taken place at the dinner and in the 
evening. Darya Aleksandrovna's words about pardon 
merely aroused his vexation. Whether he should apply 
the Christian rule' to his case or not, was a question too 
difficult to bd lightly decided ; besides, he had already 
considered this question, and decided it in the negative. 
Of all that had been said that day, the remark of that 
good stupid Turovtsuin had made the liveliest impression 
on his mind : — 

He did bravely \ for he challenged the other man and 
killed him. 

Evidently all approved this conduct ; although out of 
politeness they had not said so openly. 

" However, this matter is ended ; it is useless to think 
about it;" said" AlekseY Aleksandrovitch to himself ; and 
giving no more thought to anything except the prepara- 
tions for' his departure and his tour of inspection, he 
went to his room and asked of the Swiss who showed 



ANNA KARENINA 21* 

him the way if he had seen his valet The Swiss said 
his valet had only just gone out. Alekse'f Aleksandro- 
vitch ordered tea to be brought, and sitting down at the 
table opened a railway guide and began to study the 
departure of trains for his journey. 

" Two telegrams," said his valet, returning and coming 
into the room. "Will your Excellency please excuse 
me, I have only just stepped out?" 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch took the telegrams and 
opened them; the first announced the nomination of 
Stremof to the place for which he had been ambitious. 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch threw down the despatch, 
and with a flushed face began to walk back and forth 
through the room. 

" Quos vult perdere dementat" said he, applying quos 
to all those who had taken part in this nomination. He 
was not disturbed by the fact that he himself had not 
been nominated, that he had evidently been outwitted ; 
but it was incomprehensible to him — amazing — that they 
could not see that Stremof, that babbler, that speechifier, 
was the least fitted of all men for the place. Could they 
not understand that they were ruining themselves, that 
they were destroying their prestige, by such a choice ? 

" Some more news of the same sort," he thought with 
bitterness as he opened the second telegram. It was 
from his wife; her name, "Anna," in blue pencil, was 
the first thing that struck his eyes. 

I am dying. I beg you to come ; I shall die easier if I 
have your forgiveness. 

He read these words with scorn, and threw the paper 
on the floor. 

That there was some piece, of trickery, some decep- 
tion, in this, admitted of no doubt in his mind at first 
thought. 

" There is no deceitfulness of which she is not capable. 
She must be on the eve of her confinement, and it is 
her sickness. But what can be her object ? To legalize 
the child ? to compromise me ? to prevent the divorce ? 
But what does it mean, ' I am dying ' ? " 



228 ANNA KARENINA 

He re-read the telegram, and suddenly realized its full 
meaning. 

" If it is true, — if the suffering, the approach of death, 
have caused her to repent sincerely, and if I should call 
this pretense, and refuse to go to her, that would not 
only be cruel, but foolish, and all would blame me." 

" Piotr, order a carriage ; I am going to Petersburg ! ' 
said he to the valet. 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch decided to go to Petersburg 
and to see his wife. If her illness was a pretense, he 
would say nothing and go away again; on the other 
hand, if she were really ill unto death, and wanted to 
see him before she died, he would forgive her ; and, if 
he reached her too late, he could at least pay his last 
respects to her. 

During the journey he gave no more thought of what 
he should do. 

AlekseV Aleksandrovitch, tired and dusty with his 
night in the coach, reached Petersburg in the mist of 
the early morning. He rode along the still deserted 
Nevsky Prospekt,- looking straight before him, without 
thinking of what was awaiting him at home. He could 
not think about it, because as soon as he tried to imagine 
what might be, he could not drive away the suggestion 
that his wife's death would put a sudden end to all diffi- 
culties of his situation. 

The bakers, the closed shops, the night izvoshchiks, 
the dvorniks sweeping the sidewalks, — all passed like 
a flash before his eyes; he noticed everything, in his 
endeavors to stifle the thought of what was before him 
— of what he dared not hope for and yet hoped for. 

He reached his house ; an izvoshchik and a carriage 
with a coachman asleep were standing before the door. 

As he entered the vestibule Aleksel Aleksandrovitch, 

as it were, snatched at a decision from the most hidden 

recess of his brain, and succeeded in mastering it. It 

was to this effect : " If she has deceived me, I will be 

f . calm and go away again ; but if she has told the truth, 

y I will do what is proper." 

^ The Swiss opened the door even before AlekseT Alek- 



ANNA KARENINA 229 

sandrovitch rang the bell ; the Swiss Petrof, known as 
Kapitonuitch, presented a strange appearance, dressed 
in an old coat and slippers without any cravat. 

" How is the baruinya ? " 

" In the night there was a change for the better." 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch stopped short and turned 
very pale; he now realized how deeply he had hoped 
for her death. 

" And how is she? " 

Karnel, the servant in morning dress, came quickly 
down the stairs. 

" Very low," he said. " There was a consultation 
yesterday, and the doctor is here now/' 

"Take my things," said Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, a 
little comforted to learn that there was still hope of 
death ; and he went into the reception-room. 

A uniform overcoat hung in the hall. Aleksei Alek- 
sandrovitch noticed it, and asked : — 

"Who is here?" 

"The doctor, the nurse, and Count Vronsky." 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch went through the inner 
rooms. There was no one in the drawing-room ; but 
the sound of his steps brought the nurse, in a cap with 
lilac ribbons, out of the boudoir. 

She came to Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, and, taking 
him by the hand,, with the familiarity that the approach 
of death permits, led him into the sleeping-room. 

" Thank the Lord that you have come ! She talks of 
nothing but you ; always of you," she said. 

" Bring some ice quick ! " said the imperative voice 
of the doctor from the chamber. 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch went into her boudoir. On 
a little low chair by her table, sat Vronsky weeping, his 
face covered with his hands. He started at the sound 
of the doctor's voice, uncovered his face, and saw Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch. The sight of the husband disturbed 
him so much that he sat back in his chair, crouching 
his head down between his shoulders as if he wanted to 
disappear out of sight ; then, making a great effort, he 
rose and said : — r 



230 ANNA KARENINA 

" She is dying ; the doctors say that there is no hope. 
I am in your power. Only allow me to remain here. 
.... I will conform to your wishes in every other re- 
spect. I .... " 

When he saw Vronsky in tears, Alekser Aleksandro- 
vitch felt the involuntary tenderness that the sufferings 
of others always caused him ; he turned away his head 
without replying, and went to the door. 

Anna's voice could be heard from the sleeping-room, 
lively, gay, and with clear intonations. 

Alekset Aleksandrovitch went in and approached her 
bed. She was lying with her face turned toward him. 
Her cheeks were bright red, her eyes brilliant ; her lit- 
tle white hands, coming out of the sleeves of her night- 
dress, were playing with the corner of the coverlet. 
Not only did she seem fresh and well, but in the hap- 
piest frame of mind ; she talked fast and loud, accenting 
her words with precision and nicety. 

" Because Aleksei' — I am speaking of AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch — strange, is n't it, and cruel, that both should 
be named Alekser ? — - Alekset would not have refused 
me ; I should have forgotten ; he would have forgiven. 
.... Yes ! why does he not come ? He is good ; he 

himself does not know how good he is Akh ! Bozhe 

mor ! what agony ! Give me some water, quick ! Akh ! 
but that is not good for her, .... my. little daughter. 
Well ! then, very good ; give her to the nurse. I am 
willing ; that will be even better. Now when he comes, 
she will be hateful in his sight; take her away." 

" Anna Arkadyevna, he has come ; here he is," said 
the nurse/ trying to draw her attention to Alekseif Alek- 
sandrovitch. 

"Oh, what nonsense ! " continued Anna, without see- 
ing her husband. " There ! give the little one to me, 
give her to me! He hasn't come yet. You pretend 
that he will not forgive me because you do not know 
him. No one knows him, I alone.... His eyes, one 
must know them. Serozha's are very like them; that 
is why I can no longer look at them. Has Serozha had 
his dinner ? I know he will be forgotten. Oh, do not 



ANNA KARENINA 231 

forget him ! Let Serozha be brought into the corner- 
chamber, and let Mariette sleep near him." 

Suddenly she shrank back and was silent ; and, with 
a look of terror, raised her arms above her head as 
if to ward off a blow. She had recognized her hus- 
band. 

" No, no," she said quickly, " I am not afraid of him ; 
I am afraid of dying. Aleksef, come here. I am in a 
hurry, because there is no time to be lost. I have only 
a few minutes to live ; the fever will be upon me again, 
and I shall know nothing more. Now I am conscious ; 
I understand everything and I see everything." 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's wrinkled face expressed 
acute suffering; he took her hand, and he wanted to 
speak, but his lower lip trembled so that he could not 
utter a word, and his emotion hardly allowed him to 
glance at the dying woman. Every time that he turned 
his head toward her, he saw her eyes fixed on him with 
a humility and enthusiastic affection which he had never 
seen there before. 

" Wait ! you do not know Wait, wait ! " .... She 

stopped to collect her thoughts. "Yes," she began 
again, "yes, yes, yes, this is what I want to say. Do 
not be astonished. I am always the same ....but there 
is another I within me, her I fear : it is she who loved 
him, him, and hated you ; and I could not forget what 
I had once been. That was not I ! Now I am myself, 
entirely, really myself, and not another. I am dying, I 
know that I am dying ; ask him if I am hot. I feel it 
now ; there are those terrible weights on my hand and 

my feet and on my fingers My fingers ! they are 

enormous, but all that will soon be over One thing 

only is indispensable to me : forgive me, forgive me 
wholly! I am a sinner; but Serozha's nurse told me 
that there was a holy martyr — what was her name ? — 
who was worse than I. I will go to Rome ; there is a 
desert there. I shall not trouble anybody there. I will. 

only take Serozha and my little daughter No, you 

cannot forgive me; I know very well that it is impossi- 
ble. Go away, go away ! you are too perfect! " 



232 ANNA KARENINA 

She held him with one of her burning hands, and 
pushed him away with the other. 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's emotion J had been all the 
time increasing, and now it reached such a degree that 
he could no longer control himself. He suddenly felt 
that what he had considered his spiritual discord was, 
on the contrary, a blessed state of the soul which im- 
parted to him what seemed like. a new and hitherto 
unknown happiness. He had not believed that the 
Christian law, which he had taken for a guide in life, 
ordered him to forgive and love his enemies ; but now 
his soul was filled with joyous love and forgiveness to 
his enemies. He knelt beside the bed, he laid his fore- 
head on her arm, the fever of which burned through 
the sleeve, and sobbed like a child. She bent toward 
him, placed her arm around her husband's bald head, 
and raised her eyes defiantly and proudly. 

" There, I knew that it would be so. Now farewell, 
farewell all ! .... They are coming back again. Why 
don't they go away ?.... There! take off all these furs 
from, me!" 

The doctor disengaged her arms, laid her back gently 
on her pillows, and drew the covering over her. Anna 
made no resistance, looking all the while straight before 
her, with shining eyes. 

" Remember that I have only asked your pardon ; I 

ask nothing more Why doesn't he come?" she said, 

suddenly looking toward the door, toward Vronsky. 
"Come ! come here, and give him your hand." 

Vronsky came to the side of the bed, and, when he 
saw Anna, he hid his face in his hands again. 

" Uncover your face ; look at him, he is a saint," said 
she. " Yes, uncover your face ! look at him ! " she re- 
peated in an irritated manner. " AlekseY Aleksandro- 
vitch, uncover his face; I want to see him." 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch took Vronsky's hands and 
. uncovered his face, disfigured by the expression of suf- 
fering and humiliation which it wore. 

" Give him your hand ; forgive him." 

1 Dushevnoye razstrhyehtvo, spiritual derangement or discord. 



ANNA KARENINA 233 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch held out his hand to him, 
without trying to keep back the tears. 

"Thank the Lord! thank the Lord! " said she; "now 
everything is right. I will stretch out my feet a little, 
like that ; that is better. How ugly those flowers are ! 
they do not look like violets," she said, pointing to the 
hangings in her room. " Bozhe mof ! Bozhe mo'f ! when 
will this be over? Give me some morphine, doctor; 
some morphine. Bozhe moY ! Bozhe mol ! " 

And she tossed about on the bed. 

The doctors said that this was puerperal fever and 
that there was not one chance in a hundred of her liv- 
ing. All that day there was fever, with alleviations of 
delirium and unconsciousness. Toward midnight she 
lay unconscious and her heart had almost ceased to 
beat. 

The end was expected every moment. 

Vronsky went home, but he came back the next 
morning to learn how she was. Alekset Aleksandro- 
vitch came to meet him in the reception-room, and said 
to him, "Stay; perhaps she will ask for you." Then 
he himself took him to his wife's boudoir. In the morn- 
ing the restlessness, the rapidity of thought and speech, 
returned ; but soon unconsciousness intervened again. 
The third day was much the same, and the doctors be- 
gan ,to hope. On this day Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch 
went into the boudoir where Vronsky was, closed the 
door, and sat down in front of him. 

" Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch," said Vronsky, feeling 
that an explanation was at hand, " I cannot speak, I 
cannot think. Have pity on me ! Hard as it may be 
for you, believe me, it is still more terrible for me." 

He was going to rise; but Alekseif Aleksandrovitch 
prevented him, and said : — 

" Pray listen to me ; it is unavoidable. I am forced 
to explain to you the feelings that guide me, and will 
continue to guide me, that you may avoid making any 
mistake in regard to me. You know that I had decided 
on a divorce, and that I had taken the preliminary steps 



234 ANNA KARENINA 

to obtain one ? I will not deny that at first I was un- 
decided, I was in torment. I. confess that the desire to 
avenge myself on you and on her pursued me. When 
I received the telegram, and came home, I felt the 
same desire. I will say more; I wished for her death. 
But...." He was silent for a moment, considering 
whether he would wholly reveal his thoughts — "but I 
have seen her and I have forgiven her. The happiness 
T feel at being able to forgive clearly shows me my duty. 
I have absolutely forgiven her. I desire to offer the 
other cheek to the smiter; I wish to give my cloak to 
him who has, robbed me of my coat. I only ask one 
thing of God, — that He will not take away from me 
this joy of forgiving." 

Tears filled his eyes. Vronsky was amazed at the 
calm, luminous face. 

" This is my position. You may drag me in the mire, 
and make me the laughing-stock of creation ; but I will 
not give up Anna for that, nor will I utter a word of 
reproach to you," continued AlekseY Aleksandrovitch. 
" My duty seems clear and plain to me : I must remain 
with her ; I shall remain with her. If she wishes to 
see you, I shall inform you of it; but now I think it 
will be better for you to go away." 

He rose ; sobs choked his voice. Vronsky rose too, 
and, standing with bowed head and humble attitude, 
looked up at Karenin, without a word to say. He, was 
incapable of understanding AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's 
feelings ; but he felt that this was something too high 
for him,, something even unapproachable for a person 
who looked on the world as he did. 



CHAPTER XVIII 

After this conversation with AlekseY Aleksandrovitch 
Vronsky went out on the steps of the Karenin house 
and stopped, hardly knowing where he was and what 
he had to do. He felt humiliated, perplexed, and de- 
prived of all means of washing away his shame ; he 



ANNA KARENINA 235 

felt thrown out of the path where till now he had 
walked proudly and easily. All the rules which had 
been the guides of his life, and which he had believed 
irreproachable, proved false and untrue. The deceived 
husband, whom he had considered a melancholy char- 
acter, an accidental obstacle, at times absurd, happily 
for him had suddenly been raised by her to a height 
inspiring respect; and this husband on this height 
appeared not ugly, not false, not ridiculous, but good, 
grand, and generous. Vronsky could not understand 
it; their roles had suddenly been interchanged. He 
felt Karenin's grandeur and straightforwardness, and 
his own baseness and falsity. He felt that this husband 
was magnanimous in his grief, while he himself seemed 
little and miserable in his deception. But this con- 
sciousness of inferiority, in comparison to a man whom 
he had unjustly scorned, constituted only a small part 
of his grief. 

He felt profoundly unhappy from the fact that his 
passion for Anna, which of late had as it seemed to him 
grown cool, was more violent than ever now that he 
knew he was to lose her. During her illness he had 
seen her as she was, had learned to know her very soul, 
and it seemed to him that he had never really loved her 
till now. He must lose her just as he had come to 
know her and love her truly, — lose her, and be left 
with the most humiliating recollections. More horrible 
than anything else was his ridiculous and odious posi- 
tion when Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch had uncovered his 
face while he was hiding it in his hands. Standing 
motionless on the steps of the Karenin house, he seemed 
to be entirely unconscious of what he was doing. 

" Shall I call an izvoshchik ? " asked the Swiss. 

"Yes, an izvoshchik." 

When he reached home, after three sleepless nights, 
Vronsky, without undressing, threw himself down on a 
divan, folded his arms, and laid his head on them. His 
head was heavy. The strangest reminiscences, thoughts, 
and impressions succeeded one another in his mind with 
extraordinary rapidity and clearness. Now it was a 



236 ANNA KARENINA 

drink which he poured out and gave the invalid from 
a spoon; now. he saw the nurse's white hands, then 
AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's singular attitude as he knelt 
on the floor by the bed: 1 

" Sleep, and forget," he said to himself, with the 
calm resolution of a: man in good health who knows 
that when he feels tired he can sleep if he will. His 
ideas became confused ; he felt himself falling into the 
abyss of forgetfulness.~ The billows of the sea of uncon- 
scious life were 1 already beginning to swell over his 
head,. iw hen suddenly something like a violent electric 
shock passed through him. He started up so abruptly 
that his body bounded upon the springs of the divan; 
and he found himself in his terror on his knees. His 
eyes were as wide open as if he had not slept at all. 
The. heaviness of his head and the lassitude which he 
felt in all his members but a moment before had sud- 
denly vanished. 

";You may drag me in the mire." 
» These.words of AlekseY Aleksandrovitch rang in his 
ears., ; He , saw him standing before him; he saw, too, 
Anna's -feverish 'face, and her brilliant eyes looking 
.tenderly, not at him, but at AlekseY Aleksandrovitch ; 
he saw the stupid, ridiculous figure he must have pre- 
sented when Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch drew away his 
hands'from his face. Again he threw himself back on 
the divan, and closed his eyes. ■ 
-1 "Sleep, and forget/- he repeated to "himself. 
? riBut though his eyes were closed he saw clearer than 
ever Anna's face, just as it looked on that memorable 
evening of the races, i 

"It's impossible,, and, will not.be; how can she efface 
this from .-'her [memory? I cannot live without this! 
But how can we be reconciled ? how can we be recon- 
ciled?:"^ "J 

; He unconsciously pronounced these words aloud, and 
their mechanical repetition for some minutes prevented 
the recollections > and forms which besieged his brain 
from returning*. - But the repetition of the words did 
not' Jong deceive his imagination. Again, one after the 



ANNA KARENINA 137 

other with extraordinary swiftness, the sweet moments of 
the past and his recent humiliation began to arise in his 
mind. " Uncover his face," said Anna's' voice. He 
took away his hands, and realized how humiliated and 
ridiculous he must have appeared. 

He still lay there trying to sleep, though he felt that 
there was not the slightest hope of it, and repeating in 
a whisper some formula with the design of driving away 
the new and distressing hallucinations that kept arising. 
He listened to his own voice repeating, with a strange 
persistence : " You did ?iot knozv hozv to appreciate her % 
you did not know how to value her ; you did not know how 
to appreciate her t you did ?iot know how to value her." 

"What is going to happen to me? Am I going 
mad?" he asked himself. "Perhaps so. Why do peo- 
ple go mad ? and why do they commit suicide ? " 

And, while he was answering himself, he opened his 
eyes and was surprised to see at his head a cushion em- 
broidered by Varia, his brother's wife. . He lightly 
touched the tassel of the cushion and tried to fix the 
thoughtof Varia in his mind and how she looked the 
last time he saw her; but any idea foreign to r what tor- 
mented him was still more intolerable. 

"No,. I must sleep." He placed the cushion under 
his head, but it required an effort to keep his eyes 
closed. He leaped to his feet and sat down: "All is 
over with me ; what else can I do ? " And his imagina- 
tion vividly pictured what life without Anna would be. 

" Ambition ? SerpukhovskoX ? the world ? the court?" 
No more these had power to stop him. All this once 
had some meaning, but now it had none. He rose from 
the divan, took off his coat, loosened his necktie and 
bared his shaggy chest that he might breathe more 
freely, and began to stride up and down the room. 

"This makes people insane," he repeated; ".this 
causes suicide, .... to avoid disgrace," he added slowly. 

He went to the door and closed it ; then, with a look 
of determination, and with his teeth set, he went to the 
table, took his revolver, examined it, turned the loaded 
chamber round, and stopped to consider. He stood 



238 ANNA KARENINA 

motionless for two minutes, with the revolver in his 
hand, his head bowed in the attitude of intense thought. 
" Of course," he said to himself, as if a logical sequence 
6i clear and' exact ideas led him to this unquestionable 
decision ; but in reality this to him conclusive Of Course 
was only the consequence of a continued circle of recol- 
lections and impressions which he had gone over for the 
tenth time in the last hour. There were the same recol- 
lections of a happiness lost forever, the conception of 
the meaninglessness of all that was now before him in 
life, the same consciousness of his shame. There was 
the same repetition of these impressions and thoughts. 

" Of course," he repeated, when for the third time 
his mind directed itself to the same enchanted circle 
of thoughts and recollections; and holding the revol- 
ver to the left side of his breast, with an unflinching 
grip he pulled the trigger. He did not hear the sound 
of the report, but the violent blow that he received 
in the chest knockedhim over. He tried to save him* 
self by catching hold of the table ; he dropped his revol- 
ver, staggered, and fell on the floor, looking about him 
with astonishment* He could not recognize his room ; 
the twisted legs of the table, the waste-paper basket, 
the -tiger-skin^ on the floor, — all seemed strange to 
him. 

The quick'steps of his servant running to the draw- 
ing-room obliged him to get control of himself ; he col- 
lected his thoughts with an effort, and seeing that he 
was on the flodr, and that blood was on his hands and 
Cm the tiger-skin, he realized what he had done. 

"What stupidity 1 I missed my aim/' he muttered, 
feeling round for his pistol. It was quite near him, but 
he c6uld "not find it. As he continued to grope for it, 
he lost his balance, and fell again, bathed in his own 
btobd. 

His valet* an elegant person with side-whiskers, who 
complained freely to his friends about his delicate nerves, 
was so frightened at the sight of his master lying on the 
floor that he let him lie bleeding, and ran for help. 

In an hour Varia, Vronsky's sister-in-law, arrived, and 



ANNA KARENINA z 39 

with the assistance of the three doctors whom she sent 
for in all directions, and who all came at once, she suc- 
ceeded in putting the wounded man to bed, and estab- 
lished herself as his nurse. 



CHAPTER XIX 

Aleksei* Aleksandrovitch, when he prepared to see 
his wife again, had not foreseen the contingency of her 
repentance being genuine, and then of her recovery after 
she had obtained his pardon. This mistake appeared to 
him in all its seriousness two months after his return 
from Moscow ; but the mistake which he had made pro- 
ceeded not only from the fact that he had not foreseen 
this eventuality, but also from the fact that not until the 
day when he looked on his dying wife had he understood 
his own heart. Beside the bed of his dying wife, he had 
given way, for the first time in his life, to that feeling of 
sympathy for the griefs of others, against which he had 
always fought as one fights against a dangerous weak- 
ness. His pity for her and remorse at having wished 
for her death, but above all the joy of forgiving, had 
made him suddenly feel, not only a complete alleviation 
of his sufferings, but also a spiritual calmness sueh as he 
had never before experienced. He suddenly felt that 
the very thing that had been a source of anguish was 
now the source of his spiritual joy ; what had seemed 
insoluble when he was filled with hatred and anger, 
became clear and simple now that he loved and for- 
gave. 

He had pardoned his wife, and he pitied her .because 
of her suffering and repentance. He had forgiven Vron- 
sky, and pitied him too, especially after he heard of -his 
desperate act. He also pitied his son more than before, 
because he felt that he had neglected him. But what he 
felt for the new-born child was more than pity, it was 
almost tenderness. At first, solely from a feeling of pity, 
he looked after this little new-born girl, who was not his 
daughter, and who was so neglected during her mother's 



2 4 o ANNA KARENINA 

illness that she would have surely died if he had not 
taken her in charge ; and, before he was aware of it, he 
became attached to her. He would go several times a 
day into the nursery, and sit there, so that the wet-nurse 
and the bonne> though they were a little intimidated at 
first, gradually became accustomed to his presence. He 
stayed sometimes for half an hour, silently gazing at the 
saffron-red, wrinkled, downy face of the sleeping child, 
following her motions as she scowled, and puckered her 
lips, watching her rub her eyes with the back of her little 
hands, curling up her round fingers. And at these mo- 
ments especially, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch felt calm and 
at peace with himself, seeing nothing abnormal in his 
situation, nothing that he felt the need of changing. 

However, as time went on, he felt more and more that 
he would not be permitted to remain in this, situation, 
however natural it seemed to him, and that nobody would 
allow it. 

He felt that, besides the holy and spiritual force 
that guided his soul, there was another force, brutal, 
equally if not more powerful, which directed his life, 
and that this power would not give him the peace that 
he desired. He felt that every one was looking at him, 
and questioning his attitude, not understanding it, and 
expecting him to do. something. Especially he felt the 
unnaturalness and constraint of his relations with his 
wife. 

When the tenderness which she felt at the expecta- 
tion of death had passed away, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch 
began to notice how Anna feared him, how she dreaded 
his presence, and did not dare to look him in the face ; 
she seemed to be always pursued by a thought she dared 
not express, — and as if she had a presentiment that 
their present relations could not last ; she, too, expected 
some move from her husband. 

Toward the end of February, the little girl, who had 
been named Anna for her mother, was taken ill. In the 
morning Alekse'i Aleksandrovitch had seen her in the 
nursery, and, after he had left orders about calling 
the doctor he went to the ministry meeting. Having 



ANNA KARENINA 241 

transacted his business he returned at four o'clock; as 
he entered the anteroom, he noticed an Adonis of a 
lackey, in livery and bearskin cloak, holding a" white 
rotonda, or mantle, lined with American fox. 

" Who is here ? " he asked. 

"The Princess Yelizavyeta Feodorovna Tverskaya," 
replied the lackey, with a smile, as it seemed to Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch. 

All through this painful period Alekse'f Aleksandro- 
vitch noticed that his society friends, especially the 
women, showed a very marked interest in him and in 
his wife. He noticed in them all that veiled look of 
amusement which he saw in the lawyer's eyes, and which 
he now saw in the lackey's. They all seemed delighted, 
as if they were going to a wedding. When people met 
him, and inquired after his health, they did so with this 
same half-concealed hilarity. 

The presence of the Princess Tverskaya was not agree- 
able to Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, both because he had 
never liked her, and because she called up unpleasant 
memories, and so he went directly to the nursery. 

In the first room, Serozha, leaning on a table, with 
his feet in a chair, was drawing, and chattering merrily. 
The English governess, who had replaced the French 
woman soon after Anna's illness, was sitting near the 
child, with her fancy work in her hand ; she rose, made 
a courtesy, and put Serozha's feet down. 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch smoothed his son's hair, an- 
swered the governess's questions about his wife's health, 
and asked what the doctor said about baby, 

"The doctor said that it was "nothing serious. He 
ordered baths, sir." 

" She is still in pain, nevertheless," said Alekse'f Alek- 
sandrovitch, hearing the child cry in the next room. 

" I believe, sir, that the wet-nurse does not- suit her," 
replied the Englishwoman, decidedly. 

"What makes you think so ? " he asked, as he paused 

on his way. j 

*" It was the same at the Countess Pahl's, sir. They 

dosed the child with medicine, while it was merely suf- 

vol. 11. — 16 



242 ANNA KARENINA 

fering from hunger, sir. The wet-nurse had not enough 
milk for it*? 

Aleksef Aleksandrovitch considered for a few mo- 
ments, and then went into the adjoining room. The 
child was crying as she lay in her nurse's arms, with her 
head thrown back, refusing the full breast that was of- 
fered her, and screamed, without yielding to the blandish- 
ments of the two women bending over her. 
i/* Is n't she any better ?" asked AlekseY Aleksandro- 
vitch. 

" She is very worrisome," replied the old nurse, in a 
whisper. 

." Miss - Edwards says that perhaps the nurse, has n't 
enough milk for her," said he. * i 

" I think so too, Aleksef Aleksandrovitch." 

" Why have n't you said so ? " 

" Whom should I say it to ? ' Anna Arkadyevna is 
still ill/'* replied the old nurse, discontentedly, 
i) The old nurse had been in the family a long time, and 
these simple words struck Aleksel Aleksandrovitch as 
an allusion to his position. 

The child- cried harder and harder, losing its breath, 
and becoming hoarse. The old nurse threw up her hands 
in despair,, took the little one from the wet-nurse, and 
rocked hex as she walked back and forth. 
- U You must ask the doctor to examine the wet-nurse," 
said Alekseif Aleksandrovitch: 

i The wet-nurse, a healthy-looking woman of fine ap- 
pearance,, sprucely dressed, who was afraid of losing her 
position, muttered to herself, as she fastened her dress 
over her: great bosom*, smiling scornfully at the doubt 
of her not having enough nourishment. In her smile 
Aleksel Aleksandrovitch also detected ridicule of his 
position. 

" Poor little thing ! " said the old nurse, trying to hush 
the child and still walking back and forth. 

Aleksel Aleksandrovitch sat down in a chair, sad and 
crestfallen, and followed the old nurse with his eyes as 
she walked up and down with the child. When at last 
she had pacified it and placed it in the cradle, and, hav- 



ANNA KARENINA 243 

ing arranged the little pillow, had moved away, AlekseT 
Aleksandrovitch rose, and went up to it on tiptoe. For 
a moment he was silent, and looked with melancholy face 
at the little thing. But suddenly a smile which moved 
his hair and the skin on his forehead spread over his face, 
and he quietly left the room. 

He went into the dining-room, rang the bell, and or- 
dered the servant that answered it to send for the doc- 
tor again. He was displeased because his wife seemed 
to take so little interest in this charming baby, and in 
this state of annoyance he wished neither to go to her 
room, nor to meet the Princess Betsy ; but his wife might 
wonder why he did not come as usual ; he crushed down 
his feelings and went to her chamber. As he walked 
along toward the door on a thick carpet, he unintention- 
ally overheard a conversation which he would not have 
cared to hear. 

"If he were not going away, I should understand 
your refusal, and his also. But your husband ought to 
be above that/' said Betsy, 

" It is not for my husband's sake, but my own, that I 
don't wish it. So say nothing more about it," replied 
Anna's agitated voice. 

" Yes, but you can't help wanting to say good-by to 
the man who shot himself on your account," .... 

"That is the very reason I do not wish to see him 
again." 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, with an expression of fear 
and guilt, stopped, and started to go away without being 
heard ; but, considering that this would lack dignity, he 
turned round again, and, coughing, went toward the 
chamber. The voices were hushed, and he went into 
the room. 

Anna, in a gray khalat, with her thick dark hair cut 
short on her round head, was sitting in a reclining-chair. 
All her animation disappeared, as usual, at the sight of 
her husband ; she bowed her head, and glanced uneasily 
at Betsy, Betsy, dressed in the latest fashion, with a 
little hat perched on the top of her head, like a cap over 
a lamp, in a dove-colored gown, trimmed with bright-col- 



244 ANNA KARENINA 

ored bands on the waist on one side, and on the skirt 
on the other; was sitting beside Anna. She sat up as 
straight' as possible, and welcomed Aleksei Aleksandro- 
vitch with a nod and a sarcastic smile. 

"Ah!" she began, affecting surprise, "I am delighted 
to meet you at home. You never show yourself any- 
where, and I haven't seen you since Anna was taken 
ill. I learned of your "anxiety from others. Indeed ! you 
are a wonderful husband ! " said she, with a significant 
and flattering look, as much as to say that she conferred 
on him the "order" of magnanimity on account of his 
behavior toward his wife. 

Alekse'r Aleksandrovitch bowed coldly, and, kissing 
his wife's hand, inquired how she was. 

" Better, I think," she replied, avoiding his look. T 

" However, your face has a feverish look," he said, 
emphasizing the word "feverish." 

"We have talked too much," said Betsy. "It was 
selfish on my part, and I am going now." 

She rose ; but Anna, suddenly flushing, seized her 
quickly by the arm. 

" No, stay, I beg of. you. I must tell you, .... no, you," 
she addressed Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, while the color 
increased on her neck and brow. "I cannot, nor do I 
wish to, hide" anything from you," said she. 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch cracked his knuckles and 
bent his head. 

" Betsy has told me that Count Vronsky wishes to 
come to our house to say good-by before he goes to 
Tashkend." 

She did not look at her husband, and she evidently 
was in haste to get through with it, however hard it 
might be. " I have said that I could not receive 
him.". . 

"You said, my dear, that it would depend on AlekseY 
Aleksandrovitch," corrected Betsy. 

"Yes! No, I cannot see him, and it would not do 
any...." she stopped suddenly, and looked inquiringly 
at her husband's face ] he was not looking at her. " In 
short, I do not wish .... " 



ANNA KARENINA 245 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch approached, and wanted to 
take her hand. 

Anna's first impulse was to withdraw her hand from 
her husband's clammy hand with its big, swollen veins ; 
but she evidently controlled herself, and pressed it. 

" I am very grateful to you for your confidence, but 
.... " he began, then stopped, awkward and annoyed, 
feeling that what he could easily and clearly decide 
when by himself, he could not settle in the presence of 
the Princess Tverskaya, who was the incarnation of that 
brutal force which he had to take as the guide of his 
life in the eyes of the world, and obliged him to re- 
nounce his feelings of love and forgiveness. He stopped 
as he looked at the Princess Tverskaya. 

"Well, good-by, my treasure," said Betsy, rising. 
She kissed Anna, and went out. Karenin accompanied 
her. 

" Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, I know that you are an 
extraordinarily magnanimous man," said Betsy, stopping 
in the middle of the boudoir to press his hand again with 
unusual fervor; "I am a stranger, and I love her so 
much, and esteem you so highly, that I take the liberty 
of giving you a bit of advice. Let him come. Alekse'f 
Vronsky is the personification of honor, and he. is going 
to Tashkend." 

" I thank, you for your sympathy and your advice, 
princess ; but the question whether my wife can or can- 
not receive anybody is for her to decide." 

He spoke these words with dignity, raising his eye- 
brows as usual; but he felt at once that, whatever his 
words had been, dignity was inconsistent with the situ- 
ation. The sarcastic and wicked smile with which 
Betsy greeted his remark proved it beyond a doubt. 



CHAPTER XX 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch took leave of Betsy in 
the " hall " and returned to his wife ; she was lying 
down, but, hearing her husband's steps, she sat up 



246 ANNA KARENINA 

quickly in her former position, and- looked at him in a 
frightened way. He saw that she had been crying. 
.& " I am very grateful to you for your confidence in 
me," said he, gently ^ repeating in Russian the remark 
that he had just made in French before Betsy. 
-When he spoke to her in Russian, and used the 
familiar second person singular tmi\ this tut irritated 
Anna in spite of herself. " I am very gratefulfor your 
decision; for I agree with you that, since Count Vronsky 
is going away, there is no necessity of his coming here ; 
besides ..;. " 

"Yes! but as I have said that, why repeat it?" in- 
terrupted Anna, with an annoyance which she could not 
control. "No necessity," she thought, "for a man to 
say farewell to the woman he loves, for whom he has 
wished to commit suicide, and who cannot live without 
him ! " 

She pressed her lips together, and fixed her flashing 
eyes on her husband's hands with their swollen veins, 
as he stood slowly rubbing them together. 
< "We will not say any more about that," she added, 
more calmly. 

"I have r given you perfect freedom to decide this 
question, and I am happy to see.... " AlekseX Aleksan- 
drovitch began again. 

"That' my desires are' in conformity with yours," 
finished Anna ? quickly, exasperated to hear him speak 
so slowly, when she knew beforehand what he was 
going to say. 

"^Yes," he affirmed; "and the Princess Tverskaya 
shows very poor taste to meddle in family affairs, she 
of all others.".... 

" Fclon't believe what they, say about her," said Anna. 
" I only know that she loves 'me sincerely." 

Aleksel Aleksandrovitch sighed, and was silent. Anna 
played nervously with the tassels' of her khalat, and 
looked at him now and then, with that feeling of physi- 
cal repulsion which she reproached herself for, without 
being able to overcome. All that she wished for at this 
moment was to be rid of his distasteful presence. 



ANNA KARENINA 247 

"Ah! I have just sent for the doctor," said Aleksel 
Aleksandrovitch. 1 

"What for? I am well." 

" For the baby, the little one cries so much ; they think 
that the nurse has n't enough nourishment for her." 

" Why did n't you let me nurse her, when I urged it so ? 
All the same" (Aleksei Aleksandrovitch understood 
what she meant by all the same), " she is a baby, and 
they will kill her." She rang, and sent for the little one. 
" I wanted to nurse her, and you would n't let me, and 
now you blame me." 

" I do not blame you for anything*" .... 

"Yes, you do blame me! Bozhe moi! why didn't I 
die ! " She began to sob. " Forgive me : I am nervous 
and unjust,", she said, trying to control herself. "But 
go away." 

" No, this state of things cannot go on," said Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch to himself, as he left his wife's room. 

Never before had he been so convinced, of the im- 
possibility of prolonging such a situation before the 
world: never had his wife's dislike of him, and the 
strength of that mysterious brutal force which had taken 
possession of his life, to rule it contrary to the needs of 
his soul and to make him change his relations to his wife, 
appeared to him with such clearness. 

He saw clearly that the world and his wife exacted 
something from him which he did not fully understand. 
He. felt that it aroused within him feelings of hatred, 
which disturbed his peace, and destroyed the worth of 
his victory. over himself. Anna, in his opinion, ought 
to have nothing more to do with Vronsky ; but if every- 
body considered this impossible, he was ready to tolerate 
their meeting, on condition that the children should not 
be disgraced, or his own life disturbed. 

Wretched as this was 1 — it was,- nevertheless, better 
than a rupture whereby she would be placed in a shame- 
ful and hopeless position, and he himself would be de- 
prived of all that he loved. But he felt his powerlessness 
in this struggle, and knew beforehand that all were 
against him and that he would be prevented from doing 



248 ANNA KARENINA 

what seemed to him wise and good, and that he would 
be obliged to do what was bad, but necessary to be 
done. 

CHAPTER XXI 

Betsy had not left the " hall " when Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch appeared on the threshold. He had come from 
Eliseyef's, where they had just received fresh oysters. 

" Ah, princess ! t you here ? What a fortunate meeting ! 
I have just been at your house." 

"The meeting is but for a moment; I am going," 
replied Betsy, smiling, as she buttoned her gloves. 

"Wait just a moment, princess ; allow me to kiss your 
little hand before you put on your glove. Nothing 
pleases me so much, in returning to ancient ways, as 
the custom of kissing a lady's hand." 

He kissed Betsy's hand. 

" When shall we meet again?" 

"You don't deserve to see me," replied Betsy, laughing, 

" Oh, yes, I do ! for I have become a very serious man. 
I regulate not only my own family affairs, but also other 
people's," said he, with a significant expression in his 
face. 

"Ah! I' am delighted to hear it," replied Betsy, 
instantly knowing that he referred to Anna. 

Going back into the " hall," they stood in a corner. 

" He is killing her," she whispered, with conviction. 
" It is impossible, impossible...." 

" I am very glad that you think so," replied Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, shaking his head with sympathetic com- 
miseration. "That is why I am in Petersburg." 

" The whole town are talking about it," said she ; " this 
situation is intolerable. She is fading away before our 
veryeyes. He doesn't understand that she is one of 
those women whose feelings cannot be treated lightly. 
One of two things, — either he ought to take her away, 
and act decidedly, or else be divorced. But this is kill- 
ing her." 

"Yes, yes.... exactly...." said Oblonsky, with a sigh. 



ANNA KARENINA 249 

? I have come for that ; that is to say, not entirely for 
that.... I have just been made chamberlain, so I had to 
show my gratitude; but the main thing was to arrange 
this matter.'' t 

" Well! may the Lord help you! " said Betsy. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch accompanied the Princess Betsy 
to the door, once more kissed her wrist just above her 
glove, where the pulse beats, and after paying her such an 
impudent compliment that she did not know whether 
to laugh or take offense, he left her to go to his sister. 
He found her in tears: 

In spite of the exuberance of his lively spirits, Stepan 
Arkadyevitch fell instantly- and with perfect genuineness 
into the tone of sympathetic and poetical tenderness 
which suited his sister's frame of mind. He asked how 
she felt, and how she had passed the day. ' r 

" Wretchedly, very wretchedly ! Night and day, the 
future and the past, all .../wretched," she replied. 

" It seems to me, you have yielded to the blues. You 
must have courage'; look life in the face. It is hard, I 
know, but...." 

" I have heard that some women love men for their 
very vices," began Anna/ suddenly ; "but I hate him 
for his virtue. I cannot live with him. Understand 
me, the sight of him has a physical effect on me which 
drives me out of my mind. 1 P cannot, cannot live with: 
him ! What shall I do ? ' I have been unhappy before, 
and I thought it impossible to be more so, but this horrible 
state of things surpasses all that I could have imagined. 
Can you believe that, though I .know how good and per- 
fect he is, and how unworthy of him I am, still I hate 
him ! I hate him for his magnanimity. There is abso- 
lutely nothing left for. me but to ...." 

She was going to add " die," but Stepan Arkadyevitch 
did not let her finish. > 

" You are ill and nervous, believe me ; you exagger- 
ate everything. There is really nothing so very ter- 
rible." 

And Stepan Arkadyevitch smiled. *No one except 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, meeting such despair, would have' 



250 ANNA KARENINA 

ventured to srtrile, —for it would have seemed rude, — but 
his smile was so full of kindness, and an almost effemi- 
nate sweetness, that, instead of irritating, it was calm- 
ing and soothing ; his gentle soothing words and smile 
acted like oil of sweet almonds. Anna at once felt the 
effect. . 

"No, Stiva," said she, "I am lost, lost! worse than 
lost. And yet, I am not yet lost: I cannot still say 
that all is over ; on the contrary, I feel that all is not yet 
over: . I seem like a cord too tightly stretched, which 
must break. But the end has not yet come, and it will 
be terrible.- -,.st % i 

"•No, no ; the cord can be carefully unstrung. There 
is no difficulty without some way out of it." 
1 " I have thought it over, and thought it over, and I 
see only one...." 

r rAgaih he saw by her look of dismay that the one way 
that she -meant was deaths and again he did not allow 
her to finish. 

" No, listen to me ; you cannot judge of your position 
so well as I. Let me tell you frankly my opinion." He 
smiled" again cautiously, with his almond-oily smile. " I 
will begirt at th6 beginning ; you married a man twenty 
years older than yourself, and you married without love, 
-r^or, atfleast, without knowing what love was. It was 
a mistake-^ as well admit it." 
r " A terrible mistake ! " said Alma. 

'f.But,- I repeat it, it was an accomplished fact. You 
then had, let us say, the misfortune to fall in love *— ■■ not 
with your husband; that was a misfortune, but that, too, 
was ail accomplished fact. Your husband knew it, and 
forgave it" After each sentence he stopped, as if to 
give her time to reply, but she said nothing. "Now, 
thequestiofiis, can you continue 'to live with your hus- 
band ? do you wish it ? does he wish it ? " 

";£ knownothing about it, nothing." 

>" But you yourself have just said that you could no 
longer endure him." 

"No, I did not say so- I deny.it I know nothing, 
I understand nothirigi" ; r 



ANNA KARENINA 251 

"Yes ! but allow me ...." hi 

'* You cannot understand it. I feel that I am precipe 
tated, head first, into an abyss, and I may not save my* 
self. I cannot." 

" You will see that we can prevent you from falling, 
and from being crushed. I understand you.- I, feel that 
you are not able to express your feelings, your desires." 

,"I desire nothing, nothing- — only r to end all this." 

" He sees this, and knows it. Do you suppose that 
he does n't feel * the strain as much as. you do ? You 
suffer, he suffers ; and what way of escape is there 
from all this torture? Then, when .. a p divorce would 
settle everything...." , 

Stepan Arkadyevitch with difficulty expressed his 
principal idea, and looked to Anna to r see what effect it 
would have. , 

She said nothing and shook her head disapprovingly. 
But by the expression of her face, which suddenly lighted 
up with something .of her former beauty, he saw that, if 
she did not wish this; it was because the thought of its 
being realized was too enticing. 

" I am awfully sorry for you ! how happy I should be 
if I could arrange it for you ! " said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch. " Don't say a word ! If God will only pertfiit 
me to express all that I feel ! I am going to find Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch." 

Anna looked at him ( out of her brilliant, thoughtful 
eyes, and did not reply. 



CHAPTER XXII 

Stepan Arkadyevitch went, into his brother-in-law's 
cabinet, with the solemn face which he tried to assume 
when he sat in his official chair at a council-meeting. 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, with his arms behind his back, 
was walking up and down' the rpom, considering the 
same thing that Stepan Arkadyevitch had been' discuss- 
ing with his wife. 

" Shall I disturb you ? " asked Stepan Arkadyevitch, 



25:2 ANNA KARENINA 

suddenly feeling an unwonted embarrassment. In order 

t6 conceal his embarrassment, he took a new cigar-case 

out of" his pocket, smelt < of the leather, and took out a 

cigarette. 

tV'iNo. Db you wish' to see me?" asked Alekse'i 

Aleksandrovitch, -reluctantly. 1 «V 

"Yes.... I would like.... I, must.... yes, I must have a 
talk with you," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, surprised at 
his confusion. * •' « * .3i «■ • 

This feeling was so "strange and unexpected to him, 
that-he-did not recognize in it the voice of conscience, 
warning him that what he hoped to do was evil. He 
recovered himself with an effort, and conquered the 
weakness which took possession of him. 
f J'l'^hope' that you believe hv my love for rriy sister, 
and in my sincere sympathy and regard for you," said 
he,- and his face grew red. 

Alefeset Aleksandrovitch listened, and made no reply ; 
but his face struck Stepan Arkadyevitch by its expres- 
sion' of humility and pain. 

" I intended, I came on purpose, to speak with you 
about my lister, and the situation in which you and she 
are'placed," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, still struggling 
with his unusual embarrassment. 

^AlekseT' Aleksandrovitch smiled sadly, looked at his 
brother-in-law, and, without replying, went to the table, 
took up ; a half- written letter, and handed it to him. 

" I can think of nothing else. This is what I began 
to write, thinking that I could express myself better in 
a letter, for my presence irritates her," said he, giving 
him the letter. IIXX 

Stepan Arkadyevitch took the paper, and looked with 

perplexity 'and surprise at. his brother-in-law's dull eyes, 

whichiwere fixed on him ; then he read : — 

ij f jfr- ' Jr 

< Isee that my presence is disagreeable to you ; painful as 

it is for : me to recognize.it, I know that it is so, and it cannot 

be ^ otherwise.' I d6 not. blame you. God knows that, during 

your illness, I resolved to forget the past, and to begin a new 

life., I am nof sorry, I never shall be sorry, for what I did then. 

I desired only one thing, — your salvation, the salvation of your 



ANNA KARENINA 253 

soul, and now I see that I have not succeeded. Tell me 
yourself, what will give you true peace and happiness, and I 
will submit to whatever you may deem just and right. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch gave the letter back to his 
brother-in-law ; and with the same perplexity, he simply 
stared at his brother-in-law, not knowing what to say. 
This silence was so uncomfortable to both that Stepan 
Arkadyevitch's lips trembled convulsively, while he did 
not take his eyes from Karenin's face^ 

"That is what I wanted to- say to her," said Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch, turning away. 

"Yes, yes," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, but he could 
not go on, the tears so choked his utterance. "Yes, 
yes, I understand you." 

" I should like to know what she wishes," said he, at 
last. 

" I am afraid that she herself does not realize her 
own situation. She is not a judge of the matter," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, trying to recover himself. " She 
is crushed, literally crushed, by your magnanimity ; if 
she should read your letter, she would be unable to say 
a word, and could only bow her head still lower." * 

" Yes ! But what is to be done in such a case ? How 
can it be settled ? How can I know what she wishes ? n 

" If you will allow me to express my opinion, I think 
it is for you to state clearly what measure you believe 
necessary to put an end to this situation at once." 

"Consequently, you think it ought to be ended at 
once?" interrupted Aleksei Aleksandrovitch. "But 
how ? " he added, passing the back of his hand over his 
eyes in an unusual way. * " I see no possible way out 
of it ! " 

"There is a way out of every difficulty, however 
serious it may be," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, rising, arid 
growing more animated. "There was a time when you 
wished for a divorce .... if you are convinced now that 
you can never be happy together again .... " 

" Happiness may be understood in different ways. 
Let us grant that I agree to everything, that I have no 



w» 



ANNA KARENINA 



wishes in the matter, what escape is there from oui 
Situation ?- :r 

"If you wish for my advice," said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch-, with the same smooth, almond-oily, affectionate 
smil$ with which he h&d spoken to his sister ; and this 
sinile was so' persuasive j that AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, 
giving himself up to the, weakness, which overpowered 
Jnm^;was involuntarily inclined to believe what his 
brother-in-law sai<J. i -; ,r ".She will never say what, her 
wishes are. But there is -ope thing possible, one" thing 
tj^af she:may. : hope* for/' continued Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, "and that is to break ,the 'bonds which are only 
the cause of ( cruel recollections. In my opinion, it is 
inolispensabjq ,to put your relations on an entirely new 
tooting, and that can only be done by both of you re- 
suming your fr^edpm/l : 

" Divorce ! " interrupted Aleksef Aleksandrovitch, 
with-disgu^t;,;, 

, - n; " Yes, I suppose that divorce .... yes, divorce," repeated 
Stepan Arkady evi^h, blushing, "Taking everything 
into consideration, that is the most sensible course when 
twp married people find themselves in such a situation 
as yours. , What is to be, done, when husband and wife 
fjncj jthat, Hying, together is impossible ? This can always 
be -brought , about." 

; j r ^Vieksejf ^l^ksandrovitch drew a deep sigh, and cov- 
ered his^yes. ItI 

"There is only one consideration, — whether one of 
the parties wishes to, m^rry ; again. Jf\not, it is very 
simple," continued Stepan Arkadyevitch, .recovering 
more an4 ; mpre frqnvhis, feeling of constraint. 

Aleksei%41eksan4rpvitch, with, his face , distorted by 
emotion, muttered something to himself, but made no 
reply. Wh^t seerned.so simple to < Oblons.ky, he had 
turned over a thousand thousand timesin his mind, and, 
instead of finding it very easy, found it utterly impossible. 
Now that t]ie conditions for divorce were known to him, 
it seemed to him impossible, because the sense of his 
personal dignity, as well as his respect for r religion, pre- 
vented him from confessing to a fictitious accusation of 



ANNA KARENINA 255 

adultery and still less permitting his wife, .whom he had 
once pardoned and still loved, to be disgraced and put 
to shame. Divorce seemed impossible from still other 
and even more important reasons. 

What would become of their son ? To leave him 
with his mother was impossible. The divorced mother 
would .have her own illegitimate family, in which the 
child's position and training would be wretched. ' Should 
he keep the child for himself ? But he knew that would 
be an act of vengeance, and vengeance he did not want 

But, above all, what made divorce impossible in his 
eyes was the thought that, in consenting to it, he him- 
self would contribute to Anna's destruction^ The words 
spoken by Darya Aleksandrovna, when he was in Mos- 
cow, remained graven in his heart, that in getting a 
divorce, he was thinking only of himself, and forgetting 
that it would be her irretrievable ruin. These words, 
now that he had forgiven her and had become attached to 
the children, had a very significant meaning to him. 
To consent to a divorce, to give Anna -her liberty, was 
to cut away the last tie that bound himself to life, to 
her children whom he loved, and was to take away her 
last help in the way of salvation, and to push her over 
the precipice. 

If she became a divorced woman, he knew very well 
that she would be united to Vronsky, and such a bond 
would be criminal and illegal ; because a woman, ac- 
cording to the laws of the Church, cannot enter into a 
Second marriage during the lifetime of her husband. 

" And who knows but, after a year or two, either he 
might abandon her, or she might form a new liaison ? " 
thought AlekseY Aleksandrovitch ; "and I,- having 
allowed an illegal divorce, should be responsible for her 
fall." y > »■- 

He had gone over all this a hundred times, and was 
convinced that divorce was not by any means so simple 
as his brother-in-law would make it out ; that it Was 
wholly impossible. 

He did not admit a word of what Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch said; he had a thousand arguments to Hfute sUch 



256 ANNA KARENINA 

reasoning ; and, notwithstanding this, he listened, feel- 
ing that his words were the manifestation of that irre- 
sistible force which ruled his life, and to which he would 
finally submit. 

"The only question is, how, on what conditions, you 
will consent to a divorce ; for she will never dare to ask 
anything of you, and will give herself up entirely to your 
magnanimity." 

V My God ! my God ! why has this come upon me ? " 
thought Aleksef Aleksandrovitch ; and, as he remem- 
bered the condition of divorce in which the husband 
assumed the blame, from shame he buried his face in 
his hands, as Vronsky had done. 

" You are distressed ; I understand it ; but if you will 
consider ...." 

" ' Whosoever smiteth thee on the right cheek, turn 
to him the other also ; and if any man would take away 
thy coat, let him have thy cloak also,' " thought Aleksef 
Aleksandrovitch. — "Yes, yes!" he cried, in his piping 
voice. " I will take all the shame upon myself ; I will 

even' give up my son But will it not be better to leave 

all that ? However, do as you please." .... 

Arid turning away from his brother-in-law, that he 
might not see his face, he sat down near the window. 
He was grieved ; he was ashamed ; but with this grief 
and shame he felt a sense of happiness and emotion in 
the consciousness of his own humility. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch was touched.- 

"Aleksef Aleksandrovitch, be assured that she will 
appreciate your generosity," said he, after a pause. " It 
is, without doubt, the will of God," he added ; but he 
felt,- as soon as the words were out of his mouth, what a 
foolish remark it was, and he could hardly restrain a 
smile at his own foolishness. 

Aleksel Aleksandrovitch would have replied, but 
tears prevented him. 

"This trial comes by fate, and it must be accepted. 
I accept it as an accomplished fact, and I will try to 
help you and her," said Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

When Stepan Arkadyevitch left his brother-in-law's 



ANNA KARENINA 257 

cabinet, he was touched; but .this fact did not prevent 
him from being delighted at having settled this matter ; 
for he was certain that AlekseT Aleksandrovitch .would 
not go back on his word. His satisfaction suggested a 
conundrum which he could ask his wife and intimate, 
friends : — 

"What is.the difference between me and a field-mar- 
shal ? The field-marshal makes divorces, and nobody is 
the better for' it; while I make divorces, and three "peo- 
ple are better off Or, rather, what resemblance is 

there between me and a field-marshal? Where ....but 
by and by I '11 improve on it," he said to himself with a 
smile. 



CHAPTER XXIII 

Vronsky's wound was dangerous, although it. did not 
reach the heart. He hung for several days between life 
and death. When for the first time, he was in a condi- 
tion to talk, only Varia, his brother's wife, was in his 
room. 

"Varia!" said he, looking at her ;gravely, "I shot 
myself accidentally. Now please never speak to. me 
about this, but tell every one so ; otherwise it will seem 
too stupid ! " 

Varia bent- over him without replying, examining' his 
face with a happy smile. His eyes were bright, but no 
longer feverish, but their expression was stern. 

" Well ! Thank the Lord ! " she replied. " Are you 
suffering ? " 

" A little on this side," said he, pointing to his .chest: 

" Let me change the dressing, then." 

Squinting, he silently watched her change it, and 
when she had finished, he said : — - 

" I am not delirious now. See to it, I beg of you, 
that nobody says that I shot myself intentionally." 

" Nobody §ays so. . I hope, however, that after this 
you. will not shoot yourself accidentally again/' she said 
with a questioning smile. . s 

vol. 11. — 17 



158 ANNA KARENINA 

"Probably I shall not; but it would have been 
better ...." 

And he smiled gloomily. 

In spite of these words and this smile which 'so 
alarmed Varia, when the inflammation had subsided 
and he began to recover, he felt that he was free from 
a part of his misfortunes. By his action 'he had washed 
away, as it Were, his Shame and humiliation, which had 
weighed on him before. Henceforth he could' think 
calmly of Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch. He recognized all 
his magnanimity without being crushed by it. Besides, 
he-was able to be himself again, to look people in the 
face, and could live, governing himself by his customary 
habits. What he could not tear from his heart, in spite 
of all his efforts, was the regret, bordering on despair, 
at having lost Annd. forever; since he was firmly re- 
solved, now that he had redeemed his fault toward 
Karenify riOt to place himself between the repentant 
wife and her husband. But he Could not put out of his 
heart the regret at the loss of her love; he could not 
blot out the memory of happy moments which he had 
spent with her, and not half appreciated till now, -and 
which pursued him continually in all their fascina- 
tion. * 

SerpiikhovskoT thought of sending him to Tashkend, 
and Vronsky accepted the proposition without the least 
hesitation. But the . nearer the time for his leaving 
came, the more cruel seemed the sacrifice to what he 
considered his duty. 

His wound was healed^ and he had already gone Out 
and was engaged in making his preparations for his 
journey to 'Tashkend; ' - . 

"To see her once more, arid then bury myself ahd 
die," lie 'thought; and while paying his farewell visit 
to Betsy, he expressed his wish to her. 

The latter set out at once as an ambassador to Anna, 
but brought back her refusal. 

^ "So much the better,'* thought Vronsky, on receiving 
her reply; "this is a weakness which would have cosC 
me my last strength/' 

I II 7 



ANNA KAREN1NA 259 

The next morning Betsy herself went to Vrorisky, 
announcing that she had had, through Oblonsky/ posi- 
tive information that Aleksex Aleksandrovitch consented 
to a divorce, and that consequently Vronfcky might see 
Anna. 

Without even pausing to 'show Betsy from hfc room, 
forgetting his resolutions, without finding out when he 
could see her, or where her husband would be, Vronsky 
immediately went to the Karenins'. He flew tip the 
steps, not seeing anything or any one, and with hasty 
steps, almost running, entered Anna'3 room, and, with- 
out even noticing whether there might not be some one 
else in the room, he took her in his arms, and began 
covering her hands, her face, and her neck with kisses. 

Anna was prepared to see him again, and had made 
up her mind what to say to him ; but she had no time 
to speak Vronsky's passion overpowered her. Stfe" 
wanted to calm him, to calm herself, but it was already 
too late. Her lips trembled so that for a long time she 
was unable to speak a word. 

"Yes, you have conquered me; I am yours!" she 
succeeded in saying at last, pressing his hand to her 
breast. 

" So it had to be ! " said he, " and as long as we live, 
it must be so ; I know it now." { * 

" It is true," she replied, growing paleV and 'paler as 
she put her arms around Vronsky's neck, " However^ 
there is something terrible in this after what has hap- 
pened." 

"All that will be c forgotten, forgotten ; we shall be so 
happy ! If there were any need of our love increasing, 
it would increase, because there is something terrible 
about it," said he, raising his head, and displaying his 
strong teeth as he smiled. 

She could only reply with a smile, — not with words, 
— with her eyes which expressed such love for him. 

" I do know you with your short hair. You are lovely 
so ! Just like a little boy ! But how pale you are ! " 

"Yes; I am still very weak," she replied, smiling; 
and her lips began to tremble again. 



260 ANNA KARENINA 

"We will go to Italy; you will grow strong there," 
said he. , / 

"Is it possible that we could be like husband and 
wife, alone, by ourselves?" said she, looking him in the 
eye. 

"I am only surprised at one thing,* — that it has not 
always been so." 

" Stiva says that he will consent to everything, but I 
will not accept his generosity," said she, looking thought- 
fully above Vronsky' s head. , " I do not wish for a di- 
vorce. It is all the same to me now. I only wonder 
what he will decide with regard to Serozha." 

Vronsky could not understand how, in these first 
moments of their reunion, she could think of her son 
and of divorce. How could it be all the same to her ? 

"Don't speak of that, don't think of it," said he, turn- 
ing Anna's hand over and over in his, to draw her atten- 
tion, to him ; but she did not look at him. 

" Oh ! „ why did I not die ? it would have been so 
much better ! " said she ; and though she did not sob, 
the tears rolled down: her pale cheeks ; she tried, never- 
theless, to smile, 'that she might not give him pain. 

Once Vronsky would have thought it impossible and 
disgraceful to give up * the flattering and perilous mission 
to Tashkend, but now he 'refused it without any hesita- 
tion; then, noticing that .his refusal was misinterpreted 
by the authorities, he. gave in his resignation. 

A month later, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch was left alone 
with his son, and Anna went abroad with Vronsky, with- 
out a divorce,^ and resolutely refusing to accept one. 



•!■'«? 



PART FIFTH 



CHAPTER I 

THE Princess Shcherbatskaya found it would not 
be possible to have the wedding before Lent, 
which would come in five weeks, because the trous- 
seau would not be half done ; but she could not help 
agreeing with Levin that after Lent it might be too late, 
as an old aunt of the prince's was very ill and liable to 
die, and then mourning would still further postpone it/ 
So having decided to divide the trousseau into two parts, 
— one large, the other small, — the princess agreed to 
have the wedding before Lent. She decided that she 
would prepare the smaller part of the trousseau at once, 
and send the larger part afterward, and she was very- 
indignant with Levin because he would not answer her 
seriously whether this would suit him or not. This 
arrangement was all the more convenient because the 
young couple intended to set out for the country im- 
mediately after the ceremony, and would not need the 
larger part of the things. 

. ' Levin continued in the same condition of lunacy, in 
which it seemed to him that 'he and his happiness con- 
stituted the chief and only aim of creation, and that it 
was wholly' unnecessary for him to think or to bother 
himself about anythhig but that his friends would 
arrange everything for him. He did not even make 
any plans or arrangements for his coming life, but left 
others to decide for him, knowing all would be admi- 
rable. His brother, Sergye'f Ivanovitch, Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, and the princess ruled him absolutely ; he was 
satisfied to accept whatever they proposed. 

His brother borrowed the money that he needed ; the 
princess advised him to leave Moscow after the wed- 

261 



262 ANNA KARENINA 

ding ; Stepan Arkadyevitch advised him to go abroad. 
He consented to everything. 

" Make whatever plans you please," he thought, "I 
am happy; and whatever you may decide on, my joy 
will be neither greifer rior less." 

But when he told Kitty of Stepan Arkadyevitch's 
suggestion about going abroad, he was surprised to see 
that she did not approve of it, and that she had her 
own very decided plans for the future. She knew that 
Levin's, heart was^at horiie.in his work, and although 
she neither understood his affairs, nor tried -to under- 
stand them, still they seemed to her very important ; as 
their hom£ would be in the. country, she did not wish to 
go abroad where they were not going to live, but in- 
sisted on settling down in the. country where. their home 
wasr.to be. "This- very firm determination I surprised 
Levin; but.as.it seemed to him air right/ he begged 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, who had excellent taste, to go to 
Pokrovsky and take charge of the improvements in his 
house. It seemed to him that that belonged to his 
friend's province. 

i "By the way/,'' said. Stepan Arkadyevitch one day, 
after his return from the country, where "he had ar- 
ranged' everything for, the young couple's reception, 
" have you your.certificate of confession ? " 

"No; why?" r d • 

"You can't be married without it." 

" Ai',aT, a*! " cried Levin ; "but it is nine years since 
I have been to confession 1 I hadn't even thought 
of it IV 

'5That;is good! "said Stepan Arkadyevitch, laugh- 
ing/ "and you call me a nihilist! But that can't, be 
allowed to go; on ; f you must prepare for the sacrament ! " 
;.MWhen? there are only four days more !*" 

Stepan Arkadyevitch arranged" this matter also, and 
Levin prepared for .his, devotions. , For Levin as for 
any man who is an unbeliever, yet. respects the faith of 
others, it was 'very hard to' attend and participate in all 
religious' ceremonies; Now in his tender and sentimental 
frame '.ofc mind, the necessity of 'dissimulating was not 



ANNA KAREN I NA 263 

only odious to rjirn, it' was well-nigh- impossible. Now; 
he would be obliged either to lie or to mock at sacred 
things, at a time when his heart was bursting, when he 
felt at the height of bliss. He felt that he could/do 
neither,, But in spite of all his efforts to persuade 
Stepan Arkadyevitch that .there must be some* other 
way of obtaining a certificate without being forced to 
confess/ Stepan Arkadyevitch declared i that it wasjm-: 
possible., 1 * < ■(! 

"Yes, but what harm will it do you? only two days ! 
and the priest is a capital, bright little old "man; He 
will pull this tooth f6r you" without your knowing it." 

During- the first mass that he attended .Levin did his 
best to recall 'the* strong religious impressions of his 
youth, when he was between sixteen and : seventeen 
years old; but he found that this, was perfectly impos- 
sible. , He then tried to look on religious, forms as an 
ancient custom, without any real meaning, something 
like the habit of making calls; this also he felt' that he 
could never do. Like most of his contemporaries, 
Levin was completely undecided in regard to his reli- 
gious views, He could not believe; at the same time 
he was not firmly convinced that all these things were 
unreasonable, And therefore not being in a condition 
to believe in the efficacy of what he was doing, or to 
look on it with utter indifference as on an. empty for- 
mality, he experienced a sense of pain and annoyance 
during the time allotted to his devotions; his conscience* 
cried out that to do what he himself did not understand 
was false and wicked. 

During the ; time of the service, he listened to the 
prayers, striving to attribute to them some significance 
which should not be in too open contradiction with his 
convictions; but finding that he could not understand' 
them, but was compelled to criticize them, he tried not to 
listen, but occupied himself with his thoughts *** with the 
observations and recollections that arose in his mind with 
extraordinary vividness during the solemn night-office 
in. the church. He stayed through mass, vespers; and> 
evening prayers and on the next morning he rose earlier 



264 ANNA KARENINA 

than usual, and came at eight o'clock, without having 
eaten anything, to morning prayers and confession. 

There was no one in the church except a mendicant 
soldier/ two old women, and the officiating priests. A 
young deacon with a long, thin back clearly defined in 
two halves beneath his short cassock came to meet him, 
and going to a little table-near the wall, began to read 
prayers. >? Levin, hearing him repeat in a hurried, mo- 
notonous voice, clipping his words, the words, " Lord, 
have mercy upon us," 1 felt that his thought was locked 
up and sealed, and that to touch it and stir it now was 
out of the question, since, if he did, confusion would 
ensue ; and therefore he stood behind the deacon, not 
listening and not trying to fathom what he said, but 
thinking his own thoughts. 

"What a wonderful amount of expression there is 
about her hands," he thought, recalling the evening 
before, which he had spent with Kitty at the table in 
one corner of the drawing-room. There had not been 
much to talk about, as was usually the case at this time ; 
she had rested her hand on the table, opening and 
shutting it, and laughing as she made this motion. He 
remembered how he had kissed this hand and then ex- 
amined the lines that crossed the pink palm. 

" Have.merd on us again," thought Levin, making the 
sign of the cross, and bowing, while he noticed the 
deacon's supple movements, as he prostrated himself 
in front. of him. "Then she took my hand, and in turn 
examined it., /You have* a famous hand,' she said to 
me." He looked at his own hand, and -then at the 
deacon's, with its stubbed fingers. " Yes ! Now it will 
soon be over. No; he is beginning another prayer. 
Yes; he is bowing to the ground; that always comes 
just before the end." 

The deacon took the three-ruble note, discreetly 
slipped. into his hand, under his rough shaggy cuff, and 
promised to register Levin's name ; then quickly clack- 
ing in his new boots across the flagstones of the empty 
church, he went to the altar. In a moment he looked 

1 Gospodi pomiluii shortened by his rapid speech into pomitos, pomilos. 



ANNA KARENINA 265 

out and beckoned to Levin. The thought till that mo- 
ment locked up in Levin's brain began to stir, but he 
made haste to bring it to order. " It will be arranged 
somehow," he said to himself > and went toward the 
ambo. He mounted several steps, turned to the right, 
and saw the priest, a little old man, whose thin' beard 
was almost white/ with kindly but rather weary eyes, 
standing near the reading-desk, "turning over the leaves 
of a missal. After a slight bow to Levin, he began to 
read the prayers ; having finished them, he kneeled and 
faced Levin : — 

" Christ is here, invisible though, to hear your confes- 
sion," said he, pointing to the crucifix. " Do you be- 
lieve all that the Holy Apostolic Church teaches us ? " 
he continued, turning his eyes from Levin's face and 
crossing his hand under his stole. 

"I have doubted, I still doubt everything.... " said 
Levin, in a voice which - sounded disagreeable < to his 
own ears, and he was silent. 

The priest waited a few moments to sefe if he would 
say anything more, then closing his eyes and speaking 
rapidly with a Vladimirsky accent, he said : — 

" To doubt is characteristic of human weakness ; we 
must pray the Lord Almighty to strengthen you. What 
are your principal sins?" - * *■ 

The priest spoke without the least interruption, and 
as if he were afraid of losing time. 

" My principal sin is doubt. I doubt everything, and 
I am generally doubting." * 

"To doubt is characteristic of human weakness," 
said the priest, using the same words ; " what do you 
doubt principally ? " 

" Everything. I sometimes even doubt the existence 
of God," said Levin, in spite of himself, horrified at the 
impropriety of what he was saying. But < his words 
seemed to make no impression on the priest: 

"How can you doubt -the existence of God?" he 
asked, with an almost imperceptible smile. 

Levin was silent. ; 

"What doubts can you have about the -Creator when 



%66 ANNA KARENINA 

you contemplate His works ? " pursued the priest, in his 
quick habitual utterance; "Who ornamented the celes- 
tial vault with its stars? .who decked the earth with all 
its beauty ?; How can these things exist without a Crea- 
tor;? V :• And he cast a questioning glance at Levin. 
!riLevin : felt that it would be. out of place to enter into 
a philosophical discussion with the priest, and, therefore, 
in his reply said only what referred directly to the 
question':-?^ o /<>d tt, 

"I do not know/' » * . , 

" You do not know ? Then how can you doubt that 
God- has created everything ?." asked the priest, with a 
light-hearted perplexity, v 

\\ I cannot understand it," replied Levin, blushing, 
and feeling that his words were stupid, an$ that in such 
a position they could not be other than stupid. 
b\ "Pray to God; have recourse to Him ; the Fathers of 
the Church themselves doubted, and asked God to 
strengthen their faith. The devil has mighty power, 
and we should resist ;him. Pray to God, pray to God," 
repeated the priest, rapidly, ., 

Then he kept silent for a moment,' as if he were buried 
in thought. > on 

"They tell me that you intend to marry the daughter 
of my parishioner and spiritual son, the Prince Shcher- 
batsky," he added with a smile. "She is a beautiful 
girl." 

br" Yes;";replied Levin, blushing for the priest. " Why 
does he need to ask such questions at confession ? " he 
said to.himself. :• 

And; as if "replying to his thought, the priest con- 
tinued : — 

"You are preparing for marriage, and- perhaps God 
may grant you offspring. Isn't that so? Now, what 
education: will you give to your little children if you do 
not conquer the temptations of the devil, who causes 
you to doubt?" he asked with gentle reproach. "If 
you love your children as a good father, you will not 
only wish for them riches, luxury, and honor, but still 
more; their salvation and their spiritual enlightenment 



ANNA KARENINA 267 

by the light of truth ; is this not so ? How will you 
reply to the innocent child who" asks you, ' Papasha, 
who made all that delights me on the earth, — the water, 
the sunshine, the flowers, the plants?' Will you an- 
swer, * I know nothing about it ' ? Can you ignore 
what the Lord God in His infinite goodness has revealed 
to you ? And if the child asks you, * What awaits me 
beyond the tomb ? ' what will you say to him if you 
know nothing ? How will you answer him ? Will you 
give him up to the seductions of the world and the 
devil ? That is not right ! " said he, stopping, and 
turning his head on one side, looked at Levin out of 
his kindly, gentle eyes. 

Levin was silent, not because he was afraid this time 
to enter into a discussion with the priest, but because 
nobody had ever put such questions to him before, and 
because he thought there was plenty of time to consider 
them before his children should be in a state to ques- 
tion him. 

" You are about to enter upon a phase of life,'* con- 
tinued the priest, " where one must choose his path 
and keep to it. Pray God in His mercy to keep and 
sustain you ; and in conclusion : May our Lord God, 
Jesus Christ, pardon you, my son, in His goodness* and 
loving-kindness to all mankind." And the priest, end- 
ing the formulas of absolution, took leave of him, after 
giving him his blessing. 

Levin, returning home that day, felt happy enough 
at the thought of being free from a false situation with- 
out having been obliged to lie. Besides, there remained 
with him a vague idea that what that good and gentle 
little old man said to him was not altogether so stupid 
as he at first- had thought it was going to be, and that 
he really had something worth clearing up sometime. 

" Not now, of course," he thought, " but later on." 

Levin felt more than ever at this time that there 
were troubled and obscure places in his soul, and that, 
concerning his religion, he was in exactly the Same 
position which he so clearly saw others occupying, and 
disliked, and which he blamed his friend Sviazhsky for. 



268 ANNA KARENINA 

Levin spent that evening with his betrothed at Dolly's, 
and in trying to explain to Stepan Arkadyevitch the 
excitable condition in which he found himself, was very 
gay ; he said that he was like a dog being trained to 
jump through a hoop, which, delighted at having learned 
his lesson, wags his tail, and is eager to leap over the 
table and through the window. 



CHAPTER II 

The princess and Darya Aleksandrovna insisted on 
strictly observing the established customs ; so Levin was 
not to "sefe his " bride " on the day of the wedding, and he 
dined at his hotel with three bachelors, who met in his 
room by chance : they were Sergye? Ivanovitch ; Kata- 
vasof, an old university friend, now professor of natural 
sciences, whom Levin had met on the street and brought 
home to dinner ; Chirikof, his shafer or best man, justice 
of the peace at Moscow, and Levin's companion in bear- 
hunting. 

The dinner was very lively. SergyeT Ivanovitch was 
in the best of spirits, and greatly enjoyed Katavasof s 
originality. Katavasof, feeling that his originality was 
appreciated and understood, made a great display of it 
and Chirikof added his share of gayety to the conversa- 
tion. 

" So, here is our friend Konstantin Dmitrievitch," 
said Katavasof, with the slow speech of a professor 
accustomed to talk ex cathedra ; " what a talented fellow 
he was ! I speak of him in the past, for he no longer 
exists. 'He loved science when he left the university; 
he took an interest in humanity ; now he employs half 
his. faculties in deceiving himself, and the other half in 
apologizing for the deception." 

' ■ . " I never met a more confirmed enemy of marriage 
than you," said Sergye* Ivanovitch. 

" No, I am not its enemy ; I am a friend of the dis- 
tribution of labor. People who cannot do anything 
ought to be the ones to propagate the race. All the 



ANNA KARENINA 269 

rest should devote themselves to their intellectual devel- 
opment and welfare. That is my opinion. I know a 
great many people are inclined to confound these two, 
but I am not of the number." 

" How delighted I should be to hear that you were in 
love ! " exclaimed Levin. " Pray invite me to your wed- 
ding."- 

" But I am already in love." 

" Yes, with some cuttlefish. You know," said Levin, 
turning to his brother, " MikhaYl Semyonuitch has writ- 
ten a work on the nutrition, and .... " 

" Now, I beg' of you not to confuse matters ! It is 
of no consequence what I have written; but it is a fact 
that I love a cuttlefish." 

"That need not prevent your loving a wife." 

"No; but my wife would object to my loving the 
cuttlefish." 

" Why so ? " 

" You will see how it will be. Now, you love your 
farming, hunting Well ! just wait awhile ! " 

" I met Arkhip to-day," said Chirikof ; " he says that 
there are quantities of elk at Prudnoye, and two 
bears." 

"Well ! you may hunt them without me." 

"You see how it is," said Sergye'f Ivanovitch. "You 
may as well say good-by to bear-hunting; your wife 
won't allow it." 

Levin smiled. The idea that his wife would object 
to his hunting seemed so delightful that he was ready 
to renounce the pleasure of ever meeting a bear again. 

" However, I am sorry to hunt those two bears with- 
out you," said Chirikof. " Do you remember the last 
time at Khapilovo ? The hunting was marvelous." 

Levin did not care to spoil his friend's illusion that 
life would be worth nothing without hunting, and so he 
made no reply. 

"The custom of saying good-by to one's bachelor 
life is not without meaning," said Sergyer Ivanovitch. 
" However happy one may be, a man regrets his 
liberty." j ?: 



270 ANNA KARENINA 

"Confess that, like Gogolevsky, when he was en- 
gaged, you feel like jumping out of the window." 

"Certainly; but he won't confess it," said Katavasof, 
with a loud laugh. 

<"The window is open/.... Come now, let us go to 
Tver! We might find one bear in her lair. Indeed, 
we have still time to catch the five o'clock train," said 
Chirikof, smiling. " Hear them laugh I " 

: " Well,- upon my honor," replied Levin, smiling, too, 
"I cannot discover the least trace of regret in my soul 
for my lost liberty." 

"Yes! your soul is in such a chaos now that you 
cannot find anything in it," said Katavasof. "Wait till 
it becomes calmer; then you will see." 

" No, if I felt in the least degree that there was noth- 
ing beyond my feeling of " < — he did not like to speak 
of love before Katavasof — " of happiness, I should 
regret my lost freedom. But it is not so at all ; I am 
even delighted at my loss of freedom." 

"You are a hopeless case," exclaimed Katavasof. 
"However, let us drink to his recovery, or let us at 
least hope for him that one per cent of his illusions may 
be accomplished. And even that would be such happi- 
ness as was never known on this earth !." 

Shortly after dinner the guests separated, to dress for 
the wedding. 

When he was left alone, and had a chance to think 
over the conversation of these bachelors, Levin again 
asked himself whether he really regretted the liberty of 
which his friends had just been talking, and he smiled 
at -the idea. 

" Liberty ? why liberty ? Happiness for me consists in 
loving, in thinking her thoughts, in wishing her wishes, 
without* any liberty. That is happiness ! " 

" But can I know her thoughts, her wishes, hei; feel- 
ings?" whispered some voice. The smile disappeared 
from his face and he fell into a deep study/ And sud- 
denly a strange feeling came over . him : fear and doubt 
came over him- — doubt about everything. 

"Suppose she does not love me? What if she is 



ANNA KARENINA 271 

marrying me merely for the sake of being married? 
What if she does not herself know what she is doing ? " 
he asked himself. " Will she, perhaps, see her mistake, 
and discover, after we are married, that she does not 
love me, and that she never can love me ? n 

And strange, even painful, thoughts about Kitty 
came to his mind; he began to be violently jealous 1 of 
Vronsky, just as he had been the year before ; there 
came up before him, like the memory of yesterday, that 
.evening when he had seen them together, and he sus- 
pected her of not having confessed everything to him. 

He quickly sprang up. . 

" No," said he, in despair. " I cannot let this remain 
so ! I will go and find her, — I will talk with her, and 
say to her again, for the last time : ' We are, free ; is it 
not better to stop just where we are ? Anything is 
better than lifelong unhappiness, shame, distrust! ' V 

And with despair in his heart, full of hatred toward 
all mankind, toward himself and Kitty, he left the hotel 
and hastened to her house. 

He found her in one of the rear rooms sitting on a 
large chest, busy with her maid, looking over dresses of 
all colors, spread out over the backs of the chairs and 
on the floor. 

"Akh!" she exclaimed, beaming with joy at seeing 
him. " What brings thee ? What brings you ? " Even 
up to this last day she sometimes said tui, sometimes 
vui. " I was not expecting you ! I am just disposing 
of my maiden wardrobe.' ' 

"Ah! that is good!" he replied, frowning at the 
maid. 

"Run away, Duniasha; I will call you," said Kitty; 
and as soon ^s she had gone she asked, using the sec- 
ond person of the pronoun, " What is the matter with 
thee?" this time resolutely. She remarked her lover's 
strange, excited, and gloomy face, and was seized with 
fear. 

" Kitty, I am in torture, and I cannot suffer alone ! " 
he said to her with despair in his voice, stopping in 
front of her and looking into her eyes in a beseeching 



272 ANNA KARENINA 

way. He at once saw by her face, so sincere and lov- 
ing, that nothing whatever would result from his deter- 
mination ; yet he felt an urgent need of being reassured 
from her own lips. 

" I came to tell you that it is not yet too late ; that 
everything can even now be taken back." 

" What ? I do not understand. What is the matter 
with thee?" 

"I am — as I have said and thought a thousand times 
before-— I am not worthy of you. You once could not, 
consent to marry me. ; Think of it ! Perhaps you are 
mistaken now. Think of it well. You cannot love me 
:..".if .... it is better to acknowledge it," he continued, 
without looking at her. " I shall be miserable, but no 
matter ; let people say what they please ; anything is 
better than unhappiness ! .... But anything is better now, 
while there is yet time .... " 

" I do not understand you," she replied, frightened. 
"You mean you want to take back your word.... break 
off our...." 

"Yes, if you do not love me." 

" You must be insane ! " she exclaimed, red with vexa- 
tion. But; the' sight of Levin's piteous face arrested 
her anger; and pushing the frocks from one of the 
chairs, she sat down near him. 

" What are you thinking of ? Tell me all." 

" I think that you cannot love me. Why should you 
love me ? " 

"BozhemoY! what can I do ?".... said she; and .she 
burst, into tears. I - 

" Akh ! what have I done ? " he cried instantly, and 
throwing himself on his knees, he covered her hands 
with kisses. 

When the princess came into the room five minutes 
later, she found them completely reconciled. Kitty had 
not. only convinced him of her love, but in answer to his 
question she had explained to him why she loved him. 
She said that she loved him because she understood him 
perfectly ; because she knew that he could love, and that 
all 1 he loved was good and beautiful. 



ANNA KARENINA 273 

Levin found the explanation perfectly satisfactory. 
When the princess came in, they were sitting side by 
side on the big chest, looking over the frocks, and dis- 
cussing their fate. Kitty wanted to give Duniasha the 
brown frock that she wore the day Levin proposed to 
her; and he insisted that it should not be given to any 
one, and that Duniasha should have the blue frock: 

" But don't you see that she is a brunette, and the 
blue frock will not be becoming to her ? .... I have 
thought it all over." .... 

When she learned why Levin was there, the princess 
was half vexed at him, and sent him home to make his 
own toilet and leave Kitty in' peace, as Charles was 
going to dress Kitty's hair. 

" She is quite excited enough," said she ; " she has 
eaten nothing for days, and is losing all her beauty; 
and here you come to trouble her with your foolishness. 
Come, go away now, my dear." 

Levin went back to the hotel, guilty and ashamed, but 
reassured. His brother, . Darya Aleksandrovna, and 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, in full dress, were already wait- 
ing with holy images to bless him. There was no time 
to be lost. Darya Aleksandrovna had to go home again 
to get her son perfumed and curled for the occasion; 
the child was to carry the sacred image before the 
bride. Then one carriage must be sent for the shafer 
or best man, while another was to come to the hotel for 

Sergyei* Ivanovitch This day was full of complications. 

One thing was certain, that no delay was permissible, 
for it was already half-past six. 

The ceremony of the benediction was anything but 
solemn. Stepan Arkadyevitch assumed a comically 
grave attitude beside his wife, raised the sacred image, 
and obliged Levin to kneel before it, while he blessed 
him with an affectionate and wicked smile ; at last he 
kissed him three times ; and Darya Aleksandrovna did 
the same very hastily, for she was in a great hurry to 
get away, and in great perplexity about the carriage 
arrangements. 

" Well ! This is what we will do : you go for him in 
VOL. 11. — 18 



274 ANNA KARENINA 

our carriage, and perhaps Sergyef Ivanovitch will be so 
good as to come immediately, and to send back his." .... 

" Certainly, with pleasure." 

" We will come back together. Has the luggage been 
sent ?" asked Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

if Yes," replied. Levin; and he called Kuzma to help 
him dress. [• ; 

'« } rr> - r ■ / i ' 

,*d ] - - . 

CHAPTER III 

A throng of people, principally women, surrounded 
the church, brilliantly lighted for the wedding ; those 
who could not get inside were pushing up around the 
windows' and elbowing one another as they strove to 
look through the gratings. 

- Already more than twenty carriages stood in a line 
in the street, under the supervision of policemen. A 
police officer stood at the entrance in brilliant uniform, 
unmindful of" the cold. Carriages kept driving up 
and departing; now ladies in full dress, holding up 
their trains; now men taking off their hats, or Jk/pis. 
In the church itself both chandeliers and all the can- 
dles before the images were already burning. The 
golden gleam on the red background of the ikonostas, 
and the gilded chasing of the ikons, and the silver of the 
candelabra and of the censers, and the flaggings of the 
floor, and the tapestries and the banners suspended in 
the choir and the steps of the pulpit, and the old dingy 
missals, and the priestly robes, were all flooded with 
light, 

'On the right-hand side of the warm church, amid the 
brave array of dress-coats, uniforms, and white neck- 
ties, and satin,/ silk, and velvet robes; of coiffures, 
flowers, and bare necks and arms, and long gloves, 
there was' a constant flow of restrained but lively con- 
versation, which echoed strangely beneath the high, 
vaulted roof. i f > 

Whenever the door opened with a plaintive creak the 
murmur ceased, and every one turned around, hoping 



ANNA KARENINA 275 

at last to see the bridal pair. But the door had already 
opened more than ten times, and each time it proved 
to be some belated guest, or guests, admitted among the 
number of the friends on the right, or some spectator 
who had been clever enough to deceive or elude the 
police officer, and sat down among the strangers on the 
left. 

The friends and strangers had passed through every 
phase of waiting ; at first they supposed that the bride 
and bridegroom would be there any minute, and did not 
attach any importance to the delay; then they began 
to look around at the door mdre and more frequently, 
wondering what could have happened ; at last the delay 
began to be awkward, and the relatives and invited 
guests tried to assume an air of indifference, as if they 
were absorbed in their conversation. 

The archdeacon, as if to let people know that his 
time was precious, every now and then gave an impa- 
tient cough, which made the windows rattle ; in the 
choir the singers, tired of waiting, could be heard, now 
trying their voices, and now blowing their noses; the 
priest kept sending, now a sacristan, now a deacon, to 
find out if the bridegroom was coming, and appeared 
himself more and more frequently at the side doors in 
his lilac cassock with its embroidered sash. 

Finally a lady looked at her watch, and said to the 
one sitting next her, " This is very strange ! " And im- 
mediately all the invited guests began to express their 
surprise and discontent aloud. One of , the shafers> or 
best men, went to see what had happened. 

During all this time Kitty, in her white dress, long 
veil, and wreath of orange blossoms, was standing in the 
" hall " of the Shcherbatsky mansion with her sister, 
Madame Lvova, and her nuptial godmother, 1 looking 
out of the window, and had been waiting for half an 
hour for the shafer to announce the bridegroom's arrival 
at the church. 

Levin, meanwhile, in black trousers, but without 
either coat or waistcoat, was walking up and down his 

1 Posazkonaya maf. 



276 ANNA KARENINA 

room at the hotel, opening the door every minute to 
look out into the corridor. , But in the corridor nothing 
like what he wanted was to be seen, and, wringing his 
hands in despair, he would pour forth his. complaints to 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, who was calmly smoking. 

" Did you ever see a man in such a horribly absurd 
situation ? " 

"Yes, abominable!" said Stepan Arkadyevitch, with 
his tranquil smile. "But be calm; they will have it 
here very soon." 

r*"No, hang it!" said Levin, with restrained fury. 
"And these idiotic open waistcoats. Absolutely use- 
less ! " he added, looking at his tumbled shirt-bosom. 
''And what if my trunks have already gone to the 
railway station ? " he exclaimed in despair. 

" Then you can wear mine." 

" I might have done that in the first place." 

" Don't be ridiculous .... wait ; it is sure to come all right." 

The fact was that when Levin began to dress, Kuzma, 
his old" servant, was supposed to have taken out his 
dress-coat, his waistcoat, and all that was necessary. 

" But the shirt ! " cried Levin. 

" You have your shirt on," replied Kuzma, with an 
innocent smile. 

Kuzma had not thought to provide a clean shirt, and, 
having received his orders to pack everything up and 
take them to the Shcherbatskys* house, from which the 
young couple was to start away that same evening, he 
had done so, leaving out only his dress-suit. The one 
that Levin had worn all day was tumbled, and unfit to 
wear with his open waistcoat ; it would take too long 
to send to the Shcherbatskys\ They sent out to buy 
one; the lackey returned empty-handed — everything 
was shut up : it was Sunday. A shirt was brought from 
Stepan Arkadyevitch's house — it was ridiculously broad 
and short ; at last, in despair, he had to send to the 
Shcherbatskys' to have his trunks opened. So, while 
the people were waiting in the church, the unfortunate 
groom, like a wild beast in a cage, was ramping with 
despair up and down his room, looking out into the 



ANNA KARENINA 277 

corridor, and in his horror and despair imagining what 
Kitty might be thinking all this time. 

Finally the guilty Kuzma rushed into the room all out 
of breath, with the shirt in his hand. 

" I got there just in time, as they were carrying off 
the trunks ! " he exclaimed. 

In three minutes Levin rushed through the corridor, 
without daring to look at his watch, for fear of increas- 
ing his agony of mind. 

" You can't change anything," said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, with a smile, following leisurely. "I told you it 
would come out all right." 



CHAPTER IV 

" Here they come ! — There he is ! — Which one ? Is 
it the youngest ? Just look at her ! Poor little matushka, 
more dead than alive ! " was murmured through the 
crowd, as Levin, having met the bride at the entrance, 
came into the church with her. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch told his wife the reason of the 
delay, and a smile passed over the congregation as' it 
was whispered about. Levin neither saw any one nor 
anything, but kept his eyes fixed on his bride. 

Every one said that she had grown very homely dur- 
ing these last days, and certainly she did not look" so 
pretty under her bridal wreath as usual ; but such was 
not Levin's opinion. He looked at her high coiffure, 
with the long white veil attached, and white flowers, at 
her high plaited collar encircling her slender neck in a 
peculiarly maidenly fashion, and just showing it a little 
in front, — her remarkably graceful figure; and she 
seemed more beautiful to him than ever. But it was 
not because the flowers or her veil or her Paris gown 
added anything to her beauty, but because of the expres- 
sion of her lovely face, her eyes, her lips, with their in- 
nocent sincerity, preserved in spite of all this adornment. 

" I was beginning to think that you had made up your 
mind to run away," she said to him with a smile. 



278 ANNA KARENINA 

"What happened to me was so absurd that I am 
ashamed to tell you about it," he replied, reddening, and 
he was compelled to turn to Sergyef Ivanovitch, who 
came up at that moment 

" The tale of the shirt is a good one," said Sergyei 
Ivanovitch, throwing back his head with a laugh. 

"Yes, yes," replied Levin, without understanding a 
word which had been said: 

" Well, Kostia, now is the time to make a serious de- 
cision," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, pretending to look 
greatly scared. "The question is a grave one, and you 
must appreciate its full importance. I have been asked 
whether the candles shall be new ones, or those that 
have been partly burned; the difference is ten rubles," 
he added, pursing his lips in a smile. " I have decided 
about it, but I am afraid that you will not approve of it." 

Levin knew that there was some joke about it, but 
he could not smile. 

" What will you decide on ? new ones, or old ones ? — 
that is the question." 

"Yes, yes; new ones." 

"Well, I am very glad. The question is settled," 
said Stepan Arkadyevitch. " Of how little importance 
a man is at such a time as this!" he murmured to 
Chirikof, while Levin drew near to his bride, after 
looking at her in a bewildered way. 

" Notice, Kitty, who first sets foot on the carpet ! " 
said the Countess Nordstone, stepping up to her. — 
" You look your best," she added, addressing Levin. 

"Are you frightened?" asked Marya Dmitrievna, an 
old aunt. 

" You are n't cold, are you ? You look pale. Bend 
forward a moment," said Madame Lvova, raising her 
beautiful round arms to repair some disarrangement of 
her sister's flowers. 

, Dolly came up, and tried to say something ; but she 
could not speak, and burst into tears and laughed un- 
naturally. 

Kitty looked at those around her as absent-mindedly 
as Levin. 



ANNA KARENINA 



279 



During this time the officiating clergymen had put on 
their sacerdotal robes, and the priest, accompanied by 
the deacon, came to the lectern placed at the entrance 
of the sacred doors. The priest addressed a few words 
to Levin ; but Levin failed to understand what he said. 

" Take the bride's hand and go forward," whispered 
his best man to him. 

For a long time he was unable to make out what was 
expected of him. For a long time they tried to coach 
him and were ready to give it up, because he did the 
opposite of what he was told. Finally, he compre- 
hended that he was to take Kitty's right hand with his 
right hand, without changing his position. When at 
last he took his bride by her hand in the proper way, the 
priest advanced a few steps, and stopped in front of the 
lectern.- The relatives and' invited guests followed the 
young couple with a murmur of voices and a rustling of 
trains. Some one stooped down to arrange the bride's 
train ; in the church, a silence so profound reigned that 
the drops of wax could be heard falling from the candles. 

The old priest, in a calotte, his white hair shining like 
silver, drawn back behind his ears, drew forth his little 
wrinkled hands from beneath his heavy silver chasuble, 
ornamented with a cross of gold, approached the lectern, 
and turned over the leaves of the missal. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch came softly and spoke in his 
ear, made a sign to Levin, and then stepped back. 

The priest lighted two candles decorated with flowers, 
and, holding them slanting in his deft hand, so that the 
wax slowly fell from them, turned toward the young 
couple. It was the same old man who had heard Lev- 
in's confession. He looked at the bride and bridegroom 
put of his sad, weary eyes, and then, with a sigh, blessed 
Levin with his right hand; then, with especial tender- 
ness, placed his fingers on Kitty's bended head, gave 
them the candles, and taking the censer moved quietly 
away. 

" Is this all real ? " thought Levin, and he glanced at 
his bride. He looked down somewhat from above on 
her profile, and by the motion of her lips and her .eye- 



28o ANNA KARENINA 

brows he knew that she felt his look. She did not raise 
her head; but the high-plaited collar which reached to 
her little pink ear trembled a little. He saw that she 
was stifling a sigh, and her hand, imprisoned in its long 
glove, trembled as it held the candle. 

The whole affair of the shirt, his late arrival, his con- 
versation with his relatives and friends, their displeas- 
ure, his ridiculous position, — everything at once vanished 
from his. memory, and he was conscious of a mixed feel- 
ing of terror and joy. 

The archdeacon, a tall, handsome man, his hair curl- 
ing all around his head and wearing a stikhar^ or sur- 
plice, of silver cloth, came briskly forward, and with the 
customary gesture raised his stole with two fingers, and 
stopped before the priest. 

" Bless us, O Lord ! " * slowly, one after the other, 
rocking the atmosphere into billows of sound, echoed 
the solemn syllables. 

* ;" May the Lord bless you now and through all ages," 
replied the old priest in a sweet and musical voice, still 
turning" over the leaves. 

And the response, chanted by the invisible choir, filled 
the church to. the very roof of the vault with a deep, full 
sound, which increased, then ceased for a moment, and 
softly died away. 

They prayed as usual for the eternal repose and wel- 
fare of their souls, for the synod, and the emperor, and 
then for the servants of God, Konstantin and Yekate- 
rina, that day about to wed. 

" Let us pray the Lord to send them His love, His 
peace,' and His aid," the whole church seemed to say in 
the voice of the archdeacon. 

Levin listened to these words, and was impressed by 
them. 

"How did they know that aid was exactly what I 
need? Yes, aid. What can I know, what can I do, 
without aid ? " he thought, recalling his recent doubts 
and fears. 

When the deacon had ended the liturgy, the priest, 

. l Bla-go-slo-vi vla-duika /' 



ANNA KARENINA aSi 

with a book in his hand, turned toward the brida) 
couple : — 

"O God Eternal, who unitest by an indissoluble 
bond those who are separate/' he read, in a strong 
melodious voice, "Thou who didst bless Isaac and Re- 
becca, and showest Thy mercy to their descendants, 
bless also these Thy servants, Konstantin and Yeka- 
terina, and pour forth Thy benefits upon them. Because 
Thou art a merciful and beneficent God, we offer Thee 
the glory ! To the Father, and to the Son, and to the 
Holy Ghost, as it was in the beginning, is now, and ever 
shall be...." 

" Amen/' again chanted the invisible choir. 

" ' Who unitest by an indissoluble bond those who are 
separate ! ' How those profound words respond to what 
one feels at such a time ! Does she understand it as I 
do?" thought Levin. 

And looking down he gazed into her eyes. 

From the expression of Kitty's face he concluded 
that she did feel it as he did ; but he was mistaken : 
she scarcely comprehended the words of the service, and 
during the time of the espousal did not even hear them. 
She could not hear them or comprehend them, so power- 
ful was the single feeling which filled her heart and 
kept increasing all the time. This feeling was one of 
delight at the perfect fulfilment of what had been tak- 
ing place in her heart during the past month and a hal£ 
and during those six weeks had made her happy and 
restless by turns. 

From that day when, in her cinnamon-colored gown, 
in the "hall" of their house on the Arbatsky, she had 
silently approached Levin to give herself wholly to him, 
from that day, from that moment, she felt a complete 
rupture had been made with all her past life, and another 
existence, new and unknown, without, however, changing 
her outward life, had begun. These six weeks had been 
at once a very happy and very trying time. Her 
whole life, her hopes and desires, were all concentrated 
on this man, whom she did not even yet fully under- 
stand, to whom she was united by a sentiment which 



282 ANNA KARENINA 

she understood still less, and which attracted her and 
repelled her by turns, and at the same time she had 
gone on living in the conditions of her former life. Liv- 
ing this old life, she was horrified at herself, at her com- 
plete and invincible indifference toward her whole past : 
to things, to habits, even to her relatives, whom she. 
loved, and who loved her, her mother, who was pained 
by her indifference, and her gentle father, whom she 
had loved more than any one else in the world. At one 
moment she was horrified at this indifference, at the 
next she was filled with joy at that which had brought 
her to such a feeling. She could not imagine or desire 
anything except life with this man ; but this new life 
had not yet begun, and she could form no definite idea 
of it. It was only an expectation, a fear and joy of 
something new and unknown. And now this expecta- 
tion, as well as her remorse for not regretting the past, 
were at an end, and the new life was beginning. This 
new and unknown future could not fail to be alarming, 
but whether it was alarming or not, it was only the ful- 
filment of what had taken place in her soul six weeks 
before, only the sanctification of what had been taking 
place in her soul for a long time. 

The priest, turning to the lectern again, with difficulty 
took off Kitty's little ring, and passed it as far as the first 
joint of Levin's finger. 

" I unite thee, Konstantin, servant of God, to Yekate- 
rina, servant of God ; r and he repeated the same formula 
in placing a large ring on Kitty's delicate little rosy 
finger, pathetic in its weakness. 

The bridal pair tried to understand what was expected 
of them, but each time made a mistake, and the priest 
corrected them in a low voice. At last the priest, bless- 
ing them with his fingers, again gave Kitty the large 
ring, and Levin the small one, and again they got con- 
fused, and twice passed the rings from hand to hand, 
failing to interchange them as they should have done. 

Dolly Chirikof and Stepan Arkadyevitch stepped out 
to assist them in their difficulty. The people around 
them smiled and whispered; but the tenderly solemn 



ANNA KARENINA 283 

expression on the faces of the young couple did not 
change. On the contrary, even when they were bluft 1 
dering with the rings, they looked more serious and 
solemn than before; and the smile on Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch's face died away, as he whispered to them that 
they were to put on their own rings. It seemed to him 
that a smile might be offensive to them. 

" O Thou who, from the beginning of the world, hast 
created man, male and female," continued the priest, 
after the ceremony of the rings, "and hast given to man 
the woman to be his aid and delight, therefore, O Thdu> 
our Lord God, who hast given Thy blessing to Thy chosen, 
to Thy servants, our fathers, to Thine inheritance, do 
Thou bless Thy servants Kbnstantin and Yekaterina, arid 
confirm their nuptials in faith and concord and truth 
and love ! " 

Levin's breast heaved; disobedient tears filled his 
eyes. He kept feeling more and more that all his 
thoughts on marriage, his visions of how he should 
dispose his life, had hitherto been infantile, and that 
there was something that had never been comprehen- 
sible to him ; and now he understood its meaning less 
than ever, although he was now wholly in its power. 



CHAPTER V 

All Moscow, all the relatives and acquaintances, 
were at the church. And during the time of the mar- 
riage service, in the brilliant light that flooded the church, 
in that throng of handsomely dressed women and girls, 
and of men in white neckties, in swallow-tails, of in uni- 
form, there was a decorously subdued conversation, es- 
pecially among the men, for the women were absorbed hi 
observing all the details of a ceremony which is always 
so full of interest for them. 

A little group of friends surrounded the bride, and 
among them were her two sisters, Dolly, and the beauti- 
ful Madame Lvova just returned from abroad. 



284 ANNA KARENINA 

" Why is Mary in lilac at a wedding ? It is almost 
mourning," said Madame Korsunsky. 

"With her complexion it's her only salvation," re- 
plied Madame Drubetsky. " But I wonder why they 
had the ceremony in the evening ? That savors of the 
merchant." 

" It is pleasanter. I, too, was married in the evening," 
said Madame Korsunsky, sighing, and recalling how 
beautiful she had been on that day, and how ridiculously 
in love with her her husband had been, and how it was 
all so different now ! , . 

".They say. that those who have been best men more 
than, ten times never marry. I tried to make myself 
proof against marriage, in this way, but the place was 
taken," said Count Siniavin to the handsome young 
Princess Charskaya, who had designs on him. 
* A smile, was her only reply. She was looking at 
Kitty, and thinking how and when she would stand 
with Count Siniavin in Kitty's place; and how she 
would then remind him of the joke that he had 
made. 

Shcherbatsky confided to the old Freilina Nikolayeva 
his intention to place the crown on Kitty's head-dress to 
bring her good luck. 

" There is no need of wearing a head-dress," replied 
Frellina Nikolayeva, who had long ago decided that 
if the old widower whom she was setting her cap for 
should offer himself, she would be married very simply. 
V I, .don't like this display." 

Sergyef. Ivanovitch was talking with Darya Dmi- 
trievna, jestingly declaring that the fashion of wedding 
tours was becoming widespread because young couples 
were always rather bashful. 

" Your. brother may well be proud of his choice. She 
is charming. You must envy him." 
, "/The;time has gone by for that, Darya Dmitrievna," 
he replied, and an unexpected expression of sadness 
overspread his face. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch was telling his sister-in-law his 
pun on divorce. 



ANNA KARENINA 285 

" Somebody ought to arrange her wreath," replied the 
latter, without listening. 

" What a pity that she has grown so ugly ! " said the 
Countess Nordstone to Madame Lvova. "After all, he 
isn't worth her little finger, is he ? " 

" I don't agree with you ; I am very much pleased 
with him, and not only because he.Js, going to be my 
beaa-frh-e" replied Madame Lvova. " How well he 
appears ! It is so difficult to appear well at such a time 
and not to be absurd. He is neither ridiculous nor stiff ; 
one feels that he is touched." 

" Did you expect this marriage ? " 

" Almost. He has always been in love with her." 

"Well, we shall see which will be the first to step on 
the carpet. I have advised Kitty to look put for that." 

"That makes no difference," replied Madame Lvova; 
" in our family we are all submissive wives." 

" But I have taken pains to keep mine under the 
thumb. — How is it with you, Dolly ? " 

Dolly, was standing near them, and heard them, but 
she did not reply. She was affected; tears filled her 
eyes, and she could not have uttered a word without 
crying. She was glad for Kitty and Levin ; she was 
thinking of her own wedding; and as she glanced at 
the brilliant Stepan Arkadyevitch, she forgot the real 
state of things, and only remembered his first, innocent 
love. She was thinking, too, of other women, — her 
relatives and acquaintances, — whom she remembered 
at this important and solemn hour of their lives ; how 
they, like Kitty, stood under the crown ; how they re- 
nounced the past with joy, and began a mysterious 
future, with hope and fear in their hearts. Among the 
number she recalled her dear Anna, the details of whose 
approaching divorce she had just heard ; she had seen ■ 
her enveloped in a white veil* as pure as Kitty, with her 
wreath of orange-blossoms. And now ? " It is terribly 
strange ! " she whispered. 

The sisters and friends were not the only ones to 
follow with interest the minutest details of the cere- 
mony ; there were women among the strangers looking 



286 ANNA KARENINA 

on, who held their breath, for fear of losing a single 
movement of bride or bridegroom, and who replied 
absent-mihdedly to the jokes or idle remarks of the 
men, often not even hearing them. 

" Why is she so troubled ? Are they marrying her 
against her will?" 

" Against her will ? to such a handsome man ? Is he 
a prince?" 

"Is that her sister in white satin? There! Just 
hear the deacon howl, * Let her fear her husband ' ! " 

" Are the singers from Chudof ? " 1 

" No ; from the synod*" 

"I have asked the servant about it/ He says that 
her husband is going to take her away to his estate. 
Awfully rich, they say. That is why she is marrying 
him// 

"They make a handsome pair." 

f( And i you pretend to say, Marya Vasilievria, that 
they don't wear crinolines 2 any longer. Just look at 
that one in a puce-colored dress ! You would say she 
was an ambassador's wife by the way she- is dressed* 
Do you see now ? " 

"What a sweet little creature the bride is! — like a 
lamb for the slaughter. You may say what you please, 
I can't help pitying her." 

Such were tne remarks of the spectators who had 
succeeded in getting past the door of the church. 



CHAPTER VI 

As the service of espousal was Coming t6 an end, one 
of the officiatirlg priests spread a piece of rose-colored 
silk in front of , the lectern, in the center of the church, 
the choir chanted an artistifc and complicated psalm, in 
which the tenor and bass sang responsively, and the 
priest, turning to the young couple, attracted their atten- 
tion to the piece of rose-colored fabric. 

1 A monastery, famous for its singers. 

2 The speaker calls it karnalin instead of krinolin* 



ANNA KARENINA 287 

They were both familiar with the superstition that 
whichever one of a, bridal couple first sets foot on the 
carpet becomes the real head of the family, but neither 
Kitty nor Levin remembered anything about it after 
they had gone 3, few steps, And they did not hear the 
remarks exchanged about them, or the discussions be., 
tween those who thought that he was the first and those 
who were sure th?it they touched it simultaneously. ^ 

After the customary questions as to their willingness 
to enter into the bonds of matrimony, and would they 
plight their mutual troth, and their answers, which 
sounded strangely loud to their own ears, a new office 
began. Kitty listened to the wprds of the prayers and 
tried to understand them, but she could not. The' far-? 
ther the ceremony proceeded, the more her heart over- 
flowed with triumphant joy, which prevented her from 
fixing her attention. 

They prayed to, God that. * f the pair- might have the 
gift of chastity, and might rejoice in the sight of many 
sons and daughters ; " they recalled how God had made 
" the first woman from Adam's side/' that iS the woman 
must leave father and mother and cling to her husband, 
and they twain shall be one flesh," and that this is a 
great miracle ; they prayed God " to give them f ecun- 
dity and prosperity, as he had blessed Isaac and Re^ 
becca, Joseph, Moses, and Sephora, and to let them see 
their children to the third and fourth generation. 7 - 

" AH this is lovely," thought Kitty, ^s she heard -these 
words ; V all this is just as it should be," And a ^mije 
of happiness, which was reflected on the faces of all 
who saw her, shone on her fair, lovely face. 

" Put it entirely on," were the words heard in every, 
part of the church, as the priest brought forward the 
crowns, and Shcherbatsky, in his three-button gloves; 
tremblingly held the wreath high ^bove Kitty's head. 

" Put it on," whispered the latter, smiling. 

Levin turned round, and was struck by the radiant 
joy wriich filled her face, and the same feeling, in spite 
of himself, took possession of him; he felt, like her, 
happy and serene. 



288 ANNA KARENINA 

They listened with joy in their hearts to the reading 
of the Epistle, and the archdeacon's voice echoing the 
jast verse/fully appreciated by the strangers, who were 
impatiently waiting for it. Joyfully they drank the 
warm red wine and water from the flat cup, and they 
felt still more joyful when the priest, throwing back his 
chasuble, led them around the lectern, holding both 
their hands in his, while the bass sang, at the- top of his 
voice, Isaiye likui. Shcherbatsky and Chirikof, carry- 
ing the crowns, smiling and constantly treading on the 
bride's train, now straggled behind, now bumped into 
the crowned couple, as the priest paused in front of the 
relics. The gleam of joy on Kitty's face seemed to be 
communicated to all present. Levin was sure that the 
deacon and the priest fell under its influence as well as 
himself. 

When the crowns had been taken from their heads, 
the priest read the last prayers and congratulated the 
young couple. Levin looked at Kitty and thought he 
had never seen her so beautiful ; it was the beauty of 
that new radiance of happiness which transformed her; 
he wanted to say something to her, but did not know 
whether the ceremony was yet over or not. The priest 
relieved him from his uncertainty, and said gently to 
him, with a kindly smile : — 

" Kiss your wife, and you, kiss your husband," and 
he took their candles. 

, Levin, with circumspection, kissed his wife's smiling 
lips, gave her his arm, and went out of the church with 
anew and strange feeling of being suddenly very near 
to her. He had not believed, he could not believe, that 
all this/vvas reality. Nor until their astonished and timid 
eyes met did he believe it, because he felt that they were 
indeed one. 

That same evening, after the supper, the young couple 
started for the country. 



ANNA KARENINA 289 



CHAPTER VII 

Vronsky and Anna had been traveling together in 
Europe for three months. They had visited Venice, 
Rome, ' Naples ; and now they were just arrived at a 
small Italian city, where they intended to make a con- 
siderable stay. 

At the hotel the head butler, a regular Adonis of a 
man, who wore his thick pomaded hair parted behind 
from the neck, and a dress-coat with a wide expanse of 
white shirt-front and watch-charms over his rotund 
belly, was standing with his hands thrust into his 
pockets, scornfully blinking his eyes, and giving curt 
answers to a gentleman who had entered the hotel. 
Hearing steps on the other side of the entrance, the 
head butler turned around, and, seeing the Russian 
count, who rented his most expensive apartments, he 
respectfully drew his hands out of his pockets, and, with 
a low bow, informed the count that a messenger had 
come to say that the palazzo was at his service. The 
agent was ready to sign the agreement. 

"Ah! I am very glad," said Vronsky. "Is madame 
at home? ,, 

" She has been out, but she has returned," replied the 
butler. 

Vronsky took off his wide-brimmed soft hat, and 
wiped his heated forehead with his handkerchief, and 
smoothed his hair, which was so arranged as to hide his 
bald spot. Then, casting a hasty glance at the stranger, 
who had stopped, and was looking at him earnestly, he 
started to go. 

"This gentleman is a Russian, and was inquiring for 
you/' said the head butler. 

With a mingled feeling of vexation because he never 
could get away from acquaintances, and of pleasure at 
the idea of any distraction from his monotonous exis- 
tence, Vronsky once more looked at the gentleman, who 
had started to go and then stopped, and at one and the 
same time their eyes met. 

VOL. II. — 19 



290 ANNA KARENINA 

" Golenishchef ! " 

"Vronsky!" 

It was indeed Golenishchef, one of Vronsky's school- 
mates in the Corps of Pages. He had belonged to the 
liberal party in the Corps, and, after his graduation, he 
ha4 taken a civil rank, and had not served. The com- 
rades ha4 entirely drifted apart since their graduation, and 
had met only once. At that meeting Vronsky had per- 
ceived that Golenishchef looked down from the lofty 
^eights of, his chosen liberal profession on Vronsky's 
profession and career. Consequently, Vronsky at that 
meeting with Golenishchef had given him that cold 
and haughty reception with which it was his fashion 
to /treat people, as much as to say: "You may like or 
dislike my manner of life, but it is absolutely of no con- 
sequence to me; you must respect me if you want to 
know me." Golenishchef had been scornfully indiffer- 
ent to Vronsky's manner. That meeting, it would seem, 
should have driven them still farther apart; yet now, 
&t t the sight of each other, they each uttered a cry of 
delight. Vronsky had never realized how glad he would 
be to see Golenishchef ;. but the fact was that he did not 
Know how bored he was; He forgot the unpleasant 
impression of their previous meeting, and with mani- 
fest pleasure extended his hand to his old comrade. 
And likewise a look of satisfaction succeeded the 
troubled expression on Golenishchefs face. 

n" How glad I am to see you ! " said Vronsky, with a 
friendly smile which showed his handsome white teeth. 
- "I heard the name Vronsky, but which .... I did not 
know..., I am very,\very glad." 

" But come in. Well, what are you doing ? " 

f( Oh,I have been living here for more than a year, 
working." 
r "Ah ! " said Vronsky, with interest. " But come in." 

Apd, according to the habit of Russians, instead of 
saying, in Russian' vyhat he did not wish to be under- 
stood fey servants, he said in French:^- 

"Pp-ypu know Madame Karenin? We have been 
traveling together. I was just going to her room." 



ANNA KARENINA 291 

And white he was speaking he studied Golenishchef s 
face. 

" Ah ! I did not know," remarked Golenishchef, care- 
lessly; but he did know, '« Have you been here long ? " 

" I ? Oh, this is the fourth day," replied Vronsky, 
continuing to study his companion. 

" Yes ! He is a gentleman, and looks upon things in 
the right light," he said to himself, giving a favorable 
interpretation to Golenishchefs way of turning the con- 
versation ; " he can be presented to Anna; his views are 
all right," 

Vronsky, during this three months which he had been 
spending with Anna abroad, had felt every time that he 
met with new acquaintances a hesitation as to the man- 
ner in which they would look on his relations with Anna, 
and for the most part the men had looked on them " in 
the right light." If he or they had been asked what 
they meant by the expression " in the right light," they 
would have found it hard to tell. In reality, those that 
according to Vronsky looked on it " in the right light " 
had never looked on it at all, but as a general thing con- 
tented themselves with a wise discretion, not asking 
questions or making allusions, and behaved altogether 
as well-bred people behave when presented with delicate 
and complex questions such as surround life on all sides. 
They pretended that they fully appreciated the meaning 
and significance of the situation, recognized and even 
approved of it, but considered it ill-judged and super- 
fluous to explain it. 

Vronsky instantly saw that Golenishchef was one of 
these discreet people, and was therefore glad to meet 
him. 

In fact Golenishchef behaved toward Madame Karenin 
when he was introduced to p her in exactly the manner 
that Vronsky demanded ; it evidently cost him no effort 
to avoid all words that would lead to any awkwardness. 

He had never seen Anna before, and was delighted 
with her beauty, and still more with the perfect sim- 
plicity with which she accepted the situation. She 
flushed when she saw Vronsky come in with Goleni- 



29a ANNA KARENINA 

shchef, and this infantile color which spread over her 
frank and lovely face pleased him immensely. But he 
was delighted because from the very first, as if purposely, 
even in the presence of a stranger, which might have 
caused restraint, she called Vronsky Alekse'f, and told 
how they had just rented a house which the people 
called a palazzo y and how she was going to occupy it with 
him. The simple and straightforward facing of their 
situation was delightful to Golenishchef. Perceiving 
Anna's happy and vivacious manner, knowing Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch and Vronsky, it seemed to him that he 
thoroughly understood her. It seemed to him that he 
understood what she herself did not understand : how 
she could desert Her unhappy husband and her son, and 
lose her good repute, and still feel animated, gay, and 
happy. 

" It is in the guide-book," said Golenishchef, speak- 
ing of the palazzo which Vronsky called by name. 
" There is a superb Tintoretto there. In his latest 
manner." 

" Do you know that ? It is splendid weather ; let 's 
go over and look at it again," said Vronsky, addressing 
Anna. 

"I should like to very much. I will go and put on 
my hat. Did you say it was hot ? " said she, pausing at 
the door and looking back to Vronsky. And again the 
bright color came into her face. 

Vronsky saw by her look that she was uncertain how 
he wished to treat Golenishchef, and that she was afraid 
that her behavior might not be what he desired. 

He looked at her long and tenderly. Then he re- 
plied : — 
' " No, not very." 

And it seemed to her that she comprehended him 
perfectly, and especially that he was satisfied with her, 
and, replying with a smile, she went out with a quick 
and graceful motion. * 

The friends looked at each other, and there came 
into the faces of both an expression of embarrassment; 
as if Golenishchef, admiring her, wished to make some 



ANNA KARENINA 2 93 

complimentary remark, and had not the courage, while 
Vronsky both wished and feared to hear it. 

"Well, then," Vronsky began, so that some conversa- 
tion might be started, " so you are settled here ? Are 
you still interested in the same pursuits ? " he asked, 
remembering that he had been told that Golenishchef 
was writing something. 

"Yes; I have been writing the second part of the 
'Two Origins,' " replied Golenishchef, kindling with de- 
light at this question ; " that is, to be more exact, I am 
not writing yet, but have been collecting and preparing 
my materials. It will be far more extended, and will touch 
on almost all questions. At home, in Russia, they can't 
understand that we are successors of Byzantium," and 
he began a long and vehement explanation. 

Vronsky at first felt awkward because he did not 
know about the first part of the "Two Origins," about 
which the author spoke as if it were something well 
known. But afterward, as Golenishchef began to de- 
velop his thought, and Vronsky saw what he meant, then, 
even though he did not know about the " Two Origins," 
he listened not without interest, for Golenishchef spoke 
well. 

But Vronsky was surprised and annoyed at the irrita- 
ble excitement under which Golenishchef labored while 
talking about the object that absorbed him. The longer 
he spoke, the brighter grew his eyes, the more animated 
were his arguments in refutation of imaginary oppo- 
nents, and the more angry and excited the expression of 
his face. 

Vronsky remembered Golenishchef at the School of 
Pages, — a lad of small stature, thin, nervous, agile, a 
good-hearted and gentlemanly lad, always at the head 
of his class, and he could not understand the reasons 
for such irascibility and he did not approve of it/ And it 
especially displeased him that Golenishchef, a man of good 
social standing, should put himself down on the level 
of these common scribblers, and get angry with them 
because they criticized him. Was it worth while ? It dis- 
pleased him ; but, nevertheless, he felt that Golenishchef 



? 9 4 ANNA KARENINA 

was making himself miserable and he was sorry foi 
him. 

This imhappiness, almost amounting to insanity, was 
particularly noticeable on his mobile and rather hand? 
spmQ face, while he went on so hurriedly and heatedly 
expressing his thoughts that he did not notice Anna's 
return. 

As Anna came in, wearing her hat and with a mantle 
thrown over her shoulders, and stood near them, twirl- 
ing her sunshade in her . lovely, slender hand, Vronsky 
felt a sense of relief in turning away from Golenishchef's 
feverish . eyes fixed keenly on him, and looked with an 
ever new love at his charming companion, radiant with 
life and gayety. 

It was hard for Golenishchef to come to himself, and 
at first he was surly and cross ; but Anna, who was flat- 
teringly amiable toward every one, for such at this 
time was her disposition, quickly brought him into 
sympathy with her gay and natural manner. After es- 
saying various topics of conversation, she brought him 
round to painting, about which he spoke very well, and 
she listened to. him attentively. They walked over to 
the flalazzo and made a thorough inspection of it. 

"I am very glad of one thing," said Anna to Goleni- 
shchef; "Alekse'f will have a nice atelier. Of course 
you 41 take this room ? " she added, turning to Vronsky 
and speaking to him in Russian, using the familiar tut 
(thou) as if she already looked on Golenishchef as an inti- 
mate, before whom it was not necessary to be reserved. 

"Do you paint ?" asked Golenishchef, turning viva- 
ciously to Vronsky. 

" Yes, I used to. paint long ago, and now I am going 
to. take it up again/' replied Vronsky, with color. 
?.n' ( He has great talent," cried Anna, with a radiant 
smile. " Of course I am not a judge. But good judges 
say so." 



ANNA KARENINA 295 



CHAPTER VIII 

Anna, during this first period of freedom and rapid 
convalescence, felt herself inexcusably happy and full 
of joyous life. The memory of her husband's unhappi- 
ness did not poison her pleasure. This memory in one 
way was too horrible to think of. In another, her hus- 
band's unhappiness was the cause of a happiness for 
her too great to allow regret. The memory of every- 
thing that had followed since her sickness, the reconcili- 
ation with her husband, the quarrel, Vronsky's wound, 
his sudden appearance, the preparations for the divorce, 
the flight from her husband's home, the separation from 
her son, — all this seemed like a delirious dream, from 
which she awoke and found herself abroad alone with 
Vronsky. The recollection of the injury which she had 
done her husband aroused in her a feeling akin to dis- 
gust, and like that which a drowning man might experi- 
ence after having pushed away a person clinging to 
him. The other person was drowned. Of course, what 
had been done was evil, but it was the only possible 
salvation, and it was better not to return to those horri- 
ble memories. 

One consoling argument in regard to her' conduct 
occurred to her at the first moment of the rupture, and 
now, whenever she thought of all that had passed, she 
went over this argument. 

" I have done my husband an irrevocable injury/' she 
said to herself, "but at least I get no advantage from 
his misfortune. I also suffer and shall suffer. I give 
up all that wis dearest to me ; I give up my good name 
and my son. I have sinned, and therefore I do not 
desire happiness, do not desire a divorce, and I accept 
my shame and the separation from my son." 

But, however sincere Anna was when she reasoned 
thus, she had not suffered. She had felt no shame. 
With that tact which both she and Vronsky possessed 
to perfection, they had avoided, while abroad, any meet- 
ing with Russian ladies, and they had never put them* 



a 9 6 ANNA KARENINA 

selves into any false position, but had associated onlji 
with those who pretended to understand their situation 
much better than they themselves did. Nor even the 
separation from her son, whom she loved, caused her 
any pain at this time. Her baby, her daughter, was so 
lovely and had so filled her heart since" only the daughter 
was left to her, that she rarely thought of the son. 

The joy of living caused by her convalescence was so 
keen, the conditions of her existence were so new and 
delightful, that Anna felt inexcusably happy. The 
more she came to know Vronsky, the more she loved 
him. She loved him for his own sake and for his love 
for her. The .complete surrender to him was a delight 
His presence was always a joy to her. All the traits of 
his character as she came to know them better and bet- 
ter became to her inexpressibly dear. His appearance, 
now that he dressed in civil attire instead of uniform, 
was as entrancing to her as for a young girl desperately 
in love. In all he said, thought, or did, she saw some- 
thing noble and elevated. . She herself often felt fright- 
ened, at this excessive worship of him. She tried in 
vain to find any imperfection in him. She did not dare 
to confess to him her own inferiority, lest he, knowing 
it, should love her less. And now there was nothing 
that, she feared so. much, although there was not the 
slightest occasion for it, as to lose his love. But she 
could not fail to be grateful to him for the way he 
treated her or to show him how much she prized it. 

Although in her, opinion he had shown such a decided 
vocation for statesmanship, in which he would certainly 
have played an important part, and had sacrificed his am- 
bition for her, still he had never expressed the slightest 
regret. He was more than ever affectionately re- 
spectful, and careful that she should never feel in the 
slightest degree the compromising character of her 
position. This man, so masculine, not only never 
opposed her, but moreover it might be said that he had 
no will besides hers, and his only aim seemed to be to 
anticipate her desires. And she could not but appreci- 
ate this, though this very assiduity in his attentions, this 



ANNA KARENINA 297 

atmosphere of solicitude which he threw around her, 
was sometimes oppressive to her. 

Vronsky, meantime, notwithstanding the complete 
realization of all that he had desired so long, was not 
entirely happy. He soon began to feel that the accom- 
plishment of his desires was only a small portion of the 
mountain of pleasure which he had anticipated. This 
realization now proved to him the eternal error made by 
men who imagine their happiness lies in the accomplish- 
ment of their desires. During the first of the time after 
he had begun to live with her, and had put on his 
citizen's clothes, he experienced all the charm of a free- 
dom such as he had never known before and the free- 
dom of love, and he was satisfied with that ; but not for 
long. He soon began to feel rising in his soul the desire 
of desires — toska, melancholy, homesickness, ennui. 
Involuntarily, he began to follow every light caprice as 
if they were serious aspirations and ends. 

It was necessary to fill sixteen hours each day with 
some occupation, living, as they did, abroad, in perfect 
freedom, away from the social and military duties that 
took Vronsky's time at Petersburg. He could not think 
of indulging in the pleasures such as he had enjoyed as 
a bachelor during his previous trips abroad, for one ex- 
periment of that kind — a scheme of a late supper with 
some acquaintances — reduced Anna to a most unex- 
pected and uncomfortable state of dejection. The enjoy- 
ment with foreign or Russian society was impossible on 
account of the peculiarity of their relation. And to 
amuse himself with the curiosities of the country was 
not to be spoken of, not only because he had already 
seen them, but because as a Russian and a man of sense, 
he could not find in them that immense importance that 
the English are pleased to attach to them. 

And as a hungry animal throws itself on everything 
that presents itself, hoping to find in it something to eat, 
so Vronsky, with perfect spontaneity, attacked, now 
politics, now new books, now painting. 

As, when he was young, he had shown some inclination 
toward art, and, not knowing what to do with his money, 



i 9 % ANNA KARENINA 

had begun to collect engravings, he had tried his hand 
at painting. And now he tobk it up again, and employed 
in it that unexpended superfluity of energy which de- 
manded employment* He had the capacity for appre- 
ciating art, and he thought that this was all that an artist 
needed. After having for some time hung doubtful 
which he would choose, — • the religious, the historical, 
genre, or the realistic, ^— he actually began to paint* He 
understood all kinds, and could get inspiration from each ; 
but he could not imagine that it was possible to be entirely 
ignorant of the various styles of art and to draw inspira- 
tion directly from what is in the soul itself, not caring 
what may be the result or to what famous school it may 
belong. As he did not know this* and drew his inspira- 
tion, not directly from life, but from life as expressed 
in art, so he became easily and speedily inspired, and 
with equal ease and rapidity succeeded in making what 
he undertook to paint a very good resemblance to that 
style which he was trying to imitate. 

More than all Others, the graceful and effective 
French school' appealed to him, and in this Style he 
began* a portrait of Anna in &n Italian costume; and 
this portrait seemed to him and to all that saw it very 
successful. 

CHAPTER IX 

TH£ did, dilapidated palazzo into which thfey ttiovec* 
supplied Vronsky with the agreeable illusion that he 
was not so much a Russian proprietor, a shtalmefster in 
retirement, as he was an enlightened amateur and pro- 
tector of art, in his own modest way an artist, who had 
sacrificed society, his ties, his ambition, for a woman's 
love. This ancient palace, with its lofty stuccoed ceil- 
ings, its frescoed walls, its mosaic floors, its yellow tapes- 
tries, its thick, yellow curtains at the high windows, its 
vases on mantelpiece and consoles, its carved doors, and 
its melancholy halls hung with paintings, lent itself readily 
to his illusion. 

This new rdle which Vronsky had chosen, together 
with their removal to the pal&ZZo and acquaintance with 



ANNA KARENINA a 99 

several interesting persons, which came about through 
Golenishchef, made the first part of this period very 
enjoyable. Under the instruction of an Italian pro- 
fessor of painting, he made some studies from nature, 
and he took up the study of Italian life during the 
Middle Ages. Medieval Italian life became so fasci- 
nating to him that he began to wear his hat and throw 
his plaid over his shoulders in the medieval style, which 
was very becoming to him. 

" Here we are alive, and yet we know nothing," said 
Vronsky one morning to Golenishchef, who came in to 
see him. "Have you seen Mikhai'lofV painting ?" he 
asked, and at the same time handed him a Russian 
paper just received, and indicated an article on this 
artist, who was living in that very city, and had just 
completed a picture about which many reports had long 
been in circulation, and which had been sold on the 
easel. The article severely criticized the government 
and the academy that an artist of- such genius was left 
without any encouragement and aid. 

"I have seen it," replied Golenishchef. "Of course 
he is not without talent, but his tendencies are abso- 
lutely false. He always shows the Ivanof-Strauss- 
Renan conception of Christ and religious art." 

" What is the subject of his painting ? " asked Anna. 

" ' Christ before Pilate.' The Christ is a Jew with all 
the realism of the new school." 

And as this subject was a favorite one with him, he 
began to develop his ideas. 

" I cannot understand how they can fall into such a 
gross mistake. The type of the Christ in art was clearly 
represented by the old masters. Accordingly, if they 
want to paint, not God, but a sage or a revolutionist, let 
them take Franklin or Socrates, or Charlotte Corday, — 
but not Christ. They take the very person whom art 
should not attempt to portray, and then ...." 

"Is it true that this Mikhailof is in such poverty?" 
asked Vronsky, who felt that in his quality of Russian 

1 Count Tolstoi may possibly refer to the great artist Gay, one of whose 
pictures' was exhibited in this country a number of years ago. ^- Ed. 



3 oo ANNA KARENINA 

Maecenas he ought to find some way of aiding the artist, 
whether his painting was good or not. 

"It is doubtful. He is a famous portrait painter. 
Have you not seen his portrait of Madame Vasilchikof ? 
But it seems he does n't care to paint portraits any longer, 
and perhaps that is the reason he is in need. I say 
that...." . 

" Could n't we ask him to paint Anna Arkadyevna's 
portrait ? " 

"Why mine ?" she demanded. "After your portrait 
of me, I want no other. It would be better to let him 
paint Ani [so she called her daughter], or her," she 
added, looking out of the window at the pretty Italian 
nurse, who was just taking the baby into the garden. 
Arid at the same time she gave Vronsky a furtive 
glance. This pretty Italian woman, whose face Vronsky 
had taken as a model for a picture, was the only secret 
woe in Anna's life. Vronsky painted her picture, ad- 
mired her beauty and her medieval quaintness, and 
Anna did not dare to confess to herself that she feared 
she was going to be jealous, and was accordingly all the 
more kind to her and her little boy. 

Vronsky also lo6ked out of the window, and at Anna's 
eyes, and; instantly turning to Golenishchef, said : — 

"And so you know this Mikhallof ? " 

" I have met him. But he is an original — a chudak 

— without any education, you know, one of these new- 
fashioned savages such as you meet with nowadays — 
you know them — these free-thinkers,' who rush headlong 
into atheism, materialism, universal negation. Once," 
Golenishchef f went on to say, either not noticing or not 
wishing to notice that both Vronsky and Anna were 
ready to speak,' " once the free-thinker was a man edu- 
cated in the conceptions of religion, law, and morality, 
who did not ignore the laws by which society is regu- 
lated, and who reached freedom of thought only after 
long struggles. But now we have a new type of them, 

— free-thinkers who grow 'up without even knowing 
that there, are such things as laws in morality and 
religion, who will not admit that sure authorities exist, 



ANNA KARENINA 301 

and who possess only the sentiment of negation ; in a 
word, savages. Mikhaflof is one of these. He is the 
son of a major-domo, or ober-lakei*2X Moscow, and never 
had any education. When he entered the academy, and 
had made a reputation, he was willing to be taught, for 
he is not a fool ; and, with this end in view, he turned to 
that source of all learning, — the magazines and reviews. 
Now you know in the good old times, if a man — let us 
say a Frenchman — wanted to get an education, he 
would study the classics, — the preachers, the tragic 
poets, the historians, the philosophers ; and you can see 
all the intellectual labor that involved. But nowadays 
he turns to negative literature, and succeeds very speed- 
ily in getting a smattering of such a science. And, 
again, twenty years ago, he would have found in this 
same literature traces of the struggle against the 
authorities and secular traditions of the past ; he would 
have understood from this dispute that there was some^ 
thing else. But now he turns directly to a literature 
where the old traditions are of no avail at all, but men 
say up and down there is nothing — natural selection, 
Evolution, struggle for existence, negation, and all. In 
my article.... " 

" Do you know," said Anna, after exchanging several 
glances with Vronsky, and noticing that he was not in- 
terested in the artist's education, but was occupied only 
with the thought of helping him and getting him to 
paint the portrait. "What do you say ? " said she, reso- 
lutely cutting short Golenishchef s verbiage, " let us go 
and see him." 

Golenishchef, after deliberating, readily consented; 
and, as the artist lived in a remote quarter, they had a 
carriage called. An hour later, Anna, occupying the 
same seat in the calash with Golenishchef and Vronsky, 
drove up to an ugly new house in a distant part of the 
city. When they learned from the concierge's wife, who 
came to receive them, that MikhaYlof permitted visitors 
to his studio, but that he was now at his lodgings a few 
steps distant, they sent her to him with their cards, and 
begged to be admitted to see his paintings. 



302 ANNA KARENINA 

i n ii . < . 

CHAPTER X 

The painter Mikhaflof was at work as usual, when 
the cards of Count Vronsky and Golenishchef were 
brought him.. He had been painting all the morning 
in his studio on his. great picture, but, when he reached 
his house, he became enraged with his wife because of 
her failure to make terms with their landlady, who de- 
manded money. 

" I have told you twenty times not to go into explana- 
tions with her. You are a fool anyway; but when you 
try to argue in Italian, you are three times as much of 
a fool," said he, at the end of a long dispute. 

" Why do you get behindhand so ? It is not my fault 
If I had' any money.... " 

" For heaven's sake, give me some peace ! " cried 
Mikhai'lof, his voice thick with tears; and, putting his 
hands over his ears, he hastily rushed to the workroom, 
separated from the sitting-room by a partition, and 
bolted the door. " She has n't any common sense," he 
said to himself, as he sat down at his table, and, opening 
a portfolio, addressed himself with feverish ardor to a 
sketch which he had already begun. 

He never worked with 6 such zeal and success as when 
his life went hard, and especially when he had been 
quarreling with his wife. " Akh ! it. must be some- 
where ! "he said to himself, as he went on with his work. 
He had F begun a study of a man seized with a fit of 
anger. He had made the sketch some time before; 
but he was dissatisfied with it. "No," said he, "that 
one was better.... but where is it?".... He went back 
to his wife with, an air of vexation, and, without looking 
at her, asked his eldest daughter for the piece of paper 
which he had given her. The paper with the sketch on 
it was found, but it was soiled and covered with drops 
of tallow. Nevertheless, he took it as it was, laid it on 
the table, examined it from. a distance, squinting his 
eyes ; then suddenly he smiled, with a satisfied gesture. 

"So! so!" he' cried, taking a pencil, and drawing 



ANNA KARENINA 303 

some rapid lines. One of the tallow spots gave his 
sketch a new aspect. 

He sketched in this new pose; and suddenly remem- 
bered the prominent chin and energetic face of the man 
of whom he bought his cigars, and instantly he gave 
his design the same kind of a face and prominent chin. 
He laughed with delight. The figure ceased to be 
something vague and dead, but became animated, and 
took a form which could not be bettered. This figure 
was alive, and was clearly and indubitably delineated. 
It was possible to correct the sketch in conformity with 
the demands of this figure; it was possible and even 
requisite to set the legs in a different way, to make an 
absolute change in the position of the left arm, to re- 
arrange the hair; but after he had finished these cor- 
rections he made no changes in the figure but only 
cleared away what concealed it. He, as it were, took 
from it the veils behind which it was not wholly visible. 
Each new stroke only the more exposed the entire fig- 
ure in all its energetic power, just as it had suddenly 
appeared to him in the spot made by the wax. He 
laughed with delight. He was carefully finishing his 
design when the two cards were brought him. 

" I will come instantly," he replied. 

He went to his wife. 

" There, come, Sasha, don't be vexed," he said, with 
a smile tender and timid. "You were wrong; so was 
I. I will settle matters." 

And, having made his peace with her, he put on an 
olive-green overcoat with velvet collar, took his hat, and 
went to his studio. His successfully completed sketch 
was already quite forgotten, now he was delighted and 
surprised by the visit of these stylish Russians who had 
come to see him in a carriage. 

In the depth of his soul his opinion on the painting 
which was on his easel at that time was as follows : — 

" No one has ever painted another like it." He did 
not believe that his painting was better than all the 
Raphaels ; but he knew that no one had ever put into 
a picture what he had tried to put into this one. This 



3o 4 ANNA KARENINA 

he knew assuredly, and had known it ever since he had 
begun- to paint it. Nevertheless, the criticisms of others, 
whatever they were, possessed for him an enormous 
weight and stirred him to the depths of his soul. Any 
remark, however insignificant, which showed that the 
critic saw even the smallest part of what he himself saw 
in this picture, stirred him to the depths of his soul. He 
felt that his critics had a depth of insight superior even 
to his own, and he expected to have them discover in 
his picture new features that had escaped his own 
observation. 

And often in the judgments of visitors who came to 
look at it, it seemed to him, he discovered this. He 
hurried to the door of his studio, and, in spite of his 
emotion, was struck by the soft radiance of Anna, who 
was standing in the shadow of the portico and listening 
to something which Golenishchef was saying to her, and 
at the same time eagerly watching the artist's approach. 
The artist, without definite consciousness of it, instantly 
stowed away in the pigeonholes of his brain the impres- 
sion she made on him, to make use of it some day, just 
as he had used the tobacconist's chin. 

The visitors, whose ideas of Mikhailof had been 
greatly modified by Golenishchef s description of him, 
were still more disenchanted when they saw him. Mi- 
khaYlof was a thick-set man, of medium height, and with 
a nimble gait, and in his cinnamon-colored hat, his olive- 
green coat, and his trousers worn tight when the style 
was to wear them loose, produced an unfavorable im- 
pression, increased by the vulgarity of his broad face 
and the mixture of timidity and pretentious dignity 
which it expressed. 

" Do me the honor to enter/ ' he said, trying to as- 
sume an air of indifference, and, going to the vestibule, 
he took a key out of his pocket and opened the door. 



ANNA KARENINA 305 



CHAPTER XI 

As they entered the studio, Mikhartof again glanced 
at his guests, and stored away in his memory the expres- 
sion of Vronsky's face, especially its cheek-bones. Not- 
withstanding the fact that this man's artistic sense was 
always at work storing up new materials, notwithstand- 
ing the fact that his emotion grew greater and greater 
as the crucial moment for their criticism of his work 
approached, still he quickly and shrewdly gathered from 
almost imperceptible indications his conclusions regard- 
ing his three visitors. 

"That one [meaning Golenishchef] must be a Rus- 
sian resident in Italy." Mikhai'lof did not remember 
either his name or the place where he had met him, 
or whether he had ever spoken to him ; he remembered 
only his face, as he remembered all the faces that he 
had ever seen, but he also remembered that he had once 
before classed him in the immense category of preten- 
tiously important but really expressionless faces. An 
abundance of hair and a very high forehead would make 
the casual observer take him to be a man of importance, 
but his face had an insignificant expression of puerile agi- 
tation concentrated in the narrow space between his eyes. 

Vronsky and Anna were, according to MikhaTlof's 
intuition, rich and distinguished Russians, ignorant of 
art, like all rich Russians who play the amateur and the 
connoisseur. 

" They have undoubtedly seen all the old galleries," 
he thought, " and now are visiting the studios of the Ger- 
man charlatans and the imbecile English pre-Raphael- 
ites, and have come to me in order to complete their 
survey." 

He knew very well the fashion in which the dilettanti 

— the more intellectual they were, the worse they were 

— visited the studios of modern painters, with the single 
aim of having the right to say that art was declining, 
and that, the more you study the moderns, the better 
you see how inimitable the great masters of old, were. 

VOL. 11. — 20 



jo6 ANNA KARENINA 

He expected all this, he saw it in their faces, and he 
read it in the indifference with which his visitors con- 
versed together as they walked up and down the studio, 
leisurely examining the manikins and busts, while wait- 
ing for him to take the covering off his painting. 

But, in spite of this, all the time that he was turning 
over his studies, raising his window-blinds, and uncover- 
ing his paintings, he experienced a powerful emotion, 
and all the more so because, though he considered that 
all distinguished and wealthy Russians must necessarily 
be f cattle " and fools, yet Vronsky, and particularly 
Anna, pleased him. 

" Here," he said, stepping back from the easel and 
pointing to the painting, "is the 'Christ before Pilate.' 
Matthew, chapter xxvii." 

, He felt his lips tremble with emotion, and he took his 
place behind his guests. During the few seconds, dur- 
ing which the visitors looked silently at the painting, 
Mikha'flof also looked at it and looked at it with the in- 
difference of a stranger. In those few seconds he an- 
ticipated a superior and infallible criticism from these 
three persons, whom but a moment before he had des- 
pised. He forgot all that he had thought about his 
painting during the three years while he had been paint- 
ing ,it ; he forgot all those merits which had been so 
indubitable to him ; he looked at it now with the cold and 
critical look of a stranger, and found nothing good in it. 
He saw in the foreground the irate : face of Pilate and the 
Christ's serene countenance, and in the middle distance 
the figures of Pilate's servants, and among them John, 
looking" on at the proceedings. Each face, with its at- 
tempted expression, with its faults, with its rectifications, 
each face which, with its own peculiar character, had, as 
it were, been a growth from himself, and had cost him so 
much travail and delight, — and all these faces, which he 
had changed so many times so as to unify them, — all the 
shades of color, all the nuances, obtained with such ex- 
traordinary pains, — all this, taken together and looked 
at in such a way, now seemed to him commonplace, a 
thousand fold commonplace ! The face which he had 



ANNA KARENINA 307 

regarded with the most complacency' — the face of the 
Christ in the very center of the picture, which had roused 
his enthusiasm as he had developed it — was wholly spoilt 
for him when he looked at his painting with their eyes. 

He saw a well-painted picture, — nay, not even well- 
painted, — for now he clearly detected hosts of faults in 
it — a repetition of all those interminable Christsof 
Titian, Raphael, Rubens — and the same soldiers and 
Pilate ! All about it was trivial, poor, and antiquated, 
and even badly painted, — spotty and feeble! They 
would be justified in repeating politely hypocritical re- 
marks in his presence, pitying him and ridiculing him 
after they were gone ! 

The silence, which in reality did not last more than a 
minute, seemed to him intolerably long, and to abridge 
it and show that he was not agitated, he made an effort 
and addressed Golenishchef : — 

" I think that I have had the honor of meeting you 
before," said he, glancing anxiously first at Anna, then 
at Vronsky, so that he might not lose for an instant the 
changing expression of their faces. 

" Certainly; we met at Rossi's the evening when that 
Italian girl, the new Rachel, made a recitation ; don't 
you remember ? " replied Golenishchef, turning away 
his face from the picture without the least show of 
regret, and addressing the artist. 

Seeing, however, that Mikhatlof was expecting him 
to say something about the picture, he added : — 

" Your work has made great progress since the last 
time I saw it; and I am now, just as I was then, greatly 
impressed with your Pilate. You have represented a 
good but feeble man, — a chinovnik to the bottom of 
his soul, — who is absolutely blind to what he is doing. 
But it seems to me .... v 

Mikhal'lof's mobile face suddenly lighted up, his eyes 
gleamed, he wanted to reply ; but his emotion prevented 
him, and he pretended to have a fit of coughing. In 
spite of his low estimation of Golenishchefs artistic in- 
stinct, in spite of the insignificance of the remark, true 
though it was, about the expression of Pilate's face 



308 ANNA KARENINA 

represented as the face of a functionary, in spite of the 
humiliation which such a remark spontaneously elicited 
at the first sight of the painting implicitly, subjected 
him to, — since the more important features of the paint- 
ing were left unnoticed, Mikha'flof was in raptures over 
this criticism. Golenishchef had expressed his own 
conception of Pilate ! A The fact that this observation was 
one out of a million possible observations, all of which, 
as Mikha'flof knew perfectly well, would be true, did 
not diminish for him the significance of Golenishchef's 
remark. He suddenly conceived a liking for his guest, 
and suddenly flew from dejection to enthusiasm. In- 
stantly his whole painting became vital once more with 
a life inexpressibly complex and profound. He again 
tried to say that he himself had that conception of 
Pilate, but his lips trembled so that he had no control 
over them, and he could not say a word. 

Vronsky and Anna were talking in that low tone of 
voice peculiar to picture exhibitions, and caused by the 
desire not to say anything that might give offense to 
the artist, and, more than all, not to let any one hear 
those absurd remarks which are so easily made in 
regard to art. Mikhatlof thought that his picture was 
making an impression on them also, and he approached 
them. 

"What an admirable expression the Christ has," 
said Anna. This expression pleased her more than 
anything else in the painting, and she felt that the 
Christ was the principal figure in it, and therefore that 
this eulogy would be agreeable to the artist. ' She added, 
" One can see that he pities Pilate." 

This, again, -was one of those million accurate but 
idle observations which his picture, and especially the 
figure of the Christ, might have elicited. She said that 
Christ pitied Pilate. In the expression of the Christ 
there was bound to be an expression of pity, because 
there was in. it the expression of love, a supernal color, 
a readiness for death, and a realization of the idleness 
of wprds. Of course,- Pilate should stand for the func- 
tionary, the chinovnik, and the Christ should show pity 



ANNA KARENINA 309 

for him, — since one is the incarnation of the fleshly life, 
the other of the spiritual life. All this and much be- 
sides flashed through Mikha'flofs mind. And once 
more his face was radiant with joy. 

" Yes ! And how that figure is painted ! how much 
atmosphere ! One could go round it," said Golenishchef, 
evidently showing by this observation that he did -not 
approve of the design and scope a of the figure. 

" Yes ; it is a wonderful masterpiece," said Vronsky. 
" How alive those figures in the background are ! There 
is technique for you ! " he added, turning to Goleni- 
shchef, and alluding to a discussion in which he had 
avowed his discouragement in the technique of the art. 

"Yes, yes; very remarkable," said Golenishchef and 
Anna, simultaneously. Notwithstanding the condition 
of enthusiasm to which he had risen, the remark about 
technique nettled Mikharlof ; he scowled and looked at 
Vronsky with an angry expression. He had often heard 
this word technique, and he really did not know what 
was meant by it. He knew that this word signified the 
mechanical ability to paint and sketch, and had nothing 
to do with the thing painted. He had often noticed, as 
in the present case, that technical skill was opposed to 
the intrinsic merit of a work, as if it were possible' to 
paint a bad picture with talent. He knew that it re- 
quired great attention and care in removing the cloth 
not to injure the work, and in removing all the covers; 
but the technique of painting was not in that. If in 
the same way to a little child or to his cook were re- 
vealed what he saw, then the cook or the child would 
not hesitate to express what they saw. But the most 
experienced and skilful of technicians could not paint 
anything by mechanical ability only; it requires that 
the realm of inspiration 2 should be opened before him. 
Moreover, he saw that the very fact of talking about 
technique made it impossible to praise him for it. In 
everything that he had painted and was painting he 

1 Soderzhaniye i muist, literally, " tenor and thought." 

2 Granitsui soderzhaniya, literally " the limits or boundaries of the sub- 
ject, contents, or tenor." 



310 ANNA KARENINA 

saw the glaring faults resulting from the carqlessness 
with which he had removed the covers — faults . impos- 
sible now to rectify without ruining the whole produc- 
tion. And in almost all the figures and faces he saw the 
remains of veils that had not been perfectly removed, 
and spoiled the painting. 

■'The only criticism that I should dare to make, if 
you will allow me ...." said Golenishchef. 

" Oh ! I should be very glad .... beg you to favor me," 
replied Mikha'flof, pretending to smile. 

"It is that you have painted a man made God, and 
not God made man. However, I know that that was 
your intention." 

" I cannot paint any Christ that is not in my heart," 
replied Mikha'flof, gloomily. 

! "Yes, but in that case, excuse me, if you will allow 
me to express my thought .... Your painting is so beau- 
tiful, that this observation can do it no harm ; and, be- 
sides, it is my own individual opinion. You look on 
this in one way. Your very motive is peculiar. Take 
Ivanof, for example, — I imagine that if the Christ is 
to be reduced to the proportions of an historical figure, 
then it would be better for him to choose a new histori- 
cal theme, — -one less hackneyed." 

"But suppose this theme is the grandest of all for 
art?" 

" By searching, others may be found just as grand. 
But the fact is, art, in my' estimation, cannot suffer dis- 
cussion ; now this question is raised in the minds of 
believers or non-believers by Ivanof s painting : Is 
that God, or not God ? and thus the unity of the im- 
pression is destroyed." 

"Why so ? It seems to me that this question can no 
longer exist for enlightened men," replied Mikha'flof. 

Golenishchef was not of this opinion ; and, dwelling 
on his first thought about the unity of the impression 
required by art, he made an onslaught on Mikha'flof. 

MikhaYlof grew excited, but could not say anything 
in defense of his ideas. 



ANNA KARENINA 311 



CHAPTER XII 

Anna and Vronskj', wearying of their friend's learned 
loquacity, exchanged glances. Finally Vronsky, with- 
out saying anything to his host, went over to a small 
painting. 

" Oh ! How charming ! What a gem — wonderful ! 
How fascinating! " said both of them at once. 

'"What pleases them so?" thought Mikhaflof. He 
had completely forgotten this picture, painted three 
years before. He had forgotten all the anguish and 
joy which that painting had caused him while he had 
been working, at it day and night for days at a time — 
he had forgotten about it as he always forgot about his 
pictures when once they were finished. He did not 
even like to look at it, and he had brought it out only 
because he was expecting an Englishman who had 
thought of purchasing it. 

"That is nothing/' he said — "only an old study." 

" But it is capital," replied Golenishchef, very hon- 
estly, falling under the charm of the painting. 

Two children were fishing under the shade of a 
laburnum. The elder, all absorbed in his work, was 
cautiously disentangling his float from a bush. The 
younger one was lying in the grass, leaning his blond, 
frowzy head on his hand, and gazing at the water with 
great, pensive blue eyes. What was he thinking about ? 

The enthusiasm caused by this study brought back 
somewhat of Mikhailof 's first emotion ; but he did not 
love the vain memories of the past, and, therefore, 
pleasant as such praise was to him, he preferred to 
take his guests to a third painting. . 

But Vronsky asked him. if the painting was for sale ; 
but to Mikhalflof, who was excited by the presence of 
visitors, the question of money was very distasteful. 

" It was put up for sale," said he, darkly frowning. 

After his visitors had gone, Mikhaflof sat down 
before- his painting of Christ and Pilate, and mentally 
reviewed all that had been said, and if not s&id had 



312 ANNA KARENINA 

been understood by them. And how strange! the 
observations which seemed so weighty when they were 
present, and when he put himself on their plane of 
observation, now lost all significance. He began to 
examine his work with his artist's eye, and soon re- 
gained his full conviction of its perfection and signifi- 
cance, so that he could shut out all other interests and 
make the effort necessary for his best work. 

The foreshortening in the leg of the Christ was not 
quite correct. He seized his palette and set himself to 
work, and, while he was correcting it, looked long at the 
figure of John, which seemed to him to show the highest 
degree of perfection — and yet his visitors had not even 
noticed it ! Having corrected the leg of the Christ, he 
tried to give this also a few touches, but he felt too 
excited to do it. However, he could not work when he 
was cool any better than he could when he was too near 
the melting point or when he was too clairvoyant. It 
was only one step of transition from indifference to 
inspiration,* and- only when he reached this was work 
possible. But to-day he was too excited. He started 
to cover the canvas. Then he stopped, and, lifting the 
drapery with one hand, he smiled ecstatically, and 
looked for a long time at his St. John. At last, tear- 
ing himself from his contemplation, he let the curtain 
fall, and went home, weary but happy. 

Vronsky, Anna, and Golenishchef, returning to the 
palazzo, were very lively and gay. They talked about 
MikhaYlof and his paintings. The word talent was 
often heard as they talked ; they meant by it an innate 
gift, almost physical, independent of intellect and heart, 
and they tried to express by it all that had been experi- 
enced by the artist. It seemed as if they needed to 
have a term which should express something of which 
they, had not the slightest comprehension, but yet 
wanted to talk about. 

"There is no denying his talent," they said, "but his 
talent is not sufficiently developed, because he lacks 
intellectual culture, a fault common to all Russian 
artists." . 



ANNA KARENINA 313, 

But the painting of the two boys appealed to their 
tastes, and again and again they recurred to it. " How 
charming ! How natural and how simple ! And he 
did not realize how good it was. Certainly, I must not 
fail to buy it," said Vronsky. 



CHAPTER XIII 

Mikhailof sold Vronsky the little picture, and also 
agreed to paint Anna's portrait. He came on the ap- 
pointed day and began his work. 

Even on the fifth sitting the portrait struck every one, 
and especially Vronsky, by its resemblance, and by its 
peculiar beauty. It was remarkable how MikhaTlof was 
able to hit upon her peculiar beauty. 

" One must know her and love her as I love her to 
get her gentle and spiritual expression/' thought Vron- 
sky ; and yet he found in Mikha'ilof's portrait exactly 
that very expression. But this expression was so faith- 
ful that it seemed to him and to others that they had 
always known it. 

" I have spent so much time, and never get ahead," 
said Vronsky, referring to his own portrait of Anna, 
" and he has only to look at her to paint her. That is 
what I call technique." 

"That will come," said Golenishchef, to console him; 
for in his eyes Vronsky had talent, and, moreover, had 
a training which ought to give him a lofty view of art. 
But Golenishchef's belief in Vronsky's talent was sus- 
tained by the fact that he needed Vronsky's praise and 
sympathy with him in his own work, and he felt that 
the praise and support ought to be reciprocal ; it was a 
fair exchange. 

In a stranger's house, and especially in Vronsky's 
Palazzo^ Mikhailof was an entirely different man from 
what he was in his own studio. He showed himself 
almost venomously respectful, as if he were anxious 
to avoid all intimacy with people whom at heart he did. 
not respect. He always called Vronsky "your excel- 



314 ANNA KARENINA 

lency " ; l and, in spite of Vronsky's and Anna's repeated 
invitations, he never would stay to dinner, or come except 
at the hours for the sitting. Anna was even more gen- 
ial to him than to the others, and grateful for her 
portrait ; Vronsky was more than polite to him, and was 
anxious for his criticism on his paintings ; Golenishchef 
never lost an opportunity of inculcating sound theories 
of art : still Mikhaflof remained just as cool as ever to 
them all. But Anna felt that he liked to look at her, 
even though he avoided all conversation with her. 
When Vronsky wanted to talk about his own work he 
remained obstinately silent, and he was just as obsti- 
nately silent when he was shown Vronsky's painting 
and pictures, and he took no pains to conceal the weari- 
ness which Golenishchef s sermons caused him. 

On the whole Mikhallof, by his distant and disagree- 
able, as it were hostile, behavior, was very unpopular 
with them, even after they came to see him closer; and 
they were glad when the sittings were over, and the 
painter, having completed an admirable portrait, ceased 
to come. Golenishchef was the first to express a thought 
which all had been thinking : that Mikhallof was envious 
of Vronsky. 

"We will agree that he is not envious because he has 
talent; but he is vexed to see a wealthy man, of high 
position, a count, — and apparently they are all vexed 
at that, — reaching without especial trouble the skill 
to -paint 'as well, if not better, than he, though he has 
devoted his life to painting ; but, above all, at your 
mental culture, which he has not." 

Vronsky took MikhaTlof's part, but he felt at heart 
that his friend was right ; for it seemed to him ex- 
tremely natural that a man in an inferior position should 
envy him. 

The* two portraits of Anna, painted from the life by 
him and Mikhatlof, -might have shown Vronsky the 
difference between him and Mikhallof, but he did not 
see it. Only after Mikhaflof had finished his portrait 
he ceased to work at his, having decided that it was a 

/* "/' >* Vashetiyatelstvo.*' 1 ' 



ANNA KARENINA 315 

superfluity ; but he still devoted himself to his painting 
of medieval life. He hirnself, and Golenishchef, and 
Anna especially, felt that it was very good, because it 
resembled the works of the old masters far more than 
Mikha'ilof's painting did. 

Mikhailof, meantime, in spite of the pleasure which 
he took in doing Anna's portrait, was even more glad 
than the others were when the sittings came to an end, 
and he no longer had to hear Golenishchef's discourses 
about art, and was allowed to forget Vronsky's paint- 
ings. He knew that it was impossible to prevent 
Vronsky from amusing himself with painting ; he knew 
that he, and all other dilettanti, had the right to paint 
as much as they pleased ; 'but it was disagreeable to him. 
No one can prevent a man from making for himself a 
big wax doll, and kissing it ; but if this man r takes his 
doll and sits in the presence of a lover, and begins to 
caress his doll as the lover caresses the woman he loves, 
then it becomes unpleasant to the lover. Vronsky's 
painting produced on him a similar feeling; it was ridic- 
ulous and vexatious, pitiable and disgusting. 

Vronsky's enthusiasm for painting and the Middle 
Ages was, however, of short duration ; his art instinct 
was strong enough to prevent him from finishing his 
painting. His work came to a standstill. He had a 
dim consciousness that his faults, at first apparently 
trifling, would grow more and more grievous if he went 
on. The same thing happened to him that happened 
to Golenishchef, who was conscious that he had nothing 
to say, and kept deceiving himself with the notion that 
his thought was not yet ripe, that he was training it, and 
collecting materials. But this made Golenishchef bitter 
and irritable, while Vronsky could not deceive himself, 
or torture himself, and, least of all, grow irritable. With 
his habitual decision of character, without seeking to 
justify himself or to offer explanations, he simply gave 
up his painting. 

But, without this occupation, his life in this little 
Italian city quickly became intolerable ; the palazzo sud- 
denly appeared old and filthy ; the spots on the curtains 



3 1 6, ANNA KARENINA 

assumed a sordid aspect ; the cracks in the mosaics, the 
broken stucco of the cornices, the eternal Golenishchef, 
the Italian professor, and the German tourist, all became 
so unspeakably wearisome that it was necessary to make 
a change. Accordingly he and Anna, who was surprised 
by. this abrupt disenchantment, decided to return to 
Russia to live in the country. Vronsky wanted to pass 
through Petersburg to make business arrangements with 
his brother, and Anna was anxious to see her son. They 
decided to spend the summer on Vronsky's large patri- 
monial estate. 



CHAPTER XIV 

i 

Levin had been married three months. He was 
happy,, but in a different way from what he had antici- 
pated. At every step he had found that his former 
expectations were illusory, and that his joy lay in what 
he had not anticipated. He was happy, but as he went 
on in his married existence he discovered at each step 
that it was utterly different from what he had imagined 
it would be. At each step he experienced what a man 
would experience who had been charmed with the grace- 
ful and joyful motion of a boat on the sea, and after- 
wards should find himself in the boat. He saw that it 
was not enough to sit still and not rock ; it was neces- 
sary to be on the lookout, never for a moment forgetful 
of the course, to think of the water under his feet, to 
row, — and rowing for unaccustomed arms is hard ; easy 
enough it is to look on, but it is hard, very hard, to work, 
even though it be very agreeable. 

When still a bachelor, looking at the conjugal life of 
others, at their little miseries, quarrels, jealousies, he had 
often laughed scornfully in his heart of hearts. In his 
future married life never should any such thing happen ; 
even all the external forms of his private life should be 
in every respect absolutely different from that of others. 
And lo, and behold, instead of that, his life with his wife 
not only refused to arrange itself peculiarly, but, on the 



ANNA KARENINA 317 

contrary, was wholly made up of those very same insig- 
nificant trifles which he had formerly so despised, but 
which now, in spite of him, assumed an extraordinary 
and irrefutable importance. And Levin saw that the 
regulation of all these trifles was not nearly so easy as 
he had supposed it would be. Notwithstanding the 
fact that Levin supposed he had the most delicate com- 
prehension of family life, he, like all men, had imagined 
that it was only meant as the gratification of his love, and 
that nothing should prevent it and that no petty details 
ought to interfere with it. According to his idea, he was 
to do his work, and rest from it in the delights of love. 
His wife was to be his love, and that was all. 

But, like all men, he forgot that she, too, had to work. 
His surprise was great to find how this charming and 
poetic Kitty, in the first weeks, even in the first days, of 
their married life, could be thinking, planning, taking 
charge of the table-cloths, the furniture, the mattresses, 
the table service, the kitchen. Even during their en- 
gagement he was dumfounded at the decided way in 
which she refused to travel abroad and at her determi- 
nation to go immediately to their country home, as if 
she knew what was needful, and could think of other 
things besides her love. It vexed him then, and now 
many times he still felt vexed, to find that she took 
upon herself these petty cares and labors. 

But he saw that it was unavoidable ; and, as he loved 
her, although he could not see why she did such things, 
and although he laughed at her for doing them, he could 
not help admiring. He laughed to see how she disposed 
the new furniture which came from Moscow, how she 
rearranged everything in her room and his, how she 
hung the curtains, provided for the guest-rooms and the 
rooms that Dolly would have, directed her new cham- 
bermaid, how she ordered the old cook to provide for 
dinner, how she discussed with Agafya MikhaYlovna, 
whom she removed from the charge of the provisions. 

He saw how the old cook smiled gently as he received 
fantastic orders, impossible to execute ; he saw how 
Agafya MikhaYlovna shook her head pensively at the 



3 i 8 ANNA KARENINA 

new measures introduced by her young mistress into 
the larder, he saw how wonderfully charming she was 
when she came to him, half laughing, half crying, to 
complain because her maid, Masha, insisted on treating 
her like a child, and no one would heed her orders. It 
all seemed to him charming, but strange, and he thought 
it-would be better if it, were otherwise. , . 

He could not comprehend the sense of metamorphosis 
which she felt at finding herself the mistress, permitted 
to see to the preparation of cauliflower and kvas y or 
confections, to spend all the money she. wanted, and to 
command whatever pastry she pleased, after having 
always had her parents to restrain her fancies. 

'She was now making joyful preparations for the ar- 
rival of -Dolly and the children, and was thinking of the 
piqs which she would have made for them, and how she 
would surprise Dolly with all her new arrangements. She 
herself could not have given any reasons for it, but it was 
a fact that the details of housekeeping had an irresistible 
attraction for her. She foresaw evil days . to come, in- 
stinctively feeling the approach of spring; and knowing 
that unhappy days would also surely come, she prepared 
her little nest as* well as she could, and made haste both 
to build it and to learn how to build it. 

This zeal for trifles, so entirely, opposed to Levin's 
lofty ideal of happiness, seemed to him one thing that 
disillusioned him ; while this same activity, the meaning 
of which- escaped him, but which he could not help lov- 
ing, was one of the things that gave him new delight. 

The quarrels were also a disenchantment and a charm ! 
Never had it entered into Levin's head that between 
him and his wife there could be. any relations other than 
those of gentleness, respect, tenderness ; and here, even 
in their honeyrrioon, they were disputing, so that Kitty 
declared that he did not love her, that he was selfish, 
and burst into tears and wrung her hands. 

The first of these little differences arose in conse- 
quence of a, ride which Levin took to see a new farm; 
he stayed half an hour longer than he had said, having 
missed his. way in trying to come home by a shorter 



ANNA KARENINA 319 

road. He rode homeward, thinking only of her, of her 
love, of her happiness ; and the nearer he came to the 
house the more his heart glowed with affection for . his 
wife. He hurried to her room with the same feeling, 
only much intensified, as he had experienced on the 
day when he went to the Shcherbatskys' to offer himself. 
An angry expression, such as he had never seen in her 
face, received him. He was going to kiss her; she 
pushed him away. 

" What is the matter ? " 

" You've been enjoying...." she began, wishing to 
show herself cold and bitter. 

But hardly had she opened her mouth when the ridic- 
ulous jealousy, which had been tormenting her for half 
an hour while she had been waiting for him, sitting on 
the window-seat, broke out in a torrent of angry words. 

He then began for the first time to understand clearly 
what before he had seen only confusedly, when after the 
crowning they went out of the church. He saw that 
she was not only near to him, but that he did not know 
at all where his own personality began or her person- 
ality ended. He felt this by the painful sensation of 
internal division which he experienced at that instant. 
At first he was offended, but at the same moment he 
realized that he had no right to be offended, because she 
and he were one and the same ! At that first instant he 
experienced a feeling such as a man might have when, 
having suddenly received a sharp blow from behind, turns 
around with an angry desire to revenge himself on the 
culprit, and discovers that he has accidentally inflicted 
the blow on himself, that there is no one to be angry with, 
and that he must bear the pain and appease it. 

Never again did he experience this feeling with such 
force, but this first time it was long before he could give 
an account of it. A natural impulse impelled him to 
exonerate himself, and show Kitty how wrong she was ; 
but that would have irritated her still more and increased 
the rupture which was the cause of all their unhappiness. 
A natural impulse tempted him to disavow the blame 
and cast it at her; but a second and stronger impulse 



3 20 ANNA KARENINA 

came to close the breach as quickly as possible and not 
let it grow wider. For him to remain under the shadow 
of an injustice was cruel;- but, under the pretext of a 
justification, to cause her pain was still worse. Like a 
man half asleep, wearied with pain, he wished to free him- 
self from it, to throw off the painful place ; but, on fully 
waking, he found that the painful place was himself. 
Patience only was necessary to give relief to the pain, 
and he tried to apply this remedy - . 

Reconciliation followed. Kitty felt herself in the 
wrong, and, though she did not confess it, was more 
than ever tender to him, and they felt a new and doubled 
happiness of love. But this did not prevent these dif- 
ferences from coming up, and coming up very frequently, 
from the most unexpected and insignificant causes. 
These collisions often arose from the fact that they were 
still ignorant of what was indispensable for each, and 
from the fact that during all this first period they both 
were often in a bad frame of mind. When one was 
happy and the other depressed, then peace was dis- 
turbed, but when they both happened to be in low spirits, 
then such childish things were sufficient to provoke mis- 
understandings, that they could not even remember 
afterward what they were quarreling about. It is true, 
when they were both in good spirits, their joy of life was 
doubled. But nevertheless this first period was a trying 
time for them both. All those early days, they felt with 
especial vividness the strain, just as if both of them 
were pulling in contrary ways on the chain that bound 
them. Especially the honeymoon, from which Levin ex- 
pected so much, was far from honey-sweet, but remained 
in the memories of them both the most trying and humili- 
ating period of their lives. Both of them afterwards 
tried to blot from their memories all the ugly, shameful 
incidents of this unhealthy period, during which they so 
rarely found themselves in a normal state of mind, were 
so rarely themselves. 

Life became better regulated only after their return 
from Moscow, where they made a short visit in the 
third month after the wedding. 



ANNA KARENINA 321. 



CHAPTER XV 

They were just back from Moscow, and enjoying their 
solitude. Levin was sitting at his library table, writing ; 
Kitty, dressed in a dark violet dress, which she had worn 
in the first days of their marriage, and which Levin' had 
always liked, was making broderie a?iglaise y as she sat 
on the divan, — on the great leather divan which ever 
since the days of Levin's father and grandfather had 
stood in the library. 

Levin enjoyed her presence while he was writing and 
thinking. He had not abandoned his occupations, — 
his farming, and the treatise in which the principles 
of his new method of conducting his estate were to be 
evolved. But, as before, these occupations and thoughts 
seemed to him small and useless in comparison with the 
gloom that overshadowed his life ; so now they seemed 
just as petty and unimportant in comparison with the 
life before him, irradiated as it was with the full light 
of joy. He kept up his occupations, but felt now that 
the center of gravity of his interests had shifted, and 
that consequently he looked otherwise and more clearly 
than formerly at the matter. 

In former days this occupation seemed like the salva- 
tion of his life ; in former days he felt that without it 
life would be altogether gloomy ; now these occupations 
were necessary in order that his life might not be too 
monotonously bright. As he took up his manuscript 
again, reading over what he had written, he felt with sat- 
isfaction that the work was worth his attention. Many 
of his former thoughts seemed to him exaggerated and 
extravagant, but many of the gaps became clearly evi- 
dent to him as he reviewed the whole subject. He was 
now writing a new chapter, in which he treated of the 
causes for the unfavorable condition of Russian agri- 
culture. He argued that the poverty of the country was 
caused not entirely by the unequal distribution of the land 
property and false economical tendencies, but that this 
cooperated with the abnormal introduction of a veneer 

VOL. II. — 21 



322 ANNA KARENINA 

of civilization, especially the means of communication, 
the railways, which produced £ri exaggerated centraliza- 
tion in the cities, the development of luxury, and conse- 
quently- the creation of new industries at the expense of 
agriculture, an extraordinary , extension of the credit sys- 
tem and its concomitant — stock speculation. It seemed 
to hirri.that with a normal development of riches in the 
empire all r these signs of exterior civilization would 
appear only, when the cultivation of the land should 
have attained a proportional development, when it 
should have at least been established on correct, deter- 
mining conditions ; that the wealth of a country ought 
to increase at a regular ratio, and in such a way that 
agriculture should not be outstripped by other branches 
of wealth ; that the means of intercommunication ought 
to be developed in conformity with the natural develop- 
ment of agriculture, and that in view of our improper 
use of -the land, the railways, constructed not by reason 
of. actual necessity, but from political motives, were pre- 
mature, and instead of the cooperation which they were 
expected to give to agriculture, they arrested it by encour- 
aging'the spread of manufacturing and the credit system ; 
and that, therefore, just as a one-sided and premature 
development of one organ in the body would prevent its 
general development, so for the general development of 
wealth* in Russia, the credit system, the means of inter- 
communication, the recrudescence of manufacturing in- 
dustries, however indispensable they may have been in 
Europe, where they are opportune, have in Russia done 
nothing but harm by keeping from sight the most im- 
portant question as to the organization of agriculture. 

While Levin was writing, Kitty was thinking how her 
husband, on the evening before they left Moscow, had 
watched unnaturally the young Prince Charsky, who, 
with remarkable lack of tact, had made love to her. 
"He is jealous," she said to herself. " Bozhe mot ! how 
good and stupid he is i To be jealous of me ! If he 
only knew that for me they are all like Piotr the cook ! " 
And she glanced with a strange feeling of proprietorship 
atthe back of her husband's head and his sunburnt neck. 



ANNA KARENINA 323 

tf It is a shame to interrupt him, but he has plenty of 
time. I must see his face ; will he feel how I am look- 
ing at him ? I will tvill for him to turn round. There, 
I will make him." 

And she opened her eyes as wide as she could, as if 
to concentrate more strength into her gaze. 

" Yes, they attract all the best sap and give a false 
appearance of wealth," murmured Levin, ceasing to 
write, and conscious that she was looking at him and 
smiling. He turned around. 

" What is it ? " he asked, smiling, and getting up. 

"He did turn round," she thought. "Nothing; I 
only willed to make you turn around," and she looked 
at him as if to fathom whether he was vexed or not 
because she had disturbed him. 

" Well, how good it is to be alone together ! For me, 
at least," said he, radiant with joy, going to where she sat. 

" I am so happy here ! I never, never, want to go 
away again, especially not to Moscow." 

" But what were you thinking about?" 

"I? I was thinking.... no, no; go on with your 
writing ! don't let your mind be distracted," she replied, 
pouting. " I must cut all these eyelet-holes now ; do you 
see?" 

And she took her scissors and began to snip. 

" No ; tell me what you were thinking about ! " he 
insisted, sitting down near her, and following all the 
movements of her little scissors. 

" Oh ! What was I thinking about ? About Moscow 
and — the nape of your neck ! " * 

" What have I done to deserve this great happiness ? 
It is supernatural. It is too good," said he, kissing her 
hand. 

" To me, on the contrary, the happier I am the more 
natural I find it ! " 

"You have a little stray curl," he said, turning her 
head around carefully. 

" A stray curl ? let it be. We must, think about seri- 
ous things." 

But their conference was interrupted; and, when 



3 2 4 . ANNA KARENINA 

Kuzma came to announce tea, they separated as if they 
were guilty. 

" Are they returned from town ? " asked Levin of- 
Kuzma. 

"They're just back, — they're unpacking the things 
now." 

" Come as quickly as you can," said Kitty, going from 
the library. 

Levin, left alone, shut up his books and papers in a 
new portfolio, bought by his wife, washed his hands in 
a new wash-basin supplied with elegant new appurte- 
nances, also bought by her, and, smiling at his thoughts, 
nodded his head disapprovingly ; he was tormented by 
a feeling which resembled remorse. His life had be- 
come too indolent, too spoiled. It was a life of a Cap- 
uan, and he felt ashamed of it. "To live so is not 
good," he thought. "Here, for three months, I have 
scarcely done a thing ! To-day, almost for the first 
time, I have set about anything seriously, and what was 
the result ? I have hardly begun before I give it up. 
I even neglect my ordinary occupations. I don't watch 
the men. I don't go anywhere. Sometimes I am sorry 
to leave her; sometimes I see that she is out of spirits ; 
I who believed that existence before marriage counted 
for nothing, and that life only began after marriage! 
And here, for three months, I have been spending my 
time in absolute idleness. This must not go on. I 
must do something. Of course, she is not to blame, and 
one could not lay the least blame on her. But I ought 
to have shown more firmness, and have preserved my 
manly independence ; otherwise, I shall get into con- 
firmed bad habits.... of course, she is not to blame .... " 

A discontented man finds it hard not to blame some 
one or other for his discontent, and generally the very 
person who is nearest. And so Levin felt vaguely that 
while the fault was not his wife's — and he could not 
lay it to her charge — it was owing to her bringing up ; 
it was too superficial and frivolous. "That fool of a 
Charsky, for example, .... I know she wanted to get rid 
of him ; but she did not know how." 



ANNA KARENINA 325 

Then he went on again : — 

" Yes ! Besides the petty interests of housekeeping .... 
she looks out for those and enjoys them; besides her 
toilet and her broderie anglaise, she has no serious inter- 
ests, no sympathy in my labors, in my schemes, or for 
the muzhiks, no taste for reading or music ; and yet she 
is a good musician. She does absolutely nothing, and 
yet she is perfectly content." 

Levin in his heart judged her thus, and did not com- 
prehend that his wife was making ready for the time of 
activity which was ere long to come to her, when she 
would be at once wife, mistress of the house, 1 mother, 
nurse, teacher. He did not understand that she knew 
this by intuition, and in preparing for this terrible task 
could not blame herself for these indolent moments, 
and the enjoyment of love, which made her so happy, 
while she was cheerily building her nest for the future. 



CHAPTER XVI 

When Levin came up-stairs again his wife was sitting 
in front of the new silver samovar, behind the new tea- 
set, reading a letter from Dolly, with whom she kept up 
a brisk correspondence. Old Agafya Mikhaiflovna, with 
a cup of tea, was cozily sitting at a small table beside 
her. 

"You see your lady has asked me to sit here," said 
the old woman, looking affectionately at Kitty. 

These last words showed Levin that the domestic 
drama which had been going on between Kitty and* 
Agafya Mikhaiflovna was at an end. He saw that, not- 
withstanding the chagrin which Agafya Mikhaiflovna 
felt at resigning the reins of government to the new 
mistress, Kitty was victorious, and had just made peace 
with her. 

"Here I have been looking over your letters," said 
Kitty, handing her husband an illiterate-looking en- 
velop. " I think it is from that woman .... you know ... 

1 Khozdlka doma. 



326 ANNA KARENINA 

of your brother's I have not read it, but this is from 

Dolly .... imagine it; she has been to take Grisha and 
Tahia to a children's ball at the Sarmatskys'. Tania 
was dressed like a little marchioness." 

But Levin was not listening. With a flushed face he 
took the letter from Marya Nikolayevna, his brother 
Nikolafs discarded mistress, and began to read it; ' This 
was already the second time that she had written him. 
In her first, letter she told him that Nikolar had sent her 
away without reason, and she added, with touching sim- 
plicity, that she asked no assistance and wanted nothing, 
though she was reduced to penury, but that the thought 
of what Nikola'f Dmitritch would do without her in his 
feeble condition was killing her. She begged his' brother 
to look out for him. r 

Her second letter was in a different tonel Shfe said 
that.she had found Nikolar Dmitrievitch and was living 
with him again in Moscow, that she had gone with him 
to a provincial city, where he had received an appoint- 
ment. There he had quarreled with the chief, and 
immediately started for Moscow ; but on the way he 
had been taken so violently ill that he would probably 
never leave his bed again. " He constantly calls for 
you, and, besides, we have no money/' she wrote. 

;" Read what Dolly writes about you," Kitty began ; 
but, when she saw her husband's dejected face, she 
suddenly stopped speaking. Then she said : — 

"What is it — what has happened?" * 

" She writes me that Nikolar, my brother, is dying. 
I must go to him." 

Kitty's" face suddenly changed; The thought of 
Tania as a r little marchioness, of Dolly, and all, van- 
ished. 

"When shall you. go ?" 

" To-morrow/' 

"May I go with you ? " she asked. 

"Kitty! *what an idea!" he replied, reproach- 
fully. 

" Why what a?i idea ? " she exclaimed, vexed to see 
her proposal received with , such bad grace. " Why, 



ANNA KARENINA 327 

pray, should I not go with you ? I should not hinder 
you in any, way. I...." / 

" I am going because my brother is dying/' said 
Levin. " Why should you go ? " 

" For the same reason that you do." .... 

"At atime so solemn'- for me, she thinks only of the 
discomfort of being left alone," said Levin to himself, 
and this excuse for taking part in such a solemn duty 
angered him. 

" It is impossible," he replied sternly. 

Agafya Mikhallovna, seeing that a quarrel was immi- 
nent, quietly put down her cup and went out. Kitty 
did not even notice it. Her husband's tone wounded 
her all the more deeply because he evidently did not 
believe what she said. 

" I tell you; if you go, I am going too. I shall certainly 
go with you. I certainly am going," said she, with 
angry determination. "Why is it impossible? /Why 
did you say that ? " 

" Because God knows when or in what place I shall 
find him, or by what means I shall reach him. You 
would only hinder me," said he, doing his best to retain 
his self-control. 

" Not at all. I don't need anything. Where you 
can go, I can go too, and .... " 

" Well ! If it were for nothing else, it would be be- 
cause of that woman, with whom you cannot come in 
contact." .... 

"Why not? I know nothing about all that, and 
don't want to know. I know that my husband's brother 
is dying ; that my husband is going to see him ; and I 
am going too, because .... " 

" Kitty ! don't be angry ! and remember that in such 
a serious time it is painful for me to have you add to 
my grief by showing such weakness, — the fear of 
being alone. There, now, if it would bore you to be 
alone, go to Moscow." .... 

"You ahvays ascribe to me such miserable senti- 
ments," she cried, choking with tears of vexation and 
anger. " I am not so weak .... I know that it is my 



328 ANNA KARENINA 

duty to be with my husband when he is in sorrow, and 
you want to wound me on purpose. You don't want to 
take me.'/ .... 

" No ! this is frightful ! to be such a slave ! " cried 
Levin, rising from the table, no longer able to hide his 
anger; at the same instant he- perceived that he was 
doing himself harm. 

"Why, then, did you get married ? You might have 
been free. Why — if you repent already ? " — and Kitty 
fled into the drawing-room. 

When he went to find her, she was sobbing. 

He began to speak, striving to find words not to per- 
suade her, but to calm her. She would not listen, and 
did not allow one of his arguments. He bent over her, 
took one of her recalcitrant hands, kissed it, kissed her 
hair, and then her hands again ; but still she refused to 
speak. But when, at length, he took her head between 
his, two 'hands and called her "Kitty," she softly wept, 
and the reconciliation was complete. 

It was decided that they should go together on the 
next day... Levin told his wife he was satisfied that she 
wished- nothing but to be useful, and agreed that Marya 
Nikolayevna's presence with his brother would not be 
an impropriety ; but at the bottom of his heart he was 
dissatisfied with himself and with her. He was dis- 
satisfied with her because she would not let him go alone 
when it .was necessary. And how strange it was for him 
to think that he who such a short time before had not 
dared to believe in the possibility of such a joy as her 
loving him, now felt unhappy because she loved him too 
well. And he was dissatisfied with himself because he 
had yielded in such a weak way. In the depths of his 
heart he was even more dissatisfied to think of the in- 
evitable acquaintance between his wife and his brother's 
mistress. The thought of seeing his wife, his Kitty, in 
the same room with this woman, filled him with horror 
and repulsion. 

«) 



ANNA KARENINA 329 



CHAPTER XVII 

The inn where Nikolai Levin was dying was one of 
those establishments which are found in governmental 
cities, built on a new and improved model, with the very 
best regard for neatness, comfort, and even elegance, 
but which the public frequenting them cause to degener- 
ate with extraordinary rapidity into filthy grog-shops 
with pretensions to modern improvements and by reason 
of this very pretentiousness become far worse than old- 
fashioned inns which are simply filthy. This inn had 
already reached this condition. The soldier in dirty uni- 
form, who served as Swiss, and was smoking a cigar- 
ette in the vestibule ; the perforated cast-iron staircase, 
gloomy and unpleasant ; the impertinent waiter in a dirty 
black coat; the common "hall " with its table decorated 
with a dusty bouquet of wax flowers; the dirt, dust, and 
slovenliness everywhere and at the same time a certain 
new restlessness and self-sufficiency characteristic of 
these railway days — everything about this inn produced 
a feeling of deep depression in the Levins after their 
recent happiness and especially from the fact that the 
wretched condition of the inn was wholly irreconcilable 
with what was waiting for them. 

As usual, after they had been asked what priced rooms 
they wanted, it proved that the best rooms were taken, 
— one by the supervisor of the railroad,- another by a 
lawyer from Moscow, the third by Princess Astavyeva 
from the country. One disorderly bedroom was left 
for them, with the promise that they should have the 
one next to it, when evening came. Levin took his wife 
to it, vexed to find his prognostications so speedily real- 
ized, and impatient because when his heart was over- 
whelmed with emotion at the thought of how he should 
find his brother, he was obliged to get settled instead of 
hurrying to his brother. 

" Go, go ! " said Kitty, with a melancholy look of 
contrition. 

He left her without saying a word, and just outside 



330 ANNA KARENINA 

the door he ran against Marya Nikolayevna, who had 
just heard of his arrival but had not ventured to knock 
at his room. She had not changed since he last saw her 
in Moscow. She wore the same woolen dress, without 
collar or cuffs, and her pock-marked face expressed the 
same unfailing good nature. 
, "Well! How is he? tell me!" 

"Very bad. He doesn't sit up, and he is all the 
time asking for you. You .... she .... Is your wife with 
you ? '-' 

I^evin at first did not see why she seemed confused ; 
but she immediately explained herself. 

"I am going to the kitchen," she went on to say; 
" he will be glad ; he remembers seeing her abroad." 

Levin perceived a that she meant his wife, and did not 
know what to say. 

" Come," said he, " let us go to him." 

But they had not gone a step before the chamber 
door opened and Kitty appeared. Levin grew red with 
vexation and mortification to see his wife in such a pre- 
dicament; but Marya Nikolayevna was still more con- 
fused, and crouching back against the wall ready to cry, 
she caught the ends of her apron and wound it around 
her red hands, not knowing what to say or to do. 

For an instant Levin saw an expression of lively 
curiosity in the look with which Kitty regarded this 
terrible creature, so incomprehensible to her; it lasted 
but a moment. 

" Tell me ! what is it ? how is he ? " she asked, turning 
to her husband, and then to the woman. 

"We cannot talk in the corridor," replied Levin, look- 
ing with an expression of annoyance at a gentleman 
who, with leisurely Steps, as if on his own business bent, 
was coming along the corridor just at this time. 

"Well, come into the room, then," said Kitty, address- 
ing the apologetic Marya Nikolayevna; then seeing the 
look of alarm on her husband's face, she added, " Or 

1 Marya Nikolayevna in speaking of Nikola! Levin as well as of Kitty 
uses the third person plural, a form of exaggerated obsequiousness common 
with persons addressing their superiors. 



ANNA KARENINA 331 

rather go — go, and send for me," and she turned back 
to the room. 

Levin hastened to his brother. 

He had never expected to see and experience what 
now he saw and experienced. He expected to find him 
in that state of illusion so common to consumptives, and 
which had so struck him during his visit the preceding 
autumn. He expected to find him with the physical indi- 
cations of approaching death more distinct than before 
— greater feebleness, greater emaciation, but practically 
about the same state of things. He expected that he 
should have the same feeling of pity for this well-beloved 
brother, and of horror at the presence of death, — only 
intensified. He was quite prepared for this. But what 
he saw was absolutely different. 

In a little, close, dirty, ill-smelling room, the paneled 
walls of which were covered with red stains of expecto- 
ration, separated by a thin partition from another room, 
where conversation was going on, r he saw lying on a 
wretched bed moved out from the wall a body covered 
with a counterpane. One hand huge as a rake, and hold- 
ing in a strange way by the end a sort of long and slender 
bobbin, was on the outside of the counterpane. .The 
head, resting on the pillow, showed the thin hair glued 
to his temples, and a strained, almost transparent brow. 

"Can it be that this horrible body is my brother 
Nikolai ? " thought Levin ; but as he came near, he saw 
his face and the doubt ceased. In spite of the terrible 
change that had taken place, it was enough to glance 
at the lively eyes turned toward him as he entered, or 
the motions of his mouth under the long mustache, 
to recognize the frightful truth that this dead body was 
indeed his living brother. 

Nikola*' s gleaming eyes gazed at his brother with a 
stern and reproachful look. His look seemed to bring 
living relations between living beings. Konstantin in- 
stantly felt the reproach in the eyes fixed on him and 
regret for his own happiness. 

When Konstantin took his brother's hand, NikolaT 
smiled • but the smile was slight, almost imperceptible, 



33 2 ANNA KARENINA 

and in spite of it the stern expression of his eyes did 
not change. 

"You did not expect to find me so," said he, with 
effort. 

"Yes. ...no," replied Levin, with confusion. "Why 
did n't you let me know sooner, before my marriage ? I 
had inquiries made for you everywhere/' 

He wanted to keep on speaking, so as to avoid a pain- 
ful silence ; but he did not know what to say, the more 
as his brother looked at him without replying, and seemed 
to be weighing each one of his words. Finally he told 
him that his wife had come with him, and Nikola'f ap- 
peared delighted, adding, however, that he was afraid 
he should frighten her by his condition. A silence 
followed ; suddenly Nikolar began to speak, and Levin 
felt by the expression of his face that he had something 
of importance to tell him, but he spoke only of his health. 
He blamed his doctor, and regretted that he could not 
have consulted a celebrity in Moscow, and Levin per- 
ceived that he was still hopeful. 

Taking advantage of the first moment of silence, Levin 
got up, wishing to escape for a little while at least from 
these cruel impressions, and said he would go and fetch 
his wife. . .: 

" Good ! I will have things put in order here. It is 
dirty here and smells bad, I imagine. Masha, you attend 
to this," said the sick man, with effort. "Yes! and 
when you have put things to rights, go away," he added, 
looking at his brother questioningly. 

Levin made no reply, but as soon as he had reached 
the corridor he paused. He had promised to bring his 
wife, but now as he recalled what he himself had suf- 
fered, he made up his mind to persuade her that she 
had best not make this visit. "Why torment her as I 
am tormented ? " he asked himself. 
* i" Well, how is it?" asked Kitty, with frightened face. 

"Oh, it is horrible, horrible! Why did you come?" 

Kitty looked timidly, compassionately, at her husband 
for a few seconds without speaking ; then going to him, 
she'put -both hands on his arm. 



ANNA KARENINA 333 

" Kostia, take me to him ; it will be easier for both 
of us. Take me and leave me with him, please. Can't 
you see that it is far harder for me to see you and not 
to see him ? Perhaps I shall be useful to him, and to 
you also, I beg of you, let me go." 

She besought him as if the happiness of her life de- 
pended on it. 

Levin was obliged to let her go with him, but in his 
haste he completely forgot all about Marya Nikolayevna. 

Kitty, walking lightly and showing her husband a 
courageous and sympathetic face, stepped quietly into 
the sick man's room and shut the door noiselessly. She 
went with light, quick steps up to the bed, and sat down 
so that the sick man would not have to turn his head, 
and with her cool, soft hand she took the dying man's 
enorm6us bony hand, pressed it, and employing that 
tact peculiar to women, of showing sympathy without 
wounding, she began to speak to him with a gentle 
cheerfu]ness. 

"We saw each other at Soden without becoming 
acquainted ; you did not think then that I should ever 
become your sister." 

"You would not have known me, would you?" he 
said ; his face was lighted up with a smile when he saw 
her come in. 

"Oh, yes, indeed. How good it was of you to send for 
us ! Not a day has passed without Kostia speaking of 
you. He has been very anxious about you." 

But the sick man's animation lasted only a short time. 

Kitty had not finished speaking before his face again 
assumed that expression of stern, reproachful envy which 
the dying feel for the living. 

" I am afraid that you are not very comfortable here," 
said she, avoiding the look which he gave her, and ex- 
amining the room. 

"We must ask for another room, and Be nearer to 
him," she said to her husband. 



334 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XVIII 

JO 1 1 Jl ■ J * 

Levin could not bear to look at his brother, could not 
even be himself and feel at .ease in his presence. When 
he came into the sick man's room, his eyes and his mo- 
tions entirely absorbed him, and he did not see and did 
not realize the details of his frightful situation. 

He perceived the horrid odor, he saw the uncleanli- 
ness and disorder, he heard the sick man's groans, and 
it seemed to him that there was no way of helping it. 
It did not occur to him to investigate how the body lay 
under the coverlid ; how the lean long legs, the thighs, 
the back, were doubled up and accommodated ; nor did he 
ask whether he might not help him to lie more easily 
and do something to improve his condition, at least to 
make a bad situation less trying. , 

• The mere thought of these details made a cold chill 
run down his back ; he was undoubtedly persuaded in 
his . own mind that it was impossible to do anything 
either to prolong his life or to lighten his sufferings, and 
the sick man, feeling instinctively that his brother was 
powerless to help him, was irritated. And this made it 
all the, harderjfor. Levin. To be in the sick-room was 
painful to him ; to be away from it was . still worse. 
And be kept leaving the room, under various pretexts, 
and coming back again, for he was unable to stay alone 
by Himself. 

Kitty thought, felt, and acted in an entirely different 
way : as soon as she saw the sick man, she was filled 
with .pity for him, and this pity in her womanly heart, 
instead of arousing a sense of t fear or repulsion as it did 
in her husband's case, moved her to act, moved her to 
find out all,, the .details of his condition and to ameliorate 
them. And as she had not the slightest doubt that it 
was her duty to help him, neither did she doubt the 
possibility of it, and she set herself to work without 
delay. 

The details the mere thought of which repelled her 
husband were the very ones that attracted her attention. 



ANNA KARENINA 33 $ 

She sent for a doctor ; she sent to the drug-store ; she 
Set her own maid and Marya Nikolayevna to sweeping, 
washing, and dusting, and she even helped them her- 
self. She had all. needless articles carried away, and 
she had them replaced by -things that were needed. 
She went several times to her room, paying no heed to 
those whom she met on the way, and she unpacked and 
carried with her sheets, pillow-cases, towels, shirts. 

The waiter who served the table dlidte dinner to the 
engineers several times came with surly face when she 
rang ; but she gave her orders with such gentle author- 
ity that he never failed to execute them. Levin did 
not approve of all this. He did not believe that any 
advantage would result from it for the sick man. .More 
than all, he was afraid that it would worry his brother. 
But NikolaY, although he seemed to be indifferent, did 
not lose his temper and only felt a little ashamed and 
watched with a certain interest everything she did for 
him. 

When Levin came back from the doctor's, whither 
Kitty had sent him, he saw, on opening the door, that, 
under Kitty's directions, they were changing the sick 
man's linen. His long white back and his stooping 
shoulders, his prominent ribs and vertebrae, were all 
uncovered, while Marya Nikolayevna and the lackey 
were in great perplexity over the sleeves of Nikolai's 
night-shirt, into which they were vainly striving to get 
his long, thin arms. Kitty, quickly closing the door be- 
hind Levin, did not look at him; but the sick man 
groaned and she hastened tohim. l 

" Be quick," she said. 

"There! don't come. near me," muttered the sick 
man, angrily. " I myself .... " 

" What do you say ? " asked Marya. 

But Kitty' had heard and .understood that he was 
ashamed of being stripped in her presence. 

" I am not looking, I am not looking/' said she, trying 
to get his arm into the night-shirt. "Marya' Nikolayevna, 
you go to the other side of the bed and help us. — Please 
go and get a little flask out of < my bag, and bring it to 



33 6 ANNA KARENINA 

mfc,'\she said to her husband. "You know, in the side 
pocket; please bring it, and in the meantime we will 
finish arranging him." 

When Levin came back with the flask, he found the 
invalid lying, down in bed, and everything about him 
had assumed a different appearance. The oppressive 
odor had been exchanged for that of aromatic vinegar 
which Kitty, pursing up her lips and puffing out her 
rosy cheeks, was scattering about from a glass tube. 
The dust was all gone ; a rug was spread under the 
bed ; on the table were arranged the medicine vials, a 
carafe \ the necessary linen, and Kitty's English embroid- 
ery. On another table, near the bed, stood a candle, 
his medicine, and powders. The sick man, bathed^ 
with smoothly brushed hair, was lying between clean 
sheets, and propped up by several pillows, was dressed 
in a clean night-shirt, the white collar of which came 
around his unnaturally thin neck. A new expression 
of hope shone in his eyes as he looked at Kitty. 

The, doctor whom ' Levin went for and found at the 
club was hot the one who had been treating Nikola* and 
had aroused his indignation. The new doctor brought 
his stethoscope and carefully sounded the sick man's 
lungs, shook his head, wrote a prescription, and gave 
explicit directions first about the application of his rem- 
edies and then about the diet which he wished him to 
observe. He ordered fresh eggs, raw, or at least scarcely 
cooked,. and Seltzer water with milk heated to a certain 
temperature. i After he was gone, the sick man said a 
few words to his brother, but Levin heard only the last 
words : " .... your Katya." But by the way he looked 
at : Kitty, Levin knew that he said something in her 
praise. Then he called Katya, as he had named her : — 

" I feel much better already, 1 / he said to her. " With 
you I. should have got .well long ago! how good every- 
thing is." 

r He took her hand and lifted it to his lips ; but as if 
he feared that it might be unpleasant to her, he hesitated, 
put it down again and only caressed it. . Kitty pressed 
his hand affectionately between her own. 



ANNA KARENINA 337 

" Now turn me over on the left side, and all of you go 
to bed." 

No one heard what he said ; Kitty alone understood. 
She understood because she was ceaselessly on the watch 
for what he needed. 

"Turn him on the other side," said she to her hus- 
band. " He always sleeps on that side. It is not pleas- 
ant to call the man. I cannot do it. Can you ? " she. 
asked of Marya Nikolayevna. 

" I am afraid not," she replied. 

Levin, terrible as it was to him to put his arms around 
this frightful body, to feel what he did not wish to feel 
under the coverlid, submitted to his wife's influence, and 
assuming that resolute air which she knew so well, and 
putting in his arms, took hold of him ; but in spite of all 
his strength he was amazed at the strange weight of 
these emaciated limbs. While he was, with difficulty, 
changing his brother's position, Nikolaif threw his arms 
around his neck, and Kitty quickly turned the pillows so 
as to itt£.ke the bed more comfortable, and carefully 
arranged his head and his thin hair, which was again 
sticking to his temples. 

Nikolai* kept one of his brother's hands in his. Levin 
felt that the sick man was going to do something with 
his hand and was drawing it toward him. His heart 
sank within him ! Yes, Nikola* put it to his lips and 
kissed it ! Then, shaken with sobs, Levin hurried from 
the room, without being able to utter a word. 



CHAPTER XIX 

" He has hidden it from the wise, and revealed it unto 
children and fools ; " thus thought Levin about his wife 
as he was talking with her a little while later. 

He did not mean to compare himself to a wise man in 
thus quoting the Gospel. He did not call himself wise ; 
but he could not help feeling that he was more intellec- 
tual than his wife and Agafya Mikhaflovna, that he em- 
ployed all the powers of his soul, when he thought about 



338 ANNA KARENINA 

death. He knew also that many great and manly minds 
whose thoughts on this subject he had read had tried to 
fathom this mystery, but they had not seemed to know 
one hundredth part, as much as his wife and his old 
nurse. Agafya Mikha'flovna and Katya — as his brother 
called' her, and he' also now began to take pleasure in 
doing — had, in this respect, a perfect sympathy, though 
otherwise they were entirely opposite. 

Both unquestionably knew what life meant and what 
death meant, and though' they were of course incapa- 
ble of answering or understanding the questions that 
presented themselves to Levin's mind, they not only had 
their own way of explaining these great facts of human 
existence, but they also shared their belief in this regard 
with millions of human beings. As a proof of their well- 
grounded knowledge of what death was, they without a 
second 'of doubt knew what to do for those who were 
dying, and felt no fear of them. While Levin and others, 
who could talk much about death, evidently knew noth- 
ing about it because they were afraid of it and actually 
had no notion what to do when men were dying. If 
Konstantin Levin had been alone now with his brother 
NikolaT,- he would have grazed with terror into his face, 
and with growing terror awaited his end with fear, and 
been able to think of nothing to do for him. 

What was more, he did not know what to say, how to 
look, how to walk. To speak of indifferent things 
seemed unworthy; impossible; to speak of melancholy 
things, of death, was likewise impossible; to be silent 
was even worse. 

" If I look at him, he will think that I am studying 
him, I fear ; if I do not look at him, he will believe that 
my; thoughts are elsewhere. To walk on tiptoe irritates 
him ; to walk as usual seems brutal." 

Kitty apparently did not think about herself, and she 
had not the time. Occupied only with the invalid, she 
seemed to have a clear idea of what to do ; and she suc- 
ceeded in her endeavor. 

She related the circumstances of their marriage ; she 
told about herself ; she smiled on him ; she caressed 



ANNA KARENINA 339 

him ; she cited cases of extraordinary cures ; and it was 
all delightful : she understood how to do it. The proof 
that her activity — and Agafya Mikhaflovna's — was not 
instinctive, was animal, was above reason, lay in the 
fact that neither of them was satisfied with offering phys- 
ical solace or performing purely material acts ; both of 
them demanded for the dying man something more im- 
portant than physical care, and something above and 
beyond merely physical conditions. 

Agafya Mikha'flovna, speaking of the old servant who 
had lately passed away, said, " Thank God, he had con- 
fession and extreme unction; God grant us all to die 
likewise." 

Katya, though she was busy with her care of the 
linen, the medicines, and the bed-sores, even on the 
first day succeeded in persuading her brother-in-law to 
receive the sacrament. 

When Levin at the end of the day returned from the 
sick-room to their own two rooms, he sat down with 
bowed head, confused, not knowing what to do, unable 
to think of eating his supper, of arranging for the night, 
of doing anything at all ; he could not even talk with his 
wife : he felt ashamed of himself. . 

But Kitty showed extraordinary activity. She had 
supper brought ; she herself unpacked the trunks, helped 
arrange the beds, and even remembered to scatter Per- 
sian powder upon them. She felt the same excitement 
and quickness of thought which men of genius show on 
the eve of battle, or at those serious and critical moments 
in their lives, those moments when, if ever, a man 
shows his value, and all the preceding days of his life 
are only the preparation for these moments. 

The whole work made such rapid progress that before 
twelve o'clock all their things were neatly and carefully 
arranged : their two hotel rooms presented a thor- 
oughly homelike appearance; the beds were remade; 
the brushes, the combs, the hand-mirrors, were taken 
out ; the towels were in order. 

Levin found it unpardonable in himself to eat, to 
sleep, even to speak ; and he felt that every motion he 



34? ANNA KARENINA 

made was inappropriate. But she took out her toilet 
articles and did everything in such a way that there 
was nothing in the least disturbing or unsuitable in it. 

Neither of them could eat, however, and they sat long 
before they could make up their minds to go to bed. 

" I am very glad that I persuaded him to receive ex- 
treme unction to-morrow/' said Kitty, as she combed 
her soft perfumed hair, before her mirror, sitting in her 
dressing-sack. " I never saw it given ; but mamma told 
me that they repeat prayers for restoration to health." 

V Do you believe that he can get well ? " asked Levin, 
as he watched .the narrow parting at the back of her 
little' round head disappear as she moved the comb for- 
ward. 

I" I asked the doctor ; he says that he cannot live more 
than three days. But what does he know about it? I 
am glad that I persuaded him," she said, looking at her 
husband from behind her hair. " All things are possi- 
ble," she added, with that peculiar, almost crafty, expres- 
sion which came over her face when she spoke about 
religion. ; 

Never, since the conversation that they had while 
they were engaged, had they spoken about religion ; 
but Kitty still continued to go to church and to say her 
prayers with the calm conviction that she was fulfilling 
a duty. Notwithstanding the confession, which her 
husband had felt impelled to make, she firmly believed 
that he was a good Christian, perhaps better even than 
herself, and that all he had said about it was only one 
of his absurd masculine freaks such as he liked to in- 
dulge in, just as he did when, he jested about her 
broderie anglaise — as if good people mended holes, but 
she purposely created them. 

" There! This woman, Marya Nikolayevna, would 
never have been able to persuade him," said Levin; 
"and.... I must confess that I am very, very glad that 
you came. You made everything look so neat and com- 
fortable ! " .... 

He took her hand, but did not kiss it ; it seemed to 
him- a profanation even to kiss her hand .in the presence 



ANNA KARENINA 341 

of death, but he pressed it, as he looked with contrition 
into her shining eyes. 

" You would have suffered too terribly all alone," she 
said, as she raised her arms, which covered the glow of 
satisfaction that <made her cheeks red, and began to 
coil up her hair and fasten it to the top of her head. 
" No, she would not have known how .... but fortunately 
I learned many things at Soden." 

"Were there people there as ill as he is? " 

"Yes, more so." 

" It is terrible to me not to see him as he used to be 
when he was young You can't imagine what a hand- 
some fellow he was ; but I did not understand him 
then." 

" Indeed, indeed, I believe you. I feel that we should 
have been friends," said she, and she turned toward 
her husband, frightened at what she had said, and the 
tears shone in her eyes. 

"Yes, would have been" he said mournfully. "He 
is one of those men of whom one can say with reason 
that he was not meant for this world." 

" Meanwhile, we must not forget that we have many 
days ahead of us ; it is time to go to bed," said Kitty, 
consulting her tiny watch. 



CHAPTER XX 

DEATH 

On the next morning communion was administered 
to the sick man. Nikola* prayed fervently during the 
ceremony. There was such an expression of passionate 
entreaty and prayer in his greaf eyes gazing at the 
sacred image placed on a card-table covered with a 
colored towel that it* was terrible for Levin to look at 
him so ; for he knew that this passionate entreaty and 
hope made it all the harder for him to part from life, 
to which he clung so desperately. He knew his brother 
and the trend of his thoughts ; he knew that his skepti- 



3 42 ANNA KARENINA 

cism did not arise from the fact that it was easier foi 
him to live without a religion, but from the fact that 
gradually his religious beliefs had been supplanted by 
the theories of modern science ; and therefore he knew 
that his return to faith was not logical or normal, but 
was ephemeral and due simply to his unreasonable hope 
for recovery. He knew likewise that Kitty had strength- 
ened this hope by her stories of extraordinary cures. 

Levin knew all this and was tormented by these 
thoughts as he looked at his brother's' beseeching, hope- 
ful eyes, as he saw his difficulty in lifting his emaciated 
hand to touch his yellow forehead to make the sign of 
the cross, and saw his fleshless shoulders, and his hollow, 
rattling chest, unable longer to contain the life which 
he was begging to have restored. During the sacra- 
ment- Levin did what he had done a thousand times, 
skeptic that he was : — 

" Heal this man if Thou dost exist," he said, address- 
ing God, " and Thou wilt save me also." 

The invalid felt suddenly much better after the anoint- 
ing with the holy oil ; for more than an hour he did not 
cough once. He assured Kitty, as he kissed her hand 
with smiles and tears of thanksgiving, that he felt well, 
that he was not suffering, and that he" felt a return of 
strength and appetite. When his broth was brought, 
he got up by himself and asked for a cutlet. Hopeless 
as his case was, impossible as his recovery was, as any 
one might see by a glance, Levin and Kitty spent this 
hour in a kind of timid joy. 

" Is he not better ? " 

" Much better." 

"It is -astonishing." 

" Why should it be astonishing ? " 

"He is certainly better," they whispered; smiling at 
each other. 

The illusion did not last. The sick man went serenely 
to sleep, but after half an hour his cough wakened him 
and instantly those who were with him and the sick man 
himself lost all hope. The actuality of suffering un- 
questioned made them forget their late hopes. Nikolai, 



ANNA KARENINA 343 

giving no thought to what he had believed a half-hour 
previously, and apparently ashamed even to remember 
it, asked for a bottle of iodin to inhale. 

Levin gave him the bottle, which was covered with 
a piece of perforated paper, and his brother looked at 
him with the same imploring, passionate look which he 
had given the image, as if asking him to confirm the 
words of the doctor, who attributed miraculous virtues 
to the inhaling of iodin. 

V Kitty is n't here ? " he asked in his hoarse whisper, 
when Levin had unwillingly repeated the doctor's words. 

"No? then I may speak!..,. I played the comedy 

for her sake She is so sweet ! But you and I cannot 

deceive ourselves ! This is what I put my faith in," 
said he, pressing the bottle in his bony hands as he 
smelt the iodin. 

About eight o'clock in the evening Levin and his 
wife were taking tea in their room, when Mary a Niko- 
layevna came running toward them all out of breath. 
She was pale, and her lips trembled. 

" He is dying ! " she whispered, " I am afraid that he 
is dying ! " 

Both of them hurried to NikolaT. He had lifted 
himself, and was sitting up in bed leaning on his elbow, 
his head bowed, his long back bent. 

" How do you feel ? " asked Levin, tenderly, after a 
moment of silence. 

" I feel that I am going," whispered NikolaT, strug- 
gling painfully to speak, but as yet pronouncing the 
words distinctly. He did not raise his head, but only 
turned his' eyes up/ without seeing his brother's face. 

" Katya, go away ! " he whispered once again. 

Levin sprang up and in an imperative whisper bade 
her leave the room. 

" I am going," the dying man whispered once again. 

" Why do you think so ? " asked Levin, for the sake 
of saying something. 

"Because I am going," he repeated, as if he had an 
affection for the phrase. " It is the end." 

Marya* Nikolayevna came to him. 



344 ANNA KARENINA 

" If you would lie down, it would be easier for you," 
said she. 

" Soon I shall be lying down," he remarked softly,- — 
"dead/' he added, with angry irony. "Well, lay me 
back, if you will/' 

Levin laid his brother down on his back, took a seat 
near him, and, hardly able to breathe, gazed into his 
face. The dying man lay with his eyes shut, but the 
muscles of his forehead twitched from time to time as 
if he were in deep thought. Levin involuntarily tried 
to comprehend what was taking place in him, but in 
spite of all the efforts of his. mind to accompany his 
brother's thoughts, he saw by the expression of his calm 
stem face, and the play of the muscles above his eye- 
brows, that his brother perceived mysteries hidden from 
him. 

"Yes.... yes.... so," the dying man' murmured slowly, 
with long pauses ; ",lay me down ! " Then long silence 
followed. "So!" said he suddenly, with an expression 
of content as if all had been explained for him. " O 
Lord,! i* he exclaimed, and he sighed heavily. 

Marya Nikolayevna felt of his feet. " They are grow- 
ing cold," she said in a low voice. 

Long, very long, as it seemed to Levin, the sick man 
remained motionless; but he was still alive, and sighed 
from' time to" time. , / 

Weary from the mental strain, Levin felt that in 
spite of all his efforts he could not understand what his 
brother meant to' express by the exclamation "So." 
He seemed, to be far away from the dying -man; he 
could no. longer think of the mystery of death ; the 
most incongruous ideas came into his mind. He asked 
himself what he was going to do;— 7 to close his eyes, 
dress him, order the coffin ? Strange ! he felt perfectly 
coldrand indifferent; he did. not experience any sense of 
grief or loss, of even. the least pity for his brother; the 
principal feeling that he had was one almost of envy 
for , the knowledge ; which the dying man would soon 
have and which he, himself could not have. 

Long he waited by his bedside, expecting the end; 



ANNA KARENINA 345 

it did not come. The door opened, and Kitty came in. 
He got up to stop her, but instantly heard the dying 
man move. 

" Don't go away ! " said NikolaT, stretching out his 
hand. Levin took it, and angrily motioned his wife 
away. 

Still holding the dying man's hand, he waited a half- 
hour — an hour — and still another hour. He ceased 
to think of death ; he thought what Kitty was doing. 
Who was occupying the next room ? Had the doctor 
a house of his own ? Then he became hungry and 
sleepy. He gently let go the dying man's hand and felt 
of his feet. His feet and legs were cold; but still 
Nikola? was breathing. Levin started to go away on 
his tiptoes; but again the invalid stirred, and said, 
" Don't go away ! " 



It began to grow light ; the situation was unchanged. 
Levin gently rose, and without looking at his brother 
went to his room, and fell asleep. When he awoke, in- 
stead of hearing of his brother's death as he expected, 
he was told that he had come to his senses again. He 
was sitting up in bed, was coughing, and wanted some- 
thing to eat. He became talkative, but ceased to talk 
about death, and once more began to express the hope 
of getting well again, and was more irritable and restless 
than before. No one, not even his brother or Kitty, 
could calm him. He was angry with them all, and said 
disagreeable things, and blamed every one for his suffer- 
ings, demanding that the famous doctor from Moscow 
should be sent for ; and whenever they asked him how 
he was, he replied with expressions of anger and re- 
proach, " I am suffering terrible, unendurable agony." 

He suffered more and more, especially from his bed- 
sores, which they were wholly unable to heal, and his 
irritability kept increasing, and he reproached them all 
bitterly, especially because they did not fetch the doctor 
from Moscow. Kitty tried every means in her power 
to help him, to calm him ; but it was all in vain/ arid 



346 ANNA KARENINA 

Levin saw that she was suffering physically as well as 
morally, although she would. not confess it. 

The sentiment of death which had been aroused in 
all by his farewell to life that : night when he had sum- 
moned his brother was mightily weakened. , All knew 
that he would inevitably and speedily reach the end, 
that he was already half dead. They all felt that the 
sooner he died the better it would be; yet, concealing 
this, they still gave him medicines from vials, sent for 
new medicines and doctors, and they deceived him and 
themselves and one another; all this was falsehood, 
vile, humiliating, blasphemous falsehood. And this 
falsehood was more painful to Konstantin than to the 
others, because he loved his brother more deeply, and 
because nothing was more contrary to his nature than 
lack of sincerity. 

Levin, who had long felt the desire to reconcile his 
two brothers before Nikolai should die, wrote to SergyeT 
Ivanovitch. He replied, and Konstantin read the letter 
to the sick man : SergyeT Ivanovitch could not come 
but he asked his brother's pardon in touching terms. 

Nikola* said nothing. 

"What shall I write him?" asked Konstantin. "I 
hope you are not angry with him."' 
; " No, not at all," replied NikolaT, in a tone of vexa- 
tion. U Write him to send me the doctor." 

Three cruel days passed in this manner, the invalid 
remaining in the same condition. All those who saw 
him -—-the hotel waiter and the landlord and all the 
lodgers and the doctor and Marya Nikolayevna and 
Levin and Kitty r^- now wished only one thing, and that 
was his death. The invalid only did not express any 
such .wish, but, on, the contrary, continually grumbled 
because theydid not send for the doctor ; and he took 
his remedies and he spoke of life. Only at rare mo- 
ments, when opium caused him for a little to be oblivious 
of his incessant agony, he would in a sort of doze con- 
fess what .weighed on his mind even more heavily than 
on the others' : "Akhi If this could only end!" or 
" WhenvthisiisJover." ; 



ANNA KARENINA 347 

His sufferings, growing ever more and more severe, 
did their work and prepared him to die. There was nd 
position in which he could find relief ;" there was not 'a 
moment in which he could forget himself; there was 
not a place or a single member of his body that did riot 
cause him paifi, agony. Even the memories, the impres- 
sions, and the thoughts about his body now awakened 
in him the same feeling of repulsion as his body itself ; 
the sight of other people and their talk, their individual 
recollections, were a torment to him. Those who sur- 
rounded him felt it and instinctively refrained in his 
presence from using any freedom of, motion, from con- 
versation or from expressing their wishes. All his life 
was concentrated in one feeling, suffering, and in an 
ardent desire to be freed from it. 

Evidently there was accomplishing in him that revolu- 
tion whereby he would be induced to look on death as 
a consummation of his desires, even as a joy. Hitherto, 
every individual desire called forth by suffering 'or 
privation, as by hunger, weariness, thirst, was satisfied 
by some bodily exercise producing pleasure; but now 
privation and suffering got no relief and any attempt 
at relieving them caused new suffering. And So all his 
desires were concentrated on one thing, — the wish to 
be delivered from all his woes and the very source of 
his woes, from his body. But he had no words to ex- 
press this thought, and he continued out of habit to ask 
for what once gave him comfort, but could no longer 
satisfy hifm "Turn me on the other side," he would 
say, and then immediately wish to return to his former 
position. "Give me bouillon! Take if away! Speak, 
and don't stay so still! " and as soon as any one began 
to speak, he would shut his eyes and show fatigue, in- 
difference, and disgust. 

On the tenth day after their arrival Kitty was taken 
ill ; she had a headache and nausea and all the morn- 
ing felt unable to get up. 

The doctor declared that it was caused by her emo- 
tions and weariness. He advised quiet and rest* 

Yetj after dinner, she got up and went as tisual with 



348 ANNA KARENINA 

her work to Nikolais room. He looked at her sternly 
and smiled scornfully when she told him that she had 
been ill. All day long he never ceased to cough and to 
groan piteously. 

" How do you feel ? " she asked. 

" Worse," he replied with difficulty. " I am in pain." 

" Where do you feel the pain ? V 

" All over." 

" You will see the end will come to-day," said Marya 
Nikolayevna, in an undertone. 

Levin hushed her, thinking that his brother, whose 
ear was very acute, might hear ; he turned and looked 
at Ihim. Nikola'f had heard, but the words made no im- 
pression ; his look remained as before, reproachful and 
intense. 

."What makes you think so?" asked Levin, when 
she followed him into the corridor. 

" He has begun to pick with his fingers." 

/'What do you mean ? '■ 
f J* This way," she said, plucking at the folds of her 
woolen dress. Levin himself noticed that all that day 
the invalid had been plucking at his bed-clothes as if to 
pick off something. 

Marya Nikolayevna's prediction came true. Toward 
evening Nikola'f „had .not strength enough left to lift his 
arms, and his motionless eyes assumed an expression of 
concentrated attention. Even when his brother and 
Kitty bent over him in order that he might see them, 
this look remained unchanged. Kitty had the priest 
summoned to say the -prayers for the dying. 

While the priest was reading the prayer, the dying man 
gave.no sign of life. His eyes were closed. Levin, 
Kitty, and Marya Nikolayevna were standing by his bed- 
side. Before the prayers were ended, NikolaY stretched 
himself a little," sighed,- and opened his eyes. The priest, 
having finished the prayer, placed the crucifix on his 
icy brow, then put it under his stole, and after he had 
stood for a moment or two longer, silently he touched 
the huge bloodless hand. 

" It is all over," he said at last, and started to go away ; 



ANNA KARENINA 349 

but suddenly Nikolais lips trembled slightly, and from 
the depths of his breast came these words, which sounded 
distinctly in the silent room : — 

"Not yet.... soon." 

A moment later his face brightened, a smile came to . 
his lips, and the women who had been summoned has- 
tened to lay but the body. 

The sight of his brother and the propinquity of death 
awakened in Levin's mind that feeling of horror at the 
inexplicability and the unavoidableness of death, just as 
he had felt on that autumn night when his brother came 
to see him. This feeling was now more intense than ever. 
More than ever he felt his inability to fathom this mys- 
tery, and even more terrible seemed to him its proximity. 
But now, thanks to his wife's presence, this feeling did not 
lead him to despair; for in spite of his terrors L ^ felt 
the need of living, and loving. He felt that love saved 
him from despair, and that this love became all the 
stronger and purer because it was threatened. 

And scarcely had this mystery of death taken place 
before his eyes ere he found himself face to face with 
another miracle of love and of life equally unfathomable. 

The doctor confirmed his surmise in regard to Kitty 
Her discomfort was the beginning of pregnancy. 



END OF VOL. IL 



< * ( 



// 



■ I 1 to 



• fr 



kJl* "* i * 



ir>7 10 




The Scene in the Freight-house. 

Original Drawing by E. Boyd Smith. 



ANNA KARENINA 

VOL. Ill 



ANNA KARENINA 



PART FIFTH — Continued 



CHAPTER XXI 

AS soon as Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch had learned 
from Betsy and Stepan Arkadyevitch that all that 
was expected of him was that he should leave his wife in 
peace and not trouble her with his presence/ and that his 
wife herself wished this, he had felt himself in too great 
perplexity to be able to decide anything for himself, and 
he did not know what he wanted ; but, having placed 
his fate in the hands of others, who were willing enough 
to occupy themselves with his affairs, he : was ready to 
accept whatever might be proposed to him. 

Only when Anna had taken her departure and when 
the English governess sent to inquire if she should dine 
with him or by herself, did he for the first time clearly 
realize his position and its full horror. 

The hardest element in this state of affairs was that 
he could not coordinate and reconcile his past with the 
present. Nor was it the past when he lived happily 
with his wife that disturbed him. The transition from 
that past to the knowledge of his wife's infidelity he had 
borne like a martyr ; that state of things was trying, but 
it was comprehensible to him. "If at the time when his 
wife had confessed her wrong to him she had left him, 
he would have been mortified and unhappy ; but he 
would not have been in that inextricable, incomprehen- 
sible position in which he now felt that he was. He 
could never now reconcile his recent position, his recon- 
ciliation, his love for his sick wife and the alien child, 

VOL.111. — I I 



2 ANNA KARENINA 

with the present state of things ; in other words, with 
the fact that as a reward for all his sacrifices he was now 
deserted, disgraced, useful to no one, and a ridiculous 
laughing-stock to all. 

The first tWQ days after his wife's departure Alekser 
Aleksandrovitch received petitioners and his chief sec- 
retary, attended committee-meetings, and ate his meals 
in the dining-room as usual. Without trying to explain 
to himself why he did this, he directed all the powers of 
his mind to one single aim — to seem calm and indif- 
ferent. As he answered the questions of the servants 
in regard to what should be done about Anna's rooms 
and her things, he made superhuman efforts to assume 
the r manner of. fa man for whom the event that had 
occurred was- hot unexpected, and had nothing in it 
outside the range of ordinary, every-day events, and he 
accomplished his purpose ; "no one would have detected 
in him any signs of despair. But on the second day 
after- her departure Komer handed him a milliner's bill 
which Anna had neglected to pay, and told him that the 
manager of the business himself was waiting. Alekser 
Aleksandrovitch had the man shown in. 

"Excuse me> your excellency," said the manager, 
"for venturing to disturb you, but if you order us to 
apply to her .ladyship personally, will you kindly give 
us .her address ?" - 

Alekser Aleksandrovitch seemed to the manager to be 
cogitating ; then suddenly turning round, he sat down at 
the table. Dropping his head into his hands, he sat 
there .a, long' time in that position ; he tried several times 
to speak, but still hesitated. Korner, understanding his 
barm's feelings, asked the manager to come another 
time. 

?>inWhen he was left alone again, Alekser Aleksandro- 
vitch realized that he no longer had the power to keep 
up the role pf'firmness and serenity. He gave orders 
tQ $en<J away, the, carriage which was waiting for him, 
and he declined to see callers and would accept no' in- 
vitations .out to dine. He -felt that he could not endure 
the disdain and derision which he clearly read on the 



ANNA KARENINA jg 

face of this manager and of KorrieT, and of all without 
exception whom he had met during those two days. He 
felt that he could not defend himself from the detesta- 
tion of- people, because this detestation did not arise 
from the fact that he had himself committed any wrong 
action, for in that cases he? might have, hoped to regain 
the esteem of the world by improvement in conduct, but 
from the fact that he was unhappy, and with, an unhap- 
piness that was odious and shameful. He knew that it 
was precisely for the reason that his heart was torn that 
they would be pitiless to him. It seemed to him that his 
fellow-men persecuted him as dogs torture to death some 
poor cur maimed and howling with pain. He knew that 
the only safety from men was to conceal his wounds from 
them, and he had instinctively tried for two days to do 
so; but now he felt that he had no longer -the strength 
to continue the unequal struggle. ; • I 

His despair was made deeper by the knowledge that 
he was absolutely alone with his suffering., In all 
Petersburg there was not a man to. whom' he could 
confide all his wretchedness, not oner who would have 
any pity for him now, not as a lofty functionary,- or 
even as a member of society, but simply as a. human 
being in despair : he had no such friend. 

Aleksel Aleksandrovitch had lost his mother when he 
was ten years old ; he had no remembrance of his 
father; he and, his one brother were left orphans with 
a very small inheritance ; their uncle Karenin, a man 
of influence, held in high esteem by the late emperor, 
took charge of their bringing up.' 

After a successful course at the gymnasium and the 
university, Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, through his uncle's 
aid, made a brilliant start in official life, and, full of 
ambition, devoted himself exclusively to his career." He 
formed no ties of intimacy either in the gymnasium or in 
the university, or afterward in society; his brother alone 
was dear to him, but he entered the department of foreign 
affairs, went abroad to live, and died soon after Aleksel 
Aleksandrovitch's marriage. 

While Karenin was'governor of one of the provinces, 



4 ANNA KARENINA 

Anna's aunt, a wealthy lady of the governmental capi 
tal, introduced her niece to this governor, who was 
young for such a position, if not in years, and she 
forced him to the alternative of proposing marriage or 
leaving the city. AlekseT Aleksandrovitch long hesi- 
tated. There seemed as many reasons in favor of this 
step as there were opposed to it ; there was no definite 
reason which should impel him to break his rule, "When 
in doubt, don't!" but Anna's aunt sent word to him 
through a friend that he had compromised the young 
lady, and that as a man of honor he must offer her his 
hand. He offered himself, and gave her, first as his 
betrothed and afterward as his wife, all the affection 
which it was in his power to show. 

This attachment prevented him from feeling the need 
of any other intimacy. And now out of all the number 
of his acquaintances he had not one confidential friend. 
He had many so-called "friends," but no intimates. 
There were many persons whom Alekse'f Aleksandro- 
vitch could invite to dinner, or ask favors of, in the 
interests of his public capacity or protection for some 
petitioner ; with whom he could freely criticize the actions 
of other people and of the highest officers of govern- 
ment. But his relations to these people were exclu- 
sively confined to this official domain, from which it 
was impossible to escape. There was one university 
comrade with whom he had kept up an intimacy in after 
years, and to whom he would have confided his private 
sorrows, but this friend was a trustee 1 of the classical 
educational institutes in a distant province. Of all the 
people in Petersburg, the nearest and most practicable 
acquaintances were- his Director of the Chancelry and 
his doctor. 

Mikhail Vasilyevitch Sliudin, "manager of affairs," 
was a simple, good, intelligent, and well-bred man, and 
he seemed full of sympathy for Karenin ; but five years' 
association in official service put a. barrier between them 
which silenced confidences. 

1 PopechiteV uchebnava okruga ; an office attached to the department of 
Public Instruction. — Ed. 



ANNA KARENINA 5 

AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, having signed the papers 
which he brought, sat in silence for some time looking 
at Sliudin, and kept trying, but found it impossible, to 
open his heart to him. The question, " Have you heard 
of my misfortune ? " was on his lips ; but it ended in his 
saying as usual, when he dismissed him : — 

"You will have the goodness to prepare me this 
work." 

The doctor was another man who was well disposed 
to him, but between them there had long been a tacit 
understanding that they were both full of business and' 
in a hurry. 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch did not think at all about 
his women friends, or even of the chiefest among them, 
the Countess Lidia Ivanovna. Women simply as women' 
were strange and repulsive to him. 



CHAPTER XXII 

Aleksei Aleksandrovitch forgot the Countess 
Lidia Ivanovna, but she did not forget him. She 
reached his house at his darkest moment of solitary 
despair, and made her way to his library without wait- 
ing to be announced. She found him still sitting in the 
same position with his head between his hands. 

"J v ai forct la consigned she said, as she came in 
with rapid steps, breathless with emotion and agitation. 
" I know all, - Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch," my friend ! " 
and she pressed his hand between both of hers and 
looked at him with her beautiful melancholy eyes. 

Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch, with a frown, arose, and, 
having withdrawn his hand, offered her a chair. 

" I beg you to sit down. I am not receiving be- 
cause I am suffering, countess," he said, and his lips 
quivered. 

" My friend ! " repeated the countess, without taking 
her eyes from him ; and suddenly she lifted her eye- 
brows so that they formed a triangle on her forehead, and 
this grimace made her ugly yellow face still uglier than 



6 ANNA KARENINA 

before. AlekseY Aleksandrovitch felt that she pitied 
him and was on the point of crying. A wave of feel- 
ing, overwhelmed him, He seized her fat hand and 
kissed it, 

fV My friend,'* she said again, in a voice breaking 
with emotion, " ypu must not give yourself up to grief, 
Your grief is great, but you must find consolation," 

"I am wounded,' I am killed, I am no longer a man," 
said Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, Jetting go the countess's 
hand, but still looking into her eyes swimming with tears. 
" My situation is all the more unbearable because I can 
find neither in myself nor outside of myself any help 
tpward endurance of it.' 1 

■'You will find thig help, not in me, though I beg you 
to believe in my friendship," said she, with a, sigh. 
" Our help is love, the love which He hftS given for an 
inheritance. His yoke is easy," she continued, with the 
exalted look that AlekseY Aleksandrovitch knew so well. 
" He will sustain yon and will aid you/* 

Although these words were the expression of an 
emotion aroused by their lofty feelings as well a§ the 
symbolical language^ characteristic , of a new mystical 
exaltation just introduced into Petersburg, and which 
seemed extravagant to Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, never- 
theless he found it pleasant at, the present time to hear 
them. 

" I am weak, I am humiliated. I foresaw nothing of 
this, and now I cannot understand it." 

•*j My friend !/! repeated Lidia Ivanovna. 

"I do not mourn go much my loss," said Aleksei' 
Aleksandrovitch ; "but J cannot help a feeling of shame 
for the situation in which I am placed before the world. 
It is bad, and I cannot, { cannot bear it." 
. "It is not you who have performed this noble* act of 
forgiveness whigh has filled me — and all — with admira- 
tion. It is He dwelling in your heart. So, too, yon 
have no cause for shame/* said the • countess, ecstati- 
cally raising her 'eye§, 

Aleksef Aleksandrovitch frowned, and, pressing his 
hands together* he began to make his knuckles crack.* 



ANNA KARENINA 7 

"You must know all the details," he said, in his shrill 
voice. " Man's powers are limited) countess ; and I have 
reached the limit of mine. All this day I have wasted 
in details, domestic details, arising [he accented the 
word] from my new, lonely situation. The servants, the 
governess, the accounts, .... this is a slow fire devouring 
me, and I have not strength to endure it. Yesterday 
I scarcely was able to get through dinner .... I cannot en- 
dure to have my son look at me.... he did not afek me 
any questions, but I know he wanted to ask me, and I 
could not endure his look. He was afraid to look at 
me .... but that is a mere trifle ...." 

Karenin wanted to speak of the bill that had been 
brought him, but his voice trembled; arid he stopped. 
This bill on blue paper, for a hat and ribbons, was a 
recollection that made him pity himself. 

" I understand, my friend," said the Countess Lidia 
Ivanovna, " I understand it all. Aid and consolation 
you will not find in me, but I have come to help you if 
I can. If I could free you from these petty annoying 
tasks ...* I think that a woman's word, a woman's hand, 
are needed ; will you let me help you ? " 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch was silent, and pressed her 
hand gratefully. 

"We will look after Sefozha together 4 , I am not 
strong in practical affairs, but I can get used to them, 
and I will be your ekonomka. Do riot thank me ; I do 
not do it of myself." .... 

" I cannot help being grateful" 

"But, my friend, do not yield to the Sentiment of 

which you spoke a moment ago How can you be 

ashamed of what is the highest degree of Christian per- 
fection ? He who humbles himself shall bi exalted. 
And you cannot thank me. Thank Him* pray to Hirri 
for help. In Him alone We can find peace, COfiSolation, 
salvation, and love." 

She raised her eyes to heaven, and began to pray, as 
AlekseV Aleksandrovitch could see by her silence. 

AlekseT Aleksandrovitch listened to her, arid this 
phraseology, which before seemed, not Unpleasant to him, 



8 ANNA KARENINA 

but extravagant, now seemed natural and soothing. He 
did not'approve of this new ecstatic mysticism. He was 
a sincere believer, and religion interested him principally 
in its relation to politics ; and the new doctrine which 
arrogated to itself certain new terms, for the very rea- 
son that it opened the door to controversy and analysis, 
had aroused his antipathy from principle. Hitherto, he 
had taken a cold, and even hostile, attitude to this new 
doctrine, and had never discussed it with the countess, 
who was carried away by it, but had resolutely met her 
challenge with silence. But now, for the first time, he 
let her speak without hindrance, and even found a 
secret pleasure in her words. 

, " I am very, very grateful to you, both for your words 
and for your sympathy," he said, when she had ended 
her prayer. 

Again the countess pressed her friend's hand with 
both of hers. 

" ij Now I am going to set to work," said she, with a 
smile, wiping away the traces of tears on her face. " I 
am going to Serozha, and I shall not trouble you except 
in serious difficulties." And she got up and went out. 

The Countess Lidia Ivanovna went to Serozha's room, 
and, while she bathed the scared little fellow's cheeks 
with her tears, she told him that his father was a saint 
and his mother was dead. 

The. countess fulfilled her promise. She actually 
took charge of the details of AlekseT Aleksandrovitch's 
house, but she exaggerated in no respect when she de- 
clared that she was not strong in practical affairs. It 
was necessary to modify all of her arrangements, since 
it was impossible to carry them out, and they were modi- 
fied by Kornef, AlekseT Aleksandrovitch's valet, who, 
without any one noticing it, gradually took it on him- 
self to manage the whole establishment, and calmly and 
discreetly reported to his barin (while the latter was 
dressing) such things as seemed best. 

But, nevertheless; the countess's help was to the 
highest degree useful to him. Her affection and es- 
teem were a moral support to him, and, as it gave het 



ANNA KARENINA 9 

great consolation to think, she almost succeeded in 
converting him to (i Christianity " ; in other words, she 
changed him from an * indifferent and lukewarm be- 
liever into a fervent and genuine partizan of that 
new method of explaining the Christian doctrine which 
shortly after came into vogue in Petersburg. It was 
easy for Aleksei Aleksandrovitch to put his faith in 
this exegesis. Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, as well as the 
countess and all those who shared their views, was not 
gifted with great imagination, or at least that faculty 
of the mind by which the illusions of the imagination 
have sufficient conformity with reality to cause their 
acceptation. Thus he saw no impossibility - or unlike- 
lihood in death existing for unbelievers arid not for him, 
that because he held a complete and unquestioning faith, 
judged in his own way, his soul was already free from 
sin, and that even in this world he might look upon his 
safety as assured. 

It is true, AlekseY Aleksandrovitch dimly felt the 
frivolity, the fallacy/ of this presentation of his faith. 
He knew that when, without a thought that his forgive- 
ness of his wife was the'act of a higher power/ he gave 
himself up to this immediate feeling, he experienced a 
greater happiness than when, as now, he constantly 
thought that Christ dwelt in his soul, and that by sign- 
ing certain papers he was following His will. But it 
was indispensable for Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch to think 
so ; it was so indispensable to have, in his present hu- 
miliation, this elevation, imaginary though it was, from 
which he, whom every one despised, could look -down 
on others, that he clung to it as if his salvation de- 
pended on it. 



CHAPTER XXIII 

The Countess Lidia Ivanovna had been married when 
she was a very young and enthusiastic girl to a very 
wealthy, aristocratic, good-natured, and dissolute young 
fellow. Two months after the wedding her husband 



io ANNA KARENINA 

deserted her. He had replied to her effusive expres- 
sions of love with scorn and even hatred, which no 
one who knew the count's kindliness, and were not 
acquainted with the faults of Lidia's romantic nature, 
could comprehend. Since then, without any formal 
divorce, they had lived apart ; and when the husband 
met his wife, he always treated her with a venomous 
scorn, the reason for which it puzzled people to under- 
stand* 

The Countess Lidia Ivanovna long ago ceased to 
worship her husband, but at no time had she ceased 
to be in love with some one. Not seldom she was in 
love with several at once — men and women indiscrimi- 
nately. She had been in love with almost every one 
of any prominence. Thus she had lost her heart to 
each of the new princes and princesses who married 
into the imperial family. Then she had been in love 
with a metropolitan, a vicar, and a priest* Then she 
had been in love with a journalist, three Slavophiles, 
and Komisarof; then with a foreign minister, a doc- 
tor, an English missionary, and finally Karenin. These 
multifarious love-affairs and their different phases of 
warmth or coldness in no wise hindered her from keep- 
ing up the most complicated relations both with the 
court and society. 

But from the day. when Karenin was touched by 
misfortune and she took him under her special ■ pro- 
tection, from the time when she began to busy herself 
with his domestic affairs and work for his well-being, 
she felt that all her former passions were of no account, 
but that she now loved Karenin alone with perfect sin- 
cerity. The feeling which she now cherished toward 
him seemed to her stronger than all the previous feel- 
ings. As she analyzed her sentiment and compared 
it with the former ones, she clearly saw that she would 
never have been in love with Komisarof if he had not 
saved the emperor's life, or with Ristitch-Kudzhitfeky 
had there been no Slav question. But Karenin she 
loved, for himself, for his great, unappreciated spirit, 
for his character, for the delightful sound of his voice, 



ANNA KARENINA n 

his deliberate intonations, His weary eyes, and his soft 
white' hands with their swollen veins. Not only did the 
thought of seeing him fill her with joy* but it seemed 
to her that she saw, on her friend's face the, signs of 
the impression which she made on him. She did her 
best to please him, no less by her person than by her 
conversation. Never before had- she spent so much 
time and attention /on her tbitet. Mote than once she 
found herself wondering what would happen if she 
were, not married and he were bnty free ! ' When he 
came into the room, she Colored With' eftiotion, arid 
she could not restrain a smile, of , ecstasy if he said 
something pleasant to v her. "* , 

For several .days the countess had, been in a state of 
great excitement. „ She knew that Anna and Vronsky 
were back in Petersburg. It, was necessary to save 
AlekseTf Aleksandrovitch.from seeing her; it was neces- 
sary to save him even from the tormenting knowledge 
that this wretched woman was living in the same town 
with him and he might meet her at any instant. 
- "Lidia Ivahovria made inquiries through acquaintances 
so as to discover the plans of these repulsive people, as 
she called Anna and' Vronsky; arid fehe tried to- direct 
all of Karenin's movements so that he bright not meet 
therri. The young aide to the eniperor, a friend * of 
Vronsky's, from whom she learned about them, and 
who was hoping through the Countess .Lidia Iva- 
novna's influence to get , a concession, told her that 
they were completing their arrangements and expected 
to depart on the following day: / \*; r.r 

Lidia Ivanovna was beginning to breathe freely once 
more, when on the next morning she received a note, 
the handwriting of which she recognized with tefrof. 
It was Anna Karenina's handwriting. The envelop was 
of paper thick as bark ; the oblong sheet of "yellow paper 
was adorned with an immense monogram.: The note 
exhaled a delicious perfume. , J - J %%\ 

" Who brought it ? " 4 , ' » ■ 

• - u A messenger from the hotel." -r t 

The countess waited long before she had the eour- 



12 ANNA KARENINA 

age 5 to sit down and read" it. ; Her emotion almost 
brought on an . attack of asthma, to, which she. was 
Subject; "At last, - when she felt calmer, she opened 
the following. note written in French:^ 
1 lr f i jdd .riirf > hhi [ € T _n r 

Madame, la Comtessc : — The Christian- Sentiments filling 
your, heart prompt , me, with < unpardonable boldness, I fear, 
to address you.. I . am unhappy at being separated . from my 
son, and I ask you to do ,me the : favor of letting me see 
him once more before I depart. If I do not make direct 
application to Aleksei Aleksan<Jrovitch, it is because I do not 
wish to give 'this generous-hearted man the pain of thinking 91 
me. Knowing your friendship for him, I felt " that you would 
understand me; will you have Serozha sent to me here? or 
do, you prefer that I should come at an appointed hour? or 
would y6u let me know how and at what place I could see 
him? ' 'You r cannot imagine my desire to r see my child again, 
and consequently you cannot comprehend the extent of my 
gratefulness for the assistance that you can render me in these 
circumstances. , I Anna. 

Everything about this note exasperated the Countess 
Lidia' Ivanovna, its tenor, the allusions to Karenin's 
magnanimity, and the .especially free and easy tone 
which pervaded it. : v 

•» "'Say that there is no reply," said. the. Countess Lidia 
Ivanovna,* and/ hurriedly, opening her buvard, she wrote 
to Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch that she hoped to meet him 
about one* o'clock < at the birthday reception at -the 
Palaces ? nr. <>,; u n t nil < 1' r j -. ; 

"I must consult with/you .in/<regard;to a sad and 
serious' affair ; we will decide at the Palace when I can 
see you.- The best plan would be at "my house, where 
I will have youn tea. ready.. Tt : *is absolutely. necessary. 
He imposes the cross, but He gives also the strength," 
she added, that she might somewhat prepare him. 

The' f Gountess/,Lidia Ivanovna wrote Aleksei Aleksan- 
drovitch two or three times a day ; she liked this way, of 
communication with him, as it had the elegance and 
mystery which were lacking in. ordinary personal inter- 
course.^ hvrl oti> . Si > r r* ,ffy 



ANNA KARENINA 13 

CHAPTER XXIV 

The congratulations were over. As the visitors who 
had met at court went * away, they talked about the 
latest news of the day, the rewards that had been be- 
stowed, and the changed positions of some high func- 
tionaries. 

"'What should you say if the Countess Marya Bori- 
sovna was made minister of war, and the Princess 
Vatkovskaya, chief of staff?" asked a little, gray-haired 
old man, in a gold-embroidered uniform, who was talking 
with a tall, handsome maid of honor about the recent 
changes. 

" In that case, I should be made one of the emperor's 
aides," replied the frei'lina. 

" Your place is already settled. You are to have 
charge of the department of religions, and Karenin is 
to be your assistant." 

" How do you do, prince ? " said the little old man, 
shaking hands with some one who came along. 

" Were you speaking of Karenin ? " asked the 
prince. 

" Yes ; he and Putyatof have been decorated with the 
order of Alexander Nevsky." 

"I thought he had it already." 

" No ; look at him," said the little old man, pointing 
with his gold-laced hat toward Karenin, who was stand- 
ing in the doorway, talking with one of the influential 
members of the Imperial Council ; he wore the court 
uniform, with his new red ribbon across his shoulder. 
" Happy and contented as a copper kopek ! " he added, 
pausing to press the hand of ,a handsome, athletic cham- 
berlain passing by. 
, " No ; he has grown old," said the chamberlain. 

"With cares. He spends all his time writing proj- 
ects. He, the unfortunate man, will not let go until he 
has explained everything point by point." 

"What, grown old? // fait des passions, I think the 
Countess Lidia is jealous now of his wife." 



14 ANNA KARENINA 

"There! I beg of you not to speak ill of the Countess 
Lidia." VJ /Z f JIO 

" Is there any harm in her being in love with Kare- 
nin? "rr ?//.« " ■-■- M . r 

" Is it true that Madame Karenin is here ?" . r 

''Not here It .the Palace, but in Petersburg; I met 
her yesterday with* Aleksel Vronsky bras dessus^ bras 
dessous, on the Morskaya." . • j 

" Vest tin hoinme qui n'apas" — began the chamber- 
lain ; but he broke short Off to Salute and make way; for. 
a member of the imperial family who was passing. 

•Thus' they were talking .* about Aleksei" Aleksandro- 
vitchj criticizing and ridiculing him,, while he himself was 
barring the way of the imperial counselor, and, without 
pausing, in his explanations lest he should lose him, was 
giving a detailed exposition of a financial scheme. 

AlekSer Aleksandrovitch, about the time his wife left 
him; had rekched a situation painful fbr an official,;-^ 
the culmination of his upward career; This culmination 
had been rekched, khd all clearly saw it, but Aleksei* 
Aleksandrovitch himself r was not yet aware that his 
career was eridedi -Either his collision with. Strembf, or 
his trouble with his wife, or the simple fact that Alekself 
Al&k&indrovitch had reached the limit that h6 had been 
destined to attain, the fact remained thkt every one saw 
clearly that his official race wis run. He still held an 
impbrtant plac^; he was a member "of many important 
committees and commissions; but .he was one of those 
men' of whom nothing more is expected ; his day was 
Over. -Whatever he said, whatever he proposed) seemed 
antiquated and useless. d But AlekseT Aleksandrovitch 
himself did riot realize this; on the contrary; now that he 
had ceased to have an active ^participation in the busi-^ 
ness of the administration, he saw more ..clearly, than 
before th& faults and mistakes 'that others were making, 
and considered it v his duty to indicate certain reforms 
which should. be' introduced^ 

Shortly after'his separation from his wife, h6 i began 
to write hi& first pamphlet about the new tribunals', r and 
proposed to follow it up with < an endless series of similaf 



ANNA KARENINA 15 

pamphlets, of no earthly; use, on all the different branches 
of the administration. . * ,7/ nr> 

He not only did not' realize his hopeless situation in 
the official world, and therefore' did not lose heart, f but 
more than ever he took delight in his activity. 

f * He that is unmarried is careful for the. things of the 
Lord, how he may please the Lord; but he that is married 
is careful for the things of the world, how he may please 
his wife/ 1 said the Apostle Paul. ' And Aleksei Aleksan? 
drovitch, who now directed * his life in all respects 
according to the Epistle, often quoted this text. It 
seemed to him that, since he had been deprived of his 
wife, he served the Lord, more faithfully than ever by 
devotion to these projects. 

The imperial counselor's very manifest impatience 
and desire to get away from him in no way abashed 
Karehin, but he stopped a moment as a prince of the 
imperial family was passing, and 'his victim seized his 
opportunity to escape. 

Left to himself, Aleksei' Aleksandrovitch bowed his 
head, tried to collect his thoughts, and, with an absent- 
minded glance about him, stepped toward the door, 
hoping to meet the countess there. 

'*How strong and healthy they look physically!'' he 
said to himself, as he looked at the vigorous neck of the 
prince, who wore a closerfitting Uniform, and the/ hand- 
some chamberlain with his well-combed and perfumed 
side-whiskers. "It is only too! true, that; p.11 is: evil in 
this world/' he thought, as he looked at the chamber- 
lain's sturdy legs. Moving slowly along, Alekse'f Alelo 
sandrovitch, with his customary appearance of weariness 
and dignity, came up to the gentlemen who had been 
talking about him, and, glancing through 'the door, he 
looked for the Countess Lidia Ivanovna. •* < 

"Ah! Aleksef Aleksandrovitch!" cried the little' bid 
man, with a wiqked light glowing in his eyes, as Kafenin 
passed him with a cold 'bow. " I /have not yet con- 
gratulated you," and he pointed to the newly received 
ribbon. Jm 10 [ 

' ."I thank you. This is &fine day!" replied Aleksei 



1 6 ANNA KARENINA 

Aleksandrovitch, accentuating the adjective prekrasny % 
as was his habit. ., . 

» He knew that these gentlemen were making sport of 
him; buf he expected nothing. but hostile feelings, and 
he was accustomed to it. , f 

Catching sight of the countess's yellow shoulders ris- 
ing from her corsage, as she appeared at the door, and 
her beautiful pensive eyes, inviting him to, join her, 
Alek'sel* Aleksandrovitch,* with a smile which showed 
his even white teeth, went to her. 

Lidia Ivanovna's toilet had cost her much labor, like 
all her recent efforts in this direction ; for the object of 
her toilet was now entirely the reverse of that which she 
had followed thirty years before. Formerly she had 
thought only of adorning herself, and the more the 
better ; now, on the contrary, she had to be adorned so 
unsuitably for her figure and her years that she simply 
endeavored to render the contrast between her person 
and her toilet not too frightful, and in Alekse'f Alek- 
sandrovitch's eyes she succeeded ; he thought her fas- 
cinating. For him she, with her friendliness and even 
love for him, was the only island amid the sea of ani- 
mosity and ridicule that surrounded him. As he was the 
gantlet of scornful glances, he was naturally drawn to 
her loving eyes like a plant toward the light. 

" I congratulate you," she said, looking at his decora- 
tion. 

* ' Repressing a smile of satisfaction," Karenin shrugged 
his shoulders and half closed his eyes, as if to say that 
this was nothing to him. 

The Countess Lidia Ivanovna knew well that these 
distinctions, even though he would not confess it, caused 
him the keenest pleasure. 

" How is our angel ? " she asked, referring to Serozha. 

" I r cannot say that I very am well satisfied with .him," 
replied AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, lifting his eyebrows 
and opening his eyes. "And Sitnikof " (a pedagogue 
who had been intrusted with Serozha's , childish educa- 
tion) " does not please him. As I told you, I find in 
him a certain apathy toward the chief questions which 



ANNA KAREN-INA 17 

ought to move the soul of every man and of every 
child." 

And Aleksef Aleksandrovitch began to discourse on a 
subject' which, next to the questions " of adrriinistrati6n, 
gave him the most concern — his son's education. 

When AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, with Lidia Ivanovna's 
aid, once more resumed his ordinary life and activity 
again, he felt it his duty to occupy himself with the .edu- 
cation of the son who had been left on his hands. Hav- 
ing never before taken any practical interest in the 
question of education, Alekse'i Aleksandrovitch. conse- 
crated some time to the practical study of the subject. 
After having read various works on anthropology, peda- 
gogy, and didactics, he conceived a plan of education 
which the best tutor in Petersburg was then intrusted 
to put into practice. And this work constantly occupied 
him. ' , ; * . . 

" Yes ; but his heart ? I find in this child his father's 
heart, and with such a heart he cannot be bad," said the 
countess, with enthusiasm. • . 

" Well, that may be. So far as in me lies, I perform 
my duty ; it is all that I can do." 

"Will you come" to my house?" asked the Countess 
Lidia Ivanovna, after a moment's silence. " I have a 
very painful matter to talk with you about." I would 
have' given the world to spare you certain memories; 
others do not think the same. I have had a letter from 
her. She is herein Petersburg." 

AlekseX Aleksandrovitch quivered at the recollection 
of his wife ; but his face instantly assumed that expres- 
sion of corpselike immobility that showed how absolutely 
unable he was to treat of such a subject. 

"I expected it," he said. c • / jo« ,1 

The Countess Lidia Ivanovna looked at him with ex- 
altation, and in the presence of a soul so great, tears of 
transport sprang to her eyes. 

VOL. III. — 2 ( . 1 > / 



1 8 ANNA KAREN I NA 

X't vj '1o b \r [ >m /r I »(•• . { < r ( , m n ) j f } , ,, 

CHAPTER XXV 

When Alekser entered the Countess Lidia Ivanovna's 
cozy little boudoir, 'decorated with portraits and old por^ 
celains, he failed to find his friend; 1 

She was changing her gown. , i , f , . 

On a'round table covered with a cloth stood a Chinese? 
tea-service and a silver teapot with an alcohol lamp, 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch glanced perfunctorily at the 
numberless paintings that adorned the room ; then he 
sat down near a table and took up a copy of the New 
Testament which lay on it The rustling of : the coun- 
tess's silk dress put his thoughts to flight. 

"Well now! We can be a little more, free from dis- 
turbance/* said the countess, with a smile, gliding -between 
the table and the divan. " We can talk while drinking 
our tea.'V ' p , . I - ( " r ; f - r r •* 

'After several words, meant to prepare' his mind, sh§ 
sighed deeply, and, with a tinge of color in her- cheeks, 
she put. Anna's letter into his hands. <\ // " 

He read it, and sat long in silence/ f , ,u r 

*1 T da not feel that Thave the right to-refuse ber, M he 
said timidly, raising his eyes. t , < n / 1 

& My friend, you never can see evil anywhere.". 
• "On the contrary, I see everything is evu\ - But would 
it be fair to. .."ac\ *>;/uJ km n[ 

His face expressed indecision, 'desire for advice, for 
support,' for guidance, in'a question so beyond his com- 
prehension." * • t ' 

M< No,'V interrupted the Countess * Lidia Ivanovna, 
" there are limits to all things. V I understand immoral 
ity," she said, not with absolute sincerity, since she did 
not 'know what could induce -women to be immoral, 
K but what, I do nob understand is cruelty toward any on6 ! 
Toward you! How can she remain in the same city 
with you ? One is never too old to learn, and I learn 
every day your grandeur and her baseness ! " 

"Who shall cast the first stone?" asked AlekseK 
Aleksandrovitch, evidently satisfied with the part he 



ANNA KARENINA \ 9 

was playing. " I havq forgiven her for everything, and 
therefore I cannot deprive her of what is, a need of her 
heart, — her love for hereon." .,.. 

" But is it love t-t my friend ? Is it sincere;? Let us 
agree that you have forgiven her, and that, you still 
pardon her, , But have we the right to -vex the' squl 
of this little angel ? He believes that she is dead ; he 
prays for her and asks God to pardon her sins. .... It is 
better so. What would he think- now ? " 

" I had not thought of that, 1 ' said AlekseY Aleksan- 
drovitch, perceiving the justice of her words. 

The countess covered her face with her 'hands and 
was silent ; she was praying. 

" If you ask my advice," she replied, after she had 
uttered her prayer and taken her hands from her face, 
"you will not do this. Do I not see how ,you suffer, 
how this opens all your wounds? But let us admit that 
you, as always, forget .yourself, but where will it lead 
you ? new sufferings for yourself, to torture for the child ! 
If she were still capable of human feelings, ,she herself 
could not desire this. Nq I I have np hesitation about 
it, I advise you not to, and, if you give me your authority, 
I will reply to her." . <* 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch consented, and the countess 
wrote, in French, this letter : r — 

Chere Madame: — Recalling your existence to your spn 
would be likely to raise questions which it would be impossi- 
ble to answer without" obliging the. child to criticize tHat which 
should remain sacred to him, 'and therefore I beg you to inter- 
pret your husband's refusal in the spirit of Christian charity. 
I pray the Omnipotent to be merciful to you. 

COMTESSE LlDIA. 

This letter accomplished the Secret aim which the 
countess would not confess even to herself ; it wqunded 
Anna to the bottom of her soul , . \ 

Aleksel Aleksandrovitch, on returning home from 
Lidia Ivanovna ? s, found himself unable to take up his 
ordinary occupations, ox recover the spiritual calm of a 
believer who feels that he is among the elect. 



20 ANNA KARENINA 

The thought « of "his wife who had been so guilty 
toward him, and toward whom he had acted so like 
a saint, as the Countess Lidia. Ivanovna had so well 
expressed it, ought not to' have disturbed him, and yet 
he was ill at 'ease. He could not understand a word of 
the book- he' was 'reading, he could not drive away from 
his mind the cruel recollection^ of 'his ' relations to her, 
of the mistakes which, as it now seemed to him, he 
himself had made in« his treatment of her. He remem- 
bered with a feeling like remorse the way he had 
received Anna's confession- that day as they -were re^ 
turning from the races. Why had he demanded merely 
an outward observance of . the proprieties ? Why had 
he not challenged Vronsky to a duel? He was likewise 
tormented^ by his recollection of the letter which he 
wrote her at that time ; especially his forgiveness of her, 
which had proved useless to any one, and the- pains 
which he had wasted on" the baby that was not his/ all 
came back to his - memory and seared his heart -with 
shame and c regret/ And exactly the same feeling of 
shame- 'and regret she experienced now in reviewing all 
his past 'with "her, arid remembering the awkward way 
in which, after long vacillating, he had offered himself 
to her. '» bdl bnj; .bot . to «v ?. . . 

"But how am I at fault?" he asked himself; and 
this question immediately gave rise to another: „." Do 
othe'f .men, feel differently, fall in love differently, 
and marry _ differently, r — these Vronskys, Oblonskys.... 
these chamberlains with .their handsome calves ? " 
4t His imagination called up a whole line of these vigor- 
ous men, self-confident; and strong, who had always and 
everywhere attracted his curiosity and his wonder. 

He drove away these thoughts; he strove to persuade 
himself that the- end- and aim of his- life was not this 
world/but eternity, that peace and charity alone ought 
to dwell in his soul. But the fact that in* this temporal, 
insignificant 'life he had, as it seemed to him, made 
some humiliating blunders, tortured him as 1 much as if 
that eternal salvation in which he put his trust did not 
exist. - j * ■ /I i j 



ANNA KAREN! N A 21 

But this temptation was not long, and soon Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch regained that serenity, and elevation. of 
mind by which he succeeded in putting away all that 
he wished to forget. I I 

CHAPTER XXVI 

it f 

"Well, Kapitonuitch ? " said Serozha, as .he -came 
in, rosy and gay, after his walk, on the evening before 
his birthday, while the old .Swiss, smiling down from 
his superior height, helped the young man off with his 
coat, "did the bandaged chinovnik come to-day? Did 
papa see him ?'• 

" Yes ; the manager had only just got here when I 
announced him," replied the Swiss, winking one eye 
gayly. " Permit me, I will take it." 

"Serozha! Serozha!" called the Slavophile tutor, 
who was standing by the door that led to the inner 
rooms, "take off your coat yourself:" 

But Serozha, though he heard his tutor's weak voice, 
paid no heed to him ; standing by the Swiss, he held 
him by the belt, and looked him straight in the face.' J 

" And did papa do what he wanted I" 

The Swiss nodded. 

This chinovnik, with his head in a bandage, who had 
come seven times to ask some favor of AlekseY Aleksan- 
drovitch, interested Serozha and the Swiss. Serozha 
had met him one day in the vestibule, and overheard 
how he begged the Swiss to let him be admitted, saying 
that nothing was left for him and his children but to die. 
Since that time the lad had felt great concern for the 
poor man. v L , 

" Say, did he seem very glad ? " asked Serozha. • . 

" Glad as he could be ; he went off almost leap- 
ing." 

" Has anything come ? " asked Serozha, after .a mo- 
ment's silence. 

"Well, sir," whispered the Swiss, shaking his h£ad 
" there is something from the countess.'.' ' 



22 ANNA KARENINA 

Serozha instantly understood that , what the Swiss 
meant was a birthday present from the Countess Lidia 
Ivanovna,/ 7/n r" hoyjo^ju r. •■» ricKrfvr (d 

"What did you say ? Where is it ?•" of oj bo 

" Kornei took it to papa ; it must be some beautiful 
toy ! " 

" How big ? as big ^s this? " I MI ) 

" Smaller, but beautiful." 

■"A -little, book?" - . " ( j\ jVA* 

<1 No ; a toy. Run away, run away., , Vasili Lukitch 
is calling you," said the Swiss,, hearing the tutor's step$ 
approach, and gently removing the little gloved , hand 
which held his belt. > ' 

" In a little bit of a moment, Vasili Lukitch," said 
Serozha, with the amiable and gracious smile to whose 
influence even the stern tutor submitted, 

Serozha was in radiant spirits, and wan ted to tell hi? 
friend, the Swiss, about a piece of good fortune whicn 
the Countess Lidia Ivanovna's niece had told him, while 
they were walking in the summer garden, had befallen 
the family. His, happiness seemed greater still sincq he 
heard about the chiriovnik's success and his present. 
It seemed to Serozha that every one ought to be happy 
this beautiful day.!),, 1 Ar <j?> ; 

" Do you know papa has received- the Alexander Nev- 
sky order ?*' m Kr rl *r[ - f\ ,, 

<- <« Why should n't I know?> He has been receiving 
congratulations'." - ' . 

" Is he- glad?" 
i " How could he help being glad' of the Tsar's favor? 
Of> cdurse he deserves it 1 " said the old Swiss, gravely. 

Serozha reflected ^s he looked into; the Swiss's face, 
which # he knew even to the least detail, but especially 
the chin, between his ^ray, side-whiskers,- No .one had 
seen his chin except Serozha, who looked' up at it from 
below. f 

"Well! and your daughter ? r Is n ? t it^along time since 
she has been to see us ? " j a 

V The? S\yiss*s daughter was a ballet-dancer; /' . // * 

"How could she find time to ..come on work-d&y$? ! ' 



ANNA KARENINA 23 

he exclaimed. " They Have their lessons as well as you; 
and you had better'be off to -yours, sin" * ** 

When Serozha reached his 'roomy instead of attending 
to his tasks, he poured out intd the tutor's ears all his 
surmises about the ptesent which had been brought him. 
"It must be a locomotive engine; what 'do you think 
about it ? " he asked ; but Vasili Lukitch \vas thinking of 
nothing except the grammar lesson, which had to be 
ready for the prof essor* who canie at two o'clock. 

"No, butyouniustjusttell me one thing; Vasili Lukitch, " 
asked the child, who was now sitting at his desk, with 
his book in his hands: "what is there higher than the 
Alexander Nevsky ? You know that pajia 'has just re- 
ceived the Alexander Nevsky." *'■> <- 

Vasili Lukitch replied that the order of Vladimir was 
higher. 

"And above that?" 
j "St. Andrew I above them all," 

" And above that ? " 

" I don't know," 

"Why don't you know?" and Serozha, leaning his 
head on. his hand, began to think; 

The child's thoughts were very varied - and compli- 
cated ; he imagined that his father perhaps >vas going to 
have the orders of Vladimir and St. Andrew, and that 
therefore he would be more indulgent for that day's 
lessons; and that h6 hihiselff Wh^ii he grew up, would 
do his best to deserve all the decorations, even those 
that would.be given higher than that of St. Andrew. A 
new order would scarcely have tihie to be founded before 
he would make himself worthy of it. 
'.These thoughts made the time pass so quickly that, 
when the professor came \ his lesson about the circum- 
stances of time, and place,. and mode of action was. not 
prepared at all; and'the ph)fessor seemed riot only, dis- 
satisfied, but distressed^ i His professor's distress touched 
Serozha.- He felt that he was to blame for riot having 
learned his lesson. In spite of all his efforts, he really 
had been Unable to do it. Wheh the professor was 

iAhcfcei PefvdzbAimy-, Andrew the FfriUcalled tor JWttokletos. 



24 ANNA KARENINA 

talking to him, -he imagined that he understood; but 
when he was alone, he really could not remember or, 
comprehend that suclva short and easy word as vdrug, 
"suddenly," is a circumstance " of 4he mode of action ; but 
still he' was sorry that he had tried his teacher.* 

He seized On a f moment when his teacher was silently 
looking dnto a book, to ask him : — ^ 

. /' MikhaYl; Ivanovitch, when will your birthday be?" 

"You .would do better to think about your work ; birth-, 
days have no importance for a reasonable being. It is 
only .a day^just like any other, and must be spent in 
work." ' * f / 

Serozha looked attentively at his teacher, studied his 
sparse beard, his eye-glasses far down on his nose, and 
got into such a deep brown study that he heard nothing 
of what the teacher was explaining to him. He had *a 
dim comprehension that his teacher did not believe what 
he said. By the tone in which he said it, he felt that it 
was incredible. 

"But why do they all try to say to me the most tire- 
some things an'drthe most useless things, and all in the 
same way ? Why does this man keep me from him, and 
riot love me ? " he. asked himself sadly, and he could not 
discover any answer. 

• ' i * 

CHAPTER XXVII 

After the professor, came the lesson with his father. 
Serozha, while waiting for him, sat at the table, playing 
with his pen-knife, and he fell into new thoughts. 

One'/of his favorite occupations was to look for his 
mother while-he was out walking. , He did not believe in 
death as a general thing; *and' especially, he did not be- 
lieve that his mother was dead, 4n spite of what the 
Countess Lidia Ivanovna told him, and though, his father 
confirmed it. And therefore, after they told him that she 
was dead, he used to watch for her while he was out for 
his walk. Every, tall, graceful woman with dark hair he 
imagined to be his mother; at the sight of such a woman, 



ANNA KAREN INA 25. 

his heart would swell with love, the tears would come 
into his eyes, and he would wait until the lady drew near, 
him, and raised her veil; then he would see her face,; 
she would kiss him, smile upon him ;! he would feel the 
sweet caress of her hand, smell the well-known perfume; 
and weep with joy, as he did one evening when he lay 
at her feet, and she tickled him, and he laughed so heart- 
ily, and gently bit her white hand, covered with rings. 

Later, when he learned accidentally from the old nurse 
that his mother was alive, and that his -father and the 
countess had told him that she was dead because she 
was a wicked woman, this seemed still more impossible 
to.Serozhai because he loved her; and her looked for 
her, and longed for her. 

That very day, in the summer garden, there had been 
a lady in a lilac veil, and, with his heart beating violently, 
expecting that it was she, he saw her take the same foot- 
path where he was walking ; but this lady did not come 
up where he was, and she disappeared from sight. 
Serozha felt a stronger love than ever for his mother ; 
and now, while waiting for his father, he was cutting 
his desk with his penknife ; with shining eyes, he was 
looking straight ahead, and .thinking of her. 

" Here comes your papa," said Vasili Lukitch. 

Serozha jumped up from the chair, ran to kiss his 
father's hand, and looked for some sign of pleasure 
because he had received the order of Alexander 
Nevsky. 

"Did you have a good walk ?" asked Alekse'f Alek- 
sandrovitch, as he sat down in an armchair, taking up 
the Old Testament and opening it. r , 

Though he had often told Serozha that every Chris- 
tian ought to know the sacred history by heart, he had 
often to consult the Old Testament for his lessons ; and 
Serozha noticed it. r r,\ 

"Yes, papa, I enjoyed it very much," said Serozha, 
sitting across his chair, and tipping it, which was for- 
bidden. " I saw Nadenka 7 (Nadenka was the countess's 
niece, whom she adopted) " and she told me that they 've 
given you a. new star. Are you glad, papa ? " u_. Id 



|t ANNA KARENINA 

"In the first" plao&i pleafce don't tip your chair so," 
said AlekseT Alekfcahdrovitch, tf and in the second "place, 
know that what ought to be deaF to us is work for itself 
and not the reward. I want; you to understand that. If 
you work and study simply for the sake of receiving the 
recompense* the work will seem painful; but if you love 
work, your recompense willcbme of itself.** 

And AlekseY Aleksandrovitch remembered that on 
this vdry diy he had signed one hundred and eighteen 
different papers with no other support in a most unwek 
come task than the feeling of duty. 

Serozha's eyes, shining with affection and merriment* 
grew? gloomy, and droppedas his father looked at him. 
It was the same well-remembered way his father had 
adopted in his treatment of him, and Serozha had already 
schooled. him feelf to be hypocritical toward it. 
i He f felt that his father always spoke as if he were 
addressing some imagiriafy boy, one of those children 
found in books, and not in the least like Serozha. .And 
Serozha, when he was with his father, trfed to make 
believe that he was that bookish little boy. 
' " You understand this, I hope*" ' 

"Yes, papa/* replied the'lad, playing the part of this 
imaginary little boy. / if>* ", <u » ** 
'if' The lesson consisted of. the recitation of several verses 
of. the* Gospel and the review of the first part of the Old 
Testament. The verses from the Gospel Serozha knew 
fairly well. But, as he was in the midst of so repeating 
them, Serozha" was stfufck by the appearance of his 
father's forehead, which made almost a right angle near 
the temples, and he stumbled and transferred the end of 
onevferse to the next ver£e which began "with the same 
word. Alekset Alekfearidrovitch concluded that he did 
hot understand the meaning of what he was reciting, 
and he was vexed. 

He frbwhed,'ahd r began/ to explain what Serozha had 
heard so niariytimes that he could hot help remember- 
ing because he understood Mt too well -^ just as it was 
withUhe concept of th£ word ^drug^ suddenly* being " a 
circumstance of the.'fnode-of action." /The.child, with 



ANNA KARENINA 27 

scared eyes, looked, at -his father and thought about only 
one thing: would his father oblige him to repeat, the 
explanation that he had -given' him, as he had done at 
other times? This fear kept 'him from understanding- 
anything. Fortunately his father 'passed on; to the les- 
son in Sacred History. Serozha narrated the facts them- 
selves very well; but when he -was required to answer 
the questions as to what the fact signified he did not 
know it at all, though he had already been punished for 
this same lesson. The place where he could not recite* 
and hesitated, and where he had whittled the table and 
rocked the chair, was the critical moment when he had 
to repeat the- list of antediluvian patriarchs, Not one 
could he remember, not even Enoch, who was snatched 
up to heaven alive. On other occasions -he -could re- 
member his name, but now he had entirely forgotten it, 
for the very reason that Enoch was his favorite char- 
acter in all Biblical history, and he connected with the 
translation of this patriarch a long string of ideas which 
completely absorbed him, while he was staring at his 
father's watch-chain and a loose button on his waist- 
coat. 

Serozha absolutely disbelieved in death, though they 
had told him about it' many times. He could not be- 
lieve that those whom he loved could die, and espe- 
cially incredible was the thought of his own death. It 
all seemed perfectly impossible and incomprehensible. 
But he had been told that all must die ; he had, asked 
people in whom he had confidence, and they had' assured 
him that it was so. The nurse herself, though unwill- 
ingly, said the same thing. But Enoch did not die, and 
perhaps others might not have to die. 

"Why should not others deserve justice before God, 
and so be snatched up to heaven alive?" thought Se- 
rozha. " The wicked — ' those whom he disliked — might 
have to die, but the good might be like Enoch." 

" Well ! how about these patriarchs ? " 

" Enoch .... Enos.... " 
J /J' You' have already mentioned him. ' This' is bad, Se- 
rozha, very bad. If you do not endeavor tp Jearn the 



2# ANNA KARENINA 

things essential for every Christian to know, what will 
become of you ? " asked his father," getting up. H'i am> 
dissatisfied with you/ arid Piotr Igriatyevitch " — he was 
the professor ^ T «" is dissatisfied with you .... so I am com- 
pelled to punish you. M ** *tn 

Father and pedagogue both found; fault with him, 
and ' Serozha was - doubtless making bad work of it.. 
Yet it could not possibly be said that he was a stupid 
boy ; ; on the contrary, he was far superior to those whom 
his -'teacher 'held' up- to him "as ' examples. From his 
father's point of view, he did not want, to learn what 
was taught him. ' In reality, it" was .because he could 
not team it.' He could not' for the reason that his 
mind had needs more essential to him than those that 
his father arid the pedagogue supposed. These needs 
were wholly opposed to what they gave him, and , he 
revolted' against his teachers. n L »\ 

'He was only nine years old. He was only a child; 
but* he knew his own soul. It was dear to him; he 
guarded it jealously, as the eyelid guards the eye; and 
no one should force a way in without the key of love. 
His teachers blamed him for being unwilling to learn, 
and yet he was all on fire with the yearning for knowl- 
edge ; and he learned from Kapitonuitch, his old nurse, 
Nadenka, and Vasili Lukitch,-but not from his teachers. 
The water which the father and the pedagogue poured 
orr the mill-wheel was wasted, but the work was done 
in another -place. f «' 

His father punished Serozha by not letting him go 
to see Nadenka; but his punishment turned out to be 
an advantage. Vasili Lukitch was in good humor, and 
taught him how to make wind-mills. The whole after- 
noon was spent hi working and thinking of the ways 
and "means to make the mill go.^ Should he fix wings 
to it, or arrange it "so he could turn it himself? .He 
forgot about his mother all the evening ; but after he 
had got into ted, he suddenly remembered her, and 
he played in his own fashion that she might cease* to 
hide- ^herself from -him/ and make him a visit the- next 
day, which was his birthday. 



ANNA KARENINA 29 

"Vasili Lukitch, do you know what I prayed God 
for?" -.- 1 m >a \ \ t id ut iili 

"To study better ? " * o q 

"No." ii V I - t nl 

"Toys?" 

" No. You must not guess. It is a secret ; when 
it comes to pass, I will tell you. ' Can't you guess?" 

"No, I can't guess ; you must tell 4 me!" said Vasili 
Lukitch, smiling, which was rare with him. "Well, 
get into bed; I am going to put out the light." 

" I see that which I prayed for much better when 
there isn't any light. There, I almost told my se- 
cret ! " cried Serozha, laughing gayly. 

Serozha believed that he heard, his mother and felt 
her presence when he was in the dark. She was stand- 
ing near him, and looking at him tenderly . with her lov- 
ing eyes; then he saw a mill, a knife ; then all melted 
into darkness, and he was asleep. 



\ CHAPTER XXVIII > ; 

When Vronsky and Anna reached Petersburg, they 
stopped at one of the best hotels. Vronsky had a room 
to himself on the ground floor ; Anna, up one flight of 
stairs, with her baby, the nurse, and her maid, occupied 
a suite of four rooms* J ; i t> / 

> On the day of his return, Vronsky. went to see his 
brother; he there found his mother, who had come 
down from Moscow on business. His mother and sis- 
ter-in-law received him as usual, asked him about his 
travels, spoke of common friends, but not by a word 
did they make any allusion ; to ; Anna. -His brother, 
however, who returned his call the next morning, asked 
him about her and Aleksei*. Vronsky declared' in no 
equivocal terms that he considered the bond which 
united him j to Madame Karenin.the same as marriage, 
that he hoped a divorce would be obtained, and then 
he should marry her, but till that time, he * should I re- 



3 o ANNA KARENINA 

gard her the same as. his wife; and he asked him to 
explain this to his mother and sister-in-law. 

"The world may not approve of. me; that. is air one 
to me," he added; "but if my family wish t6, remain 
on good terms with me, they must show proper respect 
for my wife." i fl .<^« u^ Jor urn 

The elder brother, -always very< respectful • of his 
brother's opinions, was not very certain in his own 
mind whether he was. doing, right or not, and resolved 
to let society settle this question'; but, as far as he him- 
self was concerned, he saw nothing-objectionable in this, 
and he went with Aleksel to call on Anna. 

Vronsky spoke to Anna with the formal vui, you, 
as he always did before strangers, and treated her as 
a mere, acquaintance; but it was perfectly understood 
that the brother knew of their relations, and they spoke 
freely of Anna's visit to,Vfbnsky!s estate. 

Notwithstanding his experience An society, Vronsky, 
in consequence of this new state of things, fell into a 
strange error. It would seem as if he ought to have 
understood that society would shut its doors on him 
and Anna; but ridw^he .'persuaded hiniself by a strange 
freak of imagination that, however it might have been 
in .fbrmer days', nbw, owing to 'the rapid progress made 
by society, — and he had himself unconsciously become 
a strong supporter of 'progress, — prejudices Would have 
melted away, and the question whether they would' be 
received by society would not trouble them, o *jf\u . 
i "Of course, she would not be received at court,* ,x he 
thought ; " but our relatives,' our friends, will understand 
things as they are»" ; 

A man may sit for some; time with his legs^'doubled 
up in one position, provided he knows that he can 
change 'it displeasure; but if he knows that he must sit 
in such a constrained position, then he will feel cramped, 
and his legs will twitchf and stretchout toward the de- 
sired freedom. rl Vronsky experienced this in regard to 
society. Though he knew, in the bottom of hissbul that 
society was closed r to them, he made experiment whether 
it had changed, and whether it would receive -them? 



ANNA KARENINA 31 

But he. quickly found .thatyeven if it wfcre open to him 
personally, it was closed to Anna. As in the game of 
•< Gat-arid-Mouse," 2 the hands raised f or' him immedi- * 
ately fell before Anna. , 

One of the first ladies of Petersburg society whom he 
met was his cousin Betsy. 

"At last?" she cried joyously/!' and Anna? How 
glad' I am! Where are .you f stopping ? I can easily 
imagine the hideous effect our Petersburg must have on 
you after such' a charming journey! I' can imagine, 
your honeymoon in Rome! And the divorce? is it 
arranged?" u 1 

Vronsky saw that Betsy's enthusiasm cooled when 
she learned that there was no divorce as yet. 

"I know well that I shall: be stoned," said she; "but 
I am coming to see' Anna. : Yes, I will certainly come.' 
You won't stay here long, I imagine ? " f 

In fact she called on Anna .that very day ; but; her 
manner was entirely different .from what it used to be. 
She evidently prided herself on her courage, and wanted 
Anna to appreciate the genuineness of her friendship: 
After talking for about ten. minutes on the news of the 
day, she got up, and said as she went away : — 

" You have riot told me yet when the divorce is to be. 
Though I may disregard the proprieties, 2 ' stiff-necked 
people will give you the cold shoulder as long as yoif 
are not married. And it is so easy nowadays, pz sefait. 
So you are going Friday ? I am sorry we shall not see 
each other again." , c 

From Betsy's manner Vronsky might have got an idea 
of what he might expect from society. But he made 
still another experiment in his own family. n He had 
no hope of any assistance, from his mother. He knew 
wdl that, enthusiastic though" she had been in Anna's 
praise at their first meeting, she would be relentless 
toward her now that she had spoiled her son's career ; 
but Vronsky founded great hopes on Varia, his brother's 
wife. It seemed to him that she would not be one to 

1 JCoskka-muishka. 

3 Zabrosit chepets cherts mietnitsu^ to throw one's cap over the mill* 



3* 



ANNA KARENINA 



cast a stone at Anna, but would come simply and natu- 
rally to see her. 

On the next day he called on her, and, finding, her 
alone, he openly expressed his desire. 

"You know, AlekseY, how fond I am of you," replied 
Varia, after hearing what he had to say, -"and how will-' 
ing I am to do anything for you ; but if I kept silent/ it 
is because I know that I cannot be of the least iise to 
you and Anna Arkadyevna.^: She took special pains 
to use the two names. " Please don't think that I judge 
her — not at all; perhaps I should have done the same 
thing in her place. I cannot enter into details," she 
added, glancing timidly up at' his clouded face; "but 
we must call things by their right name. You-wbuld 
like me to go and see her, and then have her visit me, 
in order to restore her to society.*/ But you must know 
/ cannot do it. My daughters are growing up; I arn 
obliged, on my husband's account, to go into society. 
Now, I will go and call on Anna Arkadyevna; but 
she knows that I cannot invite her here lest she should 
meet in my drawing-room people who ,dpf not" think 
as I -do, and that would* wound 1 her. * I cannot receive 
her." .... 

" But I do not admit that she has fallen lower than 
hundreds of women whom you , receive," interrupted 
Vronsky, rising, and seeing that his sister-in-law's de- 
cision was irrevocable. ' tj < 

" Alekser, don't be angry with me ; please under- 
stand, it is not my fault," said Varia, .looking at 'him 
with a timid smile. r . . ,< \ 

"I am not angry with you r but I suffer doubly,"; said 
he, growing more and moire gloomy. "I suffer because 
this breaks our friendship, or,* at' least, seriously impairs 
it; for you .'must know f that for me this could not be 
otherwise." A I . ' J :»: r <i 

He left' her with these words. 

Vronsky understood that further experiments would 
be idle, and that; during the few days he would still 
have to spend in Petersburg, he must act as if he were 
in a foreign city, avoiding all dealings with his former 



ANNA KARENINA 33 

society friends so < as not to be subjected to vexations 
and affronts which were so painful to him.: < 

One of the most unpleasant features of his position 
in Petersburg was the k fact that Alekser Aleksandro- 
vitch and his name seemed to be everywhere: -It was 
impossible for a conversation to begin on any subject 
without ..turning on Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch ; it was 
impossible to go anywhere without: meeting him. So ; , 
at least, it. seemed to Vronsky ; just "as it i seems to a 
man with a^sofe finger,' .that he is always hitting^' it 
against everything. '»j 

Their stay in Petersburg seemed to Vronsky still more 
trying because all the time he < saw that Anna was in a 
strange, incomprehensible moralTframe of mind such as 
he had never seen before. t At' one time she Was more 
than usually affectionate ; then again she would se£m 
cold, irritable, and enigmatical.- Something was' tor- 
menting her, and she was concealing something from 
him ; and she seemed not to notice the indignities ;which 
poisoned his life, and which,rin~J[ier delicacy of percep- 
tion; should have been even more painful for her. 
[ 

CHAPTER XXIX 

Anna's chief desire on her return to Russia was to 
see her son. From the day;she left Italy the thought 1 
of seeing him again kept her in a constant state of ex- 
citement ;• and in proportion as* she drew near Peters- 
burg the prospective delight and importance < of this 
meeting kept growing greater and' greater; '* SKe did not 
trouble herself with the' question f how she should man J 
age it. It would be a simple and natural thing, sh£ : 
thought, to see her son once' more, when" she would 'be 
in the same town with : him ; but since her 'arrival she 
suddenly realized her present relation 'toward' society, 
and found that the interview was not easy to obtain. 

She had been two days now in Petersburg, and never 
for an, instant had the thought of her son left her, but 
she had not seen him. 
vol. in. — 3 



m 



ANNA KARENINA 



/ She-, felb that she^had no right to go straight to hei 
former home arid 'risk comfng- face to face with Alek- 
set Aleksaridrovitch. She might not be admitted ; she 
might be ; insulted. To ".write to 'her husbanci and ask 
permission of: him seemed to her painful even to thihk 
of; v She -could be, calm only, when she did not think 
of.het husband. To r see her/sori when he was out tak- 
ing his; walk, even if she. could -find' where and when he 
went,, was too little j^or her.- She had counted somuch 
pn^seeing him. again ! -she\had so much to say to him; 
she had such a desire to hug him, to kiss him.' 
• SetfOzha'sold nurse might have' been an assistance to 
her, and shown her how; to manage ; but she was rid 
longer living, in Aleksef Aleksahdrovitch^s house." 

X5n the third day/ having learned of AlekseY AIek~ 
sandroyitch's intimate 'relations with : the Countess Lidia. 
Iyanovna, Anna decided to write her a letter^ and this cost 
her the greatest pains to < write. She told her frankly 
that .permission' to seer 'her; son depended on Aleksb'f 
Aleksandrovitch's magnanimity.^ She knew thkt if the 
letter were shown* to; her husband, he, in his part of 
magnanimous man, would not refuse her. 

The messenger that carried the letter brought back 
the most cruel and; unexpected reply, ) that there was no 
answer. She had never felt so wounded as at the mo- 
ment when,? summoning .the; messenger, she heard from 
him the, circumstantial story of* hbw he f had waited, and 
how, after, a time,<he hadbeeri tpld that.there would be 
no answer. Anna felt humiliated, insulted, but She saw 
that, from; her. point of\ -view'; the-, countess rwas right. 
Her grief*;wasall. the keener.-because -she had to bear 
it alone; She could- not and did' .not "wish to confide* it 
to Vrpnsky. She knew that though he ^was the "chief 
cause, of her, unhapptness, he would regard her meeting' 
with her son .asjoffJittle account; "she r knew that he : 
would never be^able to^sound ail the depths of her 1 an- 
guish, ;* she knew that she should hate him for the iin^ 
sympathetic tone in which he would speak of it. And 
she, feared this, more than anything else in the world, 
and so hid from him her action in regard to her son. 



ANNA KARENINA 35 

She stayed at home; all day- long and radced her 
brain to think of other ways of meeting her son, and 
finally she decided rtdi write "directly? to. her husband. 
She had already begun 'her letter, when Lidia Iva- 
novna's reply was brought ;to- her.- The countess's pre- 
vious silence had humbled and affronted, her/ but the 
note and all that, sherrea^L: between thevlines so* exas- 
perated her, « — this bitterness against her seemed t so 
shocking when contrasted .with her passionate," legiti- 
mate affection for her son, that she grew- indignant 
against the others, and ceased to i>lame herself..' lr r'z- 
TL" What cruelty ! u What, hypocrisy! " she said to her- 
self. "All they want is to insult me and torment the 
child. I will not let them do. so: ' She is worse than' I 
am ; at least, I do not lie." 

She immediately decidedto go bnvthe : morrow,, which 
was Serozha's, birthday, directly 'to: her husband's) house"/ 
she would, bribe the servants, : an d> would make 'anyi kind 
of an excuse, if only she might once see her son and put 
an end to the ugly, network of lies -with which they were 
surrounding the innocent. child* n Jms f bnii 1 r i 

She went to a toy shop and purchased some toys, and 
thus, she formed her -plan* of > action : she would' start 
early in the morning, at eight 6'clock>*ibefore Alekse'f 
Aleksandrovitch would probably be up ; she: would have' 
the, money in, her hand all ready to bribe the>Swiss.and 
the valet to let her go up-stairs without raising her veil, 
under the pretext of laying -oh Serozha's bed some pres- 
ents sent by his godfather. As to what she should say 
to her son, she could not form the least idea ; she could* 
not make, any preparation c f or that. \ 'A 

The next morning, at eight o'clock, Anna got out of 
her, hired carriage, and rang the doorbell other former 
home. [frw 

"Go and see what is wanted! fit's some lady," skid 
Kapitonuitch, in loose /coat and galoshes, as he looked 
out of the window and saw" a lady closely veiled) stand- 
ing on the porch. The SwissV assistant, a r .young man 
whom Anna did not know, had scarcely opened the 
door before, Anna r pushed her way in, -and, ^drawing a 



36 ANNA KARENINA 

rhree-ruble note out of heft muff, thrust it into his 
hand. i 

/"Serozha .... Sergye'f Aleksievitch," she stammered, 
and started down /the vestibulfe. n 

The Swiss's assistant .examined the note, and stopped 
the. visitor at the inner glass door. 

"Whom do you wish to see?" he asked. 

She did not hear his words, and made no reply. 

Kapitonuitch, noticing the stranger's confusion, came 
out, let her into the entry, and asked her" what she 
wanted. • - I ■'- f «-' 

- V I come from Prince. Skorodumof to see Sergjtel 
Aleksievitch."; . • - ' ., tn oS ' 

" He is not up yet," replied the Swiss, looking sharply 
at her. 

Anna had .never- dreamed that the .absolutely un- 
changed appearance of the anteroom of the house which 
for nine years had been her: home could 'have such a 
powerful effect on her. .: r , » i , 

One after another, sweet and painful memories- arose 
in her mind, and for a moment she forgot why she was 
there. j_p b a *: . i «»i»-i a r, 

"Will you wait?" asked » the 'Swiss,* helping her to- 
remove her,shiibka. ' .When he saw her face, he recog- 
nized her, and 'without a word bowed profoundly. * 

" Will your ladyship l be pleased to enter ? " he said 
to her. w r ~ / . - 

She. tried to speak, but her, voice refused to utter a 
sound. Giving the old servant an entreating look, with 
light; swift steps she went to the' staircase. She flew up' 
the stairs. Kapitonuitch tried to overtake her, and fol- 
lowed after her/ catching his galoshes at every step. 
sjfi His tutords there ; perhaps he is not, dressed yet ; I 
will speak to him." 

Anna kept on up the stairs, which she knew so well, 
not. heeding what the old man said. • *i" 

".This way. ^ To the'left, if you please. Excuse it if 
all.is in disorder. He sleeps in the' front room now," r 
said the Swiss, out of breath.- '"Will your ladyship be 

^ * Vashe pfevoskhoditydstvd) literally, your excellency. 



ANNA KARENINA 37 

good enough to wait a moment?./ I will. go and see!" 
And, opening the high door, he disappeared. 

Anna stopped and waited. 

"He has just waked 'up," said the Swiss, coming 
back through the same door. 

And, as he spoke, Anna heard the sound of a child 
yawning, and merely by the sound of the yawn she 
recognized her son and seemed to see him alive before her. 

" Let me go' in.... let me ! " she cried, and .hurriedly 
pushed through the door. t'g 

At the right of the door stood the bed/ and on: the 
bed a child was sitting up * in his little open night-: 
gown ; his little body was leaning forward, and he was 
just finishing a yawn and stretching himself .' His lips 
were just closing into a sleepy smile, and, with this 
smile, he slowly and gently fell back on his pillow. 

" Serozha ! V she whispered, as she went noiselessly 
toward him. 

At the time of their separation and during that access 
of ldve which she had been recently experiencing for 
him, Anna had imagined him as still a boy of four, the 
age when he had been most charming. Now he no 
longer bore any resemblance to him whom she had left ; 
he was still further removed from the four-year-old 
ideal ; he had grown taller and thinner. How long his 
face seemed ! How short his hair ! What long arm's ! 
How he had changed since she had seen him last! But 
it was still Serozha — the shape of his head, his lips, 
his little slender neck, and his broad little shoulders. 

" Serozha ! " she whispered in the child's ear. M - 

He raised himself on his elbow, turned his disheveled, 
head first to' this side, then to that, as if searching for 
something, and opened his eyes. For several seconds 
he looked with an inquiring face at his mother, r who 
stood motionless before him. Then he suddenly smiled 
with joy, and again closing his sleepy eyes he threw 
himself, not back upon his pillow,' but into his mother's 
arms. 

" Serozha, my dear little boy ! " l she cried, choking 

1 Serozha I maPchik mol milui. 



jft ANNA KARENINA 

with tears, and' ' throwing her r arms ^ around his plump, 
body. ,i>.*if,. ' \h sd ,*ioob f ' 

" Mamma ! " he whispered, cuddling into his mother's 
arms;so as- to feel their encircling pressure. • » 

Smiling sleepily, still with his eyes closed, he took 
his chubby little hands from the head ;of.the bed and 
put them on his' mother's shoulder and climbed into her 
lap, having that warm breath of sleep peculiar to r chik 
dren; and pressed his fact to his. mother's neck and 
shoulders. l^uoiM 

tf I kriew,'\hesaid, opening his eyes; "to-day J is my 
birthday;! knew that you would ;come.< «'I am 'going < to' 
get up ~now."i- e/ mi rt nnc [ ? / yb >d j '*• [ r>i I n 

And as he spoke he fell asleep > again, 
f Anna devoured him with her eyes. She saw how he 
had grown and "changed during her absence. She knew 
and yet she did notknowjhis bare legs*/ so much longer 
now, coming below his nightgown; she recognized hi£ 
cheeks grdwn thin; his short hair curled In the neck 
where she had so often kissed 'it' She* could not keep 
her hands from him, and not a word was she able to say,' 
and the tears choked her. ^orn n- >d rod "f nod 
, " What are you crying for, mamma ? " he asked,. now 
entirely awake. " What makes you ciy ? V he repeated, 
ready to weep himself.:" h u r Ji>: 

"I will not cry ariy more.... I am crying for joy. It 
is so long since I have seen you. 'But I will not, I will 
not cry any more," said she, drying her tears and turn- 
ing around. r " N6\v go 'and r get dressed," she added, 
after she had grown a little calmer,, but still holding 
Serozha's hand. She sat down near the bed on a chair 
which held .the child's clothing! . "How do you dress 
without' me ?r -How .... '" she wanted ,to speak simply 
and gayly; but she:could not, and again she* turned her 
head away, f •• ? mI rtofi'l 

// V;E don't wash in cold water any more, papa has for- 
bidden* it ; but you have not seen Vasili Lukitch ? Here" 
he comes. But you are sitting on my things." 

And Serozha laughed -heartily. She looked at him 
and smiled. w,-, 



ANNA KARENINA 39 

M Mamma ! dear, heart, r darling," 1 he cried, again 
throwing himself; into her arms^ as if now for the first 
time, having seen. her :smile,. he clearly understood what 
had happened. >uo vliw : ■ »rl orit tKriJ th j(id 

"You don't need it on," said he, taking off her hati 
And as if again recognizing her with her head' bare, he 
began to kiss her, again. ; r i ji> A4wJ » 

"What did you think of me'?. Did you believe that I 
was dead?" ,. ; , •*> . nn bimirJriiRrtt ^jnri jj '! 

" I never believed it." . ? 

" You believed me alive, my precious f]h I 

"I knew it! I knew it!" he replied, repeating his 
favorite phrase;, and, seizing her hand which was smooth- 
ing his hair, he pressed the palm of it to hifc little mouth 
and began to kiss it. J i 

7 T l» Joint* 

. CHAPTER XXX 

Vasili Lukitch, meantime, not at first knowing who 
this lady was, but learning 'from their conversation that 
it was Serozha's mother, the woman who had deserted 
her husband, and whom* he' did not know, as he 'had not 
come into the. house till after her departure, was in great 
perplexity.' Ought he, to: go. to his pupil, or should he 
tell Aleksei* Aleksandrovitch ? 

1 On mature reflection he came to the conclusion that 
his duty, consisted in going to dress Serozha at the usual 
hour, without paying any attention to a third person' — 
his mother oV any one else. So lie dressed himself. 
But as hereaphed the "door and opened it, the sight of 
the caresses between the mother and child/the sound .of 
their voices and. their words, made ^him change his mind. 
He shook his head, sighed, and' quietly closed th£ door. 
"I will wait ten'' minutes longer,"' he said to. himself, 
coughing slightly, and* wiping his .eyes. 
- There was great excitement among the servants ; they 

all knew that ; the bariiinya had come, and that Kapitonu- 

. 1, , uJ ii» *nv LK\ i n ^v/i a* 

1 Dushenka, giilubmlika, V b OYJ\ &£ bt> n I f . I $1 



4 o ANNA KARENINA 

itch had let her inland that she was in the child's room; 
they knew, too, that their master was in the habit of 
going to Serozha every morning at nine o'clock : each 
one felt that the husband and wife ought not to meet, 
that it mii'st be prevented. ,^ *~" 

Kornet," the valet, went down to the Swiss to ask why 
Anna had been let in ; and, finding that Kapitonuitch 
had taken her up-stairs,'he reprimanded, him severely. 
The Swiss maintained an obstinate silence till the valet 
declared that he deserved to lose his place, when the old 
man jumped at c hirn, and; shaking his fist in his face, 
said:— " ," j'A \ -i i ' : h 'o 

."What is that? you. would hot let her in? You've 
served here ten < years, and had nothing but kindness 
from her, but you would have said, '-Now, go away from 
here ! * You know what policy is, you sly dog. What 
you don't forget is to rob your master, and to carry off 
his racoon-skin shubas !." • , , j 

" Soldier ! " replied Kornei, scornfully, and he turned 
toward the, nurse, who was coming in just at this mo- 
ment. "What do you think, Marya Yefimovna? He 
has let in Anna Arkadyevna, without saying anything 
to anybody, and just when- Alekseif Aleksandrovitch, as 
soon as he is up, will be going to the nursery." 

"What a scrape! what a scrape!" said the nurse. 
"BuC Kornei Vasilyevitch, find some way to keep 
your master, while I run to warn her, and get her out 
of , the way. /What a scrape ! " 

'When the nurse went into the child's room, Serozha 
was telling his mother how Nadenka and he had fallen 
when sliding down a hill of ice, and turned three somer- 
saults. Anharwas, listening to the sound of her- son's 
voice, looking "at his face, watching the play of his fea- 
tures, feeling his little arms, but not hearing a r word 
that , he said. She" had to go away,, she had to, leave 
him"; this alone she understood : and felt. She had, 
heard. Vasjli ,Lukitch's steps, and his little discreet 
cpugh, .as /lie camp to the door, and, now she heard the 
nurse coming in ; but, unable to move or to speak, she 
remained as fixed as x statue. 



ANNA KARENINA 41 

" Mistress, darling," * said the nurse, coming up to 
Anna, and kissing her hands and her shoulders. " God 
sent this joy for our birthday celebration ! -You are not 
changed at all." 

M Akh ! nurse, my dear ; I did not know that you were 
in the house," said Anna/ coming to Herself.. 

"I don't live here; I live with my daughter. I came 
to give my best wishes to Serozha, Anna' Arkadyevna, 
galubushka." 

The nurse suddenly began to weep, and to kiss Anna's 
hand. 

Serozha, with bright; r joyful eyes^ and holding his 
mother with one hand and his nurse with the other, was 
dancing in his little bare feet on" the * carpet His old 
nurse's tenderness toward his mother was delightful to 
him. T ^ 

" Mamma, she often comes to see me ; and when she 
comes ...."he began, but he stopped short when he per- 
ceived that the nurse whispered something in his mother's 
ear, and that his mother's face assumed an expression of 
fear, and something like shame which did not go well 
with -his mother. 

Anna went to him. • 

" My precious ! " she said. 

She could not say the word prashchai, " farewell " ; but 
the expression of her face said it, and he understood. 

" My precious, precious Kutik! '\ she said, calling him 
by a pet name which she used when he was a baby. 
" You will not forget me ; you ...." but she could not say 
another word. 

Only then she began to think of the words which she 
wanted to say to him, but now it was impossible to say 
them. But Serozha understood all that she would have 
said ; he understood that she was unhappy, and that she 
loved him. He even understood "what the nurse whis- 
pered in her ear ; he heard the words " always at nine 
o'clock," and he knew that they "referred to his father,' 
and that his mother must not meet him. - He understood 
this, but one thing he could not understand : why did her 

< } Baruinya, galubushka. 



41 ANNA KARENINA 

face express fear and shame ?...VShe was not to blame, 
but she was afraid of Irim, and seemed ashamed of some- 
thing. He wanted to ask a questibn which would have 
explained this doubt, but he did not dare ; he saw that 
she was in sorrow, and he pitied, her. He silently clung 
close to her,, and then he whispered : — : 
., " Don't go yet ! He will not come for some time?' 

His mother pushed him away from her a little, in or- 
der to see if he understood the meaning' of what he 
had said, and in the frightened expression of his face 
she perceived that he not only spoke of his father; 
but seemed to ask. her how 'he ought to think about 

him. '•; t .1 ,ffr 

," Serozha, my dear,"' she said," love v him ; he is better 
and more upright, than If ami, and I have been wicked 
to him. When you have grown up, you will under- 
stand.'- "v bf ' ji\ f Sj- o1 ^>/f< j r ' * i 

"Not better than you ! " cried the child, with sobs of 
despair; and; , clinging to his mothers shoulders, he 
squeezed her with all his might till his arms trembled 
with the exertion. ' , .• * ■ 

" My darling, my little one ! " l exclaimed Anna ;• and, 
bursting into tears, she sobbed like a child, even as he 
sobbed. f it. * 

At this, moment the door opened, and Vasili Lukitch 
came in. Steps were heard at the other door ; and, in a 
frightened whisper, he exclaimed, " He is coming," and 
gave Anna her hat. I / , l 

Serozha threw- himself on the bed, sobbing, and cov- 
ered his face with his hands. Anna took them away 
to kiss yet once again his tear-stained cheeks, and then 
with quick steps hurried from thfe room: 

Alekseif Aleksandrovitch met her at the door. When 
he saw her, he stopped and bowed his head. . ; - 

Though she had: declared a moment before that he 
was better and more upright than she, the swift glance 
that she gave i him, taking in his whole person, with all 
its peculiarities, awoke in her only a feeling of hatred 
and scorn for him, arid* jealousy on account oh her son, 

1 Dushetchka, malenki fhot. 



ANNA KARENINA 43 

She hurriedly lowered her veil, and, quickening her, 
step, almost Tan from, the room. 

She had entirely forgotten in her haste , the. play- 
things which, on the evening before, she had bought 
with so much love and sadness; and she took them 
back with her to the hotel. 



CHAPTER XXXI 

Eagerly as Anna had desired to see her son again, 
long as she had thought about it, prepared herself be- 
forehand, she had no idea of what an effect the sight 
of him would have on her ; when she got back to her 
solitary room at the hotel again, she could not, for a 
long time understand why she was there. 

"Yes, all is over; I am alone again/* she said to 
herself; and, without taking off her hat, she threw 
herself into an easy-chair which stood near the fireplace. 
And, fixing her eyes on a bronze clock standing on a 
table between two windows, she became absorbed in 
thought. 

The French maid whom she had brought from abroad 
with her came and offered to help her dress; Anna 
looked at her with surprise, and replied, " By and by." 
A servant came to announce coffee ; " By and by;" she 
said. 

The Italian nurse came in, bringing the little daugh- 
ter whom she had just dressed ; the plump, well-nurtured 
little one, as always, when she saw her mother, lifted up 
her bare little arms with the palms down, and, smiling 
with her toothless little mouth, began to beat the air 
with her plump little hands like a fish waving its fins, 
and to pull at the starched tucks of her embroidered 
skirt. No one could help smiling back, or kissing the 
little girl, or letting her catch hold of one of her fingers, 
screaming with delight, and jumping ; no one could help 
pressing her lips for a kiss to the little sweet mouth. 
All this Anna did, and she took her into her arms, trotted 
her on her knee, and, she kissed her fresh cheek and 



44 ANNA KARENINA 

bare elbows ; but the sight of this child made her feel 
clearly that the affection which she felt for it was not 
the same kind of love that she had for Serozha. Every- 
thing about this little girl was lovely ; but somehow she 
did not fill the wants of her heart. - 

In her first-born, although. he was the child of a man 
whom she did not love, was concentrated all the strength 
of a love which had not been satisfied. Her daugh- 
ter, born in the most trying circumstances, had never 
received the one-hundredth part of the care which she 
had spent on Serozha. Moreover, the little girl, as yet, 
only represented hopes, while Serozha was almost a 
man; and a lovely man ! He had already begun to 
struggle with his thoughts and feelings; he loved his 
mother, understood her, judged her perhaps, she thought, 
recalling her son's words and looks; and now she was 
separated from him forever, morally, as well as mate- 
rially ; and she saw no way of remedying the situation. 

She gave the little one back to her nurse, and sent 
them away, and opened a locket containing Serozha's 
picture about the same age as his sister ; then, remov- 
ing her hat, she took an album in which were photo- 
graphs of her son at different periods ; she wanted 
to compare them, and she began to take them out of 
the album. 'She took them all out. One was left, the 
last, the best photograph of him. It represented Se- 
rozha astride a chair, in a white frock, a smile on his 
lips and a shadow in his eyes ; it was his most character- 
istic, his best expression. ; Holding the album in her lit- 
tle deft hands, which to-day moved with extraordinary 
nervousness, she tried with her /slender white fingers to 
takedt from its place ; but the photograph stuck, and she 
could not get at it. There was no paper-cutter on the 
table, and she took up another photograph at random 
to push out the card from its place. ' , 
t^ It. was a picture of Vronsky, taken in Rome, with 
long Hair and a round felt hat. 

• f " Ah T there* he is," she said to herself, and as she 
looked at him she "suddenly remembered that he was 
the : cause of all her present suffering, ; 1 u> i-it 



ANNA KARENINA 45 

Not once had she thought of him all the morning; 
but now suddenly the sight of this manly and noble 
face, which she knew and loved so well, brought a flood 
of affection to her heart. 

- " Yes ! Where is he ? Why does he leave me alone, 
a prey to my grief?" she asked with bitter reproach, 
forgetting thatshb herself had carefully concealed from 
him everything concerning her. son. She sent a mes- 
sage to him, asking him to come to her immediately, 
and waited, with heavy heart, thinking over the words 
with which she should tell him all, and the loving ex- 
pressions with which he would try to console her. The 
servant returned to say that Vronsky had a visitor, but 
that he would come very soon ; and would like to know 
if she could receive him with Prince Yashvin, who had 
just arrived in Petersburg. • 

" He will not come alone, and he has not seen me 
since yesterday at dinner," she thought ; " and he does 
not come so that I can speak with him, but he comes 
with Yashvin." 

And suddenly a cruel thought crossed her mind : 
what if he no longer loved her ? 

And as she went over in her mind all the incidents of 
the past few days, she found her terrible thought con- 
firmed by them. The day before he had not dined with 
her; they did not have the same room, now that' they 
were in Petersburg ; arid now he was bringing some one 
with him as if to avoid being alone with her. 

" But he must tell me this. I must know it. If it is 
true, I know what I must do," she said to herself, wholly 
unable to imagine what would happen if Vronsky's in- 
difference should prove to be true. She began to feel 
that he did not love her any more ; she imagined herself 
reduced- to despair, and' in consequence her feelings 
made her overexcited ; she rang for her maid, went into 
her dressing-room, and tc)ok extreme pains with her 
dress as if the sighf of her toilet and becoming way of 
dressing her hair would bring back Yronsky's love, if he 
had grown indifferent 

The bell rang before she was ready. 1 ^^ uo { • 



4 6 4NNA KAREN! ^A 

When ?hq returned to, the drawing-room, not Vronsky, 
but^ Yashvin, looked' at her t Vronsky was looking at 
Serozha's picture,* which she h^d left lying orr the table, 
and he did not hurry to greet her. 

s_ "W e are old acquaintances," she said to him, going 
toward him and placing her small hand in Yashvin's 
enormous hand. He was all confusion, and this seemed 
odd, in a, man, of his gigantic form -and decided fea^ 
tures. r; i, . . 

"We met last year at the races. —Give them to me," 
she said, snatching her spiv's photographs from Vrpnsky, 
who was looking at them, while her eyes blazjed. at him 
significantly. "Were the 'rages successful, this year? 
We saw the races at Rome on the Corsp. But I believe 
you do not like life abroad," she abided, with a fascinat- 
ing smile. "I know you, and,, although we ; seldom 
meet, I know your tastes." n vj i*> \/ * 

"I am very sorry ior that, because my tastes are gen^ 
erally bad,V said' Yaslyvin, biting the left side of his 
mustache. 

After they had .talked some little time;, Yashvin, see- 
ing Vronsky look at his -watch, asked, Anna if she ex- 
pected to be hr Petersburg. Jong, , Then, bending down 
his huge back, he picked up his k£pi. ; - j 

-", Probably .not long,", she replied, in spme confusion, 
and looked at, Vronsky, <{) 

oiJ'Ther* we shall npt-meet again, ? " said Yashvin, get- 
ting up and addressing Vronsky, "Where are ypu go- 
ing to.dine ?*": , 

v ?' Corne and dine with, me/Vsaid Anna/ with decision ; 
and, vexed because she could not conceal her confusion 
whenever^ her, fajse ^situation becarpe evident before a 
Stranger, she blushed.: ."The tat?lehereis not good, but 
you* will at Jea$t ,see each other; . Of ,aH AlekseT*s mess- 
mates, you are his -favorite. " 

•o*' I should be delighted," replied Yashvin, with 3 
smile which proved to ,Vrons}ty that he was very, much 
pleased with/ Anna, Yashvin took, leave- of them and 
went away, while Vronsky lingered behind. 

" Are you going^.tQQ > ? " she, asked him. /I \ <f 



ANNA KARENINA 47 

"T am already late. Go ahead, I will overtake you," 
he shouted to Yashvin. 

* She took his hand, and, without removing her eyes 
from him, tried to find something to say to detain 
him. 3« 

"Wait ; I want to ask you something," and she pressed 
Vronsky's hand against her cheek. • '■ Well ! did' I do 
wrong to invite him to dinner ? " 

"You did quite right," he' replied, with a calm smile 
which showed his solid teeth, and he kissed her hand. 

"AlekseV, do you feel changed toward me?" she 
asked, pressing his hand between' her own; " Alekser, 
I am tired of staying here. When shall* we go away ? " 

"Soon, very soon. You can't imagine how life- here 
weighs upon me too," and he drew away hi& hand. J 

"Weill go, go away 1" she said, in an injured tone, 
and quickly left him. < * 



CHAPTER XXXII 

When VrOnsky came back to the hotel, Anna was 
not there. They told him that she had gone out with a 
lady who came to call on her. The fact that she had 
gone out without having left word where, a thing which 
she had not done before/ the fact that she had' also 
gone somewhere in the morning without telling him, — 
all this coupled with the strange expression of excitement 
on her face that morning,* the manner and the harsh 
tone with which she had snatched away her son's pho- 
tographs from him before Yashvin, made Vronsky won- 
der. He made up his mind to ask for an explanation, 
and waited in the drawing-room for her return. Anna 
did not come back alone ; she brought with her an old 
maiden aunt, the Princess "Oblonskaya. She was the 
lady who had come in the morning, and with whom she 
had been shopping. 

Anna pretended not to notice the expression of 
Vronsky's face and his uneasy, questioning manner, and 
began to talk gayly about the purchases she had made 



48 ANNA KARENINA 

in j the morning.*' • He saw that something unusual was 
the matter: in her shining eyes,- as they flashed their 
lightning on him, there was evidence, of mental strain ; 
and in her speech and movements there was r that ner- 
vous alertness and grace which in the first epoch of 
their relationship had so captivated him, but now .they 
troubled and alarmed him. 

The table was laid for, four, and, just as they were 
going to sit down in the little dining-room, Tuskieyitch 
came from the Princess Betsy with a message for Anna. 

The Princess Betsy sent her excuses for not coming 
in person to say good-by to her. She was not well, 
and asked Anna to come to see her between half-past 
seven and nine o'clock. L t 

Vronsky looked at Anna as if he would draw her 
attention to the fact that in naming a time she had taken 
precautions against her meeting any one ; _but Anna did 
not seem to pay any attention to it. 

" I am very sorry, but just between half -past seven 
and nine I shall] not, be at liberty," she said, with a 
slight smile. 
t ''The princess will be very much disappointed." 

"So shall I." , 

"I suppose you are going to hear Patti," said, Tush- 
kievitch. # . u 

" Patti ? You give me an idea. I would go certainly, 
if I could get*a loge" 
* " I .can get you one," suggested Tushkievitch. 

" I should be very much obliged to you," said Anna; 
"but won't you dine with us?" 

■- Vronsky shrugged his shoulders slightly ; he did not 
know what to make of Anna. Why had she brought 
home the old princess, why was she keeping Tushkie- 
vitch to dinner, and, above all, why did she let him get 
her a box? Was it to be thought of for a moment that 
she, in her position, could go to the opera on a Patti 
subscription night, when she would meet all her ac- 
quaintances there,? He looked at her seriously, but 
she responded with a half-despairing, half-mocking 
look, the meaning of which he could not understand. 



ANNA KARENINA 49 

All through dinner Anna was aggressively lively, and 
seemed to flirt both with Tushkievitch and with Yashvin. 
When they rose from the table, Tushkievitch went to 
secure a box, but Yashvin was going to smoke and 
Vronsky took him down to his own room ; after some 
time Vronsky came up-stairs again. t Anna, was already 
dressed in a light silk gown bought in Paris. It was 
trimmed with velvet and had an open fronts On her 
head she wore costly white lace, which set qff to advan- 
tage the striking beauty of her face. ,, ; 

"Are you really going to "the theater?" he asked, 
trying to avoid lookingat her. ■ ; r f it j % 

" Why do you ask me in such a terrified way ? " she 
replied, 5 again hurt because he did, not look at her. 
"Why shouldn't I go ? " - v * fl 

She did not seem to /understand the meaning of his 
words. Jlr V /_ 

t " Of course, there is no reason for it,", said he, frowning. 

"That is exactly what T say,", she replied^ not wish- 
ing to see the sarcasm of his remark, and calmly putting 
on a long, perfumed glove. 

"Anna, for heaven's sake, what is the matter with 
you ? " he said to her, trying to bring her to her senses, 
as her husband had more than once done. 

5 I .don't know what you mean." , , HO %j 

" You know very well that you can't go there." 

"Why not? I am not going alone; the .Princess 
Varvara has gone to dress ; she is going with; me." 

He shrugged his shoulders with a look of perplexity 
and despair. . 

" But don't you know ? " .... he began. 

"No, I don't want to know!" she almost shrieked. 
"I don't want to know. Am I sorry for, anything I 
have done? No, no, no, indeed;, if it were to begin 
over again, I would begin over again. M There- is only 
one thing of any consequence to us — to you and nie, 
and that is do we 'love each other? Everything else 
is of no account. Why do we live separate here, and 
not see each other ? Why can't I go where I please ? 
I love you, and everything is right, if your feelings have 



50 ANNA KARENINA 

nbt" changed toward me," she said in Russian, looking 
dt him 'with a K peculiar gleam in her eyes which he 
could not understand ; " why don't you look at me ? " 

He looked at her, he saw all her beauty, of her face, 
of 'the 'toilet, "which was so 'becoming to her; but now 
this beauty and -this elegance were precisely what -irri- 
tated him. 

" You know very well that my feelings cannot change ; 
but "I beg you not to go out, I beseech you," he said 
again in French, with a prayer in his voice, but with a 
cold look in his eyes. 

She, did not hear his words, but noticed only the 
coldness of his look, anci replied with an injured air: — 
Vjii And'I'for my part beg -you toexplain why I should 
not go." 
c * " BedausS it may cause you .... " 

He grew confused. 
•rt f "T "don't understand at all: Yashvin ri est pas com- 
prdmettant y zxA the Princess : Varvara is no worse-than 
anybody, else:.' Ah! here she is!" 

dfi u i^inun * ' : : i / , - 1 , • , / * 

id oi i -CHAPTER XXXIII 

For, the first time in his life Vrorisky'felt toward 
Anna a Sensation [of vexation bordering on anger, on 
acdb'iint of her intentional misunderstanding of her posi- 
tion. This feeling was intensified by the fact that he 
bb'tild notiexplairi the reason of his vexation. If he had 
frankly said what was in his mind, he would have 
^aid:. — 

• } "Tp appear at the opera in such a toilet, with a noto- 
rious person 'like the princess, is equivalent to throwing 
Bowii the gauntlet to public opinion ; to confessing your- 
self a l lost "woman, and, Consequently, renouncing all 
hope of ever going into society again." 

He could not say that to her. 
" "Why did she not understands? What has hap- 
pened to her? " he asked himself. 
* He felt at one and the same time a lessened es- 



ANNA KARENINA 51 

teem for Anna's character, and a greater sense of her 
beauty. 

With a dark frown he went back to his roonvand sat 
down with Yashvin, who, with his long legs stretched 
out on a chair, was drinking cognac and seltzer water. 
Vronsky ordered the same for himself. 

"You spoke of Lanskofs Moguchi? He is a fine 
horse, and I advise you to buy him," began Yashvin, 
glancing at his comrade's solemn face. " His crupper is 
tapering, but what legs ! and what a head ! You could n't 
do better." 

" I think I shall take him," replied Vronsky. 

The talk about horses occupied him, but not for a 
moment was the thought of Anna absent from his mind, 
and he involuntarily listened for 'the sound of steps in 
the corridor, and kept looking at the clock on the mantel. 

"Anna Arkadyevna - lef t word that she has gone to 
the theater," a servant announced: 

Yashvin poured out another little glass of cognac and 
seltzer, drank it, and rose, buttoning up his coat. 

"Well, shall we go?" said he, half smiling beneath 
his long mustaches, and showing that he - understood 
the cause of Vronsky's vexation, but did not attach much 
importance to it 

" I am not going," replied Vronsky, gloomily. 

"I promised, so Lmust go; well ^— da svidanya! If 
you should change your mind, take Krasinsky's seat, 
which will be unoccupied," he added, as he went out. 

" No ; I have some work to do." 

" A man has trials with a wife, but with a not-wife it 
is even worse," thought Yashvin as he left the hotel. 

When Vronsky was alone, he rose, and began to walk 
up and down the room. 

"Yes! T6-night? The fourth subscription night.... 
My brother Yegor will be there with his wife, and with 
my mother, probably ; in fact, all Petersburg will be 
there ! Now she is going in, and is taking off her shuba, 
and there she is in the light! Tushkievitch, Yashvin, 
the Princess Varvara ! " he pictured the scene to himself. 
"What am I to do ? am I afraid ? or have I given Tush- 



52 ANNA KARENINA 

kievitch the right. to protect her? However you may 
look at it, it is stupid, it is stupid ! .... Why should she 
place me in this position ? " he said, with a gesture of 
despair. / 

/This movement jostled the stand on which stood the 
seltzer water and the decanter with cognac, and nearly 
knocked it over; in trying to rescue jt, he upset it 
entirely ; he rang, and gave a kick to the table. 

" If you want to remain in my service," said he to his 
valet who appeared, " then tend to your business. Don't 
let. this happen again ; why did n't you take these 'things 
away?" . > - * J \ < ' r - " - ' , 

The valet, knowing his innocence, wished to justify 
himself : but by. one glance at his barin's.face he realized 
that it was best, for him to be silent;, and, making a 
hasty excuse, he got down on the floor to pick-up. the 
broken glasses and water-bottles. - -■■',.■ . ,/ , r / x » 

" That is not your business ; call a waiter, and get my 
dress-coat." 

Vronisky entered the theater at half-past, nine. /The 
performance was in full. swing. The Kapelldiener— ;a 
little >old« man — took his fur-lined shuba, and, recogniz- 
ing him, called him "your excellency,"^ and assured 
him that he needed not "to take a number, but that all 
he had to do was to call, for Feodor. 

There was no* one, in the lighted lobby except the Ka- 
pelldiener and' two valets with fur garments on their 
arms, listening at the "door. The sound of the orchestra 
playing staccato could be heard, carefully accompanying 
a woman's voice' which was admirably rendering a musi- 
cal phrase. The door opened and another Kapelldiener 
came tiptoeing out, and the phrase, as it was r ending, 
came distinctly to' Vronsky's ear. But instantly the 
door closed again and he could not hear the ending of 
the phrase or the Cadenza ; but from the applause that 
followed he knew that the aria was finished. ' ; * T r 

The , plaudits still continued as he went into the audi- 
torium, brilliantly lighted with chandeliers and bronze 
gas-fixtures. On the^ stage, the prima donna, with 



ANNA KARENINA 53 

bare shoulders and glittering with diamonds, was bow- 
ing and smiling, and, with the assistance of the tenor, 
who gave her his hand, was bending forward to receive 
the bouquets that were thrust awkwardly at her over the 
footlights, and then she went toward a gentleman whose 
hair/ shining with pomade, was parted in the middle, 
and who reached out his long arms to hand her some 
article. The whole audience — those in the boxes and 
those in the parquet — was wildly excited and leaning 
forward, shouting and clapping. The Kapellmeister, 
on his elevated stand, helped pass it along, and straight- 
ened his white necktie. 

Vronsky went down to the middle of the parquet, and, 
pausing, looked through the audience. He paid less 
attention than ever to the familiar stage-setting, to the 
stage, to the noise, to all that well-known, variegated, and 
uninteresting throng of spectators that was packed and 
crowded into the theater. 

There were the same ladies in the boxes, with the 
same officers behind them, the same gayly dressed 
women, the same uniforms, and the same dress-coats ; 
in the gallery the same disorderly crowd ; and in all this 
closely packed house, in the boxes and in the front seats, 
were some forty genuine men and women ! And Vron- 
sky immediately turned his attention to this oasis, and 
occupied himself with it exclusively. 

The act was just over as Vronsky went toward the 
first row of seats, and stopped near the railing beside 
Serpukhovskof, who, bending his knee and rapping 
against the rail with his heel, had seen him at a distance, 
and beckoned to him with a smile. 

Vronsky had not yet seen Anna, and purposely re- 
frained from looking for her ; but from the direction in 
which people were gazing, he knew where she was. 
He glanced round furtively but did not search for her. 
Expecting something even worse, he looked to see if 
Aleksei Aleksandrovitch were there ; to his joy the 
latter was not at the theater that evening. 

"How unmartial you look," said SerpukhovskoY; "one 
would take you for a diplomat — an artist." 



54 ANNA KARENINA 

"Yes; on my return home I put on citizen's dress/' 
replied Vronsky, slowly taking out his opera-glasses. 

* " In this respect, I confess I envy you. When I re- 
turn from abroad "and put these on," said he, touching 
his epaulets, "Tmoum for my liberty." 

SerpukhovskoT had Jong since given up trying to push 
Vronsky along in his military career, but he continued 
to have a warm affection for him, and he now seemed 
especially friendly toward him. 

" ft is too bad that you lost the first act." 

Vronsky, while listening -with one ear, examined the 
boxes and the first tier of seats, with his opera-glass ; 
suddenly Anna's head came into view, proud, and strik- 
ingly beautiful, in its frame of laces, next a lady in a tur- 
ban, and a bald-headed old man, who blinked as he gazed 
through his opera-glass. Anna was in the fifth box, not 
more than twenty steps from him ; she was seated in the 
front of the box, turning slightly away, and was talking 
with Yashviri. The pose of her head, her neck, her 
beautiful, broad shoulders, the radiance of her eyes and 
facev-^all reminded him of her as she had looked that 
evening at the bk\\ in Moscow. 

But her beauty inspired him with entirely different 
sentiment ; there was no longer anything mysterious in 
his feeling for her. And so, although her beauty was 
more extraordinary than ever, and fascinated him, at the 
same time it was now offensive to him. She did not 
look in r his 1 direction, but he felt that she had already 
seen him. * < 

When Vronsky again directed his opera-glass toward 
the box, he saw the Princess Varvara, very red in the 
face,, Was laughing unnaturally, and kept looking at the 
next box ; Anna, striking her closed fan on the red vel- 
vet, was looking away, evidently not seeing and not" in- 
tending to see what was going on in the next box. 
YashvhYs face wore the same expression as when he lost 
at cards ; he drew his left mustache more and more into 
his mouth, frowned, and w&s looking out of the corner 
of his eye int6 the same box* 

In this box were the Kaftasofs. Vronsky knew them, 



ANNA KARENINA 5$ 

and he knew that Anna, too, had been pn friendly terms 
with them ; Madame Kartasof, a little, thin woman, was, 
standing with her back to Anna,* and putting on an opera- 
cloak, which her husband handed , to her ; her face was 
pale and angry; and she was saying something with 
great excitement. Kartasof, a stout, bald-headed man, 
kept looking at Anna, and trying to calm his wife. 

When Madame Kartasof left the box, her husband 
lingered, trying to catch Anna's eye, and evidently de- 
sirous of bowing to her ; but apparently she purposely 
avoided noticing him, and leaned back to speak to Yash- 
vin, whose shaven head was bent toward her. Kartasof 
went out without having bowQd/and the box, was left 
empty. 

Vronsky did not understand what had just passed be- 
tween the Kartasofs an,d Anna, but he felt perfectly sure 
that something mortifying had happened to Anna ; by 
the expression of her face he saw that she was summon- 
ing all her strength to keep up'her part to the end, and 
to appear perfectly calm. And this semblance of ex- 
ternal calm was put on to perfection. Those who knew 
nothing of her history and her circle, who had not heard 
her old friends' expressions of indignation at her appear- 
ing in this way, in all the splendor of her beauty and of 
her toilet, would have admired her serenity and beauty, 
and never have suspected that this woman was enduring 
the same; feelings of shame, as a criminal experiences at 
the pillory. , K v < ' 

Knowing that something had taken place, but not 
knowing exactly what, Vronsky felt Na- sense of deep 
anxiety, and, hoping to learn ( - something about the 
matter, went to' his brother's box;' He Jntentionally 
crossed the parquet, on the side oppositeto Anna's box, 
and, as he went, ran across his former regimental com- 
mander, who was talking wjth two of his acquaintances. 
Vronsky heard the Karenins' name spoken, and noticed 
that the regimental commander hastened to call, to him 
aloud, while he gave his friends a significant look. 

"Ah! Vronsky, When shall .we see you again in 
the regiment ?, We shan't let you off without a bariquet 



56 ANNA KARENINA 

Yoii are ours, every inch of you," said the regimental 
commander. / • s ,*< 

"I shan't have the- time now. I am awfully sorry, 
another time'," replied Vronsky, going rapidly up the 
steps which led to his brother's box. 
''The old countess, his mother, with her little steel- 
colored curls, was in the box. Varia and the young 
Princess Sorokin were -walking together in the lobby 
of- the belle-etage. As soon as she saw her brother-in- 
law, Varia went back to her mother with her companion, 
and then, taking VronskyV arm/ immediately began to 
speak with him about the subject which concerned him. 
She showed more excitement than he had ever seen in 
her. 

"I think it is dastardly and vile ; Madame Kartasof 
had no right to do so. r Madame Karenin .... " she began. 

" But what is the matter ? I don't know what you 
mean." / ^ , • l, j 

" What ? you have n't heard anything about it ? " 

"You can f well understand that I should be the last 
person to hear anything about it." 

"Is there a more wicked creature in the world than 
this Madame Kartasof ! " 

"But what did she do ? " 

" My husband told me about it .... she insulted Madame 
Karenin. Her husband began to speak across from his 
box to f Madame Rarenm, and Madame Kartasof made a 
scene about it. They say she said something very offen- 
sive in a lou ! d voice, anci r went but." - 

"Count, your mamari is calling you," said the young 
Princess r Sorokin; opening the door. of .the box. 
O^Phave been waiting for you all this time," said his 
mother to ' him, with, a ' sarcastic smile ; -" we never see 
anything of * you now." -'• / " * '■•*'* ■ *• ri ■* ,»• 

The son saw that she could. not conceal a smile of 
satisfaction. / A r ' 

"Good evening* maman. I was coming to see you," 
he replied^ coolly . ffT , 

" What/ T' hope you are not going /aire la cour a 
Madame Karfamie" she added, when the young Prin« 



ANNA KARENINA 57 

cess Sorokina was out of hearing; " elle fait sensation. 
On oublie la Patti pour elle." 

" Maman y I have begged you not to speak to me 
about her," he replied gloomily. 

" I only say what everybody is saying." 

Vronsky did not reply ; and, after exchanging a few 
words with the young princess, he went out. He-nlet 
his brother at the door. 

"Ah, Alekser!" said his brother, "how abominable! 

She is a fool, nothing more I was just wishing to go 

to see Madame Karenin. Let us go together." 

Vronsky did not heed- him; he ran hastily down the 
steps, feeling that he ought to do something, but knew 
not what. 

He was stirred with anger, 'because Anna had placed 
them both in such a false position, and at the same time 
he felt deep pity for her suffering. 

He went down into the parquet, and thence directly 
to Anna's loge. Stremof was leaning on the box, talking 
with her. 

" There are no more tenors," he said ; " le moule e7i est 
brisi — the mould is broken — from which they came." 

Vronsky bowed to her and stopped, exchanging greet- 
ings with Stremof. 

" You came late, it seems to me, and you lost the best 
aria," said Anna to Vronsky, looking at him scornfully, 
as it seemed to him. 

" I am not a very good judge," he replied, looking at 
her severely. 

" Like Prince Yashvin," she said, smiling, "who thinks 
Patti sings too loud. 

" Thank you," she said, taking the program that Vron- 
sky passed to her, in her little hand, incased in a long 
glove ; and at the same moment her beautiful face 
quivered ; she rose and went to the back of the box. 

The last act had hardly begun, when Vronsky, seeing 
Anna's box empty, left the parquet, though he was 
hissed for disturbing the quiet of the theater while a 
cavatina was going on, and went back to the hotel. 

Anna was already in her room ; when Vronsky went to 



58. ANNA KARENINA 

her she was sitting in the same toilet whiqh she had worn 
at the theater. She was sitting in the first chair she had 
come to, near , the wall, - looking straight before her. 
When she saw Vronsky enter, she glanced at him with*- 
out moving. <[ t / I n 

"■Anna;" he said. • „• * < ; f > r 

" You, you are to blame f ox it all ! " she exclaimed, 
rising, with tears of anger, and despair in her voice. ; ;, 

"I begged you, J implored you, not to go; I knew 
that it would be unpleasant, to you." ,:.: 

"Unpleasant!" she exclaimed ; "it was horrible! I 
shall not forget- it as long as I live. She said that it 
was a disgrace to sit near me,". ■ u * < 

" She was a stupid woman to say such a . thing ; but 
why did you run the risk .-of hearing it; why did you 
expose yourself ?"....-, 

" I hate your calm way. You should never have 
driven, me to this; if you loved me..... "- , > / . <> 

" Anna ! what has my love to do with this ? " .... 

" Yes, if you loved me as I love you, if you suffered 
as I. •..,"" she said,, loo king at him with an expression of 
terror. ; ■»} • / i# ;n ] A > d 

He felt sorry io^lher, and yet ,he was vexed with her. 
He protested his love, because he s^w that ' it was the 
only way to calm her. ; and he refrained from reproach- 
ing her, but: in his heart he reproached her. 

And his expressions of love, which, seemed to him: so 
banai"that:he.was ashampdof; himself for repeating ; them, 
she drank in, and gradually became herself again,- 1 T f { 

Two days .later they' left 'for the country, completely 
reconciled. ; ;h 



r >\V J< >ni "ir J ,!)« 




41 


JHU i / "U'S 7'fl i<* 


vl 


■ f 


D ' W" * K E '4 r\ -}r W |f) n ^ 




■ :u >l A 


X K\ Si/J )«. xj '•>• 






[ "fb-ii <i b i 






k> v/ Of 






£ .'•(* Vff 'Vlh'jdl r.ffj 






Ja><>rf oris o1 A 




h i*l 


«»t )mjh v^IanoiV/iorfw i 




/ mtiA 



at 
in 

PART SIXTH 

CHAPTER I 

DARYA ALEKSANDROVNA, with her children, 
was spending the summer at Pokrovskoye, at the 
house of her sister, Kitty Levin'. The house on her own 
estate, at Yergushovo, was all in ruins, and Levin and 
his wife had urged her to come to them for the summer. 
Stepan Arkadyevitch heartily approved of this, arrange- 
ment. He assured them that he very much regretted 
that his duties would prevent him from, spending ^the 
summer with his family in the country, for that would 
be the greatest possible delight for him, and if he stayed 
in Moscow he could occasionally run down for a day or 
two at a time. 

Besides the Oblonskys and all their children, the 
Levins had with them the old princess, who considered 
her presence near her daughter at this particular time 
indispensable; they had also Varenka, Kitty's Soden 
friend, who was fulfilling her promise of making Kitty a 
visit when she should have been married. AH these 
were Kitty's relatives and friends. Levin, though he 
liked them all, still felt some regret for his own people 
and his own ways, which were swallowed up as in a flood 
by the " Shcherbatsky element, " as he called it. Of his 
own relatives that summer Sergye'f Ivanovitch was the 
only representative, and he was not a Levin but a Koz- 
nuishef. So that the Levin spirit was at a great dis- 
count. There were so many persons in the long-deserted 
house that almost all the rooms were occupied, and 
almost every day the old princess, as she sat down at 
tabl£, would count the guests and send off to the special 
table the grandson or granddaughter who made the num- 
ber thirteen. And Kitty, diligently occupied with her 

59 



60 ANNA KARENINA 

housekeeping, found it no small burden to provide tur- 
keys, chickens, and ducks for the satisfaction of the 
various appetites of young and old, made keen by the 
country air. 

The whole family were at table. Dolly's children 
were planning to go out and hunt for mushrooms with the 
governess and Varenka, when, to the great astonishment 
of all, Sergye'f Ivanovitch, who enjoyed among all the 
guests a great reputation, amounting almost to rever- 
ence, on account of his wit and learning, evinced a desire 
to 'join the expedition. 

"Allow me to go with you,'' said he, addressing 
Varenka. " I am very fond of getting mushrooms ; I 
think it is a very admirable occupation." 

"Why, certainly, we shall be very glad.... " she 
answered, blushing. 

Kitty exchanged looks with Dolly. The proposition 
of the learned and intellectual Sergye'f Ivanovitch to go 
with Varenka after mushrooms confirmed an idea which 
had' been engaging Kitty for some time. 

She hastened to say something to her mother so that 
their looks might hot be observed. 

After dinner SergyeY Ivanovitch was sitting at the 
drawing-room window with his cup of coffee, still talk- 
ing with his brother on some topic which they were dis- 
cussing, -but he kept his eyes on the door through which 
the children would have to pass when they should start 
after the mushrooms. Levin was sitting at the window 
near his brother. Kitty was standing near her husband, 
evidently expecting the end of a conversation which did 
not interest her, so that shemightsay something to him. 
- -'You have changed a good deal since you were 
married, and for the better....?' said Sergye'f Ivanovitch, 
smiling at Kitty, and evidently riot taking much interest 
either in the conversation, but at the same time he re- 
mained true to his passion for defending the most 
paradoxical" themes. < •* 

"Katya, it is not well -for you to stand," said her 
husband, moving up a chair for her and giving her a 
'significant look. , { *' : 



ANNA KARENINA 61 

"Well, we will finish this some other time," said 
Sergyei Ivanovitch, as he saw the children come run- 
ning out. 

In advance of the rest, galloping sidewise in 'her 
tightly fitting stockings, came Tania, waving a basket 
and Sergye'f Ivanovitch's hat. 

Boldly darting up to him, and with sparkling eyes, — 
they were just like her father's handsome eyes, — she 
gave Sergyei' Ivanovitch his hat, and made believe that 
she was going to put it on him, tempering her audacity 
with a timid and affectionate smile. 

" Varenka is waiting," said Tania, carefully putting his 
hat on his head, seeing by Sergye'f Ivanovitch's smile 
that she might do so. 

Varenka was standing at the door. She had put on 
a yellow muslin frock, and had tied a white hat over her 
head. 

" I am coming — I am coming, Varvara Andreyevna! " 
cried SergyeY Ivanovitch, finishing his cup of coffee 
and putting his handkerchief and cigarette-case into his 
pocket. 

" Is n't Varenka charming ? " asked Kitty of her hus- 
band, as Sergyei Ivanovitch got up. She said this so 
that he might hear, for this was what she especially 
wanted. " And how pretty she is, royally pretty. — 
Varenka," cried Kitty, "are you going to the woods by 
the mill ? We will join you there." 

"You really forget your condition, Kitty," said the 
old princess, warningly, as she came hastily to the door. 
"You ought not to shout so loud." 

Varenka, on hearing Kitty's voice and the princess's 
reproof, came up to them with quick, light steps. Her 
quickness of motion, the bright color that flushed her 
cheek, all proved that some metamorphosis was taking 
place in her. Kitty knew that this was something un- 
usual, and watched her attentively. She now called 
Varenka only for the sake of bestowing on her a silent 
benediction, in the interest of an important event which 
she firmly believed would take place that day in the 
woods. 



6a ANNA KARENINA 

" Varenka, I shall be very glad if a ■ certain thing 
comes to pass," she said to her in a whisper, and giving 
her a kiss. 

" Are you coming with us ? " asked Varenka of Levin, 
confused, and pretending that she had not heard what 
had been said. 

" Yes, but only as far as the barns ; I shall have to 
stop there." 

" What do you propose to do there ? " asked Kitty. . 

"I have some new carts to examine and test. — And 
where shall I find you ? V 

" On the terrace." 



CHAPTER II 

All the women were gathered on the terrace. They 
generally liked to sit there after dinner, but to-day they 
had a special matter of interest before them. Besides 
the making of baby-shirts and the knitting of bands, in 
which all of them were engaged at that time, they were 
engaged in superintending the cooking of some pre- 
serves after a recipe unknown to Agafya Mikhai'lovna. 
Kitty had brought with her this new process, which had 
been in use in her own home and required no water. 
Agafya Mikhai'lovna, who had before been shown how 
to do it in this way, considering that what had always 
been done at the Levins' could not be improved on, 
insisted on pouring water into the berries, declaring 
it could not be made otherwise. - She had been detected 
doing this, and now the berries were cooking in the 
presence of them all, and Agafya MikhaYlovna was to 
be brought to a realizing sense of the fact that the 
preserves could be made without the use of water* 

Agafya MikhaKlovna, with flushed and heated face 
and disheveled- hair and with her sleeves rolled up to 
the elbow, was moving a porringer round and round 
over a portable stove and looking gloomily at it, wishing 
with all her soul that the berries would thicken and not 
boil. 



ANNA KARENINA $3 

The old princess, conscious that Agafya Mikhalflovna's 
indignation must be directed against her as the chief 
adviser in the concoction of the Sweetmeat, pretended 
that she was busy with something else, and was not 
interested in it; but though she talked of extraneous 
affairs she occasionally glanced at the cooking out of 
the corner of her eyes. 

" I always buy my girls* dresses at a cheap shop," the 
princess was saying in regard to something they had 

been talking about " Had n't you better take off 

the scum, my dear ? " l she added, addressing Agafya 
Mikha'flovna. " It is not at all necessary for you to do 
it, and it is hot," said she, stopping Kitty. 

" I will do it," said Kitty, who had got up and was 
carefully stirring the boiling sugar with a spoon, oc- 
casionally pouring out a little on a plate which was 
already covered with a variegated, yellowish red and 
sanguine scum, mixed with syrup. 

"How they will like to lick it! " she said to herself, 
thinking of her children and remembering how she 
herself, when she was a little girl, had wondered that 
grown-up people did not feed upon that best of all 
things — scum ! 

" Stiva says that it is far better to give money," Dolly 
was saying in regard to the question of making presents, 
which they had been discussing. " But ...." 

" How can one give money?" exclaimed the mother 
and Kitty, simultaneously. " They despise it." 

" Well, for example, last year I bought our Matriona 
Semyonovna, not a poplin, but some of that kind .... " said 
the princess. 

" I remember she wore it on your name-day." 

" A lovely figure ! So simple and ladylike. I should 
have liked one of it myself, if she had not one. Like 
the kind Varenka wears. So pretty and cheap." 

" Now I think it is done," said Dolly, dropping the 
syrup from the spoon. 

"When it crystallizes it is done. Cook it a little 
more, Agafya MikhaYlovna." 

1 Galubushka, little dove. 



64 ANNA KARENINA 

• "What an absurdity !" exclaimed Agafya MikhaT- 
lovna. "It would be the same anyway," she added, ni 

"-Oh ! what a beauty he is ! Don't scare him ! " sud- 
denly exclaimed Kitty, looking .at a sparrow which' 
perched on the rail, and, turning the heart "of a berry 
over, began to peck at it. 

"Yes, but you ought to be farther away from the 
charcoal/' said her mother. 

"Apropos de Varenka" said Kitty in French, in which 
language indeed they had been speaking all the time so. 
that Agafya Mikha'flovna might not understand them, 
"do you know, maman, that I somehow expect some- 
thing decided.. You know what I mean. How nice it 
would be.'' , i 

"What a master-hand at matchmaking you are," ex- 
claimed Dolly. "How adroitly she has brought them 
together." Ik, 

" No, but tell me, maman, what do you think of it ? " 

" What do I think of it ? He can at any time have 
his choice of. all the best in Russia;'' by he she meant 
Sergyei Ivanovitch. " He is not so young as he was, 
but still I know many would set their caps for him. 
She is very good, but he might...." 

"No; indeed, you know perfectly well, that nothing 
better could be imagined for either of them. In the 
first place, she is charming," said. ? Kitty, bending down 
one finger. 

" She pleases him very much, that is true," said Dolly, 
in confirmation. 

" In the next place, he has. such a position in the world 
that it would make no difference to him what his wife's 
property or social standing was. He needs- only one 
thing — *a sweet, pretty, e:ven-tempered wife." 

"Yes, he might be very happy with her," said Dolly, 
in confirmation of this also. 

"In the third place, she must love him, and so it is 
now.... and so it would be perfectly lovely.... I expect 
when they come in from the woods it will be all decided. 
I shall read it instantly in their eyes. I should be so 
glad What do you think about it, Dolly ? 



ANNA KARENINA 65 

" Do not get so excited. You really "must not get so 
excited,'' said her mother. 

" But I am not excited, mamma. I think that he will 
surely propose to her to-day." 

" Oh, how strange it is how and when a man pro- 
poses. — Even if there is an obstacle, it is suddenly 
swept away," said Dolly, smiling pensively and recall- 
ing the old days with Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

" Mamma, how did papa propose to you," asked Kitty, 
suddenly. 

"There was nothing extraordinary about it — very 
simply," replied the princess; but her face grew all 
radiant at the remembrance. 

" No, but how was it ? Did you love him before you 
allowed him to speak ? " 

Kitty found a special charm in the fact that now she 
could talk with her mother, as with an equal, on the 
most important questions in the lives of women. - 

"Of course I loved him. He came to visit us in the 
country." - 

" But how was it decided, mamma ? " 

" Do you really think that you young people have in- 
vented something new ? It is always one and the same 
thing ; it is decided by looks and smiles." 
> "How well you describe it, mamma. That is just- it, 
'by looks and smiles/" said Dolly, confirming what her 
mother had said. 

" But what words did he say ? " 

"What words did Kostia say to you ? V 

" He wrote in chalk How long it seems since then," 

said Kitty. 

And the three ladies sat occupied with the same thought. 

Kitty was the first to break the silence. She had 
been thinking about that long-past winter before her 
marriage, and her infatuation for Vronsky. 

"There is one thing — Varenka's first love," said she, 
remembering this by a natural connection of thought. 
" I wanted to give Sergyei* Ivanovitch a hint of that to 
warn him. All men," she added, "are awfully jealous 
of our past." 

vol. m, — 5 



66 ANNA KARENINA 

fa ".Not all/' said Dolly. ''You judge by your husband. 
I believe he is even now tormented by the remembrance 
of. Vronsky - r is n'tthat so ? " 

" He is ! " replied Kitty, with a pensive smile in her eyes. 

"Well, I don't know what there is in .your past life to 
disquiet him," exclaimed the princess, her mother, re- 
senting the inference. that her maternal vigilance was 
called in question. "Is it because Vronsky paid you 
some attention ? That happens to every young girl." 

" Yes, but we were not talking about that," said Kitty, 
blushing. i j 

"No,. permit me to finish what I was saying," pursued 
the princess ; " and besides, you yourself would not per- 
mit .me to have an explanation with Vronsky, do you 
remember?" 

" Oh; mamma ! " exclaimed Kitty, with an exclamation 
oflpain./c ;^ ; z& ,vjd:T -w i 

"There is no need of your being vexed Your be- 

havior^toward him could never have been anything but 
perfectly proper. I myself should have challenged him ! 
However, my darling, don't allow" yourself to get ex- 
cited." Please remember this, and calm yourself." 
omfcl am perfectly. calm,, mamari." 

"How fortunate it turned out for Kitty that Anna 
appeared on the scene/ ' said Dolly, "and how unfortu- 
nate :ior her. How their positions are reversed," she 
added, overwhelmed by her own thought. " Anna was 
so happy then and Kitty thought herself so miserable. 
I often think of her. What a complete change ! " 
\ "j What is. the use of thinking about her? She is a 
vile, disgusting, heartless woman," exclaimed the prin- 
cess, who could not forget that "Kitty had married Levin 
instead bf Vronsky. r is^i-i «»] ■ 
-isrf' What is the good of speaking about her, anyway ! " 
said Kitty, in disgust " I do not think about her nor 

do I wish to think of ;her at all I do not wish to think 

abput her, 1 '* she repeated, hearing her husband's well- 
known step oh the steps leading to the terrace. 
siMljWJioih; do you 1 wish not to think about?" asked 
Levin, appearing on the terrace, 



ANNA KARENINA 67 

No one answered, and he did not repeat his question. 

" I am sorry that I am disturbing your feminine 
realm/' said he, looking angrily at them all, and perceiv- 
ing that they were talking about something which they 
would not talk about in his presence. For an instant he 
felt that he shared Agafya Mikhallovna's sentiments — 
her dissatisfaction at the Shcherbatsky way of making 
preserves without water, and especially the alien regime 
of his wife's family ! Nevertheless, he smiled and went 
up to Kitty. "Well, how is it?" he asked, looking" at her 
with the same expression every one used in addressing her. 

"All right," said Kitty, with a smile; "and how is it 
with you ? " 1 

" The three-horse team will take a larger load than we 
can put on the telyega. Shall we go to meet the chil- 
dren ? I have'ordered the men to harness." 

" What, are you going to take Kitty in the linyeika x ? " 
exclaimed the princess, reproachfully. 

"We shall walk the horses, princess." 

Levin never called the princess "maman" as his 
brothers-in-law did, and the princess resented it. But 
Levin, though he loved and respected her, could not 
call her so without doing violence to his feelings toward 
the memory of his own mother. 

" Come with us, maman" said Kitty. 

" I do not wish to countenance such imprudence ! " 

"Well, then, I will walk; that is good for me," said 
Kitty, rising to take her husband's arm. 

" Good for you ! But there 's reason in all things," 
said the princess. 

" Well, Agafya Mikhailbvna, are your preserves done ? 
Is the new method good ? " asked Levin, smiling at the 
housekeeper in his desire to cheer her. * 

" Perhaps they 're good ; - but, in my opinion, mucli 
overdone." 

" There's one thing about them that 's better, Agafya 
MikhaYlovna, they won't spoil," said Kitty, divining her 
husband's intention, and with the same feeling address- 
ing the old servant. " And you know the ice in thb ice- 

1 Linyeika is a wide drozhsky with several seats. 



68 ANNA KARENINA 

house is all melted and we can't get any more. As for 
your spiced meats, mamma assures me that she has never 
eaten any better/' she added, adjusting, with a smile, the 
housekeeper's loosened neckerchief., 

Agafya Mikha'flovna looked angrily at Kitty. "Do 
not try to console me, baruinya., To see you with him is 
enough to content me." 

This familiar way of speaking of her master touched 
Kitty. ft . 

"Come and show us the best places to find mush- 
rooms." ,!,, i iijv ;i ; (•/'_>•!> 

The old woman raised her head, smiling, as if to, say, 
"One would gladly guard you from all hatred, if it were 
possible." t t . t * 

"Follow my advice, please, and put over each pot of 
jelly a round piece of paper soaked in rum, and you will 
not need ice in order to preserve them," said the 
princess. 



, CHAPTER III 

Kitty was especially glad of the opportunity to be 
alone with her husband, because she /had. noticed how a 
shadow of dissatisfaction had crossed his telltale face 
when he stepped on the terrace and asked what they 
.were' talking about, and no one replied. 

As they walked along in front of the others, and, los- 
ing sight of the house, took to the well-trodden, dusty 
road, bestrewn with rye and corn, she seized his hand 
and pressed- it against her side. He had already for- 
gotten the momentary unpleasant impression, and now 
that he was alone with her/ and while the thought of 
her approaching maternity did not for an instant escape 
from his mind, he experienced a novel joy in the sense 
of the presence of a beloved woman — a 'joy perfectly 
free from anything sensual. There was nothing special 
to talk about,. but he liked to hear the sound of her 
voice', which, like the expression of heneyes, had changed, 
owing to her condition. In her voice, as well as in her 



ANNA KARENINA 69 

eyes, there was a gentleness and gravity like that which 
people show when their attention has been concentrated 
on some one favorite task. 

"You are not getting tired, are you? Lean on-, me, 
more," said he. 

" No, I am so glad to have a chance to be alone with 
you, and I confess that I miss our winter evenings when 
we two were alone together, much as I enjoy having 
them here ! " 

" That was good, but this is better. Both are better,"- 
said he, pressing her hand. 

"Do you know what we were talking about when 
you came ? " 

" About preserves ? " 

"Yes, about preserves; but afterward about the^way 
men propose." t i 

"Ah!" said Levin, listening rather to the sound, of 
her voice than to the words which she spoke, and all 
the time thinking of the road which they were following 
down to the forest, and carefully avoiding the -places 
that might cause her to stumble. 

"But how about Sergyel Ivanovitcfr and Varenka? 
Have you noticed it? .... I very much wish it might corns 
about," she went on to say. "What do you think about; 
it?" 

And she glanced into his face, 

"I don't know what to think," replied Levin, with a 
smile. " SergyeT in this respect was always a mystery to 
me. I think I told you about it." .... 

" Yes, that he was in love with a young girl, but she 
died." .... 

" That was when I was a child ; I knew it by tradi- 
tion. I remember him as he was then, He was won- 
derfully charming. But since then I have watched him 
with women. He is polite ; he likes some of them ; but 
you can't help feeling that for him they are merely peo- 
ple, not women." V 

"Yes, but now in the case of Varenka.... it seems to 
me there is some .... " 

" Maybe there is .... but one must know him He is 



70 ANNA KARENINA 

a peculiar, a remarkable man. He lives only a spiritual 
life. He is too pure and high-minded a man .... " 

" What do you mean ? How could this bring him to 
a lower level ? " 

" I don't say it would, but he is so accustomed to live 
a spiritual life only that he cannot reconcile himself to 
what is matter of fact And Varenka is quite matter of 
fact"* 

Levin had by this time become accustomed to speak 
his thoughts with all freedom, not taking pains to couch 
it in explicit words ; he knew that his wife in such mo- 
ments of intimate communion as now would understand 
what he expressed by a hint, and she did ' understand 
him. ; " r i j t 

" Yes, but she has none of that practicality such as I 
have. I can understand that he would never fall in love 
with me. She is all soul." 

"That -is not so, he is so fond of you. And I am 
always so glad that my friends like you."/../ 

"Yes, he is kind to me ; but .... " 

"But not as it was with our lamented Nikolenka.... 
you loved each other," said Levin, in conclusion. " But 
why not speak it out?" he added. "I often reproach 
myself that one so quickly forgets. Oh, what a terrible, 
what a fascinating man he was!.... But what were we 
talking about ? " said Levin, after a silence. 

"You mean that he is incapable of falling in love," 
said she, expressing her husband's thought in her own 
way. 

" I do not say that, but he has none of that weakness 
which is requisite .... and I always have envied him, and 
envy' him -still, in spite of my happiness." 

" You envy him because he is incapable of falling in 
love ? " 

" I envy him because he is better than I am," said 
Levin, Smiling. "He does not live for himself; it as 
duty which guides him, and so he has a right' to be 
serene, and well satisfied." 

"And you? " asked Kitty, with a mischievous smile: 

He could never follow the course of her thoughts 



ANNA KARENINA 71 

when they caused her to smile. But the last deduction 
was that her husband, who had the greatest admiration 
for his brother, and who humbled himself before him, 
was insincere. Kitty knew that this insincerity of his 
was caused by his love for him, from a sort of consci- 
entious scruple at being too happy, and especially from 
a never ceasing desire to be better — and she loved this 
in him, and that was why she smiled. 

"But why should you be dissatisfied ?" she asked, 
with the same smile. 

Her disbelief in his self-dissatisfaction pleased him, 
and he unconsciously provoked her to explain the 
reasons for her disbelief. 

"lam happy, but I am dissatisfied with myself...." 
said he. 

" How can you be dissatisfied, if you are happy ? " 

" How can I express it ? .... In my heart of hearts I 
wish nothing else except that you should not stumble. 
Oh ! you must not jump so/' he exclaimed, interrupting 
his argument with a reproach, because she had made a 
too vivacious motion in jumping over a branch which 
lay in the path. 

"But when I criticize myself and compare myself 
with others, especially with my brother, I am conscious 
of all my inferiority." 

"But why?" persisted Kitty, with the same smile. 
" Are n't you always doing for others ? And your farm- 
ing, your book?" .... 

" Yes, I i feel this especially now ; and you are to 
blame," said he, pressing her* hand. " I do this so, so 
superficially. Ah, if I could love all this work as I love 
you ! .... But of late I work on it as if it were a task im- 
posed on me." 1 1 

" But what do you say about papa ? " asked Kitty. 
"Is he unworthy because he does nothing for the com- 
mon wealth ? " 

"He?.... oh, no! But one must have just such sim- 
plicity, transparency, goodness, as he has ; but I have n't, 
have I ? If I do not work, I am tormented. 'T is you who 
have made it so. If it were not for you, and if it were 



72 ANNA KARENINA 

not for what is coming/' said he, with a significant 
glance at her figure, "I should devote all my p6wers 
to this work ; but now I can't, and myxonscience pricks 
me. -I do it like a task, if is all pretense.... " a , ' 

" Would you like to exchange^ with SergyeY Tvano* 
vitch," asked Kitty ; "would you like to. work for nothing 
but your duty. and the general" welfare of mankind?. " 

"Of course not. The fact is, I am so happy that I 
can't reason" clearly..... So you think the proposal will 
take place to-day, do you?" he asked/ after. a moment's 
silence. , .' • ~ 

" I think so, and then I think not. But I wish with 
all my heart it might. Here, .wait ! " . She stooped 
down and \i plucked a daisy growing by the roadside. 
" Now, count ; he y 11 propose, he *ll not propose ," she.said, 
giving .him the flower. 

" He '11 propose, he'll not propose," repeated Levin, 
picking off the narrow, white, trembling petals. 

" No, no ! " cried Kitty, stopping him and seizing his 
arm, as she excitedly .watched his /fingers, ft You pulled 
off two!"; r *>v A i r i ni ,- 

" Well, that little one doesn't count," said Levin, tear- 
ing off a short undeveloped petaL ? " But here comes the 
lmyeTka.to meet, us." / r > - 

" Kitty, you have n't fatigued yourself ? " * cried the 
princess. fc 

" Not the least in the world, mamma.'' 

"Well, get in, if the horses are quiet and .will walk." 

But there was no- need of -riding;, the .place was so 
near they continued walking. J dL". , . 

' < ,i i 

CHAPTER IV 

I '* I ' ' }£'!// 

Varenka, in her white kerchief .setting, off her dark 
locks, and surrounded by children whom she was good- 
naturedly and gayly entertaining,' and evidently excited 
by the possibility 6f a declaration from a man who was 
agreeable to her, was very fascinating. Sergyef Ivano- 
vitch walked by her side, and could not refrain from 



ANNA KARENINA 73 

admiring her. As he looked at 'her he recalled all the 
pleasant remarks he had heard her make, all the good- 
ness that he had' found in her, and he confessed to him- 
self more and more that the feeling which she aroused 
in him was something peculiar, like what he had ex- 
perienced once, only long, long before, in his early youth. 

The feeling of pleasure at being near her kept grow- 
ing stronger, and at last when, as he put into her basket 
a monstrous birch mushroom with thin stem and edges, 
he looked into her eyes, and, noticing the blush of pleas- 
ure and timid emotion which spread over her face, he 
himself grew confused, and smiled with a mute smile 
which said too much. 

" If this is the way it is going, I must deliberate and 
come to a decision, and not give way like a child to the 
impulse of a moment." 

" I am going now to hunt for mushrooms indepen- 
dently of the rest of you, otherwise my acquisitions will 
not be noticed," said he; and he went off by f himself from 
the edge of the woods, where they had been walking 
along the velvety turf among the old birch trees, scattered 
here and there in the forest together with the gray trunks 
of aspens and dark clumps of hazelnuts; r Goingoff forty 
steps or so, and coming to a clump of the bush called 
beresklet, which was in full flower with its rosy catkins, 
SergyeT Ivanovitch sheltered' himself behind it, knowing 
that he would not be seen. 

Around him it was perfectly still. Only up in the 
tree-tops above his head, ceaseless, like a swarm of bees, 
buzzed the flies, and occasionally he heard the voices of 
the children. Suddenly, not far from the edge of the 
woods, rang out Varenka's contralto voice, calling Grisha, 
and a happy smile spread over Sergyet Ivanovitch's face. 
When he realized what he was doing, he shook his head 
disapprovingly at his state of mind, and, taking out a 
cigar, he began to smoke. 

It was some time before he could light a match against 
the bole of a birch tree. The juicy scales of the white 
bark dampened the phosphorus, and the match refused 
to burn. At last one of the matches took fire, and the 



74 ANNA KARENINA 

fragrant cigar-smoke, like a wide wavering scarf, floated 
up and iaway above the bush under the pendant twigs 
of the birches. As he followed the whiff of smoke with 
his eyes, SergyeT Iyariovitch slowly walked on, thinking 
over the situation. 

, "And why should I not?" he asked himself; "If 
this was a caprice of f passion, if I had experienced only 
this attachment, this mutual attachment— for I may 
call;it mutual — and if I felt that it would run counter 
to the whole scheme of my life — if I felt thatin giving 
way to this impression I should change my calling and 
duty — then it would not do at all. The one thing that 
I can bring against it is that when I lost Marie I vowed 
that I would never marry, in remembrance of her. This 

is the only, thing* that I can say against this feeling 

This is serious," said SergyeK Ivanovitch to himself, but 
at the same time he recognized that this consideration 
had personally for him no great importance, but would 
simply spoil in the eyes of others the poetic r6le which 
he had been keeping up so. long. 

"But besides this, no matter how long I searched, I 
should never find out. what would be said against my 
feeling. . If I used all my wits, I could never find any 
one better." 

Among all the women and girls whom he had ever 
known he could jibt think of one who united to such a 
high degree all, yes, verily, all the qualities which in a 
cold "Calculation he should wish to see in his' wife. She 
had all the freshness and charm of youth, and yet she 
was no longer a child arid if she loved him she loved 
him "sensibly,- as a,woman ought to love : this was one 
thing. ) Another! was : she was not only far removed 
from worldly-mindedness, but evidently found fashionable 
society distasteful ; but at the same time she knew society 
well and h&d all those "ways of a" woman of good society, 
lacking which married life for Sergye* Ivanovitch was 
unthinkable. Thirdly, she was religious, but not like a 
child, irresponsibly religious and good, as Kitty, for 
example, was, but her life was founded on religious con- 
victions. Even in trifles SergyeT Ivanovitch found in 



ANNA KARENINA 75 

her all that he desired in a wife. She was poor and 
unencumbered, so that she would not bring a throng of 
relatives and their influence into her husband's home, 
as he saw was the case with Kitty ; but she would be 
in everything pledged to her husband, which was one of 
the conditions which he had demanded for himself 
in case he ever had any family life. 

And this young woman, having all these qualities, 
loved him. He was modest, but he could not help see- 
ing this. And he liked her. One obstacle stood in the 
way — his age. But his family were long-lived, he had 
not as yet a single gray hair, no one took him to be 
more than forty, and he remembered that Varenka had 
said that only in Russia men of fifty considered them- 
selves old men, while in France a man of fifty reckoned 
himself da?is la force de Vdge and one of forty was mi 
jeune homme. But what signified his years when he 
felt himself as young in spirit as he had been twenty 
years before? Was not youth the feeling which he 
enjoyed when, coming out again from the forest into the 
clearing, he saw in the clear sunlight Varenka's grace- 
ful figure in her yellow frock and with her basket, mov- 
ing along with light steps past the bole of an ancient 
birch tree, and the impression produced by the sight 
of Varenka blended with the surprising beauty of a 
field of oats shining yellow under the oblique rays of 
the sun, and beyond the field the old forest, variegated 
with yellow and stretching away into the azure distance ? 
His heart swelled with joy. A feeling of tenderness 
seized him. He felt within him that his mind was made 
up. Varenka, who had just stooped down to pick up a 
mushroom, with an agile motion straightened herself up 
again and glanced around. 

SergyeT Ivanovitch, tossing away his cigar, went 
toward her with resolute steps. 



76 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER V 

' " Vavara Andreyevna, when I was very young, I 
formed for myself an ideal of the woman whom I should 
love and whom I should be happy to call my wife. I 
have lived a long life, and now for the first time I find 
in you all that I was seeking. I love you and I offer 
you my hand." 

Sergyer Ivanovitch was saying these words to himself 
when he was within ten steps of Varenka. She was 
kneeling on the grass and defending with her hands a 
mushroom from Grisha, and at the same time calling to 
little Masha. 

" Here, come here. Little ones.... lots of them/' she 
cried, in her deep, pleasant voice. 

Though she saw Sergyet Ivanovitch approaching she 
did not rise nor did she change her position ; but every- 
thing told him that she was aware of his presence and 
was glad. 

" Did you find any ? " she asked, turning her sweet 
face toward him with a smile. 

" Not one," replied Sergyei Ivanovitch. " And you ?" 

She made no reply, her attention being just then 
absorbed by the children who surrounded her. 

"Here's one for you near the twig," and she pointed 
out a little agaricus pushing its elastic red cap through 
the dry grass, from which it was extricating itself. 

Varenka got' up, after Masha had plucked the mush- 
room, breaking it into two white halves. "That 
reminds me of my childhood," she remarked, as she 
joined SergyeP Ivanovitch and walked with him away 
from the children. 

They proceeded a few steps in silence. Varenka saw 
that he wanted to speak; she suspected what he* had in 
mind, and felt stifled with the emotions of joy and terror. 
They had now gone so far from the rest that no one 
could have heard them, yet he had not opened his mouth 
to speak. Varenka would have done better not to say 
a word. After a silence it would have been easier to 



ANNA KARENINA 77 

say what they wanted to say than after any casual 
words. But against her own will, as it were unexpect- 
edly, Varenka broke out : — 

" And so you did not find any. But there are never 
so many mushrooms in the woods as along the edge." 

Sergye'f Ivanovitch sighed and made no answer. He 
was annoyed because she spoke about mushrooms. He 
wanted to bring her back to the first words which she 
had spoken about her childhood ; but, as it were, con- 
trary to his will, after a brief silence, he made an obser- 
vation on what she had said last. 

" I have heard that the white mushrooms are found pre- 
eminently on the edge of the forest, but I can't tell them." 

A few moments more passed ; they had gone still 
farther away from the children, and were wholly alone. 

Varenka's heart beat so violently that she heard its 
throbs, and she was conscious that she was blushing, 
turning pale, and then blushing again. 

To be the wife of such a man as Koznuishef after her 
position with Mme. Stahl seemed to her the height of 
happiness. Moreover, she was almost convinced that 
she was in love with him. And this was to be decided 
immediately ! It was a terrible moment for her ; terrible, 
both what he would say, and what he would not say. 

Now, or never, it would have to be decided ; Sergyei 
Ivanovitch also felt this. Everything in Varenka's 
looks, in her heightened color, in the way she dropped 
her eyes, betrayed the most painful expectation. 

Sergye'f Ivanovitch saw this and was sorry for her. 
He even felt that he should wrong her if he kept silence. 
He made an effort to recall his recent arguments in favor 
of making the decision. He even repeated to himself 
the words in which he was going to couch his declaration ; 
but instead of these words, by some combination unex- 
pected to himself, he asked : — 

"What is the difference between a white mushroom 
and a birch mushroom ? " 

Varenka's lips trembled as she answered : — 

" There is very little difference in the cap, but it lies 
in the root" 



78 ANNA KARENINA 

And as soon as these words were spoken both of 
them felt that this was the end of it, that what should 
have been said would never be said, and the emotion 
which up to this moment had reached its highest pitch 
gradually died away. 

"The birch mushroom, or its root, reminds one of a 
black beard which has not been shaved for two days," 
said Sergye'f Ivanovitch, calmly. 

" Quite true," answered Varenka, smiling, and invol- 
untarily the direction of their walk changed. They were 
going back toward the children. Varenka was puzzled 
and hurt, but at the same time she experienced a sense 
of relief. Sergyet Ivanovitch mentally reviewed his 
arguments in favor of. marriage, and found them mis- 
taken. He could not be unfaithful to Marie's memory. 

" Gently, children, gently," cried Levin, testily, as the 
children sprang toward Kitty with shouts of glee. 

Behind the children came SergyeT Ivanovitch and 
Varenka. Kitty needed not to question them. She 
knew by their calm and slightly mortified manner that 
the hope which she had been nursing would not be 
realized. ; 

".Well, how is it?" her husband asked, when they 
returned to the house. 

"It will not happen," said Kitty, with a smile and 
manner which reminded him of her father, as Levin had 
often remarked to his delight. 
. " Why won't it happen ? " 

"-This is why," said she, taking his hand, raising it to 
her mouth, and touching it with her closed lips. " As 
people kiss a bishop's hand ! " 

" Which one has failed of it ? " he asked, laughing. 

" Both. It must be so when .... " * 

" Here come the muzhiks .... " r 

" No, not yet." 

_ : h - ' r 



ANNA KARENINA 79 



CHAPTER VI 

While the children took their supper, the older peo- 
ple sat on the balcony and talked as if nothing had' 
happened ; but all, and especially Sergye'f Ivanovitch and 
Varenka, knew very well that an important event had 
occurred, although it was a negative one. The two ex- 
perienced a feeling such as a boy has when, having failed 
in the examination, he is either kept in the same class or 
is excluded forever from an institution. All present, 
feeling likewise that something had taken place, talked 
with a forced animation. 

Levin and Kitty felt especially happy and in love with 
each other that evening. And that they were happy in 
their love seemed to make it impolite to comment on the 
unskilfulness of those who did not know how to be 
happy, and this made them feel guilty. 

"Take my word for it, Alexandre will not come," 
said the princess. 

That evening they were expecting Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch from the train, and the old prince had written that 
perhaps he, also, would come. " And if he does n't, I 
know why," continued the princess; "he says that young 
people ought to be left alone during the first part of 
their married lives." 

"Yes, papa is abandoning us for that very reason. 
He has not been to see us at all. ■ But how are we 
young folks ? I am sure we are quite old." 

" Only, if he does not come, and I Have to take my 
leave of you children ! " said the princess, with a mel- 
ancholy sigh. 

" What is the matter with you, mamma ? " cried both 
daughters at once. 

"You can think how it is with him. Here, now .... " 

And suddenly and unexpectedly the old princess's 
voice broke. The daughters exchanged glances in 
silence. * *' 

" Maman is always finding some melancholy topic ! " 
said their eyes. They did not know that, however 



80 ANNA KARENINA 

pleasant it was for the princess to visit her daughters, 
and however necessary she felt that she was, neverthe- 
less both she and her husband had been very sad ever 
since they had given up their last beloved daughter 
and the family nest had become empty. 

"What is it, Agafya Mikhailovna? " suddenly asked 
Kitty of the old housekeeper, whom she saw standing 
near with a mysterious and significant look in her eyes. 

" It is about supper." 

" Now, that is excellent," said Dolly. " You go and 
make your arrangements, and I will hear Grisha recite 
his lesson. He has not done anything all day." 

"The lesson is my part ! No, Dolly, I will go," cried 
Levin, springing up. 

Grisha, who had already entered the gymnasium, was 
obliged to keep up ,his lessons during the summer. 
JDarya-Aleksandrovna, who had already begun, in Mos- 
cow, to study Latin with her son, now that she had 
come to the Levins', had made it a rule to go over with 
him, at least once a day, his most difficult lessons in 
Latin and arithmetic. Levin had taken it on himself 
to substitute for her. But the mother, having once 
listened while Levin was hearing the recitation, and 
noticing that he did not teach as the instructor in Mos- 
cow did, with an awkward attempt not to hurt his feel- 
ings, told Levin decidedly that he must go according 
to the book, as his tutor did, and that she had better 
take charge of the lessons again. 

Levin was annoyed with Stepan Arkadyevitch, owing 
to whose carelessness the mother had charge of the 
children's education, though she understood nothing 
about it at all ; and he was annoyed with the teachers, 
because they had such bad methods of teaching. But 
he promised his sister-in-law that he would conduct the 
recitations as she wished. And so he continued to take 
charge of Grisha's studies, no longer, however, in his 
own method, but according to the book, and therefore 
perfunctorily, and frequently forgetting the lesson-hour. 
And that is what had happened that day. 

" No, I will go, Dolly, and you keep your seat," said 



ANNA KARENINA 81 

lie. " We are going along in due order *by the book. 
Only, now that Stiva is coming, we shall be going hunt- 
ing, so we shall have to neglect them." 

And Levin went to find Grisha. 

Varenka was saying almost the same thing to Kitty. 
Varenka had found the way of being useful even in the 
Levins' happy, well-ordered household. ; , 

" I will go and see about supper, and you. keep your 
seat," said she, and she joined Agafya Mikha'flovna. 

" Yes, yes ! but you won't find the chickens. Then .... " 
said Kitty. 

" Agafya Mikha'flovna and I will settle the difficulty," 
said Varenka, and disappeared with her. 

" What a pretty girl ! " exclaimed the princess, 

" Not pretty, maman, but the charmingest girl in the 
world." 

'And so you are expecting Stepan Arkadyevitch, are 
you ? " said Sergye'f Ivanovitch, evidently not. liking to 
have the conversation about Varenka prolonged. "It 
would be hard to find two brothers-in-law less alike," 
said he, with a sly smile. " One versatile, living only 
in society, like a fish in the water ; the other, our Ko.stia. 
full of life and activity, quick at everything, but as soon 
as he gets into society he either gives up the ghost or 
flops about aimlessly, like a fish on dry land ! " 
* "Yes, he is very heedless," said the princess, address- 
ing SergyeY Ivanovitch. "I wanted especially to ask 
you to persuade him that it is; impossible for her " — 
she was referring to Kitty — "to stay here; she cer- 
tainly ought to be taken to Moscow. He Says write for 
a doctor...." 

" Maman, he is doing everything; lie agrees to all 
you want," said Kitty, vexed with her^ mother for draw- 
ing Sergye'f Ivanovitch into this matter as a judge. 

While they were talking, the whinnying of a horse 
on the driveway was heard, and the sound of wheels on 
the stones. 

Before Dolly could jump up to go and meet her hus- 
band, Levin jumped out of the window of the room down- 
stairs where he was teaching Grisha, and put Grisha out 

VOL. III. — 6 



82 ANNA KARENINA 

"It's Stiva," cried Levin, from below the balcony. 
" We had finished, Dolly ; don't you worry ! " he added, 
as the boy darted off to meet the carriage. 

" Is, ea, id, ejus, ejus; ejus" cried Grisha, as he ran 
down the avenue. 

" And there 's some one with him ! It must be papa ! V 
cried Levin, standing at the entrance of the driveway. 
" Kitty, don't come down by the steep stairs. Come 
round ! " 

But Levin was mistaken in thinking that the, other 
man in the carriage was the old prince. When he 
came close he saw, sitting next Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
not the prince, but a handsome, portly young. man, in 
a Scotch cap with long floating ribbons. This was 
Vasenka' Veslovsky, a third cousin of the Shcherbat- 
skys, a brilliant young member of Moscow and Pe- 
tersburg society — "one of the best fellows that ever 
lived, and a devotee of hunting," as Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch expressed it in introducing him. 

Veslovsky was not in the least disconcerted by the 
surprise which his appearance, in place of the old 
prince, caused. He gayly greeted Levin, reminding 
him of their former acquaintance, and took Grisha into 
the carriage, lifting him up over the pointer which 
Stepan Arkadyevitch had brought with him. 

Levin did not get into the carriage, but followed on 
foot. He was somewhat put out by the non-arrival of 
the old prince, whom he liked better and better the 
more he saw him; he was still more put out at the 
appearance of this Vasenka Veslovsky, a man who was 
utterly unknown and superfluous. He seemed to him 
still more unknown and superfluous when, as Levin 
approached the front door, about which had collected 
a lively throng of old and young, he kissed Kitty's hand 
with a remarkably flattering and gallant look. 

" Your wife and I are cousins, and old friends," said 
Vasenka Veslovsky, heartily pressing Levin's hand a 
second time. 

"Well, how is it, any game?" asked Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, addressing Levin almost before he had greeted 



ANNA KARENINA 83 

the others. "Vasenka and I have the most ferocious 

intentions How are you, maman, since we saw each 

other in Moscow ?.... Well, Tania, how goes it? Get 
the things from the back of the calash, please," said he, 
addressing every one at once. "How well you look, 
Dollenka," said he to his wife, again kissing her hand, 
holding it in his, and smoothing it. 

Levin, who a few moments before had been in the 
happiest frame of mind, now looked at them all with 
indignant eyes, and everything disgusted him. 

"Whom did he kiss yesterday with those same lips ? " 
he queried, as he saw how affectionate Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch was to his wife. He looked at Dolly, and even 
she was displeasing to him. "Of course she cannot 
believe in his love for her. How, then, can she seem 
so glad? Repulsive! " said Levin to himself. 

He looked at the princess, who had seemed to him so 
charming a moment before, and her manner of receiv- 
ing this Veslovsky and his ribbons, as if she were at 
home there, displeased him. 

Even SergyeT Ivanovitch, who had come out on the 
porch with the rest, seemed to him disagreeable by rea- 
son of the hypocritical friendliness with which he met 
Stepan Arkadyevitch ; for Levin knew that his brother 
neither liked nor respected Oblonsky. 

And Varenka disgusted him, because she, with her 
sainte nitouche look, nevertheless met this stranger as 
if she thought only what sort of a husband would he 
make for her. 

And most displeasing of all was Kitty, as she fell into 
conformity with the tone of gayety with which that 
gentleman regarded his visit, as if it were a festival for 
himself and all the rest; especially disagreeable was 
the peculiar smile with which she responded to his smile. 

Noisily talking, they all went into the house, but as 
soon as they had sat down, Levin turned on his heel 
and started off. 

Kitty saw that something was amiss with her husband. 
She wanted to take advantage of a favorable moment 
and have a little talk with him alone, but he hastened 



84 ANNA KARENINA 

from her, declaring that he had business to attend to at 
the office. Not for a long time had his affairs seemed 
to him so important as they did at that day. 

" It may be a holiday for them," he said to himself, 
" but here are affairs of importance to be attended to, 
and they can't be delayed, and without them life could 
not be carried on." 



CHAPTER VII 

Only when they had sent to tell him supper was 
ready did Levin go back to the house again. On the 
stairway Kitty and Agafya Mikha'flovna were standing 
holding a consultation over the wines for supper. 

" But why do you make such a fuss ? Give them what 
you usually do." 

"No, Stiva doesn't drink Kostia, wait, what is 

the matter with you?" exclaimed Kitty, hastening after 
him ; but he, without heeding her, went with long strides 
into the dining-room, and immediately began to take part 
in the lively conversation which Vasenka Veslovsky and 
Stepan Arkady evitch were enjoying. 

" What do you say ? Shall we go hunting to-morrow ? " 
asked Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

"Please let us go," said Veslovsky, changing his seat 
to another chair, and doubling his fat leg under him. 

" I shall be very glad ; yes, we will go. Have you 
had any hunting this year yet ? " asked Levin,' looking 
at Veslovsky's leg, but his cordiality was put on, as 
Kitty could easily see, and it did not become him. " I 
doubt if we find any woodcock, but snipe are abundant. 
We shall have to start early. t You will not be too tired ? 
Are you tired, Stiva ? " 

" I tired ? I don't know what it is to be tired. I 'm 
ready to stay up all night. We'll go and take a 
walk." 

" Certainly, let us stay up all night. Capital," said 
Veslovsky. 

" Oh, yes, we are agreed on that point, that you can 



ANNA KARENINA 85 

stay up all night and also keep other people awake/' 
said Dolly, in that tone of playful irony which she 
almost habitually employed in addressing her husband. 
" In my opinion, I had better be going to bed. I won't 
eat any supper. I '11 go now." 

" No, Dollenka, sit down," said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, going to the other side of the great table and 
taking a seat near his wife. " I 've so many things to 
tell you about." 

" Probably mighty little ! " 

"Do you know — Veslovsky has been at Anna's? 
She lives only seventy versts 1 away from. here; he is 
going there when he leaves us, and I intend to go too. 
Veslovsky, come here." 

Vasenka approached the ladies, and sat down next to 
Kitty. 

" Oh, please tell us about it. Have you really been 
to Anna Arkadyevna's ? How is she?" asked Darya 
Aleksandrovna. 

Levin had remained at the other end of the table, and 
while he kept on talking with the princess and Varenka, 
he observed that Stepan Arkadyevitch, Dolly, Kitty, and 
Veslovsky were having an animated and mysterious con- 
versation. Not only were they talking confidentially, 
but it seemed to him that his wife's face expressed a 
deep tenderness, as, without dropping her eyes, she 
looked into Vasenka's handsome face, while he was 
talking vivaciously. 

" Their establishment is superb," Vasenka Veslovsky 
was saying in reference to Vronsky and Anna ; " of 
course, I don't take it on myself to pass judgment on 
them, but when you are there in their house, you feel 
yourself at home." 

" What are their plans ? " 

"They would like to pass the winter in Moscow, I 
believe." 

" How jolly it would be for us to go there together 
When shall you be there ? " Oblonsky asked Vasenka. 

" I am going to spend July with them." 

1 46.41 miles. 



86 ANNA KARENINA 

" And are you going ? " he asked his wife. 

" I have long been wanting to go, and I certainly 
shall," said Dolly. " I am sorry for her, and I know her. 
She is a lovely woman. When you have gone away, I 
shall go alone; that will not disturb any one, and it 
would be better for me to go without you." 

"Just the thing," answered Stepan Arkadyevitch. 
"And you, Kitty?" 

" I ? Why should I go to see her ? " said Kitty ; and, 
blushing with vexation, she glanced at her husband. 

" Do'you know Anna Arkadyevna ?" asked Veslovsky ; 
" she is a very fascinating woman." 

"Yes," answered Kitty, blushing still more, and she 
rose and joined her husband. " So you are going hunt- 
ing to-morrow, are you?" she asked him. 

Levin's jealousy during those few moments, and 
especially at the blush which covered her cheeks while 
she was talking with Veslovsky, had already reached an 
acute stage. Now, hearing her question, he interpreted 
it in his own "way. Strange as it was afterward for him 
to remember this, now it seemed clear to him that the 
reason for her asking him if he was going hunting and 
for her interest in it was to know if he would give Va- 
senka Veslovsky that pleasure, and that proved that she 
was already in love with him ! 

"Yes, I am thinking of it," he answered, in a voice 
so unnatural and constrained that he himself was horri- 
fied at it. 

" Well, you had better stay at home to-morrow ; Dolly 
has hardly seen her husband yet. Go day after to- 
morrow." 

Levin now translated Kitty's words thus : — 

" Do not separate me from him. You may go ; it is 
all the same to me ; but let me enjoy the society of this 
attractive young man." 

" Oh, if you desire it, we will stay at home to-morrow," 
answered Levin, with especial pleasantness. 

Meantime, Vasenka, not suspecting the effect his 
presence had produced, rose from the table, and ap- 
proached Kitty with an affectionate smile. 



ANNA KARENINA 87 

Levin noticed that smile. He grew pale and for a 
moment could not get his breath. 

" How does he dare to look at my wife in that way ? " 
He was boiling ! , 

" We are to go hunting to-morrow, are we not ? " 
asked Vasenka, and he sat down in a chair and again 
doubled one leg under him, as his habit was. 

Levin's jealousy grew still more intense. Already he 
saw himself a deceived husband, whom his wife and her 
lover were plotting to get rid of that they might enjoy 
each other in peace. 

Nevertheless, he asked Veslovsky, with all friendliness 
and hospitality, about his hunting-gear, his guns and 
boots, and agreed to go the next day. 

To Levin's happiness the old princess put an end to 
his torture by advising Kitty to go to bed. But even 
this was accompanied by new suffering for Levin. On 
bidding his hostess " good night," Vasenka tried to kiss 
her hand again. But Kitty, blushing and drawing away 
her hand, said, with a na'fve rudeness for which her mother 
afterward chided her : — 

" That is not the custom with us." 

In Levin's eyes she was blameworthy for permitting 
such liberties with her, and still more so for being so 
awkward in showing her disapprobation. 

" Why should you go to bed?" said Oblonsky, who 
had taken several glasses of wine at dinner, and was, in 
his most genial and poetic mood. " Look, Kitty," said he, 
pointing; to the moon just rising above the lindens, 
" how lovely ! Veslovsky, it is just the time for sere- 
nading; You know he has a splendid voice ; he and I 
tried some on the way down. He has brought two new 
ballads with him. He and Varvara might sing to us." 

After they had all left, Stepan Arkadyevitch and 
Veslovsky still for a long time walked up and down in 
the avenue, and their Voices could be heard as they 
practised singing over the new ballads. 

Hearing these voices, Levin sat scowling in an easy- 
chair in his wife's room, and obstinately refused to an- 



88 ANNA KARENINA 

swer her questions as to what was the matter with him. 
But at last Kitty, timidly smiling, asked him : " Is there 
anything about Veslovsky that has displeased you?" 

This question loosened his tongue, and he told her all. 
What he said filled him with vexation, and so he grew 
still more excited. 

He stood up in front of his wife with his eyes flashing 
terribly under his contracted brows and his hands pressed 
against his chest as if exerting all his force to restrain 
himself. His face would have been harsh and even 
cruel, had it not expressed also such keen suffering. 
His cheeks trembled and his voice shook. " Don't think 
me jealous ; the word is disgusting. I could not be 
jealous and at the same time believe that ....I cannot 
tell you what I feel, but it is horrible to me .... I am not 
jealous, but I am hurt, humiliated, that any one should 
dare to look at you so.".... 

" Why, look at me how ? " asked Kitty, honestly try- 
ing to recall all the remarks and incidents of the evening 
and all their possible significance. In the depth of her 
heart she had thought that there was something pecul- 
iar at the time when Veslovsky followed her to the 
other end of the table, but she dared not acknowledge 
it even to herself, and stilLmore she did not wish to 
say this to him and thus increase his suffering. 

" But what could he find attractive in me in my con- 
dition?".... 

" Akh ! " he cried, clutching his head " You should 

not have said that That means, if you had been 

attractive...." 

" Now stop, Kostia, and listen to me ! " said Kitty, 
looking at him with a passionately compassionate ex- 
pression. "What can you be thinking about? You 

know you are the only person in the world for me 

But you would not wish me to shut myself up away 
from everybody ? " 

At first she had been wounded by this jealousy of his, 
which spoiled even the slightest and most innocent 
pleasures ; but she was ready now to renounce, not 
merely the trifling things, but everything, for the sake 



ANNA KARENINA 8 9 > 

of calming him so as to cure him of the suffering which 
he was enduring. 

" Try to understand all the horrible absurdity of my 
position," he went on to say, in a whisper of despair. 
" He is my guest, and if it were not for his silly gallantry/ 
and his habit of sitting on his leg, he has certainly done 
nothing unbecoming; he certainly thinks himself irre- 
proachable, and so I am obliged to seem polite." 

" But, Kostia, you exaggerate things," said Kitty, 
glad at heart to see the force of his love for her, which 
now was expressed in his jealousy. 

" But more terrible to me than all this is that, when 
you are an object of worship to me, and we are so happy, 
so peculiarly happy, this trashy fellow, .... but why should 
I call him names ? He has done nothing to me. But 
why should our happiness .... " . 

" Listen, Kostia ; I believe I know what has offended 
you." 

" Why is it, why is it ? " 

" I saw how you were looking when we were at 
supper." 

"Well, well?" asked Levin, excitedly. 

She told him what they were talking about. And as 
she recounted it, she sighed with her emotion. Levin 
was silent ; then, observing his wife's pale, excited face, 
he clutched his head again. 

" Katya," cried he, " I have tired you ! Galub'chik,* 
forgive me ! This is sheer craziness. I am a burden 
to you, Katya! I am a fool! How could I torture 
myself over such a trifle ! " 

" I am sorry for you." 

" For me, for me ? that I am insane ! .... but still it is 
horrible to think that any stranger might destroy our 
happiness ! " 

u Of course, this is outrageous .... " 

"No, to disprove this, I will keep him with us all 
summer, and I '11 spread myself in heaping favors on 
him," said Levin, kissing his wife's hands. " You '11 see. 
And to-morrow — yes, certainly to-morrow, we will go ! ' 



9 o ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER VIII 

The next morning the ladies were not yet up when 
the hunting-traps 1 were waiting at the door, and Laska, 
who since dawn had realized that hunting was in pros- 
pect, and having frisked and barked till she was tired, 
was sitting up on the katki next the coachman, looking 
with excitement and disapprobation at the door at which 
the huntsmen were so provokingly dilatory in making 
their appearance. 

The first to appear was Vasenka Veslovsky, in a 
green blouse, with a cartridge-belt of fragrant Russia 
leather, shod in high new boots, which reached half- 
way up his thighs, his Scotch cap, with ribbons, on his 
head, and having an English gun of rather recent style, 
but without strap or bandoleer, 

Laska sprang toward him and welcomed him, and asked 
in her way if the others were coming; but, receiving 
no answer, she returned to her post, and waited with 
bent head and one ear pricked up. At last the door 
opened noisily, and let out Krak, the pointer, circling 
round and leaping into the air, and after him came his 
master, Stepan Arkadyevitch, with gun in hand and 
cigar in mouth. 

" Down, Krak, down ! " 2 exclaimed Oblonsky, caress- 
ingly, to the dog, which leaped up to his breast and 
caught his paws on his game-pouch. Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch wore pigskin sandals, leggings, torn trousers, and a 
short overcoat. On his head was the ruin of what had 
once been a hat ; but his gun was of the most modern 
pattern, and his game-bag as well as his cartridge-box, 
though worn, were of the finest quality. 

Vasenka Veslovsky had never before realized the fact 
that the height of elegance for a huntsman is to be in rags, 
but to have the equipment of the very finest quality. 
He understood this now, as he gazed at Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, whose elegant, well-nurtured, and aristocratic 

1 Katki and tetyegas. 

8 Tubo is the Russian address to the dog. 



ANNA KARENINA 91 

figure was so gayly brilliant* though in rags, and he 
made up his mind to profit by this example the next 
time he should go hunting. 

"Well, where is our host? " asked he. 

" He has a young wife," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
smiling. 

" And how charming she is ! " 

" He must have gone in to see her again, for I saw 
him all ready to start." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch was right. Levin had gone 
back to Kitty to make her say over again that she 
forgave him for his absurd behavior of the evening 
before, and to ask her for Christ's sake to be more 
careful. The most important thing was for her to keep 
the children at a distance* for they were always likely 
to run into her. Then he needed once more to receive 
assurance from her that she would not be angry with 
him because he was going away for two days, and to 
reiterate his desire that she should infallibly send him a 
note the riext morning by a mounted courier, if it were 
only two words, so that he might know that she was 
comfortable. 

Kitty, as always, had regretted the two days' separa- 
tion from her husband; but- as she saw him full of 
animation* and seeming especially big and strong in his 
hunting-boots and white blouse, and recognized that, to 
her incomprehensible, enthusiasm for hunting* she forgot 
her own regret in her delight in his happiness, and cheer- 
fully bade him good-by. 

- " Pardon, gentlemen ! " cried Levin, hurrying down 
to the porch. " Has the breakfast been put up ? Why 
is the chestnut horse on the off side ? Well, then, it 
makes no difference. Down, Laska ! charge ! 

" Put him among the geldings," said he, addressing the 
covvherd who was waiting for him on the door-steps with 
a question about the young rarri. " It is my bliirider 
that he 's become ugly." 

Levin jumped down from the katki in which he had 
already taken his seat, and met a hired carpentef who 
was just approaching the porch. 



9 2 ANNA KARENINA 

" Now, yesterday evening you did n't come to my 
office and here you are delaying me : well, what is it ? " 

"You bid me make a new stairway. Three steps will 
have to be added. And we can get all the lumber at 
once. It would be much 'moire convenient." 

"You should have listened to me," said Levin, in a 
tone of annoyance. " I said, - Fix the string-boards, and 
then cut in the steps.' Now, : don't try to mend them. 
Do as I ordered, make a new one." 

The matter in question was this : in the wing which 
was building, the carpenter had spoiled a staircase by 
framing it separately, and not taking the slope into 
account, so that the steps were all at an angle when it 
was put into its place. But now the carpenter wanted 
to add three steps and keep the same framework. 

" It would be much better...." 

"But where would it go, even if you added three 
steps ? " • 

" Excuse me," said the carpenter, with a disdainful 
smile. " It would go up to the same landing. Of course 
you 'd pull it out below," said he, with a persuasive ges- 
ture. " It will fit, it will surely fit." 

"But three steps add to the length of it — how 
would that improve it ? " 

After an idle argument in which the carpenter kept 
obstinately repeating the same words, Levin took his 
ramrod and proceeded to outline the plan of the stair- 
way in the dust. 

" Now do you see ? " 

"As you command," said the carpenter, with a sud- 
den light flashing into his eyes, , and evidently at last 
comprehending what Levin was driving at. -" I see, we 
shall have to make a new one." 

" Well, then, do as you were ordered," cried Levin, 
taking his place in the katki again. " Let us start ! 
Hold the dogs, Filipp ! " 

Levin, now that he had left behind him all domestic 
and business cares, felt such a powerful sense of the 
joy of living and such expectation that he did not care 
to talk. Moreover, he experienced that sense of con- 



ANNA KARENINA 93 

centrated emotion which every huntsman feels as he 
approaches the field of his activity. If anything occu- 
pied him now, it was the question whether they should 
find anything in the Kolpensky marshes, and how would 
Laska come out in comparison with Krak, and what sort 
of luck he would that day enjoy. Should he do himself 
credit as a huntsman before this stranger ? How would 
Oblonsky shoot ? Better than he ? 

Oblonsky was occupied with similar thoughts and 
was not talkative. Vasenka Veslovsky was the only 
voluble one ; and now, as Levin listened to him, he re- 
proached himself for his injustice of the previous eve- 
ning. He was a capital fellow, simple, good-natured, 
and very gay. If Levin had known him in his bachelor 
days, he would have become- intimate with him. But 
Levin rather disliked his* holiday view of life and a 
certain free and easy elegance. He seemed to arrogate 
to himself a marked and indubitable superiority because 
of his long finger-nails and his little cap and everything 
else corresponding ; but this could be condoned in view 
of his good nature and irreproachable manners. He 
pleased Levin because he was well educated, and spoke 
French and English admirably, in fact, was a man of 
his own walk in life. 

Vasenka was completely carried away by the Step- 
naya Donskaya horse on the left of the three-span. He 
kept going into raptures over her. " How splendid it 
would be to gallop over the steppe on a steed of the 
steppe ! Is n't that so ? " he cried. He imagined that 
galloping over the steppe on such a horse was some- 
thing wild and poetic, with no possibility of disappoint- 
ment ; but his innocence, especially in conjunction with 
his good looks, his pleasant smile, and his graceful 
motion, was very captivating. And because he was 
naturally sympathetic to Levin, or else because Levin, 
in consequence of his injustice to him the evening be- 
fore, tried to find all his best qualities, they got on 
famously. 

They had gone scarcely three versts when Veslovsky 
suddenly remembered his cigars and pocket-book, and 



94 ANNA KARENINA 

could not tell whether he had lost them or left them on 
his table. There were three hundred and seventy rubles 
in the pocket-book, and he could not leave them so. 

" Do you know, Levin, I could take your Cossack 
horse and gallop back to the house. It would be 
elegant! " 

"Oh, no/' replied Levin, who calculated that Va- 
senka's weight must be not less than two hundred and 
forty pounds ; " my coachman can easily do the errand." 

The coachman was sent back on the Cossack horse, 
and Levin drove on with the pair. 



CHAPTER IX 

" Well, what 's our line of march ? Give us a good 
idea of it/' said Stepan Arkadyevitch. 
* " This is my plan : we will t go first to Gvozdevo. 
Just this side of Gvozdevo is a snipe marsh, but on the 
other side of Gvozdevo extend splendid woodcock 
marshes, and there '11 be game there. It 's hot now, 
but toward the cool of the day — it's twenty versts from 
here — we will try the field. We will spend the night 
there, and then to-morrow we will strike into the great 
marshes/' 

" But isn't there anything on the way ? " 

" Yes, but it would delay us, and it is too hot There 
are two splendid little places, but it is hardly worth 
while." 

It was Levin's intention to attack these places> but 
as they were near home, he could go there at any 
time, arid as they were small he thought that three 
hunters were too many. Therefore, he prevaricated 
when he said that it was hardly Worth while. 

When they came up to the little marsh, Levin was 
proposing to drive by ; but Stepan Arkadyevitch, with 
the experienced eye of a huntsrhan, immediately saw the 
water-soaked' ground which was visible from the road. 

" Shan't we try that ? " he asked, pointing to the 
marsh. 



ANNA KARENINA 95 

<( Levin, please stop, how splendid!" Vasenka Ves- 
lovsky began to beg, and Levin could not well refuse. 

Before they had fairly stopped, the dogs, in eager 
emulation, darted into the marsh. 

"Krak!.... Laska!" .... 

The dogs turned back. 

" There won't be room enough for three. I will wait 
here," said Levin, hoping that they would not find any- 
thing except lapwings, which flew up from in front of 
the dogs, and, as they skimmed away over the marshy 
ground, uttered the most mournful cries. 

"No; come on, Levin, let us all go together," called 
Veslovsky. 

"It's a fact, there isn't room. Back, Laska, back, 
You don't need more than one dog, do you ? " 

Levin remained by the linel'ka and with jealousy in 
his heart watched the huntsmen, who were tramping 
through the whole bog. There was nothing in it, how- 
ever, except' moor-hens and lapwings, one of which Va- 
senka killed. 

" Now you see that I gave you good advice about the 
marsh," said Levin. " It's only a waste of time." 

" No, it 's good fun all the same ! Did you see ? ,? 
exclaimed Vasenka, awkwardly climbing into the wagon 
with his gun and his lapwing in his hands. " Did n't I 
make a stunning good shot ? Well, will it take long to 
get to the other one ? " 

Suddenly the horses plunged. Levin gave himself a 
violent bump an the head against some one's gun, and a 
shot went off. The gun really went off before, but it 
seemed to Levin the other way. It happened that 
Vasenka in uncocking his gun fired one barrel. The 
shot buried itself in the ground and no damage was done 
to any one. Stepan Arkadyevitch shook his head and 
laughed reproachfully at Veslovsky. But Levin had 
not the heart to rebuke him. In the first place, any 
reproach would seem to be called forth by a danger past 
and by the bump on his forehead ; and in the second 
place, Veslovsky was so innocently filled with remorse 
and afterward laughed so good-naturedly and so con- 



96 ANNA KARENINA 

tagiously over their common alarm that no one could 
help joining in. 

When they reached the second marsh, which was of 
considerable size and sure to occupy much time, Levin 
advised not getting out. But Veslovsky again put in his 
entreaties. Again, since the marsh was not big enough 
for three, Levin, like a hospitable host, remained by the 
teams. As soon as they stopped, Laska darted off to 
the tussocks. Vasenka Veslovsky was the first to follow * 
the dog. And before Stepan Arkadyevitch reached the 
wet ground a snipe flew up. Veslovsky missed it, and 
the bird flew over into an unmown meadow. But this 
snipe was predestined to be Veslovsky's. Krak again 
pointed it, and Veslovsky killed it and returned to the 
teams. 

" Now you go, and I will stay by the horses," said he. 

The huntsman's fever had by this time taken posses- 
sion of Levin. He turned the reins over to Veslovsky 
and went into the swamp. Laska, who had been for 
some time pitifully whining and complaining at the in- 
equality of fate, darted toward the • tussock-filled bog 
which Levin knew so well, and to which Krak had not 
yet found his way. 

"Why don't you hold her back?" cried Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. 

" She won't scare them away," replied Levin, delight- 
ing in his dog and following after her. 

As Laska went forward, the nearer she came to the 
tussocks the greater grew her gravity. A little marsh 
bird only for a second distracted her attention. She 
made one sweep around the tussocks, then began a 
second, but suddenly trembled and stood stock still. 

"Come, Stiva, come," cried Levin, feeling how his 
heart was beginning to throb, and how, suddenly as if 
some bolt had slipped in his ears, all sounds, losing their 
sense of proportion, disconnectedly but distinctly began 
to come to him. He heard Stepan Arkadyevitch's steps, 
distinguishing them from the distant stamping of horses, 
he heard the crunching sound of a corner of a tussock 
torn away by the roots, and he could distinguish above 



ANNA KARENINA 97 

:t the whir of a woodcock's wings. He could also hear, 
not far behind him, a strange splashing in the water, 
but what it was he could not make out. * Choosing a 
place for his feet, he moved toward the dog. 

" Go on." 

Not a snipe, but a woodcock, flew up from under the 
dog's nose. Levin raised his gun, but at the instant he 
aimed the same noise of splashing in the water grew 
louder and nearer, and together with it Veslovsky's 
voice loudly shouting something. Levin saw that he was 
aiming too far behind the woodcock, but still he fired. 

Turning round to discover what made the noise, Levin 
saw that the horses attached to the katki were no longer 
in the road, but were in the. swamp. 

Veslovsky, desirous of watching the shooting, had 
driven down to the swamp and had entangled the horses. 

" The devil take him," said Levin to himself, turning 
back to the entangled horses. 

" Why did you drive in so far ? " he asked dryly ; and, 
summoning the coachman, he began to disengage the 
horses. 

Levin was vexed because they had caused him to 
miss his shot, but still more- so" because neither Stepan 
Arkadyevitch nor Veslovsky would help him to unhar- 
ness and get out the team; but the reason for this was 
that they had not the slightest comprehension of the art 
of harnessing. 

Not vouchsafing Vasenka a single word in answer to 
his assurance that where he stood it was perfectly dry, 
Levin silently worked with the coachman to unhitch the 
horses. But afterward, warming up to the work, and 
noticing how zealously and assiduously Veslovsky dragged 
at the katki by its side and even broke a part of it off, 
Levin blamed himself because, under the influence of the 
feeling which he had had the evening before, he had 
been too cool toward Veslovsky, and he tried by especial 
friendliness to atone for his curtness. 

When everything was brought to order again and the 
teams were on the highway, Levin gave orders to get 
the luncheon ready. 
vol. in. — 7 



98 ANNA KARENINA 

" Bon appitit y bonne conscience. Ce poulet va tombe? 
jusqifau fond de mes bottes" exclaimed Vasenka, grow? 
ing lively again, and employing a quaint French proverb, 
as he devoured his second chicken. " Now our misforr 
tunes are ended ; now everything will go on famously. 
Only as a punishment for my sin I must certainly'sit 
on the driver's box. Is, n't that so? hey? — No, no, 
I am a born Automedon. Just see how I will tool you 
along," he insisted, not letting go the reins when Levin 
asked him to give up to the coachman. "No, I must 
atone for my sin, and I like it immensely on the box." 
And he drove; 

Levin was somewhat afraid that he would tire out the 
horses, especially the chestnut on the left, which he 
could not control ; but reluctantly he gave in to his 
gayety, listened to the love-songs which Veslovsky, sit-: 
ting on the box, sang allthe way, or to his stories and 
personation of an Englishman driving a fouMn-hand, 
and after they had enjoyed their 1 luncheon they reached 
the marshes of Gvozdevo in the gayest possible spirits/ 



CHAPTER X 

Vasenka drove the horses so furiously that they 
reached the marshes too early and it was still hot. Oh 
reaching the important marsh, the real goal of their jour- 
ney, Levin could not help wondering how he might rid 
himself of Vasenka and so get along without impediment. 
Stepan Arkadyevitch had evidently the same desire/and 
Levin could read in his face that expression of anxiety 
which a genuine huntsman always betrays before he 
goes out on the chase — he also detected a certain good^ 
natured slyness characteristic of him. 

" How shall we go in ? I can see the marsh is ex4 
cellent, and there are the hawks," said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, pointing to two big birds circling over the tall 
grass. " Where hawks are there is sure to be game ! " 

HWell, do you see, gentlemen?" said Levin, with a 
rather gloomy expression, pulling up his boots and con- 



ANNA KARENINA 99 

templating the caps Qn his fowling-piece. " Do you see 
that tall grass ? " He pointed to an islet shading into a 
black green in the midst of the wet meadow which, al- 
ready half mown, extended along the right bank of the 
river. " The marsh begins here directly in front of you 
— where it is so green, From there it extends to the 
right where those horses are -going; there are the tus- 
socks and you will find snipe there, and so on around 
this high grass clear up to the alders and the mill itself. 
That direction, you see where the ground is overflowed, 
that is the best place. I 've killed as many as seven- 
teen woodcock there. We will separate with the two 
dogs in different directions, and then we will meet at the 
mill," 

"Well, who will go to the right, who .to the left?" 
asked Stepan Arkadyevitch. "There is more room to 
the right ; you two go that way and I will take the left," 
said he, with pretended indifference. 

" Capital, we will shoot more than he does. Come 
on, come on, come on," cried Veslovsky. 

Levin saw that he was in for it, so they started off 
together. 

As soon as they struck into the marsh the dogs began 
to hunt round and darted off for the swamp. Levin 
well knew what that careful and indeterminate manoeuver 
of Laska's meant; he also knew the place, and he was 
on the lookout for a bevy of woodcock. 

"Veslovsky, come in line, in line/* he cried in a voice 
of anguish to his companion, who insisted in falling be- 
hind. Since the accidental discharge of the weapon at 
the Kolpensky marsh, Levin could not help taking an 
interest in the direction in which Veslovsky's gun-barrel 
was pointing. 

" Now, I won't bother you, don't worry about me ! " 

But Levin could not help worrying, and he remem- 
bered Kitty's words as she said good-by to him : " Look 
out that you don't shoot one another." 

Closer and closer ran the dogs, avoiding each other, 
each following her own scent ; the expectation of start- 
ing up a woodcock was so strong that the squeak of 



ioo ANNA KARENINA 

his heel as he lifted it out of the mud seemed to Levin 
like the cry of the bird ; he clutched and squeezed the 
butt of his gun. 

Bang! Bang! A gun went off directly behind his 
ear. 

It was Vasenka shooting at a flock of ducks which 
were splashing about in the swamp, and alighted far 
away from the huntsmen in an irregular line. Before 
Levin had a chance to glance round, a woodcock 
drummed, — another, a third, and half a dozen more 
flew up one after the other. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch shot one at the very instant he 
was about beginning his zigzags, and the woodcock fell 
in a heap in the swamp. * Oblonsky took his time in 
aiming at another which was flying low toward the high 
grass, and simultaneously with the flash the bird fell 
and it could be seen skipping from the mown grass, 
flapping its white uninjured wing. 

Levin was not so fortunate ; he shot at too close 
range for the first woodcock, and missed ; he was about 
to follow after it, but just as it was rising again, another 
flew up from almost under him and diverted his atten- 
tion, causing him to miss again, u 

While they were reloading, still another woodcock 
flew up, and Veslovsky, who had got his gun loaded 
first, fired two charges of small shot into the water. 
Stepan Arkadyevitch picked up his woodcock, and looked 
at Levin with flashing eyes. 

" And now let us separate," said he, and limping with 
his left leg, and holding his gun ready cocked and whis- 
tling to his dog, he started off by himself. Levin and 
Veslovsky took the other direction. 

It always happened with Levin that when his first 
shots were unsuccessful, he grew excited, lost his temper, 
and shot badly the rest of the day. So it was in the 
present instance. The woodcock were abundant; they 
kept flying up from before the dogs, and from under 
the huntsmen's feet, and Levin might have easily re- 
trieved his fortunes ; but the longer he hunted, the more 
he disgraced himself before Veslovsky, who kept mer- 



ANNA KARENINA 101 

rily firing recklessly, never killing anything and never in 
the slightest degree abashed at his ill luck. Levin 
moved forward hotly, growing more and more excited, 
and finally he came not to have much hope of bringing 
down his game. Laska seemed to understand this state 
of things. She began to follow the scent more lazily, 
and looked at the huntsmen with almost an air of doubt 
and reproach. Shot followed shot. The gunpowder- 
smoke hung round the sportsmen, but in the great wide 
meshes of the hunting-bag lay only three light little 
woodcock. And of those one was killed by Veslovsky, 
and one of them they both brought down. 

Meantime on the other side of the swamp Stepan 
Arkadyevitch's shots were heard, not very frequently, 
but, as it seemed to Levin, very significantly, and at 
almost each one he would hear him cry: — 

" Krak, Krak, apporte." 

This still more excited Levin. The woodcock kept 
flying up into the air over the high grass. The drum- 
ming on the ground and the cries of the birds in the air 
continued incessantly on all sides, and the woodcock, 
which flew up before them and swept through the air, 
kept settling down again in front of the huntsmen. Now 
instead of two hawks there were dozens of them scream- 
ing over the marsh. 

After they had shot over the larger half of the swamp, 
Levin and Veslovsky directed their steps to a place 
where there were alternating strips of -meadow-land, 
which the peasants were accustomed to mow. Half df 
these strips had already been mown. 

Although there was less hope of finding game where 
the grass was tall than where it had been cut, Levin 
had agreed with Stepan Arkadyevitch to join him there, 
and so he proceeded with his companion across the mown 
and unmown strips. 

" Hi ! sportsmen," cried a muzhik, who with several 
others were sitting around an unharnessed cart. " Come 
and have a bite with us. We '11 give you some wine." 

Levin looked round. 

" Come on, we 've plenty," shouted a jolly bearded 



ioa ANNA KARENINA 

muzhik with a red face, displaying his white teeth and 
holding up a green bottle which glittered in the sun. 

" QiCest-ce qu'ils disent ? v asl^ed Veslovsky. 

" They invite us to drink some vodka with them. 
They have probably just finished their meadows. I 'd 
go if I were you, 1 ' said Levin, not without craftiness, for 
he hoped that Veslovsky would be tempted by the 
vodka and would go for it. 

"Why should they treat us ? " 

" Oh, they are probably having a jollification. Really, 
you had better go. It will interest you/' 

" A lions, c'est curie ux" 

" Go ahead, go, you will find the road to the mill," 
cried Levin ; and, looking round, he saw to his delight 
that Veslovsky, stooping over and dragging one leg 
after the other, and carrying his musket on his out- 
stretched arm, was making his way from the swamp 
toward the peasants. 

" You come too," cried the muzhik to Levin. " Don't 
be afeared, 1 we '11 give you a tart." 

Levin felt a strong inclination to drink a glass of 
vodka and to eat a piece of bread. He was tired and 
could hardly lift his feet out of the bog, and for a moment 
he hesitated. But the dog was pointing, and imme- 
diately all his weariness vanished, and he lightly made 
his way over the march toward the dog. The woodcock 
flew from under his feet; he fired and brought it down. 
The dog pointed again — pil! From in front of the 
dbg another arose. Levin blazed away. But the day 
was unfortunate ; he missed, and when he looked for 
the one he had killed, it was nowhere to be found. He 
searched all through the tall grass, but Laska had no 
faith that her master had killed it, and when he sent 
her to find it, she pretended to circle round but did not 
really search. 

Even without Vasenka, on whom Levin had laid the 
blame for his bad luck, there was no improvement. 
There also woodcock abounded, but Levin missed shot 
after shot. 

1 He says niabos* for nebos\ nichavo for nichevo. 



ANNA KARENINA 103 

The slanting rays of the sun were still hot ; his clothes, 
wet through with perspiration, stuck to' his body ; his 
left boot, full of water, was heavy and made a sucking 
noise ; over his face, begrimed with gunpowder, the per- 
spiration ran in drops; there was k bitter taste in his 
mouth ; his nose was filled with the odor of smoke and 
of the bog ; in his ears rang the incessant cries of the 
woodcock; his gun-barrels were so hot that he could 
not touch them ; his heart beat with loud and rapid 
strokes, his hands trembled with excitement, his weary 
legs kept stumbling and catching in the roots and tus- 
socks : but still he kept on shooting. At last, having 
made a disgraceful failure, he threw down-his gun arid cap. 

"No, I must get my wits back," he said to himself; 
and, picking up his gun and cap, he called Laska to heel, 
and quitted the swamp. As he came out on the dry 
ground he sat down on a tussock, took off his boots and 
stockings, poured out the water, then he went back to 
the swamp, took a long drink of the boggy-smelling 
water, soaked his hot gun-barrels, and washed his face 
and hands. After he had cooled off, he again went 
down to the place where he would find the woodcock, 
and he made up his mind not to lose his self-control 
again. He meant to be calm, but it was the same as 
before. . His finger would press the trigger before he 
had taken fair aim at the bird. Indeed, it went from 
bad to worse. 

He had only five birds in his game-bag when he 
quitted the marsh and went to the alder-wood where- he 
had agreed to meet Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

Before he caught sight of Stepan Arkadyevitch he 
saw his dog Krak, all black with the marsh slime, and 
with an air of triumph as he came leaping out from under 
the up-turned root of an alder and began to snuff at 
Laska. Then appeared Stepan Arkadyevitch's stately 
figure in the shade of the alders. He came along, still 
limping, but with flushed face, all coVered with perspi- 
ration and with his collar flung open. 

" Well, how is it ? Have ydu killed many ? " he cried, 
with a gay smile. 



io 4 ANNA KARENINA 

" How is it with you ? " asked Levin. But there was 
no need of asking, because he could see his overflowing 
game-bag. 

" Oh, just a trifle." He had fourteen birds. " What 
a splendid marsh. Veslovsky must have bothered you. 
Two can't hunt well with the same dog," said Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, to soften the effect of his triumph. 



CHAPTER XI 

When Levin and Stepan Arkadyevitch reached the 
peasant's izba, where Levin always stopped when he 
was out hunting, Veslovsky was already there. He was 
laughing his merrily contagious laugh, sitting in the 
middle of the hut and clinging with both hands to a 
bench from which a soldier, the brother of their host, was 
pulling him in his efforts to haul off his muddy boots. 

" I have only just got here. lis ont £t£ charmants. 
Imagine it — they gave me plenty to eat and drink. 
What bread, 't was marvelous. Ddlicieux. And such 
vodka I never tasted ! And they utterly refused to take 
any payment. They kept saying : ' Drink it down/ or 
something like that." 

" Why should they take money ? They regarded you 
as a guest. Do you suppose they had vodka to sell ? " 
asked the soldier, who at last succeeded in pulling off 
the wet boot together with the mud-stained stocking. 

Notwithstanding the dirtiness of the izba, which the 
huntsmen and their dogs had tracked all over with mud, 
notwithstanding the smell of bog and gunpowder with 
which it was filled, and notwithstanding the absence of 
knives and forks, the three men drank their tea and ate 
their luncheon with appetites such as only hunting pro- 
duces. After they had washed up and cleansed off the 
mud, they went to a hay-loft where the coachman had 
prepared them beds. 

Although it was already dark, not one of the huntsmen 
felt any inclination to go to sleep. After they had in- 
dulged in various recollections and stories of shooting. 



ANNA KARENINA 105 

of dogs, and of previous expeditions, ,the conversation 
turned on a theme which interested them all. As it 
happened, Vasenka kept going into raptures over the 
fascination of this their camp and the fragrance of the 
hay, and the charm of the broken telyega : — it seemed 
to him to be broken because the front part was taken 
off — and about the hospitality of the muzhiks, who had 
given him vodka to" drink, and about the dogs, which 
were lying each at his master's feet. 

Then Obion sky gave an account of a charming, meet 
which he had attended the summer before at the place of a 
man named Malthus, who was a well-known railway mag- 
nate. Stepan Arkadyevitch told what wonderful marshes 
and game preserves Malthus rented in the govern- 
ment of Tver, what equipages, dog-carts, and wagonettes 
were provided for the sportsmen, and how a great break- 
fast tent was carried to the marshes and pitched there. 

" I can't comprehend you," exclaimed Levin, raising 
himself on his hay. " I should think such people would 
be repulsive to you. I can understand that a breakfast 
with Lafitte might be very delightful ; but is n't such 
luxury revolting to you? All these people, like all 
monopolists, acquire money in such a way that they gain 
the contempt of people ; they scorn this contempt and 
then use their ill-gotten gains to buy off this contempt ! " 

" You 're perfectly right," assented Veslovsky. " Per- 
fectly. Of course Oblonsky does this out of bonhomie, 
but others say, ' Oblonsky goes there.' " .... >; 

" Not in the least," — Levin perceived that Oblonsky 
smiled as he said this. " I simply consider' that this 
man is no more, dishonorable than any other of our' rich 
merchants or nobles. They all have got their money 
by hard work and by their brains." 

" Yes, but what kind of hard work ? Is it hard work 
to secure a concession and then farm it out ? " 

" Of course it is hard work. Hard work in this sense, 
that if it were not for such men, then we should have 
no railways." 

"But it is not hard work such as the muzhik .or the 
student- has." ' * j 



106 ANNA KARENINA 

" Agreed, but it is work in this sense, that it is a form 
of activity which gives us results -*- railways. But per- 
haps you argue that railways are useless." 

" No ; but that is another question. I am willing to 
acknowledge that they are useful. But all gains that 
are disproportionate to the amount of labor expended are 
dishonorable." 

" But who is to determine the suitability ? " 

" Property acquired by any dishonest way, by craft," 
said Levin, feeling that he could not very well make the 
distinction between honorable and dishonorable. u For 
example, the money made by stock-gambling," he went 
on to say, " that is bad, and so are the gains made by 
fortunes acquired without labor, as it used to be with 
the speculators in monopolies ; only the form has been 
changed. Le roi est mort, vive k roi! We had only just 
done away with brandy-farming when the railways and 
stock-gambling came in ; it is all money acquired with- 
out work." 

" Yes* that may be very wise and ingenious reasoning. 
— Lie down; Krak," cried Stepan Arkadyevitch, address- 
ing the dog, which was licking his fur and tossing up 
the hay. Oblonsky was evidently convinced of the cor- 
rectness of his theory, and consequently argued calmly 
and dispassionately. " But you do not make the dis- 
tinctions clear between honest and dishonest work. Is 
it dishonest when I receive a higher salary than my 
head clerk, although he understands the business better 
than I dd ? " 

" I don't know." 

"Well, I will tell you one thing: what you receive 
for your work oft yoiit estate is ; — let us say — five 
thousand above your expenses ; but this muzhik, bur host, 
hard as he works, does hot get mofe than fifty rubles, 
and this disparity is just as dishonorable as that I re- 
ceive more than my head clerk or that Malthus receives 
more than a railway engineer. On the 1 contrary, it seems 
to me that the hostility shown by society to these men 
arises from envy*" .... 

"No, that is unjust," said Veslovsky ; "it cannot be 



ANNA KARENINA 107 

envy, and there is something unfair in this state of 
things." r I 

" Excuse me," persisted Levin. " You say it is unfair 
for me to receive five thousand while the muzhik/gets 
only fifty ; you 're right. It is unfair. I feel it, 
but...." 

" The distinction holds throughout. Why do we eat, 
drink, hunt, waste our time, while he is forever and ever 
at work ? " said Vasenka Veslovsky, who was evidently 
for the first time in his life thinking clearly on this ques- 
tion, and therefore was willing to be frank, < 

" Yes, you feel so, but you don't give your estate up 
to the muzhik," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, not sorry of 
a chance to tease Levin. . / 

Of late there had arisen between the two brother$ : in : 
law a secretly hostile relationship; since they had mar- 
ried sisters, a sort of rivalry existed between them as to 
which of them had the best way of living, and now this 
hostility expressed itself by the conversation taking a 
personal turn. 

" I do not give it because no "one demands this of me, 
and even if I wanted to, I could not," replied Levin. 

" Give it to this muzhik; he would not refuse it." 

"But how could I give it to him? Should r I come 
with him and sign the deed ? " r . 

" I don't know ; but if you are convinced that you 
have not the right .... " 

"I am not altogether convinced. On the contrary; I 
feel that I have no right to give it away, that I have 
certain obligations both to the land and to my family." 

" No, excuse me ; if you consider that this inequality 
is unjust, then why don't you do so ? " 

" I do it, only in a negative way, in the Sense that 
I do not try to increase the discrepancy that exists be- 
tween him and me." i > 

" No, but that is a paradox, if you will allow me to 
say so." 

" Yes, that is a sort of sophistical statement," averred 
Veslovsky. — "Ho! friend," 1 he exclaimed, addressing 

1 K/wzain. \ . 



108 ANNA KARENINA 

their host, who had just their come into the loft, mak- 
ing the door creak on its hinges, "aren't you asleep 
yet?" 

" No, how can one sleep ? But I supposed you 
gentlemen were asleep — still, I heard talking. I wanted 
to get a hook. — Will she bite?" he added, carefully 
slipping along in his bare feet. 

" But where do you sleep ?" 

" We are on night duty." 

"Oh, what a night," exclaimed Veslovsky, catching 
a glimpse of the edge of the izba and the unharnessed 
wagons in the faint light of the west through the now 
widely opened door. " Just listen to those women's 
voices singing; it is not bad at all. Who is singing, 
friend ? " said he, addressing the muzhik. 
-■" " Oh, those are the girls from the farm, singing to- 
gether." 

"Come, let's go out and take a walk! We shall 
never go to sleep. Come on, Oblorisky." 

"What's the use?" said Oblonsky, stretching, "it's 
more comfortable here." 

" Well, then, I '11 go alone," exclaimed Veslovsky, 
jumping up eagerly and putting on his shoes and 
stockings. "Good-by — da svidanya — gentlemen. If 
there 's any fun, I will come and call you. You have 
given me good hunting and I won't forget you." 

" He 's a splendid young fellow," said Oblonsky, after 
Veslovsky had gone out and* the muzhik had shut the 
door again, 

f* Yes, he is," replied Levin, still continuing to think 
of what they had been talking about. It seemed to 
him that he had clearly, to the best of his ability, uttered 
his thoughts and feelings, and yet these men, who were 
by no means stupid or insincere, agreed in declaring 
that he indulged in sophistries. This confused him. 
: "This is the way of it," my -friend/' said Oblonsky. 
" One of two things must be : either you must agree that 
the present order of society is all right, and then stand up 
for your rights, or confess that you enjoy unfair privileges, 
as I do, and get all the good out of them that you can." 



ANNA KARENINA 109 

" No ; if this was unfair, you could not get any enjoy- 
ment' out of these advantages.... at least I could not. 
With me the main thing would be to feel that I was not 
to blame." 

" After all, why should we not go out," said Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, evidently growing tired of this discus- 
sion. " You see we are not going to sleep. Come on, 
let 's go out." 

Levin made no reply. What he had said in their 
conversation about his doing right only in a negative 
sense occupied his mind. " Can one be right only in 
a negative way ? " he asked himself. 

" How strong the odor of the fresh hay is," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, as he got up. " It is impossible 
to go to sleep. Vasenka is hatching some scheme out 
there. Don't you hear them laughing, and his voice ? 
Won't you come ? Come on." 

" No, I am not going," said Levin. 

" Is this also from principle ?" asked Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, with a smile, as he groped round in the dark- 
ness for his cap. 

" No, not from principle, but why should I go ? " 

" Do you know you are laying up misfortune for 
yourself?" said Stepan Arkadyevitch, having found his 
cap, and getting up. 

"Why so?" 

" Don't I see how you are giving in to your wife ? 
I heard how much importance you attached to the ques- 
tion whether she approved of your going off for a 
couple of days' hunting. That is very well as an idyl, 
but it does n't work for a whole lifetime. A man ought 
to be independent ; he has his own masculine interests. 
A man must be manly," said Oblonsky, opening the 
door. 

* What does that mean .... going and flirting with the 
farm girls ? " asked Levin. 

" Why not go, if there 's fun in it ? Ca ne tire pas d 
consequence. My wife would not be any the worse off 
for it, and it affords me amusement. The main thing 
is the sanctity of the home. There should not be any 



no ANNA KARENINA 

trouble at home. But there is no need of a man's tying 
his hands." 

" Perhaps not," said Levin, dryly, and he turned over 
on his side. " To-morrow I must start early and I shan't 
wake any one, and I shall start at daybreak." 

"Messieurs, venez vzte," called Vasenka, returning. 
"Charmante! I have discovered her ! Channante! A 
perfect Gretchen, and she and I have already scraped 
acquaintance. Truly she is mighty pretty," he cried, 
with such an expression of satisfaction that any one 
would think that she had been made for his especial 
benefit, and that he was satisfied with the work of the 
one who had prepared her for him. 

Levin pretended to be asleep, but Oblonsky, putting 
on his slippers and lighting a cigar, left the barn and 
soon their voices died away. 

It was long before Levin could go to sleep. He 
heard his horses munching their hay, then the muzhik 
setting out with his eldest son to watch the animals in 
the pasture, then the soldier going to bed on the other 
side of the loft with his nephew, the youngest son of 
their host ; he heard the little boy in a low voice telling 
his uncle his impressions regarding the dogs, which to 
him seemed terrible and monstrous beasts ; then the boy 
asking what these dogs caught, and the soldier in a 
hoarse and sleepy voice telling him that the next day the 
huntsmen would go to the swamp and would fire off their 
guns; and then, the boy still continuing to ply him with 
questions, the soldier hushed him up, saying, " Go to 
sleep, Vaska, go to sleep, and you will see," and soon 
the man began to snore and all became quiet. All that 
was heard was the neighing of the horses and the cries 
of the woodcock. 

" Why is this simply revolting ? " he asked himself. 
"Well,* what's to be done? It is not my fault." And 
he began to think of the morrow. 

" To-morrow I will start early in the morning, and I 
will take it on myself not to get excited. I will bring 
down some woodcock. And there are plenty of snipe ! 
And when I get back, there '11 be a letter from Kitty. 



ANNA KARENINA in 

Yes, perhaps Stiva is right ; I am not manly toward 

her; I am too much under my wife's thumb But 

what is to be done about it? This also is revolting." 

Through his dream he heard Veslovsky and Stepan 
Arkadyevitch gayly talking and laughing. For an 
instant he opened his eyes. The moon had risen, and 
through the open doors he saw them standing there in 
the bright moonlight, and talking. Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch was saying something about the freshness of a 
young girl, comparing her to a walnut just out of its 
shell, and Veslovsky laughing his contagious laugh, 
made some reply, evidently repeating the words spoken 
by some muzhik, "You'd better be going home." 

Levin spoke through his dream, " Gentlemen, to- 
morrow morning at daybreak." 



CHAPTER XII 

Waking at earliest dawn, Levin tried to wake his 
companions. Vasenka, lying on his stomach, with one 
leg in a stocking, was sleeping so soundly that it was 
impossible to get any reply from him. Oblonsky, only 
half awake, refused to start out so early. And even 
Laska, sleeping curled up in a round ball at the edge 
of the hay, got up reluctantly, and lazily stretched out 
and straightened her hind legs, one after the other. 
Levin, putting on his boots, took his gun and cautiously 
opening the creaking door of the shed, went outdoors. 
The coachmen were sleeping near the wagons ; the 
horses were dozing. Only one sheep was drowsily eat- 
ing with his nose in the trough. It was still gray in 
the yard. 

" You are up early, are n't you, my dear," said the old 
peasant woman, the mistress of the house, coming out 
from the izba, and addressing him in a friendly way, like 
an old acquaintance. 

" Yes, I 'm going out shooting, auntie. Can I go this 
way to the swamp ? " 

" Directly behind the barns, follow the foot-path along 



ii2 ANNA KARENINA 

by the hemp-field." Stepping cautiously with her bare, 
sunburnt feet, the old woman accompanied Levin as far 
as the fence back of the barn. " Go straight on and 
you '11 come to the swamp. Our boys went there last 
evening." 

Laska ran merrily ahead along the foot-path/ Levin 
followed her with swift, light steps, constantly watching 
the "sky. He had an idea that he would reach the 
swamp before the sun would be up. But the sun did 
not loiter. The moon, which had been shining brightly 
when he first came out, was now growing pallid like a 
lump of quicksilver. The morning star, which before 
was most conspicuous, now almost defied detection ; 
certain spots i. before, almost indistinguishable on the 
distant field, now were becoming plainly visible ; these 
were heaps of rye. The dew, though it could not be 
seen in the absence of the sunlight, was so dense on the 
fragrant tall hemp from which the seed had already 
been gathered, that it wet Levin's legs and blouse above 
his belt. In the transparent stillness of the morning the 
slightest sounds were audible. A bee, humming like a 
bullet, whizzed by Levin's ear. He looked around and 
discovered a second and yet a third. They were com- 
ing from the hives and were flying over the hemp-field 
and disappearing in the direction of the swamp. The 
foot-path led directly into the marsh, which could be 
detected by the mists rising over it, here denser, there 
thinner, so that clumps of grass and cytisus bushes 
looked like little islands emerging from them. Peasant 
boys and men, who had been on night duty, were 
scattered about on the edge, of the swamp and along the 
roadside, and all of them were sleeping wrapped up in 
their kaftans. At a little distance from them three 
horses were moving about unfastened. One of them 
carried clinking chains. Laska ran along by her 
master's side, eager to dash ahead, and with her eyes 
on everything. After they had passed the sleeping 
muzhiks and had reached the first swampy places, Levin 
examined the priming of his gun and let the dog go. 

One of the horses, a fat chestnut three-year-old, see- 



ANNA KARENINA 1.13 

ing Laska, shied, and, lifting his tail, whinnied. The two 
other horses were also startled, and dashed through the 
water and galloped out of the swamp. As they pulled 
their hoofs out of the soft, sticky " mud, they made a 
noise like smacking. Laska paused, looking with 
amused eyes at the horses, and seemed to ask her 
master what she should do. Levin caressed her and 
gave a whistle as a signal that she might begin her 
work. Laska, joyous and full of importance, darted on 
over the soil of the marsh, which quaked "under her 
weight. 

As soon as she got fairly into the bog, Laska in- 
stantly distinguished amid all the well-known odors of 
roots and swamp-grass and the mud and the. droppings 
of the horses, the. scent of the bird perceptible through 
the whole place — the penetrating bird odor which 
more than anything else excited her. Wherever there 
was moss or sage bushes this odor was peculiarly strong; 
but it was impossible to make out ; in which direction it 
increased or diminished in strength. In order to get 
her bearings, the dog had to bear to the lee of the wind. 
Unconscious of any effort in moving her legs, Laska in 
an eager gallop, yet so restrained that she was able to 
stop at a bound, if anything of consequence presented it- 
self, dashed toward the right away from the breeze which 
was now beginning to blow freshly from the east. Snuff- 
ing the air with her widespread nostrils, she suddenly 
became conscious that she was no longer following a 
trail, but was on the game itself — not one bird alone, 
but many. Laska slackened her speed. The birds 
were there, but she could not as yet determine exactly 
where. In order to find the exact spot, she .began 
another circle, when suddenly the voice of her master 
called her back. 

"Here, Laska," he cried, directing her toward, the 
other side. She paused as if to ask. him if she had not 
better keep on as she had begun. But he repeated his 
command in a stern voice, sending her to a tussock- 
covered place overflowed with water, where there could 
not possibly be anything. 

VOL. III. — 8 



M4 ANNA KARENINA 

She heard him," and, pretending to obey him, so as to 
satisfy him, ran hastily over the spot indicated, and then 
returned to the place which had attracted her before, 
and instantly perceived them again. Now that he no 
longer bothered her s}ie knew exactly what to "do, and 
without looking where she was going, stumbling over 
tussocks to her great indignation and falling into the 
water, but quickly extricating herself with her strong, 
agile legs, she began to circle round, so as to get her 
exact bearings. 

The scent of the birds kept growing stronger and 
stronger, mpre and more distinct, and suddenly it be- 
came perfectly evident to her that one of them was there, 
just behind a certain tussock not five steps in front of her, 
and she stopped and trembled all over. Her legs were 
so short that she could not see anything, but she knew 
by- the scent that the bird was sitting there not five steps 
distant from her. She pointed, growing each instant 
more certain of her game and full of joy in the anticipa- 
tion. Her tail stuck straight out and only the end' of it 
quivered. *Her mouth was open slightly. Her ears were 
cocked Up. Indeed, one ear had been all the time pricked 
up as she ran, and she was panting heavily, but cautiously, 
and looking round still more cautiously, rather with her 
eyes than with her head, to see if her master was coming. 
He was coming, leaping from tussock to tussock, and 
more slowly than usual it seemed to her; his face bore 
the expression which she knew so well, and which was 
so terrible 1 to her. It seemed to her that he was coming 
slowly, and yet he was running 1/ 

Remarking Laska's peculiar method of search as she 
crouched down close'to the ground and took such long 
strides that her hind' legs seemed to rake the ground, 
and noticing her slightly opened mouth, Levin knew 
that she was on the track of snipe, and offering a 
mental prayer to God that he might not miss especially 
his first shot, he followed the dog. As he came up 
close to A her he looked from his superior height and saw 
with his eyes what she perceived only with her nose. 
In a nook between two tussocks not more than six feet 



ANNA KARENINA 115 

away from him a snipe was sitting. With head raised 
it was listening. Then, slightly spreading and closing 
its wings and awkwardly wagging its tail, it hid behind 
its nook. 

" At him, at him ! " cried Levin, pushing Laska from 
behind. 

"But I can't move," thought Laska. "Where shall 
I go ? From here I smell 'em, but if« I stir I shan't 
find anything, or know what they are or where they 
are." 

But Levin again pushed the dog with his knee, and 
in an excited whisper he cried again, "At him, Lasotchka, 
at him ! " 

"Well, if he wants me to do it, I will, but I won't 
answer for the consequences now," she said to herself, 
and she darted forward with all her might between the 
tussocks ! She no longer went by scent, but only by 
her eyes and ears, and did not know what she was 
doing. 

Ten paces from the first place a second snipe arose 
with a loud squawking and a characteristic drumming 
of wings. Instantly the shot rang out and the bird fell 
heavily with its white breast on the moist ground. Still 
another immediately flew up, not even roused by the dog. 

When Levin aimed at it it was already a long shot, 
but he brought it down. After flying twenty feet or 
more the second snipe rose high into the air, then, spin- 
ning like a top, fell heavily to the ground on a dry 
spot. 

" That is the talk," thought Levin, thrusting the fat 
snipe, still warm, into his hunting-bag. "Ha, Lasotchka, 
there 's some sense in this, hey ? " 

When Levin, having reloaded, went still farther into 
the swamp, the sun was already up, though it was as 
yet hidden behind masses of clouds. The moon, which 
had now lost all its brilliancy, looked like a white cloud 
against the sky; not a star was to be seen. The swampy 
places, which before had been silvered with the dew, 
were now yellow. The whole swamp was amber. The 
blue of the grass changed into yellowish green. The 



n6 ANNA KARENINA 

marsh birds bustled about among the bushes glittering 
with dew and casting long shadows along by the brook. 
A hawk awoke and perched on a hayrick, turning his 
head from side to side, looking with displeasure at the 
marsh. The jackdaws flew fieldward, and a barefooted 
urchin was already starting to drive the horses up to an 
old man who had- been spending the night there, and was 
now crawling out from under his kaftan. The gun- 
powder smoke lay white as milk along the green grass. 
One of the peasant children ran down to Levin. 

"There were some ducks here last evening, uncle," 1 
he cried, and followed him at a distance. 

And Levin experienced a feeling of the keenest satis- 
faction in killing three woodcock, one after the other, 
while the boy was watching, him and expressing his 
approbation. i 



CHAPTER XIII 

The superstition of hunters, that if the first shot 
brings down bird or beast, the field will be good, was 
justified. 

Tired and hungry, but delighted, Levin returned 
about ten o'clock, after a run of thirty versts, having 
brought down nineteen snipe "and woodcock and one 
duck, which, for want of room in his game-bag, he hung 
at his belt/'His companions had been long up; and 
after waiting till they were famished, they had eaten 
breakfast. ' 

" Hold on, hold on ! I know there are nineteen/' 
cried Levin, counting for the second time his woodcock 
and snipe, with their bloodstained plumage, and their 
drooping heads all laid one over the other, so different 
from what they were on the marsh. 

The count was verified, and Stepan Arkady evitch's 
envy was delightful to Levin. 

It was also delightful to him, on returning to his 

1 Dyadcnka, little uncle. 



ANNA KARENINA 117 

lodging, to find there a messenger who had just come 
from Kitty, bringing him a letter. 

I am perfectly well and happy, and if you fear lest I shall 
not be sufficiently cared for, you may be reassured. I have a 
new body-guard in the person of Marya Vlasyevna. [She was 
a midwife, a new and very important personage in Levin's fam- 
ily.] She came over to see me. She thinks I am wonderfully 
well, and we shall keep her till you get back. We are all well 
and happy, and if you are enjoying yourself and the hunting is 
good you may stay another day. 

These two pleasures — his successful hunt and the let- 
ter from his wife — were so great, that they effaced from 
Levin's mind two less agreeable incidents. The first 
was the fact that his fast horse, who had apparently been 
overworked the evening before, refused to eat and was 
out of sorts. The coachman said that she was used up. 

" They abused her last evening, Konstantin Dmitritch," 
said he. " The idea ! They drove her ten versts at full 
speed ! " 

The second unpleasantness, which for the first mo- 
ment put an end to his happy frame of mind, but which 
afterward caused him no end of amusement, arose from 
the fact that not a thing was left for him from all the 
abundant store of provisions which Kitty had put up 
for them, and which it seemed ought to have lasted 
them a whole week. As he returned from his long and 
weary tramp, Levin had indulged his imagination in 
certain tarts, so that when he entered the izba he 
actually felt the taste of them in his mouth just as Laska 
scented the game, and he immediately ordered Filipp 
to serve them to him. It then transpired that not only 
the tarts, but all the cold chicken, had disappeared. 

" There ! talk of appetites," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
laughing and nodding at Vasenka Veslovsky ; " I can- 
not complain of mine, but this is marvelous." 

" Well ! what shall I do ? " cried Levin, glowering at 
Veslovsky. " Filipp, give me some cold beef." 

" Beef 's all gone and the dogs have got the bones ! " 
replied Filipp. 



n8 ANNA KARENINA 

Levin was so irritated that he could not help exclaim- 
ing, "I should think you might' have left something 
for rae!" and he felt like crying. 

" Then cook me a woodcock," he said, with trembling 
voice, to Filipp, trying not to look at Vasenka, " and 
bring me some milk." 

But after he drank his milk he was mortified because 
he had shown his disappointment so plainly and before 
a stranger, and he began to laugh at himself for his 
anger. 

In the afternoon they went out into the fields again, 
and even Veslovsky shot several birds, and at night they 
went home. 

They were as gay on their return as they had been 
while going. Veslovsky now sang songs, and now told 
of his adventures with the muzhiks .who- gave him his 
vodka and bade him drink it down quick, Then he 
related his nocturnal experiences with the nuts and the 
farm girl, and the muzhik who asked him if he was 
married or not, and who, when he found that he was 
not married, said to him: "Well,- you'd better not be 
running after other folks' women ; first of all go home 
and get a wife for yourself." 

This advice greatly amused Veslovsky, 

"Well, on the whole, I am awfully glad we went, 
are n't you, Levin ? " 

"Very glad," replied Levin, sincerely, and he was 
especially happy because he no longer felt that animosity 
which he had felt at home toward Vasenka Veslovsky; 
but, on the other hand, had conceived a genuine friend- 
ship for him. 

CHAPTER XIV 

About ten o'clock the next morning, after inspecting 
the farm, Levin knocked at the door of the room in 
which Vasenka had spent the night, 

"Entres" cried Veslovsky. "Excuse me, but I am 
just finishing; my ablutions" he added, with a smile, 
standing before Levin in his bare skin. 



ANNA KARENINA 119 

u Do not let me disturb you," said Levin, and he sat 
down by the window. : " Did you sleep well ? " 

" Like the dead. Is it a good day for hunting ? " 

" What do you drink, tea or coffee ?" 

"Neither; I always go down to breakfast; I am 
mortified at being so late. The ladies/ I suppose, are 
already up ? Splendid time for a ride I You must show 
me your horses." 

After walking around the garden, examining the stable, 
and performing a few gymnastic exercises together on 
the parallel bars, Levin and his guest returned to the 
house and went into the drawing-room. 

" We had splendid sport and got so many new im- 
pressions," said Veslovsky, approaching Kitty, who was 
sitting near the samovar. " What a pity that ladies are 
deprived of this pleasure ! " 

" Well, of course he must have something to say to 
the lady of the house," thought Levin. Again he de- 
tected something peculiar in the smile and in the tri- 
umphant air with which his guest behaved toward Kitty. 

The princess, who was sitting onthe other side of the 
table with Marya Vlasyevna and Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
called Levin to her and began to broach her idea that 
they should go to Moscow for Kitty's confinement, and 
explained to him how the rooms should be prepared for 
her. 

Just as all the preparations for his .wedding had 
seemed distasteful to Levin because they were so insig- 
nificant in comparison with the , majesty of the event 
itself, so now even more humiliating were all the prepa- 
rations for the approaching confinement, the time of 
which they were reckoning up on their, fingers. He 
tried to shut his ears to all the talk Sabout the various 
kinds of swaddling-clothes for the unborn infant ; he 
did his best to shut his eyes to all the mysterious and 
numberless bands and triangular pieces of linen to which 
Dolly seemed to attribute special importance and the 
like. 

The event of the birth of a son — for he was firmly 
persuaded that it would be a son — seemed to him so 



i2o ANNA KARENINA 

extraordinary that he could not believe in its possibility , 
and while on the one hand it promised him a happiness 
too enormous and therefore incredible, on the other 
hand it seemed to him too mysterious to admit of trying 
to imagine what it meant, and consequently all this 
preparation as if for something commonplace, for some- 
thing in the hands of men, seemed to him revolting and 
humiliating. The princess did not understand his feel- 
ings, and she attributed his unwillingness to think and 
talk about this to indifference and carelessness, and so 
she gave him no peace. She had just been charging 
Stepan Arkadyevitch to look up a suite of rooms, and 
now she called Levin to her. 

" Do as you think best, princess ; I understand nothing 
about the matter," said he. 

" But it must be decided just when you will go to 
Moscow." 

" Truly I don't know ; what I know is that millions of 
children are born away from Moscow, and doctors ... 
and all that ...." 

"Yes, but in that case ..." 

" Let Kitty do as she pleases about it." 

" It is impossible to speak with Kitty about it. Do 
you want me to frighten her ? Only this spring Natali 
Golitsuin died in consequence of an unskilful accoucheur." 

" I shall do as you wish," repeated Levin, angrily. 

The princess began to say something more to him, 
but he was not listening. Though his conversation with 
the princess upset him, he was not angered by what she 
said, but by what he saw at the samovar. 

" No ; that can't go on," thought he, as he from time 
to time glanced over at Vasenka, who was bending 
down to Kitty, with a flattering- smile, and making some 
remark to her; and he also noticed his wife's disturbed 
and blushing face. 

There was something improper in Veslovsky's attitude, 
his smile, his eyes. So, too, Kitty's action and appear- 
ance seemed to him unbecoming, and again the light 
flashed in his eyes. And again, as happened two days 
before, he felt- himself suddenly, without the* least warn- 



ANNA KARENINA 121 

ing, precipitated from the height of happiness, content- 
ment, and dignity, into an abyss of despair, hatred, and 
confusion. Again they seemed to him, each and all, his 
enemies. 

"Do just as you please, princess/' said he again, 
turning round. 

" Heavy is the cap of Monomakh," said Stepan,Ar- 
kadyevitch in jest, referring evidently, not to Levin's 
conversation with the princess, but to the cause of 
Levin's agitated face, which he had noticed. " How 
late you are, Dolly ! " 

All rose to greet Darya Aleksandrovna. Vasenka 
also arose, but only for a moment ; and with the lack of 
politeness characteristic of up-to-date young men toward 
ladies, scarcely bowing, he resumed his conversation with 
some humorous remarks. 

"Masha has been wearing me all out," said Dolly. 
" She did not sleep well and she is terribly fretful to-day." 

The conversation which Vasenka and Kitty were en- 
gaged in once more turned, as it had the evening before, 
on Anna and whether love could hold outside the con- 
ventions of society This conversation was disagree- 
able to Kitty, and it agitated her, not only by reason of 
the topic and the tone in which it was carried on, but 
still more because she was already conscious of the 
effect it would have on her husband. But she was too 
simple and innocent to understand how to put an end 
to it, or even to hide the signs of agitation which this 
young ^an's too pronounced attentions produced in her. 
Whatever she did, she knew perfectly well would be re- 
marked by her husband and would be absolutely misin- 
terpreted. 

And indeed, when she asked Dolly what was the 
matter with Masha, and Vasenka, waiting till this new 
subject of conversation, which was a bore to him, should 
be finished, stared with an indifferent look at Dolly, 
this question struck Levin as an unnatural and obnox- 
ious kind of slyness. 

" Well, are we going after mushrooms to-day ? " asked 
Dolly. 



122 ANNA KAREN1NA 

"Oh, yes, do let us go, I should like to get some,' 
said Kitty, and she blushed. For mere politeness' sake 
she wanted to ask Vasenka if he would go with them, 
but she did not do so. 

"Where are you going, Kostia?" she asked, with a 
guilty air, as her husband, with deliberate steps, went 
by her on his way out of the room. , 

This guilty confusion confirmed all his suspicions. 

" A machinist came while I was away. I have not 
had a chance to see him yet," he answered, without 
looking at her. 

He had gone down-stairs, but had not yet left his 
library, before he heard Kitty!s well-known footsteps 
imprudently hurrying after him. 

" What is it ? We are busy," said he, curtly. 

" Excuse me," said Kitty, addressing the German ma- 
chinist; " I wish to say a few words to my husband." 

The mechanic was about to leave, but Levin stopped 
him : " Don't disturb yourself." 

" I don't want to lose the three o'clock train," re- 
marked the German. 

Without answering him, Levin went out into the cor- 
ridor with his wife. 

" Well, what do you wish to say to me?" he asked in 
French. 

He did not look at her .face, and did not want to see 
how it quivered and what a look of pathetic humiliation 
was in her eyes. 

" I .... I wanted to say that it is impossible to live so; 
it is torture " .... murmured she. 

"There is some one there at, the cupboard," he re- 
plied angrily. " Don't make a scene." 

" Then let us go in here, then." 

Kitty wanted to go into the next room, but there the 
English governess was teaching Tania. 

11 Then let us go into the garden." 
- 'In the „ garden they ran across a muzhik who was 
weeding a path. And now no longer thinking that the 
muzhik would see her tearful or his agitated face, not 
thinking that they were in sight of people, as if running 



ANNA KARENINA 123 

from some unhappiness, they went with swift steps 
straight on, feeling that they must have a mutual expla- 
nation, and find some lonely spot where they could talk, 
and free themselves from this misery that was oppress- 
ing them both. 

" It is impossible to live so. It is torture. I suffer. 
You suffer. Why is it ? " she said, when at last they 
reached a bench standing by itself in the corner of the 
linden alley. 

" But tell me one thing: was not his manner indecent, 
improper, horribly insulting?" he asked, standing in 
front of her in the same position, with his fists doubled 
up on his chest, in which he' had stood before her two 
days before. 

" It was/' said she, in a trembling voice; "but, Kos- 
tia, can't you see that I am not to blame ? All this 
morning I have been trying to act so that.... but oh, 
these men.... why did he come? How happy we 
were ! " she said, choking with the sobs that shook her 
whole body. 

The gardener saw with surprise that, though nothing 
was chasing them, and there was nothing to run away 
from, and there was nothing especially attractive about 
the bench where they had been sitting, yet still they 
went past him back to the house with peaceful, shining 
faces. 

CHAPTER XV 

As soon* as he had taken his wife to her room, Levin 
went to seek Dolly. Darya Aleksandrovna also was in 
a state of great excitement. She was pacing up and 
down her chamber, and scolding little Masha, who 
stood in a corner, crying. 

"You shall stay all day in the corner, and eat dinner 
alone, and you shall not see one of your dolls, and you 
shall have no new dress," she was saying, though she 
did not know why she was punishing the child. " This 
is a naughty little girl," she said to Levin; "where does 
she get this abominable disposition ? " 



i2 4 ANNA KARENINA 

"Why, what has. she done?" asked Levin, rather in- 
differently, for he was annoyed to find that he had come 
at the wrong" time when he wished some advice regard- 
ing his own affairs. 

" She and Grisha went into the raspberry bush, and 
there ....but I can't tell you what she did. I'da thou- 
sand times rather have Miss Elliot. This governess 
does n't look after anything .... she 's a machine. Figurez 
vous, que la petite ...." 

And Darya Aleksandrovna related Masha's misdeeds. 

" There 's nothing very bad in that. That does n't 
signify a bad disposition. It is only a piece of childish 
mischief," said Levin, soothingly. 

" But what is the matter with you ? You look troubled. 
What has happened down-stairs ? " asked Dolly, and by 
the tone of her questions Levin perceived that it would 
be easy for him to say what he had in his mind to say. 

" I have n't been down-stairs. I have been alone in 
the garden with Kitty. We have just had a quarrel.... 
the second since .... Stiva came." 

Dolly looked at him with her intelligent, penetrating 
eyes. 

"Now tell me, with your hand on your heart," he 
said, " tell me, was the conduct, not of Kitty, but of 
this young man, anything else than unpleasant, not 
unpleasant, but intolerable, insulting even, to a hus- 
band ? " 

" What shall I say to you ? — Stand, stand in the 
corner!" said she to Masha, who, noticing the scarcely 
perceptible smile on her mother's face, started to go 
away. " Society would say that he is only behaving as 
all young men behave. // fait la cour d tine jeune et 
jolie femme, and her husband, as himself a gentleman 
of society, should be flattered by it." 

"Yes, yes," said Levin, angrily; "but have you 
noticed it ?" 

" I noticed it, of course, and so did Stiva. Just after 
tea he said to me, *Je crois que Veslovsky fait tin petit 
brin de cour a Kitty' " x 

1 1 believe Veslovsky is trying to flirt with Kitty. 



ANNA KARENINA 125 

" Well, that settles it. Now I am calm. I am going 
to send him away," said Levin. 

" What ! Are you out of your senses ? " cried Dolly, 
alarmed. "What are you thinking about, Kostia ? " 
she went on with a laugh. — " You may go now to 
Fanny," she said to the child. "No! If you like, I 
will speak to Stiva. He will get him to leave. He can 
say you are expecting company. However, it is not 
our house." 

" No, no ! I will do it myself." 

"You will quarrel." .... 

" Not at all, I shall find it amusing," said he, with a 
happier light shining in his eyes. " There, now, Dolly, 
forgive her ; she won't do -it again," he said, pointing 
to the little culprit, who had not gone to Fanny, but 
was now standing irresolute beside her mother, and 
looking askance at her with pleading eyes. 

The mother looked at her. The little girl, sobbing, 
hid her face in her mother's lap, and Dolly laid her thin 
hand tenderly on her head. 

"Is there anything in common between us and that 
fellow?" thought Levin, and he went to find Veslovsky. 

As he passed through the hall he ordered the carriage 
to be made ready to go to the station. 

"The springs were broken yesterday," the servant 
answered. 

" Then bring the tarantas. Only be quick about it 
Where is the guest ? " 

" He went to his room." 

Levin found Vasenka in the act of trying on his 
gaiters in preparation for a ride. He had just taken 
his things out of his valise, and laid aside some new love- 
songs. 

Either there was something strange in Levin's ex- 
pression, or Vasenka himself was conscious that ce petit 
brin de cotir which he was making was rather out of 
place in this family ; but at all events, he felt as uncom- 
fortable in Levin's presence as it is possible for an 
elegant young man to feel. 

1 ■ Do you ride in gaiters ? " asked Levin. 



126 ANNA KARENINA 

" Yes ; it *s much neater," replied Vasenka, putting 
up one fat leg on a chair, and struggling with the 
bottom button, and smiling with genuine good humor. 

He was really a very good-hearted young fellow, and 
Levin felt sorry for him and conscience-stricken for 
himself as his host when he saw the timidity in Vasenka' s 
eyes. 

On the table lay a fragment of a stick which they 
had broken off that morning while trying to prop up the 
parallel bars for their gymnastic exercises. Levin took 
this fragment in his hand and began to break off the 
ragged ends, not knowing how to commence. 

" I wanted .... " He stopped for a moment ; but sud- 
denly remembering Kitty and all that had taken place, 
he went on, looking him squarely in the eye. " I have 
had the horses put in for you." 

" What do you mean ? " began Vasenka, in surprise. 
" Where are we going ? " 

" You are going to the railway station," said Levin, 
with a frown, breaking off the end of the stick. 

" Are you going away ? Has anything happened ? " 

"I happen to be expecting company," Levin went 
on, breaking off pieces of his stick more and more ner- 
vously with his strong fingers. " Or, no, I am not 
expecting any one, and nothing has happened, but I 
beg you to go away. You may explain my lack in 
politeness as you please." f 

Vasenka drew himself up. 

" I beg you to explain to me," said he, with dignity, 
comprehending at last. 

"I cannot explain to you, and you will be wise not to 
question me," Levin said slowly,' trying to remain calm, 
and to check the tremulous motions of his face. 

And as the chipped pieces of the stick were by this 
time all broken, Levin took the stick in his fingers, split 
it in two, and picked up the part that fell to the 
floor. 

Apparently the sight of those energetic hands, those 
very muscles which he had seen tested that morning 
while they were doing their gymnastics, those flashing 



ANNA KARENINA 127 

eyes, and the quivering face and the subdued sound of 
his voice impressed Vasenka more than the spoken 
words. Shrugging his shoulders and smiling disdain- 
fully, he submitted. 

" May I not see Oblonsky ? " 

The shrugging of the shoulders and the smile did not 
annoy Levin. ** What else could he do ? " he asked 
himself. 

" I will send him to you immediately/ 1 

"What sense is there in such conduct!" exclaimed 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, when he had learned from his 
friend that he was to be driven from the house, and 
finding Levin in the garden, where he was walking up 
and down waiting for his guest's departure. "Mais 
c'est ridicule ! To be stung by such a fly as that ! 
Mais c'est du dernier ridicule ! What difference does 
it make to you if a young man .... " 

But the spot where the fly had stung Levin was evi- 
dently still sensitive, because he turned pale again and 
cut short the explanations which Stepan Arkadyevitch 
tried to give. 

" Please don't take the trouble to defend the young 
man ; I can't help it. I am sorry both for you and for 
him. But I imagine it won't be a great trial for him to 
go away, and my wife and I both found his presence 
unpleasant." 

" But it was insulting to him. Et puis cest ridicule" 

" Well, it was humiliating and extremely disagreeable 
to me. I am not to blame toward him, and there is no 
reason why I should suffer for it." 

" Well, I did not expect this of you. On pent itre 
JalouXy mais a ce point cest du dernier ridicule? 

Levin quickly turned away, and entered the thick 
shrubbery by the driveway, and continued to walk up 
and down the path. 

Soon he heard the rumbling of the tarantas, and 
through the trees he saw Vasenka riding up the road, 
sitting on the straw (for unfortunately the tarantas had 
no seat), the ribbons of his Scotch cap streaming behind 
his head as he jolted along. 



128 ANNA KARENINA 

"What now?" thought Levin, as he saw a servant 
run from the house and stop the cart. It was only to 
find a place for the machinist, whom Levin had entirely 
forgotten. The machinist, with a low bow, said some- 
thing to Veslovsky, and clambered into the tarantas, and 
they drove off together. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch and the old princess were in- 
dignant at Levin's conduct. And he himself felt that 
he had been not only ridiculous in the highest degree, 
but even blameworthy and disgraceful ; but as he re- 
membered all that he and his wife had suffered, he 
asked himself how he should do another time in similar 
circumstances, and his answer was that he should do 
exactly the same thing again. 

In spite of all this, toward the end of the day, all of 
them, with the exception of the old princess, who could 
not forgive Levin's behavior, became extraordinarily 
gay and lively, just like children after a punishment or 
like grown people after a solemn official reception, so 
that in the evening, in the absence of the old princess, 
they talked about the dismissal of Vasenka as about 
something that had taken place long, long before. And 
Dolly, who had inherited from her father the gift of 
telling a funny story, made Varenka laugh till she cried, 
by telling her three and four times, and each time with 
new amusing details, how she had just put on, in honor 
of their guest, some new ribbons, and was just going 
into the drawing-room, when, at that very minute, the 
rattle of an old tumble-down wagon drew her to the 
window. Who was in this old tumble-down wagon ? 
Vasenka himself ! and his Scotch cap, his love-songs, 
his romantic airs, and his gaiters, seated on the straw ! 

" If only a carriage had been given him ! But no ! 
Then I hear a shout : ' Hold on ! ' ' Well,' I say to my- 
self, 'they have taken pity on him ;' not in the least; 
I look and see a fat German, — and off they go ! and 
my ribbons were wasted." 



ANNA KARENINA 129 



CHAPTER XVI 

Darya Aleksandrovna carried out her plan of go- 
ing to see Anna. She was sorry to offend her sister, 
or to displease her sister's husband. She realized that 
the Levins were right in not wishing to have anything 
to do with Vronsky ; but she considered it her duty to 
go to see Anna and prove to her that her feelings could 
not change, in spite of the change in her position. 

In order not to be dependent on the Levins, Darya 
Aleksandrovna sent to the village to hire horses ; but 
Levin, when he heard about it, went to her with his 
complaint: — 

"Why do you think this journey would be disagree- 
able to me ? And even if it were, it would be still more 
unpleasant for me not to have you take my horses/' 
said he. "You never told me that you were really 
going ; but to hire them from the village is disagreeable 
to me in the first place, and chiefly because, though they 
undertake to get you there, they would not succeed. I 
have horses. And if you don't wish to offend me, you 
will take mine." 

Darya Aleksandrovna had to yield, and on the ap- 
pointed day Levin had all ready for his sister-in-law a 
team of four horses, and a relay, made up of working 
and saddle-horses ; a very far from handsome turnout, 
but capable of taking Darya Aleksandrovna to her 
destination in one day. 

Now that horses were needed to take the old princess 
out for her daily drive, and for the midwife, it was a 
rather heavy burden for Levin ; but, according to the law 
of hospitality, he could not possibly think of allowing 
Darya Aleksandrovna to hire horses outside, and, more- 
over, he knew that the twenty rubles which was asked 
for the hire of a team would be a serious matter for her, 
for Darya Aleksandrovna's pecuniary affairs had got 
into a very wretched condition, and caused the Levins 
as much anxiety as if they had been their own. 

Darya Aleksandrovna, by Levin's advice, set out at 



i 3 o ANNA KARENINA 

early dawn. The weather was fine, the calash was 
comfortable, the horses went merrily, and on the box, 
next the coachman, in place of a footman, sat the book- 
keeper, whom Levin had sent for the sake of greater 
security. 

Darya Aleksandrovna dropped off to sleep, and did 
not wake up till they reached the place where they had 
to change horses. It was at the same rich muzhik's 
house where Levin had stopped on his way to Svia- 
zhsky's. After she had taken tea, and talked awhile with 
the women about their children and with the old man 
about Count Vronsky, for whom he had great respect, 
Darya Aleksandrovna proceeded on her way about ten 
o'clock. 

At home on account of her maternal cares she never 
had much time to think. Consequently now, during this 
fpur hours' journey, all the thoughts that had been so 
long restrained suddenly began to throng through her 
brain, and she passed her whole life in review as she 
had never before done and from every side. These 
thoughts were strange even to herself. 

First she thought of her children, and began to worry 
over them, though her mother and her sister — and 
it was the latter on whom she chiefly relied — had 
promised to look after them. " If only Masha does n't 
do some stupid thing, and if Grisha does n't get kicked 
by the horse, and if Lili does n't have an attack of indi- 
gestion," she said to herself. 

Then questions of the present moment began to 
mingle with questions of the immediate future. She 
began to consider how she must make changes in her 
rooms when she returned to Moscow, she must refurnish 
her drawing-room; her eldest daughter would need a 
shuba for winter. Then came questions of a still more 
distant future. How should she best continue the chil- 
dren's education ? 

" The girls can be easily managed," she said to herself, 
" but the boys ? It is well that I am able to look after 
Grisha, but it comes from the fact that I am free just 
now, with no baby in prospect. Of course there 's no 



ANNA KARENINA 131 

dependence to be placed on Stiva. I shall be able to 
bring them up with the assistance of excellent people; 
but if I have any more babies ...." 

And it occurred to her how unjust was the saying 
that the curse laid on woman lay in the pangs of child-birth. 

"Childbirth is nothing, but pregnancy is such misery," 
she said to herself, recalling the last experience of the 
sort, and the death of the child. And the thought 
brought to mind her talk with the young wife at the 
post-house. When asked if she had children, this 
peasant woman had answered cheerfully : — 

" I had one daughter, but God relieved me of her; she 
was buried in Lent. 

" And you are very sad about her ? " 

" Why should I be ? father has plenty of grandchildren, 
as it is, and she would have been only one care more ! 
You can't work or do anything ; it hinders everything." 

This reply had seemed revolting to Darya Aleksan- 
drovna, in spite of the young peasant-woman's appear- 
ance of good nature, but now she could not help recalling 
what she had said. There was certainly a grain of truth 
in those cynical words. 

" Yes, and as a general thing," said Darya Aleksan- 
drovna, as she looked back over the fifteen years of her 
married life, " pregnancy, nausea, dullness of spirits, in- 
difference to everything, and worst of all, ugliness. 
Kitty, our little, young, pretty Kitty, how ugly even 
she has grown, and I know well what a fright I become 
when I am in that condition. The birth-pains, the aw- 
ful sufferings, and that last moment.... then the nursing 
of the children, the sleepless nights, the agonies ...." 

Darya Aleksandrovna shuddered at the mere recollec- 
tion of the agony which with almost every one of her 
children she had suffered from broken breast. 

Then the illnesses of the children, that panic of fear ■> 
then their education, their evil disposition ; she recalled 
little Masha's disobedience in going to the raspberry 
bush ; the lessons, Latin — everything that is so incom- 
prehensible and hard. And, above all, the death of these 
children. 



i 3 2 ANNA KARENINA 

And once more she went over the undying pangs that 
weighed down her maternal heart in the cruel remem- 
brance of the death of her youngest child, the nursling 
who died of the croup, and his funeral, and the indiffer- 
ence of other people as they looked at the little pink 
coffin, and her own heartrending grief, which none 
could share, as she looked for the last time on the pal- 
lid brow with the clinging curls, and the surprised half- 
open mouth visible for one instant ere they shut down 
the cover with its silver-gilt cross. 

" And what is all this for ? What will be the result of 
it all ? That I never have a moment of rest, spending my 
days now in bearing children, now in nursing them, for- 
ever irritable, complaining, self-tormented, and torment- 
ing others, repulsive to my husband. I shall live on, and 
my children will grow up wretched, ill-educated, and 
poor. Even now, if I had not been able to spend the 
summer with the Levins, I don't know how we should 
have got along. Of course Kostia and Kitty are so 
considerate that we can't feel under obligations to them ; 
but this cannot go on so. They will be having children 
of their own, and then they will not be able to help us 
any more; even now their expenses are very heavy. 
What then ? Papa, who has kept almost nothing for him- 
self, won't be able to help us, will he ? One thing is per- 
fectly certain, I cannot educate my children unaided ; 
and, if I have to have assistance, it will be humiliating. 
Well, let us suppose that we have good luck, if no more 
of the children die and I can manage to educate them. 
Under the most favorable circumstances they will at 
least turn out not to be bad. That is all that I can 
hope for. And to bring about so much, how much 

suffering, how much trouble, I must go through My 

whole life is spoiled ! " 

Again she recalled what the young peasant woman 
had said, and again it was odious to her to remember it; 
but she could not help agreeing that there was a grain 
of coarse truth in her words. 

" Is it much farther, Mikhafla ? " asked Darya Alek-, 
sandrovna of the bookkeeper, in order to check these 
painful thoughts. 



ANNA KARENINA 133 

"They say it is seven versts from this village." 

The calash was rolling through the village street and 
across a little bridge. On the bridge was passing a 
whole troop of peasant women talking, with loud and 
merry voices, and carrying their sheaves on their backs. 
The women paused on the bridge and gazed inquisi- 
tively at the calash. All the faces turned toward Darya 
Aleksandrovna seemed to her healthy and cheerful, 
mocking her with the very joy of life. 

"All are full of life, all of them enjoy themselves," 
said Darya Aleksandrovna, continuing to commune with 
her own thoughts, as she passed by the peasant women 
and was carried swiftly up the little hill, pleasantly 
rocking on the easy springs of the old calash, "while I, 
like one let loose from a prison, am free for a moment 
from the life that is crushing me with its cares. All 
other women know what it is to live, these peasant 
women and my sister Natali and Varenka and Anna 
whom I am going to visit — every one but me. 

"And they blame Anna. Why? Am I really any 
better than she ? At least I have a husband whom I 
love ; not, to be sure, as I wish I loved him, but I love 
him in a way, and Anna did not love hers. In what 
respect is she to blame ? She desired to live. And God 
put that desire into our hearts. Very possibly I might 
have done the same thing. And to this day I am not 
certain whether I did well in taking her advice at that 
horrible time when she came to visit me in Moscow. 
Then I ought to have left my husband and begun my life 
all over again. If I had I might have loved and been loved. 
And now are things any better ? I cannot respect him., 
but I need him," she said to herself, referring to her 
husband, "and so I endure him. Is that any better? 
At that time I still had the power of pleasing, I had 
some beauty then," said Darya Aleksandrovna, still 
pursuing her thoughts ; and the desire to look at her- 
self in a mirror came over her. She had a small travel- 
ing mirror in her bag, and she wanted to take it out ; 
but, as she looked at the backs of the coachman and 
the swaying bookkeeper, she felt that she should be 



134 ANNA KARENINA 

ashamed of herself if either of them turned round and 
saw her, and so she did not take out the mirror. But, 
even though she did not look at the mirror, she felt that 
even now it was not too late : for she remembered 
Sergyei" Ivanovitch, who was especially amiable to her, 
and Stiva's friend, the good Turovtsuin, who had helped 
her take care of the children during the time of the 
scarlatina, and had been in love with her. And then 
there was still another, a very young man, who, as her 
husband used jestingly to remark, found her prettier 
than all her sisters. And all sorts of passionate and im- 
possible romances rose before her imagination. 

" Anna has done perfectly right, and I shall never 
think of reproaching her. She is happy, she makes 
some one else happy, and she is not worn out as I am, but 
keeps all her freshness and her mind open to all sorts of 
interests," said Darya Aleksandrovna, and a roguish 
smile played over her lips because, as she passed Anna's 
romantic story in review, she imagined herself simul- 
taneously having almost the same experiences with a 
sort of collective representation of all the men who had 
ever been in love with her. She, just like Anna, con- 
fessed everything to her husband. And the amazement 
and perplexity which she imagined Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch displayed at this confession caused her to smile. 

With such day-dreams she reached the side road that 
led from the highway to Vozdvizhenskoye. 



CHAPTER XVII 

The coachman reined in his four horses, and looked 
off to the right toward a field of rye where some mu- 
zhiks were sitting beside their cart. The bookkeeper at 
first started to jump down, but afterward reconsidered, 
and shouted, imperatively summoning a muzhik to the 
carriage. The breeze which had blown while they were 
in motion died down, when they stopped ; the horse-flies 
persisted in sticking to the sweaty horses, which kept 
angrily shaking them off. The metallic sound of whet- 



ANNA KARENINA 135 

ting scythes, borne by the breeze across from the telyega, 
ceased. One of the peasants got up and came over to 
the calash. " Say, hurry up," cried the bookkeeper, 
angrily, to the muzhik, who, in his bare feet, came 
leisurely along the ruts of the dry and little-traveled 
road, "come here." 

The old man, whose curly hair was bound round with 
a piece of bast, and whose bent back was black with 
perspiration, quickened his step, and came up to the 
calash, and took hold of the rim with his sunburnt hand. 

" Vozdvizhenskoye? the manor-house? 1 to the count's?" 
he repeated; " why, all you have to do 's to drive on up 
the hill. First turn to the left. Then straight along the 
preshpekt and that '11 bring you there. Who do you 
want? The count himself?" 

" Do you know whether they are at home, galubchik? " 
asked Darya Aleksandrovna, not mentioning names, for 
she did not know how to ask for Anna even of a 
muzhik. 

" Must be at home," said the muzhik, shuffling along 
in his bare feet and leaving in the dust the tracks of his 
soles with their five toes. "They must be at home," he 
repeated, evidently liking to talk. "This afternoon 
some new guests came. Guests, such quantities of 
them ! .... What do you want," he cried, addressing his 
comrade, who shouted something from the cart. 
"They've all been out on horseback. We saw them 
go by. They must be back by this time. But whose 
folks are you ? " 

" We have come from a long way," said the coachman, 
climbing upon the box. " So then, it is not far." 

" I tell you, you are almost there. If you drive on.... " 
said he, shifting his hand on the rim of the calash. 

His young comrade, healthy-looking and thick-set, 
also came up to the carriage. 

" Do you need any help in getting in the harvest?" 
he asked. 

" I don't know, galubchik." 

1 Bar sky dvor, a dvor, or house and grounds, belonging to a bar in ot 
noble. 



136 ANNA KARENINA 

" Well, you understand, you turn to the left and then 
you '11 get there," said the muzhik, evidently reluctant to 
part with the strangers and anxious to talk. 

The coachman touched up his horses, but they had 
hardly started ere the muzhik cried : — 

"Wait! h6 ! hold on!" cried two voices together 
The coachman reined in again. "There they come. 
There they are," cried the muzhik. " See what a lot 
of them," and he pointed to four persons on horseback 
and two in a char a bancs who were coming along the 
road. 

They were Vronsky and his jockey, Veslovsky and 
Anna, on horseback, and the princess Varvara with 
Sviazhsky in the char a bancs. They had been out to 
ride and to look at the operation of some newly imported 
reaping-machines. 

When the carriage stopped the riders were all walk 
ing their horses. In front Anna rode with Veslovsky. 
Anna rode at an easy gait on a little stout English cob 
with a cropped mane and docked tail. Her pretty head, 
with her dark ringlets escaping from under a tall hat, 
her full shoulders, her slender waist in a tightly fitting 
amazonka, and her whole easy, graceful horsemanship 
surprised Dolly. At first it seemed to her unbecoming 
for Anna to be riding horseback. Darya Aleksandrovna 
connected the idea of horseback riding for ladies with 
the idea of light, youthful coquetry, which seemed to 
her did not accord well with Anna's position ; but as she 
examined her more closely she immediately became 
reconciled to her going on horseback. Notwithstanding 
all her elegance, everything about her was so simple, 
easy, and appropriate in her pose and in her habit and 
in her motions, that nothing could have been more 
natural. 

Next to Anna, on a gray, fiery cavalry horse, rode 
Vasenka Veslovsky, thrusting his fat legs forward, and 
evidently very well satisfied with himself. He still 
wore his Scotch cap with its floating ribbons, and 
Darya Aleksandrovna could hardly restrain a smile of 
amusement when she saw him. 



ANNA KARENINA 137 

Behind them rode Vronsky on a dark chestnut horse 
of purest blood, which was evidently spoiling for a gal- 
lop. He was sawing on the reins to hold him back. 
Behind them came a little man in a jockey's livery. 
Sviazhsky and the princess in a new char d francs, drawn 
by a plump raven-black trotter, brought up the rear. 

Anna's face, as she recognized Dolly in the little per- 
son curled up in a corner of the old carriage, suddenly 
grew bright with a happy smile, and, uttering a cry of 
joy, she put her cob to a gallop. Riding up to the 
calash, she leaped off the horse without any one's aid, 
and, gathering up her skirts, ran to meet her. 

"I thought so, and did not dare to think so! What 
pleasure! you can't imagine my joy," she said, pressing 
her face to Dolly's, kissing her, and then holding her off 
at arm's length and looking at her with an affectionate 
smile. " What a pleasure, AlekseT," she said, glancing 
at Vronsky, who had also dismounted, and was com- 
ing toward them, " what a piece of good fortune ! " 

Vronsky came up, raising his tall gray hat. "You 
can't imagine what delight your visit gives us," said he, 
in a tone which conveyed a peculiar satisfaction, and with 
a smile which displayed his strong white teeth. 

Vasenka, without dismounting from his horse, took 
off his beribboned cap, and waved it gayly round his 
head, in honor of the guest. 

"This is the Princess Varvara," began Anna, in reply 
to a questioning look of Dolly as the char d bancs came 
up. 

"Ah!" replied Darya Aleksandrovna, and her face 
showed involuntary annoyance. 

The princess Varvara was her husband's aunt, and 
she knew her of old, and did not esteem her. She 
knew that she had lived all her life long in a humiliating 
dependence on rich relatives; and the fact that she was 
living at Vronsky's, at the house of a stranger to her, 
insulted her through her husband's family. Anna 
noticed the expression of Dolly's face, and was con- 
fused; she blushed, and, dropping the train of her 
amazonka, she tripped over it. 



138 ANNA KARENINA 

Darya Aleksandrovna went over to the char a bancs 
when it had stopped and coolly greeted the Princess Var- 
vara. Sviazhsky was also an acquaintance. He asked 
after his friend Levin and his young wife; then, casting 
a fleeting glance at the oddly matched horses and the 
patched side of the old carriage, he proposed that the 
ladies should get into the char a bancs, 

" I will take this vehicle to go home in ; the horse is 
quiet and the princess is an excellent driver." 

"Oh, no," interrupted Anna, coming up; "remain as 
you are. I will go home with Dolly in the calash." 

Darya Aleksandrovna's eyes were dazzled by the un- 
exampled elegance of the carriage, and the beauty of 
the horses, and the refined brilliancy of the company 
around her, but more than all was she struck by the 
change that had taken place in her old friend, her 
dearly beloved Anna. 

Any other woman, less observant, and unacquainted 
with Anna in days gone by, and especially any one who 
had not been under the sway of such thoughts as had 
occupied Darya Aleksandrovna on the way, would not 
have noticed anything peculiar about Anna. But now 
Darya Aleksandrovna was struck by the transient beauty 
characteristic of women when they are under the in- 
fluence of love, and which she detected now in Anna's 
face. Everything about her face was extraordinarily 
fascinating: the well-defined dimples in her cheeks and 
chin, the curve of her lips, the smile, which, as it were, 
flitted over her features, the gleam in her eyes, the grace- 
fulness and quickness of her movements, the richness 
in the tones of her voice, even the manner with which 
she, with a sort of sternly affectionate manner, replied 
to Veslovsky, who had asked permission to ride her cob 
so as to teach it to gallop by a pressure of the leg. It 
seemed as if she herself was aware of this, and rejoiced 
in it. 

When the two ladies were seated together in the 
calash, they both suddenly felt a sense of constraint. 
Anna was confused at the scrutinizingly questioning look 
which Dolly fixed on her, and Dolly because she could 



ANN4 KARENINA 139 

not help feeling ashamed of the dirty old calash in which 
Anna had taken her seat with her. 

The coachman, Filipp, and the bookkeeper experienced 
the same feeling. The bookkeeper, in order to hide his 
confusion, fidgeted about in helping the ladies to be com- 
fortably seated ; but Filipp, the coachman, frowned and 
was loath to acknowledge any such superficial superiority. 
He put on an ironical smile as he scrutinized the raven- 
black trotter harnessed to the char a bancs i and decided 
in his own mind that the black trotter might do very well 
for a prominazhe, but that he could not show forty versts 
at a heat. 

The muzhiks had left their telyega, and gayly and 
curiously were watching the meeting of the friends, and 
making their observations. * 

"They seem tolerably glad; hain't seen each other 
for some time," remarked the curly-haired old man. 

" There, Uncle Gerasim, that black gelding would haul 
in the sheaves lively ! " 

" Glian'-ka, look ! Is that a woman in trousers ? " 
asked another, pointing at Veslovsky, sitting on the side- 
saddle. 

" Nye, muzhik ! see how easy he rides." 

" Say, then, my children, we shan't get another nap, 
shall we ? " 

' " No more sleep now," said the old man, squinting 
his eyes and glancing at the sun ; " past noon I Look ! 
Now get your hooks and to work." 



CHAPTER XVIII 

Anna looked at Dolly's tired, worn face, with the 
wrinkles powdered with ditst, and was on the point of 
saying that she looked thin ; but, realizing that she her- 
self had grown more beautiful than ever, and that Dolly's 
eyes told her so, she sighed, and began to talk about 
herself. 

"You are studying me," she said. "You are won- 
dering if I can be happy in my .position ! Well, what 



i 4 o ANNA KARE^NINA 

can I say ? It is shameful to confess it ! but I .... I am 
unpardonably happy. What has happened is like a 
piece of enchantment ; like a dream where everything 
was terrible, agonizing, and suddenly you wake up and 
realize that it was only a nightmare. I had been asleep, 
I had suffered awful agonies, and now that is all long, 
long past. And how especially happy I am now that we 
are together ! " and she looked at Dolly with a timid, 
questioning smile. r j 

" How glad I am ! " Darya Aleksandrovna answered, 
more coldly than she wished. "I am glad for you; .... 
but why have you not written me ? " 

" Why ? .... Because I did not dare to You knew my 

position." 

" Not dare ? to me ! If you knew how I ...." 

Dolly was about to tell her about the reflections she 
had had on the journey, but somehow it did not seem to 
her to be the fitting place. " We will have our talk by 
and by," she added. " What is that group of buildings, 
or little village rather?" she asked, wishing' to change 
the conversation, and pointing to some green and red 
roofs which appeared through the acacias and lilac trees. 

But Anna did hot reply to her question. 
/ " No, no ! how do you feel about my position ? What 
do you think of it ? tell me ! " Anna went on. 

"I think.../' began Darya Aleksandrovna; but at 
this instant Vasenka* Veslovsky, in his short jacket, 
spurring the cob into a trot with his right leg and creak- 
ing terribly on the leather side-saddle, went dashing by 
them. 

" It goes, Anna Arkadyevna," he shouted. 

Anna did not even look at him, but again it seemed 
'to* Darya Aleksandrovna that it was impossible to begin 
on this long conversation in the carriage, and so she said 
less than she thought. 

"I do not think about it at all," said she. "I love 
you and .always have loved you. And when we love 
people so, we love them for what they are, not for what 
we wish they were." 

Anna turned her eyes away from her friend's face, half 



ANNA KARENINA 141 

closing them in order better to take in the meaning of 
the words. This was a new habit, which Dolly had 
never seen in her before. Apparently she interpreted 
her friend's answer as she wanted, and she looked at 
Dolly. 

" If you have any sins, they will all be blotted out by 
this visit and by your kind words," she said, and Dolly 
saw that her eyes were dimmed with tears. She silently 
took her hand. 

"What are those buildings? What a lot of them ! " 
said Dolly again, after a moment of silence. 

" Those are the roofs of our buildings, — our barns and 
stables," replied Anna. " Here our park begins. It 
was all neglected, but Alekse'f has made it new again. 
He is very fond of this kind of occupation, and to my 
great surprise he has developed a passion for farming. 1 
Ah, his is a rich nature ! Whatever he undertakes he 
excels in. He not only does not get' bored, but he is 
passionately interested in it. I do not know how, but 
he is making a capital farmer, so economical, almost 
stingy — but only in farm ways. For things of other 
sorts he will spend ten thousand rubles and never give 
it a thought." , 

She said this with that joyously crafty characteristic 
smile of women when they speak of the men they love, 
and the secret peculiarities which they alone know about. 

" Do you see that large building ? That is a new 
hospital. I think it will cost him more than a hundred 
thousand. It is his hobby just now. Do you know 
what made him build it ? The peasants asked him to 
reduce the rent of some meadows, but he declined to do 
so, and I told him he was stingy. Of course, it was n't 
altogether that, but everything taken together, so he 
began to build the hospital to prove my charge unjust; 
c'est ttnepetitesse, perhaps, but I love him the better for 
it. Now in a moment you'll see the, house. It was 
built by his grandfather, and the outside hasn't been 
changed at all." 

" How beautiful ! " cried Dolly, with involuntary sur- 

1 Khozyaistvo, 



i 4 2 ANNA KARENINA 

prise at the sight of a stately house ornamented with 
columns, and surrounded by a park filled with ancient 
trees of various shades of green* 

"Jsn't it beautiful? And the view from the second 
story is magnificent." 

They came into the dvor, or court, paved with small 
stones and ornamented with flower-beds; two workmen 
were at this moment surrounding a bed filled with loam 
with roughly trimmed stones. They stopped under a 
covered entrance. 

" Oh, they have already arrived," said Anna, as she 
Saw the saddle-horses being led away. " Is n't that 
horse a pretty creature ? that cob ; he 's my favorite. 
Bring him here and give him some sugar ! Where is 
the count ? " she asked of the two servants in livery 
who came hurrying out to receive them. " Ah, here he 
is ! " added she, perceiving Vronsky .with Veslovsky 
coming to meet them. 

"Where shall we put the princess ? " asked Vronsky 
of Anna, in French, and, without waiting for an answer, 
once more greeted Darya Aleksandrovna, and this time 
he' kissed her hand, — "in the large balcony chamber, I 
suppose?" 

i * Oh, no, that is too far off. Better put her in the 
corner .chamber. We shall see more of each other. 
Come, come," said she, giving her favorite horse some 
sugar which the lackey had brought. 

*i Et voits oubliez votre devoir" she added, turning to 
Veslovsky, who was already in "the porch. 
^ "Pardon, fen at tout plehi les poches" he replied, 
smiling, and thrusting his fingers into • his .waistcoat 
pocket. . / , 

"Mais votts venez trop tard" she replied, wiping 
her hand, which the horse had mouthed in taking the 
sugar. i 

Anna turned to Dolly, — 

"You'll stay with us'a long time," said she. " Only 
one day? That is impossible." 

"That is what I promised, -*+■ and the; children," an- 
swered the latter, ashamed at the wretched appearance 



ANNA KARENINA 143 

of her poor little traveling-bag and at the dust with 
which she felt herself covered. 

" No, Dolly, dushenka However, we'll talk of that 

by and by. Come up to your room." And Anna con- 
ducted Dolly up-stairs. 

The room was not the chamber of honor which 
Vronsky offered her, but one -where she could be nearer 
Anna ; but even this room, though they felt it needful 
to apologize for it, was furnished with a luxury such as 
she was not accustomed to, and which recalled the most 
sumptuous hotels that she had seen abroad. 

" Well, dushenka! how glad I am ! " said Anna, seat- 
ing herself for a moment in her riding-habit Tell me 
about your family. I saw Stiva just an instant, but he 
could not tell me anything about the children. , How is 
my darling Tania ? She must be a great girl ! " 

"Yes, very large/' answered Dolly, laconically, as- 
tonished that she answered so coolly about her children. 
"■ We are all living charmingly with the Levin's/* she 
added. 

"There! If I had known," said Anna, "that you 
wouldn't look down on me, .... you all would have come 
here. Stiva is an old and good friend of Aleksei's," 
said Anna, blushing. 

" Yes ! but we are so well .„. " began Dolly in con- 
fusion. 

"Well! I am so happy, I talk nonsense; only, 
dushenka, I am so glad to see you," said Anna, kissing 
her again. " But you would not tell me what you think 
about me; I want to know all. But I am so glad that 
you see me just as I am. My only idea, you see, is to 
avoid making people think that I am making any dis- 
play. I don't want to make any display ; I want simply 
to live and not do any harm to any one but myself. 
Am I not right about it ? However, we '11 talk of all 
this at our leisure. Now I 'm going to change my dress; 
I will send you a waiting-maid." 



144 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XIX 

Darya Aleksandrovna, when left alone, examined 
her chamber with the eyes of a genuine housekeeper. 
All that she saw as she went through the house, and all 
that she saw in the room, impressed her by its richness 
and elegance ; and this new European luxury, which she 
had read about in English novels, she had never seen 
before in Russia/ — certainly not in the country. All 
was new, from the French tapestries to the carpet which 
covered the whole room, the bed with its hair mattress, 
the marble toilet-table, the bronzes on the mantel, the 
rugs, the curtains, — all was costly and new. 

The smart waiting-maid who came to offer her ser- 
vices was dressed with much more style than Dolly, and 
was as costly and new as the whole room. Darya Alek- 
sandrovna liked her good breeding, her dexterity, and 
her helpfulness ; but she felt confused at taking out be- 
fore her her poor toilet articles from her bag, especially 
a mended night-dress, which she had happened to put in 
by mistake from among her oldest ones. She was ashamed 
of the very patches and mended places which gave her 
a sense of pride at home. It was clear that for six 
nightgowns, it would take twenty-four arshins. of nain- 
sook at sixty-five kopeks, amounting to more than fifteen 
rubles, besides the cost of the trimmings ; and these fif- 
teen rubles were saved ; but in the presence of this brill- 
iant attendant she felt not so much ashamed as awkward. 

Darya Aleksandrovna felt great relief when her old- 
time acquaintance, Annushka, came into her room to take 
the place of the dashing chambermaid, who was needed 
by her mistress. 

Annushka was evidently very glad at the arrival of 
her mistress's friend, and talked incessantly. Dolly 
noticed that she was, eager to express her opinion about 
her mistress's position, and about the love and devotion 
which the count showed to Anna Arkadyevna ; but she 
peremptorily stopped her as soon as she began to talk 
on this topic. 



ANNA KARENINA 145 

" I grew up with Anna Arkadyevna, and love her 
more than the whole world. It 's not for us to judge 
her, and she seems to love ...." 

" Please have these washed, if it is possible/' said 
Darya Aleksandrovna, interrupting her. 

" I will do so. We have two women especially for the 
laundry, but the washing is done all by machinery. The 
count looks out for everything. He is such a hus- 
band 

Dolly was glad when Anna came in and put an end 
to the babbling Annushka's confidences. 

Anna had put on a very simple batiste gown. Dolly 
noticed particularly this simple gown. She knew what 
this simplicity meant,* and how much money it repre- 
sented. 

"An old acquaintance," said Anna to Annushka. 

Anna now was no longer confused. She was per- 
fectly calm and self-possessed. Dolly saw that now she 
was entirely free from the impression which her coming 
had at first produced, and had assumed that superficial 
tone of indifference which, as it were, closed the door to 
the expression of real thought and feelings. 

" Well, and how is your little daughter ? !' asked 
Dolly, 

"Ani?" — for so she called her daughter Anna* — 
" very well. Her health is much better. Should you 
like to see her ? Come, and I'll show her to you. We 
have had great trouble with her," she went on to relate, 
" We had an Italian for her nurse; good, but so stupid ; 
we wanted to send her back, but the little thing is so 
much attached to her, we still keep her." 

"But how have you done about...." began Dolly, 
wishing to ask about the child's name; but, as she saw 
Anna's countenance grow suddenly dark, she changed 
the ending of the question. " Have you weaned her? " 

Anna understood. 

" That is not what you were going to ask. You were 
thinking of the child's name, weren't you? This tor- 
ments AlekseT ; she has no name; that is, she is a 
Karenin," and she closed her eyes so that only the lashes 

VOL. III. — 10 



146 ANNA KARENINA 

were visible. ..,. " However," she added, her face sud- 
denly lighting up again, " we will talk again about all 
that; come, and I'll show her to you. Elle e$t trh 
gentille ; she is already beginning to creep." 

In the nursery there was* the same sumptuousness as 
had struck Darya Aleksandrovna throughout the. rest of 
the house, only to an even higher degree. There were 
baby-coaches imported from England, and instruments 
for teaching children to walk, and a peculiarly arranged 
divan like a billiard table for creeping, bath-tubs, swings. 
All were new, beautiful, solid, of English make, and 
evidently very costly. The room was large, very high- 
studded, and light. . , . 

When they entered, the little girl with only her shirt 
on was seated in an arm-chair by the table, and was .eat- 
ing her broth and spilling it all -over her bosom. A 
Russian maid-servant who assisted in the nursery was 
helping her, and at the same time was apparently her- 
self eating. Neither the Italian nurse nor the nurse- 
maid was present; they were in the /next room, and could 
be^ heard talking together in a strange French jargon 
which was the only means they had of communicating 
their ideas to each other. 

The English maid, a tall, sprucely dressed woman with 
a disagreeable face and an untrustworthy Expression, 
came into the doorway shaking her light brown curls 
as, soon as she heard Anna's voice, and immediately 
began to offer her excuses, alth6ugli Anna had not 
chidden. her. At every word Anna spoke the English 
maid, would several .time's , repeat the phrase, "Yes, my 
lady." 

The dark-browed, dark^haired, rosy little girl, with 
her strong, pretty little form, very much pleased Darya 
Aleksandrovna in spite of the unfriendly look with which 
she gazed at the stranger ; her healthy appearance also 
pleased her, and her way of creeping. Not one of her 
own children had learned so early to creep, - This little 
girl, when she was put down on the carpet and her dress 
was tucked up behind, was wonderfully beautiful. With 
her brilliant black eyes she gazed up at her elders like 



ANNA KARENINA 147 

a pretty little animal, evidently delighting in the fact that 
they admired her, and she smiled ; and, putting out her 
legs sidewise, she energetically crept about* now going 
swiftly backward, and again darting forward, and clutch- 
ing things with her little fingers. 

But the whole atmosphere of the nursery, and especially 
the English maid, struck Darya Aleksandrovna very un- 
pleasantly. Only by the supposition that no respectable 
person would consent to serve in a household as irregular 
as Anna's, could she understand how Anna, with her 
knowledge of people, could be willing to put up with 
such an unsympathetic, vulgar maid. , . 

Darya Aleksandrovna, after a few words, observed 
that Anna, the nurse, the maid, and the child were not 
much wonted to each other, and that the mother was 
almost a stranger in this part of the, house. She wanted 
to find a plaything for the little girl and did not know 
where it was kept. Strangest of all, in answering the 
question how many teeth the child had, she made a mis- 
take, and did not know anything about the last two. 

"It is always a grief to me that I am so useless here," 
said Anna, as they went out, holding up the train of her 
dress so that it should not catch on any of the toys by 
the door. " It was not so with my oldest.'* 

" I thought, on the contrary ...." began Dolly, timidly. 

" Oh, no ! You know that I have seen Serozha again," 
said she, half shutting her eyes and looking fixedly 
before her, as if she sought for something far away. 
" However, we '11 talk about that by and by. You can't 
believe — but I am like a person dying of starvation, 
who finds a banquet before her, and does not know 
what to begin with. You and the talk I am going to 
have with you are this banquet for me. With whom 
could I speak openly if not with you ? I don't know 
what topic to take up first. Mais je ne vons ferai grace 
de rien} I must tell you all. 

" Well, I want to give you a sketch now of the people 
you will meet here," she began. " First, the Princess 
Varvara. You know her, and I know your opinion and 

1 I shall not spare you anything. 



148 ANNA KARENINA 

Stiva's in regard to her. Stiva says her whole aim ot 
life consists in proving her preeminence over Aunt 
Katerina Pavlovna. That is all true of her; but she 
is good, I assure you, and I am so grateful to her. At 
Petersburg there was a time when un chaperon was 
indispensable. Then she came along just in time. It 
is really true ; she is good. She made my position much 
easier. I see you don't know how difficult my position 
was.... there in Petersburg!" she added. "Here I am 
very comfortable and happy. But about this afterward. 
But I must tell you about our guests. Then there 's 
Sviazhsky ; he is the marshal of. the district, 1 and a very 
clever man, and he needed Aleksef for something. You 
see, with his fortune, now, as we live in the country, 
Aleksef can wield a wide influence. Then Tushkievitch ; 
you have met him ; he was at Betsy's ; but they sent 
him off, and he came to visit us. As Alekse'f says, he 
is one of those very agreeable men, if one takes him 
just as he wishes to appear, et puis il est comme il faut, 
as the Princess Varvara says. And then Veslovsky.... 
you know him. A very good young fellow," she said, 
and a mischievous smile curled her lips. "How about 
that absurd story he told of Levin? Veslovsky told 
Alekse'f, and we don't believe it. // est tres ge?itil 
et naif" she added, with the same smile. " I have 
to entertain all these people, because men need amuse- 
ment, and Alekse'f needs society ; and we have to make 
it lively and gay, so that Alekse'f won't want some- 
thing new. We also have with us the superintendent. 
He is a German, a very good man, who understands his 
business; Alekse'f has great esteem for him. Then 
there 's the doctor, a young man who is not exactly a 
Nihilist, but, you know, he eats with his knife, but a 
very good doctor. Then the architect, — une petite cour." 

1 Prcdvoditytlt marshal of the nobility. 



ANNA KARENINA 149 



CHAPTER XX 

"Well, princess, here we have Dolly, whom you 
wished so much to see," said Anna, as she and Darya 
Aleksandrovna came out on the great stone terrace 
where the Princess Varvara was sitting in the shade, 
with her embroidery frame in front of her, making a 
chair cover for Count Alekse'f Kirillovitch. "She says 
that she does not want anything before dinner, but 
supposing you order luncheon brought in, while I go 
and find the gentlemen." 

The Princess Varvara gave Dolly a gracious and 
somewhat condescending reception, and immediately 
began to explain that she had come to live with Anna 
because she loved her more than her sister, Katerina 
Pavlovna, — that was the aunt that had superintended 
Anna's education, — and because, now when all were 
abandoning Anna, she considered it her duty to help 
her at this trying period of transition. 

" Her husband is going to grant her a divorce, and 
then I shall go back to my solitude ; but, however pain- 
ful it may be, I shall stay here for the present, and not 
imitate the example of others. And how kind you are ; 
how good of you to make this visit ! They live exactly 
like the very best married people. Let God judge them ; 
it is not for us. It was just so with Biriuzovsky and 
Madame Avenyef, and then Vasiliyef and Madame 
Mamonov, and Liza Neptunova. You see no one says 
anything about them, and in the end they will be re- 
ceived. And then c'est un inte'rieur si jolt, si com me il 
faut. Tout-a-fait a Vanglaise. On se rhtnit le matin 
ait breakfeast et puis on se se'pare} Every one does just 
as he pleases till dinner-time. They dine at seven. 
Stiva did very wisely to send you ; he would better keep 
on good terms with them. You know the count has 
great influence through his mother and his brother. 

1 They have a perfect establishment, and the inside of their house is so 
charming, so stylish. It is altogether English. The family meets at break- 
fast and then separates. 



ISO ANNA KARENINA 

And then they do so much good. Has he told you 
about his hospital?, ^a* sera admirable! Everything 
from Paris." 

This conversation was interrupted by Anna, who re- < 
turned to the terrace, followed by the gentlemen, whom 
she had found in the billiard-room. 

Considerable time still remained before dinner, the 
weather was beautiful, and so various propositions were 
made for their amusement during the two hours before 
them. 

There was every facility for diversion there at Voz- 
dvizhenskoye and many of them were very different 
from what they had at Pokrovskoye. 

" Une partie de lawn tennis" proposed Veslovsky, 
with his gay, contagious smile. V, I '11 take one side 
with you again, Anna Arkadyevna." 

" No, it is hot ; suppose we go into the parkland take 
Darya Aleksandrovna out in the boat to show her the 
landscape,'' said Vronsky. 

" I am agreeable to anything," said Sviazhsky. 

" I think Dolly would like to do that better than any- 
thing else," said Anna. " So then the boat-ride it is." 

That having been decided, Veslovsky and Tushkie- 
vitch went to the landing, agreeing to get the boat 
ready, and the two couples took the path to the. park; 
Anna walked with Sviazhsky, and Dolly with Vronsky, 

Dolly was somewhat confused and embarrassed by 
this absolutely novel environment in which she found 
herself. Abstractly, theoretically, she not only justified, 
but even approved, of Anna's conduct. Like the major- 
ity of irreproachably virtuous women, wearying often of 
the monotony of a virtuous life, Dolly from a distance 
excused illicit love, and even envied it a little. More- 
over, she loved Anna with all her heart. 

But in reality, finding her among these strangers, with 
their fashionable ways, which were quite noveb to her, 
she was thoroughly ill at ease^ Especially odious to her 
was it to see the Princess Varvara forgiving everything, 
because she could thereby share in her niece's luxury. 

Abstractly and on general principles Dolly excused 



ANNA KARENINA 151 

Anna's conduct, but the sight of the man for whom she 
had taken this step was unpleasant to her. Moreover, 
Vronsky was not congenial to her at any time ; she 
thought him very haughty, and could see no reason 
except his wealth to justify his haughtiness. But in 
spite of all her will-power, there in his own establish- 
ment he more than ever impressed her with a sense of 
his importance and she could not feel at ease with him ; 
she felt just as she had felt when the maid took the 
nightgown from her valise. Just as before the maid she 
had felt, not exactly ashamed, but awkward, on account 
of, the patches, so now with Vronsky she felt all the 
time, not exactly ashamed, but uncomfortable. 

Dolly felt confused and cast about in her mind for 
something to talk about. 

Although she felt sure that he with his pride might 
be displeased if she praised his house and park, never- 
theless, finding no other topic of conversation, she re- 
marked that she liked his house very much. 

<• Yes, it is a very handsome building, and in good old 
style," replied the count. 

" I liked the court in front of the steps ; was it 
always so?" 

" Oh, no ! " said he, and his face shone with satisfac- 
tion. " If you had only seen it in the spring ! " 

And at first coldly, but warming as he went on, he 
pointed out to Dolly the many improvements he had 
made in" the house and park. It was evident that Vron- 
sky, having consecrated much labor to the improvement 
and beautification of his establishment, really felt the 
need of appreciation from some new person, and, that he 
was not a little gratified at Darya Aleksandrovna's praise. 

".If you would like to look into the hospital and are 
not tired, we might go that way. It is not far. Come, 
let us go ! Shall we, Anna ? " 

"Yes — shall we not?" she said, turning to Svi- 
azhsky; " mais il ne faut pas laisser le pauvre Veslovsky 
et Tushktivitch se moffondre la dans le bateau ! * We 

1 Btit we ttmst not leave these gehtlemeh to wait 4ft vain tot US in the 
boat. 



152 ANNA KARENINA 

must send word to them. Yes. This is a monument 
which he will leave here," said she to Dolly, with the 
same shrewd knowing smile on her face as when she 
first spoke of the hospital. 

" Oh, capital work ! " said Sviazhsky ; and then, not to 
seem assenting from mere politeness, he added : — 

" I am surprised, count, that you, who are doing so 
much for the peasants' sanitary advantage, are so indif- 
ferent to schools." 

" C'est devenn tellement commun, les /coles/ 9 replied 
Vronsky. " You must know I do this to amuse myself. 
This is the way to the hospital," said he, addressing 
Darya Aleksandrovna, pointing to a side-path which 
led from the avenue. The ladies put up their sun- 
shades and walked along the side-path. 

After making a few turns and passing through a 
wicket-gate, Darya Aleksandrovna saw before her on 
rising ground a large red building of complicated archi- 
tecture not completely finished. The iron roof, not as 
yet painted, glittered in the sun. Near the hospital 
itself there was another building going up, in the midst 
of the woods, and workmen in aprons stood on scaffold- 
ings laying the bricks, taking mortar from buckets and 
smoothing it with trowels. 

" How rapidly the work is going on," remarked 
Sviazhsky. "The last time I was here the roof was 
not in position." 

" It will be ready by autumn, for the inside is 
already nearly finished," said Anna. 

" And what is this other new building ? " 

"A house for the doctor, and a pharmacy," replied 
Vronsky ; and, seeing the architect, in a short overcoat, 
approaching, he excused himself to the ladies, and went 
to meet him. 

Going round the mortar-pit, from which the workmen 
were getting lime, he joined the architect and began to 
talk angrily with him. 

"The pediment will be much too low," he replied 
to Anna, who asked him what the discussion was 
about. 



ANNA KARENINA 153 

" I said that the foundation ought to be raised," said 
Anna. 

" Yes ! Of course, it would have been better, Anna 
Arkadyevna," said the architect; "yes, it was a mis- 
take." 

"Yes, indeed! I am very much interested in this," 
said Anna, in reply to Sviazhsky, who expressed his 
surprise that the architect spoke to her as he did. 
" The new building must correspond with the hospital. 
But this was thought of afterward, and begun without 
any plan." 

Having concluded his talk with the architect, Vronsky 
joined the ladies and conducted them into the hospital. 
Though on the outside they were already placing the 
cornices and were painting the lower part of the build- 
ing, on the upper floors almost everything was done. 
They went up by a broad cast-iron staircase to the 
secpnd story, and entered the first great room. The 
walls were stuccoed for marble, the great glass win- 
dows were already in place ; only the parquetry floor 
was as yet to be finished, and the carpenters, engaged 
in planing the squares, left off their work, and, removing 
the tapes which bound their hair, greeted the visitors. 

"This is the reception-room," said Vronsky. "In 
this there will be not much besides the desk, 'a table, 
and a cupboard." 

" Here, come this way. Don't go near the window," 
said Anna, touching the paint to see if it was dry. 
" Aleksei, the paint is beginning to dry." 

From the reception-room they went into the corridor. 
Here Vronsky explained the new system of ventilation ; 
then he showed them the marble bath-rooms and the 
beds with extra spring mattresses. Then he showed 
them one after the other the wards, the laundry, then 
the heating apparatus, then the noiseless barrows for 
wheeling articles along the corridors, and many other 
contrivances. Dolly was simply amazed at the sight of 
so many novelties, and, wishing to understand it thor: 
oughly, she asked a great many questions, which 
Vronsky answered with the greatest alacrity. 



154 ANNA KARENINA 

"Yes, I think this hospital will be the only one of the 
kind in Russia," remarked Sviazhsky.. 

" Shall you not have a lying-in department ? " aSked 
Dolly. "That- is So necessary in this country. I have 
often thought...." 

In spite of his politeness/ Vronsky interrupted her. 

{' This is not an obstetrical institution, but a hospital, 
and is meant for all except infectious diseases," said he. 
"And -now look at this," and he showed Darya Alek- 
sandfovna a newly imported chair designed for con- 
valescents. "Will you look at it, please?" He sat 
down in the chair arid began to move it along* " He 
can't walk .... or he is still weak, or he has a larne leg, 
but still he must have the air, and so he goes out and 
enjoys himself ! " 

Darya Aleksandrovna was interested in everything; 
everything pleased her very much, but, more than all, 
Vronsky himself pleased her with his natural na'fve 
enthusiasm. 

"Yes, he is certainly a good, lovable man," she 
thought, not listening to what he said, but looking at 
him and trying to penetrate his expression, and then 
momentarily looking at Anna. He pleased, her so much 
with his animation that she understood how it was that 
Anna came to love him. - 



CHAPTER XXI 

" No ; the princess must be tired, and the horses will 
not interest her," said Vronsky to Anna, who had pro- 
posed to show Dolly the stable, where there was a new 
stallion that Sviazhsky wished to see. "You go there, 
and I will escort the princess back to the house* And* 
if you please," added he to Dolly, "we will talk a little 
on the Way, if that will be agreeable." 

" I know nothing about horses, so I shall very will- 
ingly go with you," said Darya Aleksandrovna. 

She saw by Vronsky's face that he wanted something 
of her, nor was sh6 mistaken* As soon as they had 



ANNA KARENINA 155 

passed through the wicket-gate again into the park, he 
looked in the direction where Anna was gone, and, hav- 
ing convinced himself that they were out of her sight 
and hearing, he began : — 

" You have guessed that I wanted to have a talk with 
you," said he, looking at her with his smiling eyes. "I 
am not mistaken in believing that you are Anna's friend, 
ami?" 

He took off his hat, and, taking out his handkerchief 
wiped his head, which was growing bald. 

Darya Aleksandrovna made no reply, and only gazed 
at him in alarm. Now that she was entirely alone with 
him, she suddenly felt terror-stricken ; his smiling eyes 
and the stern expression of his face, frightened, her. 

The most diverse suppositions as to what he might be 
wanting to talk with her about chased one another 
through her mind. 

"Can it be that he is going 1 to' ask me to come with 
my children and "make them a visit, and I shall be 
obliged to decline? or is it that he wants me to find 
society for Anna when she comes to Moscow ?.... Or is 
he going to ' speak of Vasenka Veslovsky and his rela- 
tions- to Anna? Or can it be about Kitty, and that he 
wants to confess that he was to blame toward her ? " 
t She thought over everything that 'might be disagree- 
able, but never suspected what he really wanted to talk 
with her about. 

" You have such an influence over Anna, she is so 
fond of you/' said he, " help me." 

Darya Aleksandrovna looked timidly and I question- 
ingly into Vronsky's energetic face, which, as they 
passed under the linden trees, was now lighted up by 
the flecking sunbeams and then again. darkened by the 
shadows, and she waited for him to 'proceed; but he, 
catching his cane in the paving-stones, walked in silence 
by her side. * . 

" Of all Anna's friends, you are the only one who has 
come to see her — I do not coiint the Princess Varvara 
— I know very well it is not because you approve of our 
position ; it is because you . love Anna, and, knowing 



156 ANNA KARENINA 

the cruelty of her "position, want to help her. Am 1 
right?" /j 

"Yes," said Darya Aleksandrovna, shutting up her 
sunshade, " but .... " 

ANo^^he interrupted, and he involuntarily stopped 
and obliged her to stop also; though he had no intention 
of putting his companion into an awkward situation. 
" No one feels more strongly and completely the cruelty 
of Anna's position than I do. And you will realize this 
if you will do me' the honor to believe that I am not 
heartless. I am the cause of her being in this position, 
and therefore I feel it." 

"I understand," r said Darya Aleksandrovna, invol- 
untarily admiring him for the ' honest and straight- 
forward way in which he said this. -"But for the v&ry 
reason that you feel yourself the cause P fear you are 
inclined tp exaggerate," said she. " Her position in 
society is difficult, I admit." * 

"In society it is. hell!" said he, frowning gloomily.;' 
" you can't conceive moral tortures worse than those 
which Ahna endured at Petersburg "during the fortnight 
we were there; and I beg you to believe...." 

"Yes, but here?;... And so far , neither she nor you 
feel the need of a society life." .... 

" Society ! why should I need it ? " exclaimed Vronsky, 
scornfully. . > t I ->j r. r 

"Up to the present time, and perhaps it will be so 
always, you are calm and happy. I see in- Anna that 
she is happy, perfectly happy, and she has already told 
me that she is, "'said Darya Aleksandrovna, smiling. 
* And while she spoke the doubt arose in her mind : " Is 
Anna really happy ? " , * 

But Vronsky, it seemed, had no doubt on that score : — 

' " Yes, yes, I know that she has revived after all her 

sufferings. She is happy .... she is happy now. But 

I ? " said Vronsky. " I am afraid of what the future 

has in store for us .... excuse me, do you want to go ? " 

••'.* No/ it is immaterial:" 

" Well, then, let us sit down here." 

Darya Aleksandrovna sat down on a garden bench 



ANNA KARENINA 



157 



in a nook of the walk. He was standing in front of 
her. 

" I see that she seems happy," he repeated ; and the 
doubt whether Anna was happy again rose in Darya 
Aleksandrovna's mind more strongly than ever. " But 
will it last? Whether we did right or wrong is a hard 
question ; but the die is cast/' he said, changing from 
Russian to French, "and we are joined for life; we are 
joined by the ties of love. We have one child, and we 
may have others. But the law and all the conditions of 
our state are such that there are a thousand complica- 
tions, which Anna, now that she is resting after her 
afflictions and sufferings, does not see and will not see. 
It is natural ; but I cannot, help seeing. My daughter, 
according to the law, is not my daughter, but Karenin's, 
and I do not like this falsehood/' said he, with an ener- 
getic gesture of repulsion, and looking at Darya Aleksan- 
drovna with a gloomy, questioning face. 

She did not reply, but simply looked at him. He 
continued : — 

" To-morrow a son may be born — my son — and by 
law he would be a Karenin, and could, inherit neither 
my name nor my property, and, however happy we were 
here at home, and however many children we had, there 
would be no legal connection between me and them. 
They would be Karenins. You understand the cruelty, 
the horror, of this state of things ? I try to explain this 
to Anna. It irritates her — she will not understand me, 
and I cannot tell her all. Now look at the other side. 
I am happy in her love, but I must have occupation. I 
have taken up my present enterprise, and I am proud 
of it, and consider it far more beneficial than the occupa- 
tions of my former comrades at the court and in the 
service. And certainly I would not change my occupa- 
tion for theirs. I work here, on my own place, and I am 
happy and contented, and we need nothing more for our 
happiness. I love my activity, cela nest pas tin pis aller; 
far from it." ' 

Darya Aleksandrovna noticed that at this point of his 
explanation he became entangled, and she did not under 



158 ANNA KARENINA 

stand very well his sudden pause, but she felt that, having 
fairly begun to speak of his intimate affairs concerning 
which he could not talk with Anna, he would now make 
a full breast of it, and that the question of his activities 
in the country belonged to the same category as his 
relations to Anna. 

"And so I keep on/' said he, growing more cheerful 
again. "The chief thing is that when one works one 
must have the persuasion that what one has done will 
not die with him, that he will have heirs .... but I have 

none Conceive the feelings of a man who knows that 

his children and those of the wife he worships do not 
belong to him ; that they belong to a man who hates 
them, and would never recognize them. Is n't it hor- 
rible ? " 

He was silent and deeply moved. 

" Yes, of course," said Darya Aleksandrovna ; " I 
understand this. But what can Anna do ? " 

V Well, that brings me to the purpose of this talk,' 1 
said the count, controlling himself with effort. " Anna 

can get a divorce. It depends on her If we are to 

petition the emperor to legitimize the children, a divorce 
is essential. But that depends on Anna. Her husband 
consented to that, and your husband had it all arranged 
some time ago, and I know that he now would not 
refuse ; all it requires is for Anna to write to him. He 
said up and down that he would consent, if Anna would 
apply for it. Of course," he added, frowning, "this 
condition is one of those Pharisaic cruelties of which 
only heartless people are capable. He r knows what 
torture all remembrance of him has for her, and so he 
exacts this letter from her. I understand that it is pain- 
ful to her. But the reasons are so imperative that she 
must passer pardesstts toutes ces finesses de sentiment* II 
va du bonheur et de V existence d'Aniia et de ces etifants. 1 
I don't speak about myself, though it is painful, very 
painful, to me," said he, with a wrathful expression 
against whoever was responsible for this state of things. 

1 She ought to be above these excessive sensibilities; her happiness is 
involved, as well as "her children's. 



ANNA KARENINA 159 

"And this is why I make bold to apply to you, princess, 
as to a very anchor of salvation. Help me to persuade 
Anna of the need of getting a divorce." 

" Why, of course I will," said Darya Aleksandrovna, 
gravely, for she vividly recalled her last meeting with 
Aleksel Aleksandrovitch. " Of course I will," she re- 
peated resolutely, as she thought of Anna. 

" Exert your influence on her and induce her to write 
the letter. I do not wish, and indeed I find it almost 
impossible, to talk with her about this." 

"Very well, I will speak to her. But why does she 
not think of it herself?" asked Darya Aleksandrovna, 
suddenly remembering Anna's strange new trick of 
half-closing her eyes. And then it occurred to her that 
Anna did this especially when any reference was made 
to the more intimate side of her life. 

" She seems to try to shut her eyes to her whole life, 
as if to put it out of her mind," said Darya Aleksan- 
drovna to herself " Yes, I will speak to her, cer- 
tainly; both for your sake and for hers," repeated 
Dolly, in response to Vronsky's grateful look. 

And they got up and went to the house. 



CHAPTER XXII 

Finding Dolly already returned, Anna looked scruti- 
nizingly into her eyes, as if she would read there a reply 
to her wonder what she and Vronsky had been talking 
about, but she asked no questions. 

" Dinner is nearly ready, and we have hardly seen 
each other. I count on this evening; but now I must 
go and change my gown. I suppose you 'd like to do 
the same. One gets so soiled after such a walk." 

Dolly went to her room, and felt ridiculous. She had 
no change to make, since she had worn her best gown ; 
but, in order to make some change in her toilette, in 
honor of dinner, she asked the maid to brush the dust 
off, she changed her cuffs and put on a fresh ribbon, 
and put some lace in her hair. 



i6o ANNA KARENINA 

"It is all I could do," she said laughingly, to Anna, 
who came to her, dressed in a third but very simple cos- 
tume. 

" Well ! we are very formal here," said Anna, in apol- 
ogy for her elegant attire. " Aleksef is so glad that you 
came. I believe he has fallen in love with you," she 
added. " I hope you are not tired." 

Before dinner there was no time for any talk. When 
they entered the drawing-room, they found the Princess 
Varvara and the gentlemen all in evening dress. The 
architect was the only one that wore a frock-coat. 
Vronsky presented the doctor and the superintendent 
to his guest. She had already met the architect at 
the hospital. 

A portly, butler, wearing a stiffly starched white 
cravat, and with his smooth round face shining, came 
and announced that dinner was served, and the ladies 
stood up. Vronsky asked Sviazhsky to escort Anna 
Arkadyevna into the dining-room, and he himself offered 
his arm to Darya Aleksandrovna. Veslovsky was 
quicker than Tushkievitch in handing in the Princess 
Varvara, so that Tushkievitch went with the doctor and 
the superintendent. 

The dinner, the service, the plate, the wine, and the 
dishes served, not only corresponded to the general tone 
of new luxury appertaining to the household, but seemed 
even more luxurious and elegant. Darya Aleksandrovna 
took note of this splendor, which was quite new to her, 
and, as the mistress of an establishment of her own, she 
could not help making a mental inventory of the details, 
and wondering how and by whom it was all done ; and 
yet she had no dream of introducing anything like it 
into her own home, which was conducted on a scale of 
far greater simplicity. 

Vasenka Veslovsky, her own husband, and even 
Sviazhsky and many more men whom she knew, had 
never carried out anything like this, and every one of 
them believed in the dictum that the master of a well- 
regulated household always desires to make his guests 
imagine that the elegance and comfort surrounding 



ANNA KARENINA 161 

them are not any trouble to him, but come about spon 
taneously. 

Darya Aleksandrovna knew that even such a simple 
matter as providing kasha for her children's breakfast 
does not go of itself, and that all the more in such 
an elegant and complicated establishment there had to 
be some one in full and complete charge. And by the 
glances with which Aleksef Kirillovitch took in the de- 
tails of the table, and by the nods which he gave toward 
the butler and by the way in which he offered Darya 
Aleksandrovna the choice between botvinya and soup,- 
she understood that everything was done under the direct 
superintendence of the master of the house. Anna had 
nothing more to do with it than Veslovsky had. She 
and Sviazhsky, the princess and Veslovsky, were only 
guests, gayly and thoughtlessly taking advantage of 
what was done for them. 

Anna was khozyaika, or mistress of the household, 
only in the management of the conversation ; and this 
conversation was very difficult at a small table among 
guests belonging to such different spheres of life as the 
superintendent and the architect, who were trying not to 
be dazzled by such unwonted splendor,' and who were 
unused to taking part in a general conversation ; but 
Anna went through with her task with her usual tact 
and simplicity, and even with pleasure, as Darya Alek- 
sandrovna noticed. 

The conversation turned first on the way in -which 
Tushkievitch and Veslovsky had gone down alone to the 
boat, and Tushkievitch began to speak of the recent 
yacht-race under the auspices of the Petersburg yacht- 
club. But Anna, taking advantage of the first pause, 
quickly turned to the architect, in order to bring him 
out of his silence. 

" NikolaT Ivanuitch was surprised," said she, referring 
to Sviazhsky, "to see how the new building had grown 
since he was here last. But I myself am here every 
day, and every day I am surprised myself to see how 
fast it progresses. 

" It is good to work with his excellency," said the 
vol. in. — 1 1 



162 ANNA KARENINA 

architect, smiling. .... He had a sense of the dignity of his 
calling, and was a very worthy and self-possessed gentle- 
man "You don't do such, work under government 

patronage. When" they would . write reams of paper, I 
simply lay the plan before the count, .we talk it over, and 
three words decide it." 
ift American ways," suggested Sviazhsky, smiling. 

"Yes! buildings there are raised rationally.".... 

The conversation then went off "oh the abuse of power 
in the United States; but Anna immediately started him 
on a third theme, in order to bring. out, the superinten- 
dent from his silence. ; n 

"Have you ever seen the steam reaping-machines ? " 
she asked of -Darya Aleksandrovna. "We had just 
been to" see 6urs r when we met you. * I never saw one 
before*"' / v { 

" How do they work ? " asked'Dolly. 

"Just likestissors. A plank and a quantity of little 
knives. Like this ! " 

Anna took a knife and fork- in tp her beautiful .white 
hands covered with rings, and tried to show her. She 
apparently saw that she did not make herself very clear, 
but, knowing that /she spoke pleasantly and that her 
handswere beautiful, she continued her explanations. 

" Better say pen-knives ! V said Veslovsky, with an 
attempt at a pun, 1 - and not talcing his eyes from her. 

Anna smiled almost imperceptibly, but made no reply, 
to his remark. 

"Am I not right, Karl, that they are like scissors?" 
she said, appealing to the director. 

" O/tjj'a," replied the German. " Es ist ein ganz ein- 
f aches Ding ; " 2 and he began to explain the'constructioh 
of the machine* . '.; > 

" It is too bad that it does not bind the 'sheaves. : I 
saw one at the Vienna Exposition; it bound them with 
wire," said Sviazhsky. ".That kind would be. much 
more convenient." 

"Es kommtdraufan::..:DerPreis von Draht muss 

. ( x Nozhnitsui) scissors ; .nozkiichki, little knives. 
2 It id a very simple thing/ " ' "* l - " 

i i — .in 



ANNA KARENINA 163 

ausgerechnet werden" And the German, aroused from 
his silence, turned for confirmation to Vronsky — " Das 
lasst sich ausrechnen, Erlaitcht" 

The German put his hand into his pocket, where he 
kept a pencil and notebook, in which he had an exact 
statement, but, suddenly remembering that he was at the 
dinner-table, and noticing Vronsky's cold eyes fastened 
on him, he controlled himself. 

" Za complicirt) macht zu viel Klopots," 2 he said in 
conclusion. 

■"" Wiinschi man Dochots, so hat man audi Klopots" 2 
said Vasenka Veslovsky, making sport of the German. 
" y adore Vallemand" he said, with a peculiar smile, 
turning to Anna. 

" Cesses /" said she, with affected sternness. , •: 

" We expected to find you on the field," said she to 
the doctor, who was somewhat" infirm. "Were you 
there?" 

"I was there, but I evaporated," replied the doctor, 
with a melancholy attempt at a jest. 

" It must have been a beautiful motion." 

" Magnificent." 

"Well, and how did you find your old woman? I 
hope it is n't the typhus." 

"Whether it is typhus or not I can't tell yet, butL." 

"How sorry I am," said' Anna; and, having thus 
shown her politeness to the dependents, she turned 
again to her friends. 

" At any rate, it would be pretty hard to reconstruct 
a machine by following your description, Anna Arka- 
dy evna," said Sviazhsky; 

" No, why so? " said Anna, with a smile which inti- 
mated that she knew there was something charming in 
her description of the construction of the reaping-ma- 
chines, and that even Sviazhsky had noticed it. This 
new trait of youthful coquetry struck Dolly unpleasantly. 

" Still, in architecture Anna Arkadyevna's knowledge 
is very remarkable," said Tushkievitch. 

1 Too complicated, makes too much bother. 
3 If one wants money, he must have bother. 



164 ANNA KARENINA 

" Well, yesterday evening I heard Anna Arkadyevna 
making some wise remark about plinths," said Veslovsky. 
*' Would you find me doing that ? " 
. " There is nothing remarkable in that, when one 
keeps one's eyes and ears open," said Anna. " But don't 
you know what houses are built of ? " 

Darya Aleksandrovna perceived that Anna was not 
pleased with this tone of badinage which she and Veslov- 
sky kept up, but that she fell into it involuntarily. 

In this respect Vronsky behaved exactly the opposite, 
to Levin. He evidently attributed not the least impor- 
tance to Veslovsky's nonsense, ( but, on the contrary, 
encouraged this jesting. 

"Well, tell us, Veslovsky, what they use to fasten 
stones together." w ' 

" Cement, of course." 

" Bravo ! And what is cement made of ? " > 

"Well, it is something like gruel No, a sort of 

mastic," said Veslovsky, amid general laughter. 

The conversation among the guests, with the excep- 
tion of the doctor, the superintendent, and the architect, 
who generally kept silence, went on without cessation, 
now growing light, now dragging a little, and now 
touching to the quick. 

Once Darya Aleksandrovna was touched to the quick, 
and felt so provoked that she grew red in the face, and 
afterward she .wondered if she made any improper op 
unpleasant remark. Sviazhsky spoke of Levin and told, 
of some of his strange opinions in regard to machines 
being injurious to Russian agriculture. 

" I have not the pleasure of knowing this Mr. Levin ; 
probably he has never seen the machines he criticizes. 
But if he has seen and tried, they must have been 
Russian ones, and not the, foreign make. , What can be 
his views?" 

" Turkish views," said Veslovsky, smiling at Anna. 

" I cannot defend his opinions," said Dolly, reddening ; 
"but Levin is a thoroughly intelligent man, and ii he 
were here he would know what answer to make you, 
but I can't." . , 



ANNA KARENINA 165 

" Oh, I am very fond of him, and we are excellent 
friends," said Sviazhsky, smiling good-naturedly ; " mats 
pardon^ il est un petit pen toque'. For example, he con- 
siders the zemstvo and the justices of the peace — every- 
thing — entirely useless — will have nothing to do with 
them." 

" It 's our Russian indifference ! " exclaimed Vronsky, 
filling his goblet with ice-water from a carafe. " Not to 
feel the obligations which our privileges impose on us 
and so ignore them." 

" I don't know any one who is more strict in the ful- 
filment of his duties," said Dolly, irritated by Vronsky's 
superior tone. 

" I, on the contrary," continued Vronsky, evidently 
somewhat piqued by this conversation, — V I, on the con- 
trary, am very grateful, as you see, for the honor which 
has been done me, thanks to Nikola* Ivanovitch " — he 
referred to Sviazhsky — "in my appointment as honorary 
justice of the peace. I consider that for me the duty 
of going to the sessions of the court, of judging the 
affairs of a muzhik, are as important as anything that I 
could do. And I shall consider it an honor if you elect 
me a member of the town-council. 1 This is the only 
way that I can repay society for the privileges I enjoy 
as a landed proprietor. Unfortunately the influence 
which the large landed proprietors ought to wield is not 
fully appreciated." 

Vronsky's calm assurance that he was in the right 
seemed very strange to Darya Aleksandrovna. She 
knew that Levin, whose opinions were diametrically 
opposite, was equally firm on his side ; but she loved 
Levin, and so she was on his side. 

" So we can depend on you at the next election, can 
we ? " said Sviazhsky. " But we ought to leave earlier, 
so as to get there by the 8th. Will you do me the honor 
to go with me, count ? " 

" I pretty much agree with your beau frere" said 
Anna, "though for different reasons," she added, with 
a smile. " I am afraid that nowadays we are getting 

1 The Russian name for this official \sglasnui. 



166 ANNA KARENINA 

to have too many of these public duties, just as in old 
times there were so many chinovniks that there was a 
chinovnik for everything ; so now every one is becoming 
a public functionary. AlekseT has been here six months, 
and is already a member of five or six different public 
commissions — wardenship, 1 judge, town councilman, 
juryman^- 1 don't know what else. Du train que cela 
va all his time will be spent on it. And I am afraid if 
these things are - multiplied so, that it will be only a 
matter of form. You have ever so many offices, Nikolai 
Ivanuitch, have you not? at least twenty, haven't you?" 
she "asked, turning toward Sviazhsky. 

' Anna spoke jestingly, but in her tone there was a 
shade of irritation. Darya Aleksandrovna, who was 
watching Anna and Vronsky attentively, immediately 
noticed it. She saw also that the count's face assumed 
a resolute and obstinate expression, and that the Princess 
Varvara made haste to talk about some Petersburg ac- 
quaintances, so as to change the subject ; and, remember- 
ing what Vronsky had told her in the garden about his 
pleasure in activity, she felt certain that this conversa- 
tion about public activities had something to do with a 
secret quarrel between Vronsky and Anna. 

The dinner, the wines, the service, were luxurious, but 

. everything seemed to Darya Aleksandrovna formal and 

impersonal, like the state dinners and balls that she had 

seen, and on an ordinary day and in a small circle it 

made a disagreeable impression on her. 

After dinner they sat dd^n on the terrace. Then 
they began to play lawn-tennis. The players, dividing 
into two sides, took their places on the carefully rolled 
and smoothly shaven croquet-ground, on which the net 
was stretched between gilded posts. Darya Aleksan- 
drovna was invited to play, but it took a long time 
before she learned how, and r wheh she got an idea of 
the game she felt so tired that she went and sat down 
by the Princess Varvara and only watched the players. 
Her partner, Tushkievitch, also ceased playing, but the 
others .continued the game a long time. Sviazhsky and 

. m l Popechiielsivo. 



ANNA KARENINA 167 

Vronsky both played very well and earnestly. They 
followed the tennis-ball with quick eyes as it was sent 
from one side to the other, not wasting their energies, 
and not getting confused, skilfully running to meet it, 
waiting till it should bound, and with good aim and 
perfect accuracy catching it on the racket and sending 
it over the net. 

Veslovsky played worse than the others. He got too 
much excited, but nevertheless by his gayety he kept up 
the spirits of the other players. His jests and shouts 
never ceased. Like the other men, by the advice of the 
ladies he took off his coat and played, and his tall, 
well-shaped figure in his shirt-sleeves, and his ruddy, 
warm face, and his violent motions made a pleasant 
picture to remember. 

When Darya Aleksandrovna that night lay down in 
her bed, as soon as she closed her eyes she saw Vasenka 
Veslovsky dancing about on the croquet-ground. 

But while they were playing, Darya Aleksandrovna 
did not feel happy, She was displeased with the frivolity 
which Vasenka Veslovsky and Anna still kept up while 
they were playing; nor did such a childish game played 
by grown men and women by themselves, without chil- 
dren, seem natural or sensible. But lest she should de- 
stroy the pleasure of the others and so as to pass away 
the time, she rested a little while and then took part in 
another game and made believe that she was gay. All 
that day it seemed to her as if she were acting in a 
comedy with better actors than herself, and that her 
bad acting spoiled the whole piece. She had come 
intending to stay for two days if they urged her. But 
in the evening, during the game of tennis, she made up 
her mind to go home the next day. Those very same 
maternal cares which she had so hated as she thought 
them over during her journey, now, after two days' 
absence, presented themselves in another light and 
began to attract her. When, after tea and after a 
moonlight row in the boat, she went alone to her room, 
took off her gown, and began to put up her thin hair foi 
the night, she felt a great sense of relief. 



1 68 ANNA KARENINA 

It was even unpleasant to think that Anna would 
soon be in to see her. She would have preferred to be 
alone with her thoughts. 



CHAPTER XXIII 

Dolly was just feeling ready to go to bed when 
Anna came in, in her night costume. 

All that day Anna had more than once been on the 
point of speaking intimately, but each time, after saying 
a few words, she had put it off, saying, "By and by; 
when we are alone, we will talk. I must tell you 
everything." 

Now they were alone and Anna did not know what 
to talk about. She sat by the window looking at Dolly, 
and casting over in her mind that inexhaustible store of 
topics which she wished to talk about, and yet she 
could not find one to begin with. It seemed to her 
as if she had already told all that was in her heart to 
tell. 

"Well, what about Kitty?'* asked Anna, sighing 
deeply, and looking guiltily at Dolly. "Tell me the 
truth, Dolly; is she angry with me ?" 

" Angry ? No," answered Dolly, smiling. 

" Does n't she hate .... does n't she despise me ? " 

" Oh, no ; but you know this is one of the things 
people don't forgive." 

" Yes, yes," said Anna, turning away and looking out 
of the open window. " But I was not to blame ! And 
who is to blame ? and what is there blameworthy about 
it ? Could it have been otherwise ? Now tell me ? 
How do you think? Could you have helped being 
Stiva's wife ? " 

"Truly, I don't know ; but you must tell me .... " 

" Yes, ' yes ! But finish telling me about Kitty. Is 
she happy ? They say her husband is an excellent 
man." 

" That 's too little to say, that he 's excellent ; I don't 
know a better man." 



ANNA KARENINA 169 

" Oh, how glad I am ! I am very glad. ! Little to 
say, that he 's an excellent man/ " she. repeated. 

Dolly smiled. 

" But now tell me about yourself/' said Dolly. " I 
want a long talk with you. I have talked with...." 

She did not know what to call Vronsky — it was awk- 
ward to call him either count or Alekseif Kirillovitch. 

"With AlekseT," said Anna. "Yes; I know that 
you talked with him. But I wanted to ask you frankly 
what you think of me.... of my life." 

" How can I tell you at such short notice ? I don't 
know what to say." 

"No; you must tell me You see my life. But 

you must not forget that you see us in summer with 
people, and we are not alone ....but we came in the 
early spring, we lived entirely alone, and we shall live 
alone again. I ask for nothing better than living alone 
with him. But when I imagine that I may live alone 
without him, absolutely alone, and this would be .... I 
don't see why this may not be frequently repeated, that 
he may spend half of his time away from home," she 
said, and, getting up, she sat down close by Dolly. 
" Oh, of course," she said quickly, interrupting Dolly, 
who was about to speak, " of course, I cannot keep 
him by force.... I don't keep him. To-day there's a 
race ; his horses race ; he goes. I am very glad ! But 
you think of me; imagine my situation .... what is to be 
said about it?" She smiled. " But what did he talk 
with you about ? " 

" He spoke about a matter which I myself wanted to 
talk over with you ; and it is easy for me to be an advo- 
cate of it, — about this: whether it is not possible or 
essential to" — Darya Aleksandrovna hesitated — "to 
improve, make your position legal .... you know how I 
look at .... but anyhow, if possible, a marriage must take 
place." 

"You mean divorce?" said Anna. "Do you know, 
the only woman who came to see me in Petersburg was 
Betsy Tverskaya! Perhaps you know her. Au fond 
cest la femme la plus dipravfe qtd existe. She had a 



170 ANNA KARENINA 

liaison with this Tushkievitch, deceiving her husband 
in the most outrageous way,... but she told' me that she 
did not wish to know me, because my position was 
illegal! Don't think that I compare.... I know you. 
dear heart. 1 But I could not help remembering it. 
Well, what did he say to you ? V - 

" He said that he suffered both for you and for him- 
self ; maybe you will say that it is egoism, but what an 
honorable and noble egoism ! He wishes to make his 
daughter legitimate, and to be your husband and with a 
husband's rights." 

" What wife, what slave, could be more of. a slave 
than I, in my position? " she interrupted angrily. 

" The main reason that he wishes it is that you may 
not suffer." 

" This is impossible. Well ? " 

"Well, to make your children legitimate, to give them 
a name." 

"What children?" said Anna, not looking at Dolly, 
but half-closing her eyes. 

" Ani, and those that may come to you." 

"Oh, he can be easy; I shall not have any more.".... 

" How can you say that you won't have any more ? ".... 

" Because I will not have any more ; " and, in spite of 
her emotion/ Anna smiled at the nafve expression of 
astonishment, of curiosity, and horror depicted on Dolly's 
face. " After my illness the doctor told me.,.." 



" It is impossible," exclaimed Dolly, looking at Anna 
with wide-opened eyes, For her this was one of those 
discoveries, the consequences and deductions of which 
are so monstrous that at the first instant it touches only 
the feeling, that it is impossible to grasp it, but that it 
rouses momentous trains of thought. 

This discovery, which explained for her how hap- 
pened all these hitherto inexplicable families of one 
or at most two children, stirred up so many thoughts, 
considerations, and contradictory feelings that she could 

1 Dushenka moya. 



ANNA KARENINA »\ 

not* say a word, and only gazed with wide-open eye$ 
of amazement at Anna. It . was the,- very thing of 
which she had dreamed, but now that she knqw it 
was possible she was horror-struck. She felt that it 
was a quite too simple solution of a too complicated 
question. 

"N'est ce pas immoral t" she asked, after a mo- 
ment's silence. • r 

" Why ? Remember that I must choose between, two 
things : either being pregnant, that is to say, sick, or 
being the friend, the companion, of my husband ; for so I 
consider him, If that is a doubtful fact to you, it is not 
so to me," said Anna, in an intentionally superficial and 
frivolous tone. 

" Yes, yes, but...." exclaimed Darya ^Aleksand^pvna, 
hearing the very same arguments which she had brought 
up to herself, and no longer finding in them their former 
weight. 

" For you, for other women," proceeded Anna, appar r 
ently divining her thoughts, " there may be some cjoubt 

about this; but for me Just think! I am. not ,his 

wife ; he will love me just as long as he loves me; and 
how, by what means, am I to keep his Iov'q? ( It i$,by 
this." o 

And she put out her white arms in f rpnt of her beau- 
tiful body. , r 

With extraordinary rapidity, as always happens in 
moments of emotion, all sorts of thoughts and ideas went 
rushing through Darya Aleksandrovna's mind. 

" I have not tried," she reasoned, " to attract Stiva to 
myself ; he deserted me for some one else, and the first 
woman for whom he sacrificed me did not .retain him by 
being always pretty and gay. He threw her over arid 
took another. And will Anna be able to fascinate and 
retain Count Vronsky? If that is what attracts him, 
then he will be able to find women who dress even bet- 
ter and are more fascinating and merry-hearted. And 
however white, however beautiful, her bare f arms, how- 
ever beautiful her rounded form, and her animated face 
framed in her black hair, he will be able to] find still 



172 ANNA KARENINA 

better, more attractive women, just as my abominable, 
wretched, and beloved husband has done." 

Dolly made no reply, and "only sighed. Anna re- 
marked this sigh, which signified dissent, and she pro- 
ceeded. She had in reserve still more arguments, still 
stronger, and impossible to answer. 

" You say that this is immoral. But this requires to 
be reasoned put," she went on saying. " You forget my 
position. How can I desire children ? I don't say any- 
thing about the suffering, I am not afraid of that. But 
think what 'my children will be ! Unfortunate beings, 
who will- have to bear a name'which is not theirs, — by 
their very birth compelled to blush for their father and 
mother." 

" Well, this is the very reason why a divorce is neces- 
sary."' 

But Anna did not hear her. She wanted to produce 
the same arguments by which she had so many times 
persuaded herself. 

" Why was the gift of reason bestowed on me, if I 
cannot employ it in preventing the birth of more un- 
happy beings ? " 

She looked at Dolly, but without waiting for any an- 
swer she went on : — 

" I should always feel'my guilt toward these unhappy 
children. If they do not exist, they will not know mis- 
ery ; 7 but if they exist and suffer, then I am to blame." 

These were the same arguments as Darya Aleksan- 
drovna had used to herself, but now she listened and 
did not understand them. She said to herself: — 

"How can one be culpable with regard to non-ex- 
istent existences ? " And suddenly the thought came, 
" Could it have' been possibly any better if my darling 
Grisha had never existed ? " and it struck so unpleasantly, 
so "strangely, that she shook her head to chase away the 
cloud of maddening thoughts that came into her mind. 

" No, I do not know ; I believe it wrong," she said, 
with an expression of disgust. 

" But you must not forget that you and I .... and more- 
over," added Anna, notwithstanding the wealth of her 



ANNA KARENINA 173 

own arguments and the poverty of poor Dolly's, seem- 
ing somehow to recognize that this thing was immoral 
after all, — "you must not forget the main thing, that I 
am not now in the same position as you are. For you 
the question is, Do you wish to have more children ? but 
for me, Do I desire them ? This is the principal differ- 
ence. You must know that I cannot desire them in my 
position." ; 'i •- 

Darya Alfcksandrovna was silent. She suddenly be- 
came aware that such an abyss separated- her from Anna 
that between them certain questions existed on which 
they could never agree, and which had best hot be 
discussed. 

CHAPTER XXIV 

"That shows all the more necessity for legalizing 
your position, if possible." 

"Yes, if possible" answered Anna, in an entirely dif- 
ferent tone, c&lm and sweet. 

"Is a divorce entirely impossible? They tell me 
your husband has consented." 

" Dolly, I do not wish to talk about this." 

"Well, we will not," Darya r Aleksandrovna hastened 
to say, noticing the expression of suffering on Anna's 
face. " Only it seems to me that you look too much on 
the dark 'side."' 

"I? Not at all ; I am very happy and contented. 
You s&WyJefais des passions with Veslovsky .... M 

"Yes! To tell the truth, Veslovsky's manner dis- 
pleases me very much," said Darya Aleksandrovna, will- 
ing enough to change the conversation. 

" Oh ! there 's nothing ! It tickles Alekser, and that 's 
all there is of it. But he is a mere boy and entirely in 
my hands! You understand, I do as I please with him ; 
just as you do -with your Grisha Dolly! " — : she sud- 
denly' changed* the subject — "you say that I look on 
the dark side! You can't understand. . This is too terri- 
ble ; I try not to look at all ! " 

" You are wrong ; you ought to do what is necessary.' 



174 ANNA KARENINA 

"But. what is necessary? Ypu say I. must tn^rry, 
Alekse'f, and that I dqn't-think about that. / nqt, think 
about tjiat! " she exclaimed, and the color flew oyer her 
face. She. got up, straightened herself, and began wajkr 
ing up and down the rQQrri with her graceful gait, stop-- 
ping, nqw and then.: ■-." Not think about that ! There is 
not a day pr, an hour when I dp. not j think, of it, and 
blame myself for thinking of it ; — because the thought 
of it wihVmake mq mad -^ will make nusfjina4ni.i"ahe 
repeated. "When I think of it, I, cannot go to sleep 
without morphine. But very good ! let us speak calmly. 
You talk about divorce,, butj in the first place he would not 
consent ; he is now under the Countess Lidya's influence. 7 

Darya Aleksandrovna, reclining in her easy-chair with 
a sympathetic and sorrowf \xl f acp, watched Anna as she 
walked up and down. She shook her head. 

"We must /try,", said she. , 

"Suppose I should try. What does,it„mean ?" she, 
asked; evidently expressing a . thought which she had 
gone over in her own mind a thousand times and. h a d 
learned, by heart. .Jl It means that. I, who hate him, i and 
who have nevertheless confessed my guilt tp him — r\ 
believe in his magnanimity — that I humiliate myself to 
write; him, ..., Well ! -suppose I make the effort ; sup- 
pose I do.it v . I shall receive* either an insulting answer 
or his, consent. Good, I get his consent.... " Anna at 
this time was in the farthest end of the room and stopped 
there to arrange a window-curtain. " I get his con- 
sent .... but my s^son ? You -see he will not give him 
to me I * No, he will grow up despising me, living with 
his father, w.hom J'have left. Just think, I love these 
two almost equally, both more than myself ; these twp,- 
Serozha an$ AlekfeeiV 

She advanced to the middle of the room and stppd in 
front of Dolly, pressing her hands to her breast. In her 
white peignoir she seemed wonderfully tall and large; 
She. bent her head, and, looking out of her moist, shining 
eyes on -the little, .homely; lean Polly, sitting there in 
her darned nightgown and nightcap, all a-tremble with 
emotion, went o.n ;,t- 



ANNA KARENINA 



l 7S 



"These two only I love, and the one excludes the 
other. I cannot bring them together, and yet this is 
the one thing I want. If this were not so, it would be all 
the same, — all, all the same. It will end in some way ; 
but I cannot, I will not, talk about this. So do not 
despise me, do not judge me. You in your purity 
could never imagine what I suffer ! " 

She sat down beside Dolly and, with a guilty expres- 
sion in her eyes, took her hand. 

" What do you think ? What do you think of me ? 
Do not despise me ! I do- not deserve that ; I am mis- 
erably unhappy. If there is any one unhappy, it is I .... " 
said she, and, turning away, she began to weep. 

After Anna left her, Dolly said her prayers and went 
to bed. She pitied Anna with all her soul while she 
was talking with her ; but now she could not bring her- 
self to think of her. Memories of home and her children 
arose in her imagination with new and wonderful joy. 
So dear and precious seemed this little world to her that 
she decided that nothing would tempt her to stay longer 
away from them, and that she would leave the next day. 

Anna, meantime, returning to her dressing-room, took 
a glass, and poured into it several drops of a mixture 
containing chiefly morphine, and, having swallowed it, 
she sat a little while motionless, then went with a calm 
and joyous heart to her bedroom. 

When she went into her sleeping-room, Vronsky 
looked scrutinizingly into her face. He was trying to 
discover some trace of the talk which he knew by the 
length of her stay in Dolly's room she must have had 
with her. But in her expression, which betrayed a cer- 
tain repressed excitement, as if she were trying to con- 
ceal something, he found nothing except the beauty to 
which he was so accustomed, and which always intoxi- 
cated him, and the consciousness of it and the desire 
that it might still have its usual effect on him. 

He did not like to ask her what they had been talk- 
ing about, but hoped that she herself would tell him. 
But she only said : — 

" I am glad you like Dolly ; you do, don't you ? " 



176 ANNA KARENINA 

" Yes ! I Ve known her for a, long time. She 's a 
very good woman, metis excessivemehi terre a terre. . But 
still I am well pleased at her visit." . 

'He gave Anna another, questioning look, and took 
her hand ; but she understood his look in another way, 
and' smiled. . *i 

The next morning, in spites of. repeated urging from 
her hosts, Darya Aleksandrovna prepared to go away. 
Levin's coachman, in his old kaftan and a sort of postil- 
ion's cap, put the unmatched horses into the old car; 
riage with its shabby harness, and, looking stern and 
resolute, drove up the sanded driveway to the r covered 
portico. I ? 

Darya Aleksandrovna took a cold farewell of the 
Princess Varvara and the gentlemen. The .day that 
they had passed together made them all see clearly that 
they had no interests in common, and that they were 
better apart. Anna only was sad. She knew that no 
one would waken again in her the feelings' which Dolly 
had aroused in; her soul. To. have these feelings 
aroused was painful to her, but still she" knew that they 
represented all the better side of her nature, and that 
soon all vestige of such feelings would be stifled by the 
life that she was leading. 

As soon as she got fairly away from the house, Darya 
Aleksandrovna experienced a pleasant feeling of relief, 
and she -was about to ask. her men how they liked the 
Vronskys, when suddenly the coachman, Filipp himself, 
spoke out: — * f 

"They're rich, "rich enough, but they give only three 
measures of oats. The horses cleaned it all up before 
cockcrow. What are ' three measures ? Only a bite. 
Nowadays oats /cost only/forty-five kopeks. With us, 
we give our>visitors' horses as much as they will eat." > 

" A stingy barin," said the bookkeeper.. 

" Well, but you liked their horses, did n't you? " asked 
Dolly. , . . . 

" The horses, yes, they were all right. And the food 
was good. But still somehow T felt kind* of homesick, 



ANNA KARENINA 177 

Darya Aleksandrovna ; I don't know how it was with 
you," said he, turning to her his good, handsome face. 

"Yes, and so did I. But do you think we shall get 
home this evening ? " 

"We must get home." 

On reaching home and finding every one perfectly 
happy and glad to see her, Darya Aleksandrovna, with 
great liveliness, told the story of her trip and how warmly 
she had been received, about the luxury and good taste 
of the Vronskys' establishment and about their amuse- 
ments ; and she would not allow any one to say a word 
against them. 

"You must know Anna and Vronsky, — and I know 
him better than I did, — to appreciate how kind and 
affectionate they are/' said she, with perfect sincerity, 
forgetting the vague feeling of discomfort that she had 
felt when she was there. 



CHAPTER XXV 

Vronsky and Anna passed the rest of the summer 
and part of the autumn in the country under the same 
conditions, and took no steps toward getting a divorce. 
It was agreed between them that they should not make 
any visits ; but they both felt that the longer they lived 
alone, particularly in the autumn, and without guests, 
the more unendurable became their life, and that they 
must have some change. 

Nothing which constitutes happiness was apparently 
wanting to them. They were rich, young, well ; they 
had one child, and they had pleasant occupations. 
Though they had no guests, Anna continued to take 
the greatest care of her person and her dress. She 
read much, both in the way of novels and of serious 
literature, and sent abroad for valuable books which 
she saw praised in the foreign magazines and journals. 
And she read carefully, as one can do only when in the 
solitude of the country. Moreover, all subjects which 
interested Vronsky, she studied up in books and scien- 
vol. in. — 12 



V}9 ANNA KARENINA 

rific journals, 60 that often he went directly to her with 
questions relating to agronomics, and to architecture, 
even with those on the breeding of horses, and the best 
methods of hunting. He was amazed at her knowledge 
and her memory ; and when he felt any doubt about the 
beginning of in enterprise and wanted moral support, 
he would consult her, and she would find in books what- 
ever he asked about and then show it to him. 

The arrangement of the hospital also occupied her. 
She not only assisted in it, but, moreover, invented 
many original ideas and carried them out. But, after 
all, her chief preoccupation was herself .... herself and 
how she" might retain Vronsky 's affections, how she 
might supply for him all that he needed. 

Vronsky appreciated this, and saw that the only aim 
df hei 4 life -was to please him and to obey his wishes in 
every particular; but at the same time he was op- 
pressed by the chains of -tenderness which she tried 
to forge around him. As time went on, he found 
himself more and niore . embarrassed by these chains, 
and more desirous of, if not exactly escaping from them, 
at least of keeping them from interfering with his* inde- 
pendence. If it had not been for his ever increasing 
desire for freedom, if it had not been for the fact that 
every time he had to go to the city, to the races, there 
was a scene with Anna, Vronsky would have been 
perfectly contented with his existence. 

The role of r rich landed proprietor,' which he had 
chosen for himself as constituting the true work of the 
Russian aristocracy, and- which he had been engaged 
in now for half a year, gave him ever increasing pleasure. 
His work, which absorbed him more and more, was 
prospering admirably. Notwithstanding his enormous 
expenses for the building of the hospital, for machinery, 
and cattle imported from Switzerland, and many other 
things, he felt sure that hfc was not wasting, but increas- 
ing, his property.'' As far as it concerned the matter of 
income, the sale of wood, of wheat, of wool, the leasing 
of land, Vronsky was as firm as a rock, and succeeded 
in holding to his price. In matters concerning his whole 



ANNA KARENINA 179 

management, both on this 'and on his other estates, he 
kept to the simplest and least risky processes, and was 
to the highest degree economical and prudent in all 
details. Notwithstanding all the cleverness and shrewd- 
ness of his German superintendent, who tried to involve 
him in purchases and who so managed every calculation 
that a large outlay was needed at first, but where, by 
waiting a little, the same' thing could be done much 
cheaper and with greater profit, Vronsky used his own 
judgment* He would listen to his superintendent, would 
ask him all sorts of questions, and consent to his pro- 
posed plans only when the thing to be imported or con- 
structed was something perfectly new, unheard of as 
yet in Russia, and calculated to cause surprise. More- 
over, he would decide to embark in large enterprises 
only when he had plenty of money on hand, and in 
entering on any such outlay he attended to all the details, 
and insisted that he should have the very best results. 
Thus it was evident that in carrying out his undertakings 
he was not dissipating, but was increasing, his estate. 

In the month of October the government of Kashin, 
in which were situated the estates of Vronsky, Sviazhsky, 
Koznuishef , and a part of Levin's, was to hold its nobiliary 
elections. 1 These elections, fotmany reasons, and because 
of the persons who took part in them, attracted general 
attention. Much was said about them and great prepa- 
rations were made for them. People from Moscow, 
Petersburg, and even 'from abroad, who had never wit- 
nessed an election, came to look onl 

Vronsky had some time before promised Sviazhsky to 
go with him. 

Just before the elections, Sviazhsky, who had often 
visited Vozdvizhenskoye, came after Vronsky. On 
the evening before this event Vronsky and Anna almost 
had a quarrel about his proposed trip. It was getting 
autumnal in the country, a melancholy, gloomy time, 
and therefore Vronsky, already ready for a contest, 
announced with a cold, stern expression, such as he rarely 
allowed himself toward Anna, that he was going away on 
1 Dvorianskiye vuiboruu 



180 ANNA KARENINA 

this expedition. But to his surprise Anna received the 
news with entire calmness, and only asked him when he 
should be back. He looked at her scrutinizingly, not 
understanding her calmness. She smiled as he looked 
at her. He knew her power of retiring into herself, and 
he knew that it was manifested only when she was plan- 
ning something about herself and did not wish him to 
know her plans. He was afraid of this now, but he was 
so desirous of avoiding a scene that he almost forced 
himself into believing that her manner was sincere. 

" I hope you will not be lonely." 

"I hope so too," said Anna. " I received a box of 
books from Gautier yesterday ; no, I shall not be lonely." 

" She is adopting a new tone, and so much the better," 
thought he ; " but it is all the same thing." 

And so, without entering into any frank explana- 
tion with her, he started off for the elections. This was 
the first time since the beginning of their liaison that he 
had left her without full and complete explanation. In 
one way this disquieted him ; in another, he felt that it 
was better so. 

" At first there will be something as there is now, not 
altogether clear and above board, but after a while she 
will get used to it. At all events," he thought, V I can 
give up to her everything except my independence as a 
man." 



CHAPTER XXVI 

In September Levin returned to Moscow for Kitty's 
confinement. 

He had already been there a whole month without 
anything to do, when Sergyef Ivanovitch, who had an 
estate in the government of Kashin, and who took a 
great interest in the approaching elections,. was getting 
ready to make the journey. He took with him his 
brother, who had a r parcel of land in the Seleznevsky 
district, and who, moreover, had some very important 
business to transact t in regard to a trusteeship and the 



ANNA KARENINA 181 

receipt of certain money in Kashin in behalf of his sister, 
who lived abroad. 

Levin was even at the last moment in a state of un- 
certainty, but Kitty, seeing that he was bored in Moscow, 
not only urged him to go, but without his knowledge 
bought him a noble's uniform at an expense of eighty 
rubles. And these eighty rubles paid out for the uni- 
form constituted the chief reason which induced Levin 
to go. He therefore went to Kashin. . 

He had been at Kashin six days, present at every 
session of the electors, and employing himself in his" sis- 
ter's affairs, which did not progress at all satisfactorily. 
All the marshals of nobility were absorbed in the elec- 
tions, and it was impossible to accomplish the very simple 
business which depended on his guardianship. The 
other matter — the receipt of some money-— in the 
same way caused him great delay. After long parley- 
ings concerning the removal of an interdict, the money 
was ready to be paid over ; but the notary, a most 
obliging man, could not deliver the paper, because the 
signature of the president was necessary, and the presi- 
dent, neglecting his duties, was at the sessions of the 
nobles. All these annoyances, this wandering from 
place to place, these talks with very pleasant good men, 
who thoroughly appreciated the disagreeable position of 
the petitioner but could not help him, all this endeavor 
which brought no result, produced on Levin's mind a 
most painful impression, analogous to that tormenting 
impotence which one sometimes experiences in a night- 
mare when one wants to employ physical force and is 
unable to do so. He frequently experienced this when 
talking with that most obliging of men, the solicitor. 
This solicitor, it seemed, was doing everything in his 
power and was exerting all his mental energies to get 
Levin out of his difficulties. 

"Try this way or that way," he would say, " or go to 
this place or to that place ; " and the solicitor would lay 
out a whole plan for avoiding the fatal obstacle that 
stood in the way. But immediately he would add, 
" Still there 's a delay; however, try it" , And Levin 



1 8a ANNA KARENINA 

would go flying off in this direction or that, and doing 
whatever he was told to do. All were good and kind, 
but it seemed as if the obstacles, even after he had 
passed them, kept growing up again and cutting off his 
path. 

Especially annoying was it to him that he could 
never know with whom he was. really contending, for 
whose profit it was that he could never bring his busi- 
ness to a conclusion. And no one seemed to know this 
either. Not even the solicitor knew this. If Levin 
could have understood, as he understood why it was im- 
possible to get at the office of a railway otherwise than 
by standing in line, it would not have been humiliating 
and vexatious, but, as regarded the obstacles that stood 
in his way, not one could tell him why they existed. .... 

But Levin had greatly changed since his marriage. 
He had learned patience, and-if he could not compre- 
hend why all this was arranged as it was, then he told him- 
self, since he did not know all about it, he Was not in a 
position to judge, that apparently it was unavoidable; 
and he strove not to lose his temper. 

Now that he was present at the elections, he endeav- 
ored not to be severe in his criticisms, nor to enter into 
controversies, but as far as he could to understand the 
matters which excellent and honorable men whom he 
thoroughly respected found So serious and so absorbing. 
Sincfc his marriage Levin had opened his eyes to so 
many new and serious sides of life which had hitherto 
seenied to him, in his superficial view of them, of no 
great importance, that now in the mktter of the elections 
he looked for a serious significance and found one. 

Sergye'f Ivanovitch explained to him the idea and sig- 
nificance bf the change which was proposed to the elec- 
tors. The governmental predvodityel> or marshal of 
nobility, had charge of very many matters "of public imi 
portance, — as, for example, guardianships, siifch a^ the 
one which Levin himself was now trying t6 bring into k 
satisfactory shape, — and large sums of money and the 
direction of the gymnasia^ or schools for women, and for 
the peasantry arid "the military and the training of the 



ANNA KARENINA 183 

people for their new duties, and finally of the zemsfvo, or 
popular assembly. Now the present marshal, Snetkof, 
was a man of the old aristocratic stamp, who had squan. 
dercd an enormous property, was a very worthy and 
honorable man in his way, but wholly incapable of com- 
prehending the new needs of the present time. He 
always on every occasion took the side of the nobles; 
he always cast the whole weight of his influence against 
the extension of popular education and he gave the 
zemstvo, which was coming to have such an enormous 
significance, a partisan character. 

It was considered necessary to put in his place a new 
and active man, imbued with the most enlightened 
modern ideas, and to manage the business so as to ex- 
tract from all the rights given to the noblesse, 1 not as th$, 
noblesse, but simply as a constituent part of the, zemstvo, 
such advantages of self-government as were possible. 

In the rich government of Kashin, which always took 
the lead in every advance, such forces were now con- 
centrated that the business now before the assembled 
nobles would be likely to set an example fqr all the 
other departments, indeed for all Russia, And there-* 
fore the business had a great importance. 

It was proposed to elect as marshal instead of Snet« 
kof, either Sviazhsky, or, still better, Nevyedovsky, a 
man of eminent understanding, formerly a professor, 
who was an intimate friend of Sergye? Ivanovitch's. 

The sobranie, or provincial assembly, was opened by a 
speech from the governor, who urged the nobility to elect 
the necessary functionaries, not from partisan reasons, but 
for merit and for the public weal ; and he hoped that 
the nobility of the department of Kashin would do their 
duty, as they had always done, and thus deserve their 
monarch's confidence. 

Having finished his speech, the governor left the hall, 
and the noblemen, tumultously and eagerly, and some; 
of them even enthusiastically, followed him, and sur- 
rounded him while he was putting on his shuba, and talk- 
ing in a friendly way with the government marshal 

1 Dvorianstvo, ,. f 



1 84 ANNA KARENINA 

Levin, anxious to see everybody and miss nothing, 
was in the midst of the throng, and he heard the gov- 
ernor say, " Please tell Marya Ivanovna that my wife is 
very sorry, but she had to go to the asylum." 

Then all the nobles gayly took their shubas, and went 
in 'a body to the cathedral. 

In the cathedral Levin, together with the rest, raised 
his hand and repeated, after the protopope, the solemn 
oaths by which they swore to fulfil their duties. The 
church service always impressed Levin, and when he 
joined with this throng of men, old and young, in re- 
peating the words, " I kiss the cross," he felt stirred. 

On the second and third day the assembly was occu- 
pied with the moneys meant for the educational estab- 
lishments for the nobility and for women, which Sergye'f 
Ivanovitch declared had no especial importance, and 
Levin, who had his own business to attend to, was not 
present. ' 

On the fourth day the verifying of the government 
accounts came up, and here, for the first time, the new 
party came into direct collision with the old. The com- 
mission, whose duty it was to verify' these accounts, 
announced to the assembly that the money was all 
accounted for. The government marshal arose, and 
with tears in his eyes thanked the nobility for their con- 
fidence in him. The nobles loudly congratulated him, 
and shook hands with him. 

But at this time one noble' belonging to Sergye'f 
Ivanovitch's party declared that he had heard that the 
commission, ft>r fear of affronting the government mar- 
shal, had not properly performed the verification of the 
accounts. One of the members of the commission un- 
guardedly admitted this.' Then a very small and very 
young-looking, but very sarcastic, gentleman began to 
say that it would probably be agreeable for the govern- 
ment marshal to give an account of his expenditures, 
and that the excessive delicacy of the members of the 
commission had deprived him of that moral satisfaction. 
Thereupon the members of the commission withdrew 
their report, and Sergyef Ivanovitch began logically to 



ANNA KARENINA 185 

prove that it was necessary to acknowledge that the 
expenditures had been verified or that they had not been 
verified, and he went into a long exposition of the 
dilemma. 

A chatterer from the opposite party replied to 
Sergyei' Ivanovitch. Then Sviazhsky spoke, and was 
followed by the sarcastic gentleman. The proceedings 
were tedious, and no end was reached. Levin was sur- 
prised that they discussed this so long, and all the more 
because, when he asked Sergyei Ivanovitch whether 
Snetkof were suspected of peculation, he replied : — 

"Oh, he's an honest man. But we must shake this 
old-fashioned patriarchal way of managing business." 

On the fifth day occurred the election of the district 
marshals. The session was a stormy one for many of 
the districts. In the uyezd or district of Seleznevskoye, 
Sviazhsky was unanimously elected by acclamation, and 
he gave a grand dinner the same evening. 



CHAPTER XXVII 

The principal election, that of marshal of the govern- 
ment, did not take place until the sixth day. 

The great halls and the little halls were crowded with 
nobles in their various uniforms. Many came for this 
day only. Acquaintances who had not met for years 
were there, some from the Krimea, some from Peters- 
burg, some from abroad. The debates were carried on 
at the governor's table, under the emperor's portrait. 

The nobles both in the larger and in the smaller hall 
were grouped in opposing camps, and, judging by the 
hostile and mistrustful looks exchanged, by the conversa- 
tions which ceased at the approach of strangers, by the 
fact that some walked up and down the distant corridor 
whispering together, it was evident that each side had 
secrets from the other. Even by a superficial glance it 
could be seen that the nobles were divided into two 
sharply contrasting types : the old and the new. The 
old school wore for the most part either old court uni- 



186 ANNA KARENINA 

forms, tightly buttoned up, with swords, and ancient 
hats, or else their ordinary marine, cavalry, or infantry 
uniforms . of very ancient date. The uniforms of the 
old nobles were made in the ancient style, with, epau- 
lets on the shoulders, and- with short waists and. tight 
armholes, as if their possessors had grown out of r them; 
but the younger men, wore court uniforms with broad' 
shoulders, long waists, and white waistcoats unbuttoned, 
or else .uniforms with black collars and embroidered 
laurel leaves — the distinguishing badge of the ministry 
of justice. Court uniforms were to be seen ,here an$ 
there, also among the young men, adding to the brilliancy 
of the throng. , A 

But the division into,/' old " and " young " did not 
coincide with - the party lines, Some of the younger 
men, to Levin's surprise, belonged to tfye old party, and, 
on the contrary, some of the very oldest nobles were on 
confidential terms; with Sviazhsky and were evidently 
warm partizans of the new school. 

In the smaller hall, where men were smoking and 
lunching, Levin wf§ standing near ^ group of his friends 
and listening to what was said, and "vainly exerting all 
his intellectual powers to cprriprehend what was said. 
Sergye'f Ivanovitch was the. center around whorq rrjany 
men had gathered. He was now listening to Sviaihsky 
and Khliustof, the marshal of. another district, who ber 
longed to their party. Khliustof- would not agree to gq 
with his district and beg Snetkpf to. stand as candidate; 
but Sviazhsky advised him to do this, and SergyeT Ivano- 
vitch approved of this plan. Levin, could npt under- 
stand why a party opposed to this marshal and wanting to 
defeat him should nevertheless put him up as a candidate. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch, who had just been lunching 
and drinking, joined them in his chamberlain's unifqrm, 
wiping his mouth with a perfumed and embroidered 
cambric, handkerchief. ^ , 

"We hold the situation," said he, arranging both his 
side- whiskers, * f ,Sergye'i Ivanovitch;" and after he heard 
Sviazhsky's plan he agreed with him. 

f One districts enpuglvbut let Sviazhsky pretend to 



ANNA KARENINA 187 

be in opposition ; " and all except Levin understood the 
meaning of his words. 

"Well, how is Kostia?" he said, turning to Levin and 
taking him by the arm. " So you came, it seems, in style." 

Levin would not have been sorry to be in style, but 
he could not comprehend what was taking place, and, 
going a few steps from the rest, he expressed to him his 
astonishment at seeing the hostile districts asking the old 
marshal to stand as candidate. 

" O sancta simplicitas ! " replied Oblonsky ; and in a 
few clear words he explained to Levin what the state of 
the case was. 

" If, as at the last elections, all the districts should 
unite on the government marshal, he w T ould be elected. 
This is not what is wanted. Now eight of the districts 
have agreed to ask him to stand. But if two should 
refuse to accept him for their candidate, then Snetkof 
might decline to stand. And then the old party might 
take for their candidate some one else in their party, so 
that the whole scheme would be defeated. But if Sviazh- 
sky's district is the only one refusing to adopt him as 
their candidate, Snetkof will accept the nomination. So 
he is selected and proposed as a candidate so as to 
throw dust in the eyes of the opposite party, and when 
we set up our candidate they will go over to him." 

Levin began to get some idea of the plan, but it was 
not entirely clear to him, and he was about to ask a few 
more questions, when suddenly there was heard in the 
next room a great shouting and uproar and confusion : — 

" What is it ? What ? Who ? .... Confidence in whom ? 

What ? .... It is disproved Lack of confidence They 

won't admit Flerof .... prosecution They refuse to ad- 
mit a man ? Shame ! .... The law." Such were the words 
that Levin heard shouted from all sides, and he, together 
with all the rest, hurrying from all directions and shout- 
ing at the tops of their voices, rushed into the great 
hall, and, pressing along with all the nobles, he made 
his way up to the governor's table, about which the 
government marshal, Sviazhsky, and other leaders were 
hotly discussing. 



1 88 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER XXVIII 



Levin stood at quite a distance. A noble breathing 
stertorously near him and another with thick squeaking 
soles prevented him from hearing distinctly. All he 
could distinguish was the marshal's gentle voice, then 
the sharp voice of the sarcastic gentleman, and then the 
voice of Sviazhsky. He could only distinguish that they 
were disputing about the meaning of a clause of the law, 
and the meaning of the words, " nakhodivshayosa pod 
slyedstviem" 

The crowd parted to let Sergye'f Ivanovitch get to the 
table. Sergye'f Ivanovitch, after waiting till the sar- 
castic gentleman was done speaking, said that it seemed 
to him it would be a better way to consult the law 
itself, and he asked the secretary to find for him the 
text of the law. The law said that in case of divergence 
of opinion a vote must be taken. 

Sergyef Ivanovitch read the clause, and was just 
beginning to explain its meaning when he was inter- 
rupted by a tall, stout, round-shouldered proprietor, with 
dyed whiskers, and wearing a tight uniform with a high 
collar which seemed to prop up the back of his head. 
This man came up to the table, and, striking it with his 
fist,, shouted at the top of his voice : — 

"Put it to the ballot. Vote on it! No discussing! 
The ballot ! " 

Then suddenly a number of voices broke out at once, 
and the tall noble, still pounding with his fist, grew 
angrier and angrier, and shouted louder and louder. 
But it was impossible to make out what he was talking 
about. 

He said the same thing as Sergyet Ivanovitch had 
proposed; but evidently he hated Koznuishef and his 
whole party, and this feeling of hatred communicated 
itself to the whole party, and called forth the opposition 
of similar, though more decorous, hatred from the other 
side. 

Voices were raised and for a moment everything was 



ANNA KARENINA 189 

in confusion, so that the government marshal was obliged 
to call for order : — 

" Put it to vote, put it to vote. That man knows 

what he is talking about ! There '11 be bloodshed 

The emperor's confidence Don't count the marshal, 

he's not our prikashchik That's not the point!.... 

Please, put it to vote It 's odious ! " were the ex- 
clamations heard on every side in angry, violent tones. 
Eyes and faces became still angrier and more violent, 
with words of irreconcilable hatred. Levin did not 
understand at all what the trouble was, and was amazed 
at the passion with which they discussed the question 
whether they should vote or not vote on the opinion 
concerning Flerof. He forgot, as Sergyei Ivanovitch 
afterward explained to him, the syllogism that for the 
common weal it was necessary to elect .a new govern- 
ment marshal ; to defeat the present marshal a majority 
of the votes was needed ; to get a majority of the votes 
it was necessary to give Flerof the right of voting ; to 
pronounce Flerof qualified it was necessary to have it 
decided how the clause of the law was to be understood. 

" One voice may decide the whole matter, and we 
must be serious and logical if we wish to act for the 
public good," said Sergyei' Ivanovitch, in conclusion. 

But Levin forgot this, and it was trying for him to 
see these excellent men, for whom he had such respect, in 
such a disagreeable and angry frame of mind. In order 
to avoid this feeling he, without waiting for the end of 
the election, went into the smaller hall, where there was 
no one except the servants connected with the buffet. 

Seeing the servants busily engaged in polishing the 
service and putting away the plates and glasses, seeing 
their contented lively faces, Levin felt an unexpected 
feeling of relief, just as if he had come out from an ill- 
smelling room into pure air. He began to walk back 
and forth, watching the servants. It pleased him greatly 
to watch one of the servants, an old man with gray side- 
whiskers, expressing his scorn for the younger ones, who 
stood in awe of him, teaching them the best way of folding 
napkins. Levin was just about to engage the old ser- 



i 9 o ANNA KARENINA 

vant in conversation, when the Secretary of the Assembly, 
a little old man, who made a specialty of knowing all the 
nobles of the province by their full names, came to call 
him. , 

" Excuse me, Konstantin Dmitritch," said he ; " your 
brother is asking for .you. The opinion is to be voted on." 

Levin went into the hall, took a little white ball, and, 
following close behind Sergyei Ivanovitch, he went to 
the table where Sviazhsky was standing with an impor- 
tant and ironical air, running his beard through his hand 
and occasionally putting it to his nose. Sergyei Ivano- 
vitch put his ball into the ballot-box, and made room for 
Levin ; but Levin, having entirely forgotten what the vot- 
ing was for, was disconcerted, and asked his brother : — 

" Where shall I put it?" 

He spoke in a low tone, and as there was talking near 
him, he hoped that his question would not be overheard ; 
but the speakers stopped, and his unfortunate question 
was heard. SergyeT Ivanovitch frowned, and replied 
sternly ; — 

"This is a matter entirely of conviction." 

A number of the bystanders smiled. Much embar- 
rassed, Levin quickly cast his vote, and as he happened 
to hold it in his right hand, he threw it into the right- 
hand receptacle. Only after he had deposited it did he 
remember that he ought to have put it in his left hand, 
and he did so, but it was already too late ; and growing 
still more confused, he hastily made his way to the very 
rear rank. < : 

" One hundred and twenty-six in the affirmative ; ninety- 
eight in the negative," announced -the secretary, who 
could not pronounce the letter r. Then a laugh went 
round ; a button and two nuts were found in the ballot- 
box. The questionable noble was admitted and the new 
party was victorious. 

But the old party did not even yet acknowledge itself 
defeated. Levin heard them request Snetkof to stand 
as their candidate, and he saw a throng of nobles sur- 
rounding the government marshal, who was making an 
address. Levin went nearer. In reply to the nobles, 



ANNA KARENINA 191 

Snetkof was speaking of the confidence which the 
nobility had reposed in him, of their love for him which 
he did not deserve, because all his service had consisted 
in his devotion to the nobility, whom he had served for 
twenty years. Several times he repeated the words, " I 
have served to the best of my ability, I appreciate your 
confidence and thank you for it," and then, suddenly 
pausing because of the tears which choked him, he 
hurried from the room. His tears arose either from 
the injustice that had been done him, or from his love 
for the nobles, or possibly from the unpleasant position 
in which he was placed, finding himself surrounded by 
enemies; but his grief was contagious; the majority of 
the nobles were touched, and Levin felt sorry for him. 

At the door the government marshal stumbled against 
Levin. 

"Excuse me, — I beg your pardon," he said, as to a 
stranger ; then, recognizing him, he smiled a melancholy 
smile. It seemed to Levin that he wanted to say some- 
thing but was prevented by his emotion. The expression 
of his face and his whole figure in his uniform, with his 
crosses, and white pantaloons ornamented with galloon, 
as he hastened out, reminded Levin of some hunted ani- 
mal which sees that it has little chance to escape. This 
expression in the government marshal's face went to 
Levin's heart, for only the day before he had been to see 
him about the guardianship affair, and had seen in the 
whole' establishment the dignity of a good-hearted domes- 
tic gentleman : the house large, with ancestral furniture ; 
unstylish, dirty, but dignified, old servants who had evi- 
dently been former serfs and had not changed their mas- 
ter ; the wife, a tall, benevolent lady in her lace cap and 
Turkish shawl, caressing her lovely granddaughter ; the 
youngest son, a boy in the sixth class of the gymnasium, 
who had come in to wish his father good morning and 
to kiss his big hand ; the imposing but affectionate greet- 
ings and gestures of the master of the house : all this 
had awakened in Levin involuntary respect and sympa- 
thy even then, and now he felt touched and sorry for the 
old man, and wanted to say something pleasant to him. 



192 ANNA KARENINA 

"Perhaps you will be our marshal again." 

" I doubt it," said Snetkof, with his scared look. " 1 
am tired, getting old. There are younger and better 
men than I. Must let them take my place." And he 
disappeared by a side door. 

Now the most solemn moment had arrived. It was 
necessary to proceed immediately to the election itself. 
The leaders of both parties were counting on their fin- 
gers the white and black balls. The controversy re- 
garding Flerof gave the new party not only one more 
vote, but also gained time, so that they could send for 
three nobles, whom the trickery of the old party was 
going to deprive of the possibility of taking part in the 
election. Two nobles who had a weakness for wine had 
been made drunk by Snetkof's henchmen, and a third 
had been seduced by the promise of a uniform. 

Having learned about this, the new party had made 
haste during the contest concerning Flerof to send an 
izvoshchik for the noble and to provide him with a uni- 
form, and to bring one of the two drunken nobles to the 
hall. 

" I brought one of them, I had to douse him with 
water," said the proprietor who had gone in search of 
him', addressing Sviazhsky. " He '11 do." 

" He 's not very drunk, is he; can't he stand ? " asked 
Sviazhsky, shaking his head. " Yes, he 's a young man. 

•Only don't let them get him to drinking here I told 

the caterer not to give him any wine under any consid- 
eration." 

CHAPTER XXIX 

The narrow hall where men smoked and had lun- 
cheon was crowded with nobles. The excitement kept 
increasing, and all faces showed signs of anxiety. Es- 
pecially agitated were the leaders, who knew all the 
details and had followed the voting very closely. These 
men had charge of the approaching engagement. The 
others, like the soldiers in the. ranks before the battle, 
although ready for the conflict, in the meantime sought 



ANNA KARENINA 193 

diversion. Some ate luncheon, standing or sitting at 
the buffet ; others walked up and down the long room 
smoking cigarettes, and talked with friends whom they 
had not seen for long. 

Levin did not feel hungry, he did not smoke, and he 
did not care to join his friends, that is, SergyeT Ivano- 
vitch, Stepan Arkadyevitch, Sviazhsky, and the others, 
for the reason that Vronsky in his equerry's uniform 
stood in lively conversation with them. The evening 
before he had seen Vronsky at the election, and had 
carefully avoided him, not wishing to come into contact 
with him. He went to a window and sat down, watch- 
ing the groups and listening to what was said around 
him. He felt depressed, especially because all the others, 
as he could see, were animated, active, and occupied, and 
he alone was inert and indifferent ; the only other excep- 
tion was an old man in a naval uniform, who had no teeth 
and who spoke in a mumbling voice. 

"What a rogue. I told him it was not so ! He can't 
make it up in three years," a round-shouldered, short 
proprietor was saying energetically; this man, whose 
long unpomaded hair was spread out over the embroi- 
dered collar of his uniform coat, walked along, noisily 
putting down the heels of his new boots which evidently 
had been made for the elections ; but as he caught sight 
of Levin he cast a hostile glance at him, and turned 
about abruptly. 

" Yes, it is a nasty thing to say so," repeated the 
little proprietor, in a piping voice. 

Immediately behind these two came a whole throng 
of proprietors, crowding around a tall general, and 
quickly approaching where Levin was. They were evi- 
dently trying to find some place where they would not 
be overheard. " How does he dare to say that I ordered 
his trousers to be stolen. He drank them up, I reckon. 
I don't care a straw if he is a prince. Don't let him 
dare to say such a thing ; it 's swinish ! " 

" Hold on, excuse me. They insist on the letter of 
the law," they were saying in another group; "his 
wife must be inscribed among the nobility." 
vol. in. — 13 



194 ANNA KARENINA 

" The devil take the letter of the law ! I insist on its 
spirit. According to that they are genuine nobles, be- 
lieve me." 

" Your excellency, let us come, fine champagne ! " 

Another group immediately pressed behind a noble 
who was shouting something at the top of his voice; 
this was one of the three drunken nobles. 

" I always advised Marya Semyonovna to let it on a 
lease because she gets no profit out of it," a proprietor 
was saying in a pleasant voice. This man had gray 
whiskers and wore the uniform of a colonel on the old 
general's staff. It was the same proprietor whom he had 
once met at Sviazhsky's house. Levin immediately 
recognized him. The proprietor also glanced at Levin, 
and they greeted each other. 

" This is very pleasant. How are you ? I remember 
you very well. We met last year at Nikola* Ivanovitch's, 
at the marshal's." 

"Well, how goes your farming?" 1 asked Levin. 

" Everything is going to rack and ruin," said the pro- 
prietor, halting near Levin, and looking at him with a 
submissive smile, but with an expression of calmness 
and confidence that this was the natural order of things. 

" But how does it happen that you are in our part of 
the world?" he asked. "Did you come to take part in 
our coup d^tat?" he went on, pronouncing the French 
words with confidence, but with a bad accent. 

" All Russia is assembled here, — chamberlains, if not 
ministers." i 

He pointed to Stepan Arkadyevitch's imposing figure, 
as in white trousers and chamberlain's uniform he strode 
along next the general. 

" I must confess to you," said Levin, " I don't under- 
stand the significance of these noblemen's elections." 

The old gentleman looked at him. 

" Well ! what is there to understand ? what signifi- 
cance can they have ? It 's a decaying institution which 
prolongs itself by the force of inertia. Look at all these 
uniforms; they tell you this is an assemblage of justices 

1 KhozyaistVQi everything connected with his estate. 



ANNA KARENINA 195 

of the peace, perpetual councilors, and so on, but no 
noblemen." 

" Why, then, do you come ? " 

" From habit, to keep up relations ; from a sort of 
moral obligation. And then, if I must tell the truth, I 
came on a question of personal interest. My son-in-law 
wants to be elected as a perpetual councilor ; he 's not 
rich ; I must try to help him. But why do such people 
as that come ? " and he pointed out the orator whose 
sharp voice had struck Levin during the debates at the 
governor's table. 

" It is a new generation of nobles." 1 

" Certainly new, but not nobles. They are landhold- 
ers, but we are the proprietors. But they are trying to 
get the power as if they were nobles." 

" Yes, but you say it is a decaying institution ? M 

" Decaying or not decaying, it must be treated more 
respectfully. Even though Snetkof .... We may not be. 
worth much, but, nevertheless, we have lasted a thousand 
years. Suppose you lay out a new garden before your 
house and there happens to be a century-old tree which 

has grown up on your land Though the tree is old 

and gnarled, you don't have it cut down, but you lay out 
your walks and your flower-beds in such a way as to 
preserve intact the old oak. You can't grow such a 
tree in one year," said he, cautiously, and immediately 
changed the conversation. "Well, how do matters go 
with you ? " 

" Not very brilliantly ; five per cent ! " 

" Yes, but you don't reckon your own time and labor. 
* Now, I will tell you about myself. Up to the time 
when I began to take care of my own estate, and while 
I was still in the service, I used to receive three thou- 
sand a year. Now I work harder than when I was 
in the service, and I also get about five per cent, and 
am lucky if I get that. And all my time and trouble 
are thrown in." 

" But why do you do so if the results are so unprofit- 
able ? " 

1 Dvoriamtvo, noblesse. 



196 ANNA KARENINA 

" Yes, why do .1 ? What shall I say ? Habit, and 
because I know it has got to be done. I will tell you 
something besides," continued the proprietor, leaning 
his elbow on the window-seat and falling into a tone of 
monologue, "my son has no taste for farming. 1 He is 
evidently going to be a scholar. So there '11 be no one 
to carry it on after me. And yet one goes ahead. Here 
I 've just planted a garden." 

" Yes, yes," said Levin. " You are quite right. 1 
always am conscious that there 's no real economy in 

my farming, but still I go on with it But one feels 

that one owes a certain duty to the land." 

"Now I will tell you another thing," continued the 
proprietor. "A neighbor, a merchant, came to see me. 
We went over the farm, and then the garden. ' Well, 
Stepan Vasilyevitch, your place is in order,' said he, 
1 but your garden has too much shade.' But he found 
it in order, mind you. ' My advice would be, cut down 
those lindens. Just for the bark. Here are a thousand 
lindens. Each one will make two excellent basts, and 
basts sell well. If I were you, I should cut some of 
that linden trash down and sell it.' " 

" Yes, and with the money he would buy cattle, or 
perhaps a bit of ground cheap, and he would lease it to 
the peasants," said Levin, with a smile, for evidently he 
had more than once come in contact with similar cases. 
" And so he makes a fortune. r But you and I thank 
God if we keep our land, and are able to leave it to our 
children." 

" You are married, I have heard ? " 

"Yes," replied Levin, with proud satisfaction. "It' 
is wonderful! We live without making any profit, 
obliged, like ancient vestals, Xo watch some holy fire." 

The old gentleman smiled under his white mustache. 

" Some people, like our friend Sviazhsky and Count 
Vronsky, pretend to make something by agriculture; 
but so far they have only succeeded in eating into their 
capital." 

"Why shouldn't we imitate the merchants, and cut 

1 Khozyaistvo. 



ANNA KARENINA 197 

down the trees in our parks and make money? " asked 
Levin, reverting to the idea which had struck him. 

"Just this! because we guard the sacred fire, as you 
say. Besides, that is not the business of the nobles. 
And our work as nobles does not lie here, at these elec- 
tions, but at home, each in his own place. It is a caste 
instinct that tells us what is necessary or not necessary. 
The muzhiks have theirs; a good muzhik will persist 
in hiring as much land as he can. No matter how bad 
it is, he will work it just the same, — even without 
profit." 

" We are all alike," said Levin. " I am very glad to 
have met you ! " he added, seeing Sviazhsky approach- 
ing. 

" Here we have met for the first time since we were 
together at your house," said the proprietor to Svi- 
azhsky. "Yes, and we have been having a talk." 

" And doubtless have been slandering the new order 
of things ? " said Sviazhsky, smiling. ; 

" Something of the sort." 

" One must free one's mind." 



CHAPTER XXX 

Sviazhsky took Levin's arm, and together they ap- 
proached their friends. 

It was now impossible to avoid Vronsky. He was 
standing with Stepan Arkadyevitch and Sergyei' Ivano- 
vitch, and was looking straight at Levin as he came 
along. 

" I am delighted ! " said he, offering his hand to 
Levin. "I think we met at the Princess Shcher- 
batsky's." 

" Yes, I remember our meeting perfectly," answered 
Levin, growing purple; and he immediately turned 
away and entered into conversation with his brother. 

Vronsky, smiling slightly, began conversing with Svi- 
azhsky, apparently having no desire to continue his 
talk with Levin. But Levin, while he was speaking 



198 ANNA KARENINA 

with his brother, kept looking at Vronsky, trying to 
think of something that he might say to him so as to 
atone for his rudeness. 

"On whom does the business depend now?" he 
asked, turning to Sviazhsky and Vronsky. 

" On Snetkof. He must either decline or consent/' 
replied Sviazhsky. 

" What will he do, consent or not ? " 

"That is where the trouble lies — neither one thing 
nor the other," said Vronsky. 

" But who will be nominated if he declines ? " asked 
Levin, looking at Vronsky. 

" Any one may," answered Sviazhsky. 

" You, perhaps," suggested Levin, 

"Certainly not," replied Sviazhsky, scowling, and 
directing an agitated look at the sarcastic gentleman 
who was standing near Sergyer Ivanovitch. 

" Who then ? Nevyedovsky ? " continued Levin, feel- 
ing that he was treading on dangerous ground. 

But this was still worse ; Nevyedovsky and Sviazhsky 
were two of the candidates. 

" Not I in any case," replied the sarcastic gentleman. 

It was Nevyedovsky himself. Sviazhsky introduced 
him to Levin, 

"This takes hold of you, doesn't it?" asked Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, winking at Vronsky. "It's just like a 
race. One might put up stakes," 

"Yes, indeed it takes hold," said Vronsky, "And 
having once begun with it, one must carry it through. 
It 's a battle," said he, contracting his brows and com- 
pressing his powerful jaws. 

"What a worker Sviazhsky is ! He sees everything 
so clearly and plans in advance ! " 

"Oh, yes," said Vronsky, heedlessly, 

A silence followed, during which Vronsky, since it 
was necessary to look at something, looked at Levin, at 
his legs, at his uniform, and then at his face ; and notic- 
ing his downcast expression said, for the sake of say- 
ing something : — 

" How is it that you who live in the country are not a 



ANNA KARENINA 199 

justice of the peace ? Your uniform is not that of a jus- 
tice, I see." 

" Because I think that justices of the peace are an 
absurd institution," answered Levin, gloomily, but all the 
time hoping for an opportunity to atone for his former 
rudeness. 

" I do not think so; on the contrary ...." said Vronsky, 
surprised. 

*' It is all child's play," interrupted Levin; "justices 
of the peace are unnecessary for us. In eight years I 
never have had any business with one. And the one 
case I had was decided exactly contrary to the evidence. 
There 's a justice of the peace forty versts from me. I 
had a small matter amounting to two rubles; I had to 
send for a lawyer, and that cost fifteen ...." 

And Levin went on to tell how a muzhik had stolen 
some flour from a miller, and when the miller charged 
him with it, the muzhik made a calumnious complaint. 

All this was not to the point, and awkwardly put, and 
Levin himself, while speaking, felt it. 

" Oh, this is such an original!" said Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, with his oily smile. " Come on ; it seems 
they are balloting." .... 

And they separated. 

"I don't understand," said Sergyef Ivanovitch, who 
had noticed his brother's awkward sally, " I don't under- 
stand how it is possible to be so absolutely devoid of 
political tact. It is just what we Russians lack. The gov- 
ernment marshal is our opponent, and you are ami cochon, 
you are on intimate terms with him. But why on earth 
make an enemy of Count Vronsky ? .... not that I make a 
friend of him, for I have just refused his invitation to 
dinner ; but he is ours. Then you asked Nevyedovsky if 
he was going to be a candidate. It isn't the right way 
to act." 

" Oh 1 I don't understand anything about it ; it all 
seems to me unimportant," said Levin, gloomily. 

" You say that it is unimportant ; but when you mix 
up in it, you spoil it." 

Levin was silent, and they entered the large hall. 



aoo ANNA KARENINA 

The old marshal had decided to be a candidate, 
although he felt that there was something up, some trick 
in preparation ; and though .he knew that not all the dis- 
tricts had nominated him, still he decided to stand. , 

Silence reigned in the hall; the secretary in a loud 
voice explained that votes would now be cast for Mikharl 
Stepanovitch Snetkof, captain of the guard, 1 as govern- 
ment marshal. 

The district marshals went from their desks to the 
government table with plates in which were the ballots, 
and the election began. " Deposit it at the right/* whis- 
pered Stepan Arkadyevitch to Levin, as he and his 
brother approached the table behind the district mar- 
shal. But Levin now forgot the count which they had 
explained to him, and was afraid that Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch had made a mistake in saying "At the right." Now 
Snetkof was the opposition candidate. Going up to the 
box, Levin held the ballot in his right hand, but thinking 
that he was wrong, he transferred the ballot to his left 
hand just in front of the box itself, and consequently de- 
posited it in the wrong place.- The tally-keeper who 
stood by the box, knowing, by the mere motion of the 
elbow how each one voted, involuntarily frowned. 
There was no reason for him to practise his cleverness. 

Deep silence reigned and the click of the ballots was 
heard. Then a single voice was heard announcing the 
affirmative and negative votes. 

The marshal was chosen by a decided majority. A 
great tumult arose," and all rushed toward the door. 
Snetkof came in, and the nobles surrounded him, offer- 
ing him their congratulations. 

" Well ! is it over ? " asked Levin of Sergye'f Ivanovitch. 

"On the contrary, it is just begun/' replied Sviazhsky, 
taking the words out of his brother's mouth, and smiling. 
"The opposition candidate may have more votes." 

Levin had forgotten all about this, and only now real- 
ized that this was only finessing. But it was a bore to 
him to recall what the plan had been. He felt a sort of 
humiliation, and a desire to escape from the throng. As 

* ' i ' J x Rot mist r gvardu 



ANNA KARENINA 201 

no one paid any heed to him, and he thought he was Ox 
no use to any one, he slipped out into the smaller hall, 
where, as before, he found consolation in watching the 
servants. The old servant asked him if he would have 
something to eat, and Levin consented. After he had 
eaten a cutlet with beans, and had talked with the ser- 
vants about their former masters, Levin, not caring to 
go back to the crowd which was so unpleasant to him, 
walked about the galleries. 

The galleries were full of well-dressed ladies, who 
were leaning over the balustrades endeavoring not to 
lose a word that was said in the hall below, and around 
them was standing and sitting a throng of elegantly 
dressed lawyers, professors of the gymnasia with spec- 
tacles on, and officers. Everywhere they were talking 
about the elections and the proposed change in the mar- 
shal, and saying how interesting the voting was. As 
Levin stood near one group, he heard a lady saying to a 
lawyer : — 

" How glad I am that I heard Koznuishef. It pays 
to go hungry for it. It was charming. How distinctly 
I could hear all he said. There is not one who equals 
him in the court, only Maidel, and even he is not nearly 
so eloquent." 

Finding a comfortable place near the railing, Levin 
leaned over and tried to look and to listen. All the 
nobles were sitting behind screens in the parts of the 
hall devoted to their various districts. In the center of 
the hall stood a gentleman in uniform, and in a light but 
clear voice he was saying : — 

" You will now cast your votes for Staff-Captain 
Yevgeni Ivanovitch Apukhtin as candidate for the posi- 
tion of marshal of the nobility of the government." 

A deathlike silence ensued, and again a weak, senile 
voice was heard : — 

" He declined." 

Again the same thing began, and again, " He de- 
clined." So it went on for about an hour. 

Levin, leaning on the balustrade, looked and listened. 
At first he was filled with amazement, and was anxious 



202 ANNA KARENINA 

to know what it all meant ; then, becoming persuaded that 
it was beyond his power. to, comprehend it, it began to 
bore him. Then, as he thought of the excitement and 
the angry passions expressed in all faces, he felt mel- 
ancholy ; he made up his mind to depart, and he started 
down-stairs. As he was passing through the entry of 
the gallery, he encountered a sad-looking gymnasium 
scholar walking back and forth with streaming eyes. 
On the staircase he met a couple, a lady swiftly hur- 
rying along on her heels, and the gentle colleague of the 
prokuror. 

" I told you not to be late," the prokuror was saying, 
just as Levin stood to one side to give the lady room to 
pass. Levin was on the lowest stair, and was just get- 
ting the cloak-check out of his waistcoat pocket, when 
the secretary found him. 

" Excuse me, Konstantin Dmitriyevitch, they are bal- 
loting." 

And the candidate who was now receiving votes was 
this very Nevyedovsky whose refusal had seemed to him 
so explicit ! 

Levin started to go into the hall. The door was 
locked ; the secretary knocked ; the door opened, and as 
he entered he met two very red-faced proprietors. 

" I cannot endure it," said one of the red-faced pro- 
prietors. 

Immediately behind the proprietor appeared the old 
government marshal. His face was terrible in its expres- 
sion of fright and /weakness. 

" I told you not to let any one go out I " he shouted to 
the guard. 

" I let some one in, your excellency." * 

" O Lord ! " and, sighing painfully, the old marshal, 
slinking along in his white pantaloons, with bowed head, 
went through the hall to the great table. 

The vote was counted, and Nevyedovsky, as had 
been planned, was government marshal. Many were 
happy ; many were satisfied, gay ; many were enthusias- 
tic ; many were dissatisfied and unhappy. The old gov* 

1 Vashe prevoskhodityehtvo. 



ANNA KARENINA 203 

ernment marshal was in despair, and could not disguise 
it. When Nevyedovsky went out of the hall, the throng 
surrounded him and expressed their enthusiasm toward 
him as they had done toward the governor when he 
opened the election, and as they had done toward Snet- 
kof when he was elected. 



CHAPTER XXXI 

On this day the newly elected marshal of the govern- 
ment and many of the new party which triumphed with 
him dined with Vronsky. 

The count came to the elections because.it was tire- 
some in the country and it was necessary for him to 
assert his independence before Anna, and also because 
he wished to render a service to Sviazhsky in return for 
similar favors shown him at the zemstvo elections, and 
last and principally because he intended strictly to fulfil 
the duties which he imposed upon himself as a noble 
and a landowner. 

But he had never anticipated the intense interest 
which he would take in the elections or the success 
with which he would play his part. He was a perfectly 
"new man" among the nobles, but he was evidently 
successful, and he was not mistaken in supposing that 
he already inspired confidence. This sudden influ- 
ence was due to his wealth and distinction, to the fine 
house which he occupied in town, — a house which an 
old friend of his, Shirkof, a financier and the director of 
a flourishing bank at Kashin, had given up to him, — 
and partly to an excellent cook whom he brought with 
him, and to his friendship with the governor, who was 
his ally and a protecting ally; but above all to his simple 
and impartial treatment of every one, so that the majority 
of the nobles quickly changed their minds in regard to 
the reputation he had acquired of being proud. He him- 
self felt that, with the exception of this silly gentleman 
who had married Kitty Shcherbatsky, and who d propos 
de bottes had been disposed foolishly to quarrel with him 



2o 4 ANNA KARENINA 

and say all manner of foolish things, everybody whom 
he met was. disposed to side with him. He clearly saw, 
and others recognized the fact, that he had very largely 
contributed to Nevyedovsky's success. And now, as he 
sat at the head of his own table celebrating Nevyedovsky's 
election, ne experienced a pleasant feeling of triumphant 
pride in his choice. He was so much interested in the 
election that he determined that, if he should be married 
at the end of the next three years, he would run as a 
candidate, just as once when, after having won a prize 
by means of his jockey, he had decided to run a race 
himself. 

Now he was celebrating the triumph of . his jockey. 
Vronsky sat at the head of the table, but he placed the 
young governor at his right. Vronsky saw that all looked 
upon him as the khozyaYn of the government, who had 
triumphantly opened the elections, who had gained by 
his speech great consideration and even worship ; but 
for Vronsky he was nothing more than Katka Maslof, 
— such was his nickname at the Corps of Pages, — who 
used to be confused in his presence, and whom he tried 
to put at his ease.. 

At his left he placed Nevyedovsky, a young man with 
a sarcastic and impenetrable face. Toward him Vronsky 
showed respectful consideration. 

Sviazhsky accepted his own failure gayly ; indeed, as 
he said, lifting his glass to Nevyedovsky, he could not 
call it a failure; it would be impossible to find a better 
representative of the new tendencies which the nobility 
was to follow. And therefore, as he said, everything 
that was honorable stood on the side of the success just 
won, and triumphed with it. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch also was gay, because he was 
having such a. good time and because every, one else 
was so happy. 

During the admirable dinner they reviewed the various 
episodes of the elections. Sviazhsky gave a comical 
travesty, of the former marshal's tearful discourse, and, 
turning to Nevyedovsky, he advised his excellency to 
choose a more complicated manner of verifying his^ac- 



ANNA KARENINA 205 

counts than by tears. Another noble with a turn for 
humor related how lackeys in short clothes had been 
ordered for the former marshal's ball, and how now 
these lackeys would have to be discharged unless the 
new marshal of the government should give balls with 
lackeys in short clothes. 

During all the time of the dinner, whenever they 
addressed Nevyedovsky they called him "your excel- 
lency," * and all spoke of him as " our government 
marshal." 2 This was spoken with the same sort of satis- 
faction as people feel when they address a newly married 
woman as madame and add her husband's name. 

Nevyedovsky pretended that he was not only indiffer- 
ent, but even scorned this new title, but it was evident 
that he was happy and was exercising self-control not to 
betray his enthusiasm, since to do so would not be be- 
coming to the new liberal environment in which they all 
found themselves. 

After dinner a number of telegrams were sent off to 
people who were interested in the result of the elections. 
And Stepan Arkadyevitch, who felt very gay, sent Darya 
Aleksandrovna a despatch thus worded : — 

Nevyedovsky elected by twenty majority. I am well. 
Regards to all. 

He dictated it aloud, and added, "I want to make 
them feel happy." But when Darya Aleksandrovna 
received the despatch, she only sighed for the ruble 
which it cost, and she knew well that it was sent during 
a dinner. She knew that Stiva had a weakness at the 
end of dinners J "aire jouer le te'le'graphe. 

The dinner was excellent, and the wines came from 
no Russian dealer, but were directly imported from 
abroad ; and everything was noble, simple, and joyous. 
The guests, twenty in number, were selected by Sviazh- 
sky from among the new liberal workers, and they were 
united in sentiments, keen-witted, and thoroughly well- 
bred. They drank many toasts, accompanied by witty 

1 Vashc prevoskhodityehtvo. 

2 Nash gubernsky prcdvoditycU 



206 ANNA KARENINA 

speeches, in honor of the new marshal, and of the gov- 
ernor, < arid . of the director of the bank, and of "our 
beloved .host." , 

Vronsky was contented. He had never expected to find 
in the provinces such distinguished society. 

Toward the end of dinner the gayety redoubled, and 
the governor asked Vronsky to attend a. concert arranged 
for the benefit of our brothers by his wife, who wanted 
to make his acquaintance. 

" There will be a ball afterward, and you shall see our 
beauty. In fact, she is remarkable," 

"Not in my line" answered Vronsky in English; 
he liked the phrase, but he smiled and promised to 
go. 

i Just before they left the table; and while they were 
lighting their cigars, Vronsky's valet approached him, 
bringing a note on a tray. 

" From Vozdvizhenskoye, by a special messenger," 
said the. man, with a significant expression. 

"It is remarkable how much he looks like the colleague 
of the prokuror Sventitsky," said one of the guests in 
French, referring to the valet, while Vronsky, with a 
frown on his brqw, was reading the note. 

The note was from Anna, and Vronsky knew, before 
he read it through, what was in it. He had promised, 
as;, the elections were -,to last five, days, to return on 
Friday; but it/was now Saturday, and he. knew that the 
letter would be full of reproaches because he had not 
fulfilled his promise. T\\q one he had sent off the after- 
noon before had evidently not been received. 

The tenor of the note was what he expected ; but its 
form was a. great surprise, and extremely unpleasant to 
him. ', : t 

* Ani is very sick, and the doctor says it "may be pneumonia. 
I shall go wild, here all alone. The Princess Varvara is only 
a hindrance instead of a help. I expected you day before 
yesterday, and now I send a messenger to know where you are 
and what you are doing. I wanted to come myself, but hesi- 
tated, knowing that it would be disagreeable to you. Send some 
answer, that I may know what tp do. 



ANNA KARENINA 207 

The child was ill, and she had wished to come herself. / 
A sick daughter, and this hostile tone ! 

Vronsky was impressed by the antithesis between the 
jolly, careless company, and the moody, exacting love to 
which he was obliged to return. But he was obliged t6 
go, and he left by the first train that would take him 
home that night. 



CHAPTER XXXII 

Before Vronsky's departure for the election, Anna, 
coming to the conclusion that the scenes which had 
always taken place every time he left her for a journey 
might serve to cool his love rather than attach him 
more firmly to her, resolved to control herself to the best 
of her ability, so as to endure calmly the separation from 
him. But the cold, stern look which he had given her 
when he came to tell her about his journey had wounded 
her, and he was hardly out of her sight before her-reso- 
lution was shaken. 

In her solitude, as she began to think over his cold 
look, which seemed to hint at a desire for liberty, she 
came back, as she always did, to one thing — to the 
consciousness of her humiliation. 

" He has the right to go when and where he f pleases. 
Not only to go, but to abandon me. He has all the 
rights, and I have none ! But as he knows this, he 
ought not to have done this. And yet what has he 
done?.... He looked at me with a hard, stern look. Of 
course, that is vague, intangible. Still, he did not for- 
merly look at me so, and it signifies much," she thought; 
"that look proves that he is growing cold toward me." 

And, although she was persuaded that he had begun 
to grow cold toward her, still there was nothing she 
could do, there was no change she could bring about in 
her relations toward him. Just as before, she could 
retain his affections only by her love, by her fascination. 
And, just as before, the only way she could keep herself 
from thinking what would happen if he should abandon 



208 ANNA KARENINA 

her, she busied herself incessantly ail day ; at night she 
took morphine. 

To be sure, there was one means left — not to keep 
him with her — for this she wished nothing else but his 
love — but to bind him to her, to be in such a relation 
to him that he would not abandon her. This means was 
divorce and marriage ; and she began to desire it, and 
resolved that she would agree to it the first time he or 
Stiva spoke about it again. With such thoughts she 
spent five days without him, the five days he expected 
to be away. 

Drives and walks, conversations with the Princess 
Varvara, visits to the hospital, and, above all, reading, 
the reading of one book after another, occupied her 
time. But on the sixth day, when the coachman re- 
turned without bringing Vronsky, she felt that she no 
longer had strength enough left to smother the thought 
about him and what he was doing at Kashin. Just at 
this very time her little girl was taken ill. Anna attended 
to her, but it did not divert her mind, the more as the 
little one was not dangerously ill. Do the best she could, 
she did not love this child, and she could not pretend to 
feelings which had no existence. 

On the evening of the sixth day, while she was entirely 
alone, she felt such apprehension about him that she 
almost made up her mind to start for the city herself, 
but after a long deliberation, she wrote the prevaricating 
note and sent it by a special messenger. 

When, the next morning, she received his letter, she 
regretted hers. With horror she anticipated the repetition 
of that severe look which he would give her on his return 
— especially when he learned that his daughter had not 
been dangerously ill. But still she was glad she had 
written him. Now Anna acknowledged to herself that 
he might be annoyed by her, that he might miss his liberty, ' 
but yet she was glad that he was coming ; suppose he 
was annoyed by her, still he would be there with her so 
that she should see him, so that she should be aware of 
his every motion. 

She was sitting in the parlor, by the lamp, reading a 



ANNA KARENINA 209 

new book of Taine's, listening to the sound of the wind 
outside, and watching every moment for the arrival of 
the carriage. Several times she thought that she heard 
the rumble of wheels, but she was deceived. At last 
she distinctly heard not only the wheels, but the coach- 
man's voice, and the carriage rolling, under the covered 
porch. 

The Princess Varvara, who was laying out a game of 
patience, heard it too. Anna's face flushed ; she rose, 
but, instead of going down, as she had twice done already, 
she stopped. She was suddenly ashamed at her decep- 
tion, and still more alarmed by the doubt as to how he 
would receive her. All her irritation had vanished. 
All she feared was Vronsky's displeasure. She remem- 
bered that her daughter for two days now had been 
perfectly well. She was annoyed that the child should 
recover just as she sent off the letter. 

And then she realized that he was there, himself, 
with his eyes, his hands. She heard his voice, joy 
filled her heart, and, forgetting everything, she ran to 
meet him. 

" How is Ani? " he asked anxiously, from the bottom 
of the stairs, as she ran swiftly down. 

He was seated in a chair, and his lackey was pulling 
off his furred boots. 

"All right; much better. " , . 

" And you ? " he asked, shaking himself. 

She seized his two hands, and drew him toward her, 
looking into his eyes. 

"Well, I am very glad," he said, coldly surveying her, 
her head-dress, her whole toilet, which, as he knew, had 
been put on expressly for him. 

All this pleased him, but how many times had the 
same thing pleased him ! and that stony, severe expres- 
sion, which Anna so much dreaded, remained on his 
face. 

"Well! I am very glad; and how are you?" he 
asked, kissing her hand, after he had wiped his damp 
mustache. 

"It is all the same to me," thought Anna, "if only 
vol. in. — 14 



2io ANNA KARENINA 

he is here ; and when he is here he cannot help loving 
me ; he does not dare not to love me." 

The evening passed pleasantly and merrily in the 
presence of the Princess Varvara, who complained to 
him that when he was away Anna took morphine. 

" What can I do ? I cannot sleep, — my thoughts 
are distracting ; when he is here, I never take it, — almost 
never." 

Vronsky told about the elections, and Anna, by her 
questions, cleverly led him to talk about what especially 
pleased him, his own success. Then she told him all 
the interesting things that had happened since he went 
away, and took care to speak of nothing unpleasant. 

But late in the evening, when they were alone, Anna, 
seeing that she had him at her feet again, wished to 
efface the unpleasant effect of her letter ; she said: — 

"Confess that you were displeased to receive my 
letter, and that you did not believe me." 

As soon as she spoke she saw that, though he was 
affectionately disposed toward her, he did not forgive 
this. 

"Yes," answered he, "your letter was strange. Ani 
was sick, and yet you yourself wanted to come." 

" Both were true." 

"Well, I do not doubt it." 

"Yes, you do doubt. I see that you are angry." 

" Not for one minute ; but what vexes me is that you 
will not admit that there are duties ...." 

" What duties ? Going to concerts ? " 

"We won't talk about it"' 

" Why not talk about it ? " 

"I only mean that imperious duties may meet us. 
Now, for instance, I shall have to go to Moscow on 

business Akh ! Anna, why are you so irritable ? Don't 

you know that* I cannot live without you ? " 

" If this is the way," said Anna, changing her tone 

suddenly, " then you are tired of this kind of life Yes, 

you come home one day and go away the next ...." 

" Anna, this is cruel ; I am ready to give up my whole 
life...." 



ANNA KARENINA 211 

But she would not listen to him. 

" If you are going to Moscow, I shall go with you ; I 

will not stay here alone We must either live together 

or separate." 

" But you know I ask nothing more than to live with 
you, but for that...." 

" The divorce is necessary. I will write him. I see 

that I cannot continue to live in this way But I am 

going with you to Moscow." 

" You really threaten me ; but all I ask in the world 
is not to be separated from you," said Vronsky, smiling. 

As the count spoke these affectionate words, the look 
in his eyes was not only icy, but wrathful, like that of a 
man persecuted and exasperated. 

She saw his look and accurately read its meaning. 

" If this is so, then it is misfortune ! " said this look. 
The expression was only momentary, but she never for- 
got it. 

Anna wrote to her husband, begging him to grant the 
divorce, and toward the end of November, after separat- 
ing from the Princess Varvara, who had to go to Peters- 
burg, she went to Moscow with Vronsky. Expecting 
every day to get AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's reply, and 
immediately afterward to secure the divorce, they set 
up their establishment as if they were married. 



PART SEVENTH 



CHAPTER I 

THE Levins had been in Moscow for two months, 
and the time fixed by competent authorities for 
Kitty's deliverance was already passed. 

But she was still waiting, and there was no sign that 
the time was any nearer than it had been two months 
before. The doctor and the midwife and Dolly and her 
mother, and especially Levin, who could not without ter- 
ror think of the approaching event, now began to feel 
impatient and anxious. Kitty alone kept perfectly calm 
and happy. She now clearly recognized in her heart 
the birth of a new feeling of love for the child which 
already partly existed for her, and she entertained this 
feeling with joy. The child was no longer only a part 
of her ; even now it already lived its own independent 
life at times. This, caused her suffering; but at the 
same time she felt like laughing, with a strange, un- 
known joy. 

All whom she loved were with her, and all were so 
good to her, took such care of her, and tried so to make 
everything pleasant for her, that, if she had not known 
and felt that the end must soon come, this would have 
been the happiest and best part of her life. Only one 
thing clouded her perfect happiness, and this was that 
her husband was different from the Levin she loved or 
the Levin that lived in the country. 

She had loved his calm, gentle, and hospitable ways 
in the country. In the city he seemed all the time rest- 
less and on his guard, as if he feared that some one was 
going to insult him or her. There in the country he 
was usefully occupied, and seemed to know that he was 



ANNA KARENINA 213 

in his place. Here in the city he was constantly on the 
go, as if he were afraid of forgetting something ; but he 
had nothing really to do. And she felt sorry for him. 

But she knew that to his friends he was not an object 
of commiseration ; and when in society she looked at him 
as one studies those who are beloved, endeavoring to look 
on him as a stranger, and see what effect he produced on 
others, she saw with anxiety the danger that she herself 
might become jealous of him for the reason that he was 
not at all pitiable, but was rather an exceedingly attrac- 
tive man by reason of his dignified, rather old-fashioned, 
shy politeness to ladies, his strong physique, and his very 
expressive face. But she read his inner nature. She 
saw that he was not himself, otherwise she could not 
define his actions. But sometimes in her heart she re- 
proached him because he could not adapt himself to city 
life. Sometimes even she confessed that it was really 
difficult for him to conduct his life so as to please her. 

But, indeed, what could he find to do ? He was not 
fond of cards. He did not go to the clubs. She now knew 
what it meant to frequent the company of high livers, 

like Oblonsky It meant to drink and to go to places — 

she could not think without horror of where these men 
were in the habit of going. Should he go into society ? 
She knew that to enjoy that it would be necessary to 
find pleasure in the company of young ladies, and she 
could not desire that. Then, should he sit at home with 
her, with her mother, and her sister? But however 
pleasant these conversations might be to her, she knew 
that they must be wearisome to him. What, then, re- 
mained for him to do ? Was he to go on with his book ? 
He intended to do this, and began to make researches 
in the public library ; but, as he confessed to Kitty, the 
more he had nothing to do, the less time he had. More- 
over, he complained to her that too much was said about 
his book, and that therefore his ideas were thrown into 
confusion and that his interest in his work was flagging. 

One result of their life in Moscow was that there 
were no more quarrels between them, either because city 
conditions were different, or because both were beginning 



2i 4 ANNA KARENINA 

to be more guarded and prudent; the fact remained 
that, since they left the country, the scenes of jealousy 
which they feared might again arise were not repeated. 

In these circumstances one very important- affair for 
them both took place: Kitty had a meeting with 
Vronsky. 

Kitty's godmother, the old Princess Marya Borisovna, 
was always very fond of her, and wanted to see her. 
Kitty, though owing to her condition she was not going 
out now, went with her father to see the stately old 
princess ; and there she met Vronsky. At this meeting 
Kitty could reproach herself only for the fact that for 
the moment when she first saw the features, once so 
familiar, she felt her . heart beat fast, and her face 
redden ; but her emotion lasted only a few seconds. 
The old prince hastened to begin an animated conver- 
sation with' Vronsky ; and by the time he had finished 
Kitty was ready to look at Vronsky, or to talk with him 
if need be, just as she was talking with the princess, 
and, what was more, without a smile or an intonation 
which would have been disagreeable to her husband, 
whose invisible presence, as it were, she felt near her at 
the moment. 

She exchanged some words with Vronsky, smiled 
serenely when he jestingly called the assembly at 
Kashin "our parliament," — she had to smile so as to 
show that she understood the jest. Then she addressed 
herself to the old princess, and did not turn her head 
until Vronsky rose to take leave. Then she looked at 
him, but evidently it was only because it is impolite not 
to look at a man when he bows. 

She was grateful to her father because he said noth- 
ing about this meeting with Vronsky ; but Kitty under- 
stood from his especial tenderness after their visit, during 
their usual walk, that he was satisfied with her. She 
felt satisfied with herself. She had never anticipated 
that she should have the strength of mind to remember 
all the details of her former feelings toward Vronsky, 
and yet to seem and to feel perfectly indifferent and 
calm in his presence. 



ANNA KARENINA 215 

Levin turned far more crimson than she did, when 
she told him about her meeting with Vronsky at the 
house of the Princess Marya Borisovna. It was very 
hard for her to tell him about it, and still harder to go 
on relating the details of the meeting, for the reason 
that he did not ask her a question, but only gazed at her 
and frowned. 

" It was such a pity that you weren't there," she said 
to her husband, — "not in the room, for before you I 
should not have been so self-possessed. I 'm blushing 
now ever and ever so much more than I did then," said 
she, blushing till the tears came, — "but if you could 
have looked through the keyhole." 

Her sincere eyes told Levin that she was satisfied 
with her behavior, and, though she blushed,, he immedi- 
ately became calm; he asked her some questions, just 
as she wished him to do. When he had heard the 
whole story, even to the detail that she could not help 
blushing for the first second, and afterward was per- 
fectly at her ease as if she had never met him before, 
Levin grew extraordinarily gay, and declared that he 
was very glad of it, and that in future he should not 
behave so foolishly as he had done at the elections, 
but that when he met Vronsky again he should be as 
friendly as possible. 

" It is so painful to look on him almost as an enemy, 
whom it is hard to meet. I am very, very glad." 



CHAPTER II 

" Please don't forget to call at the Bohls'," said 
Kitty, as her husband came to her room, about eleven 
o'clock in the morning, before going out " I know that 
you are going to dine at the club, because papa wrote 
you. But what are you going to do this morning ? " 

" I 'm only going to Katavasof s." 

" Why are you going so early ? V 

"He promised to introduce me to Metrof. He's a 



ai6 ANNA KARENINA 

famous scholar from Petersburg. I want to talk over 
my book with him." 

" Oh, yes ; was n't it his article you were praising ?. 
Well, and after that ? " 
' " Possibly to the tribunal, about that affair of my 
sister's." 

" Are n't you going to the concert ? " she asked. 

" No ; why should I go all alone ? " 

" Do go. They 're going to give those new pieces.... 
it will interest you. I should certainly go." 

"Well, at all events, I shall come home before din- 
ner," said he, looking at his watch. 

" Put on your best coat, so as to go to the Countess 
Bohl's." 

" Why, is that really necessary ? " 

" Akh ! certainly. The count himself came here. 
Now, what does it cost you? You go, you sit down; 
you talk five minutes about the weather, then you get 
up and go." 

- " Well, you don't realize that I am so out of practice, 
that I feel abashed. How absurd it is for a strange 
man to come to a house, to sit down, to stay a little 
while without any business, to find himself in the way, 
feel awkward, and then go." 

Kitty laughed. 

"Yes; but didn't.- you. use -to make calls before you 
were married ? " 

" Yes, but I was always bashful," said he ; " and now 
I am so out of the way of it, that, by Heavens, 1 I would 
rather not have any dinner for two days than make this 
call. I am so bashful. It seems to me as if they must 
take offense, and say, 'Why do you come without 
business ? ' " j 

" No, they don't take offense. I will answer that for 
you," said Kitty, looking brightly into his face. She 
took his hand. " Now, prashchaf ! — please go ! " 

He kissed his wife's hand, and was about to go, when 
she stopped him. 

" Kostia, do you know I have only fifty rubles left?" 



ANNA KARENINA 217 

"Well, I will go and get some from the bank. How 
much do you want?" said he, with his well-known ex- 
pression of vexation. 

" No, wait ! " She detained him by the arm. " Let us 
talk about this a moment ; this troubles me. I try not 
to buy anything unnecessary ;' still, the money runs 
away. We must retrench somehow or other." 

" Not at all," said Levin, with a little cough, and 
looking askance upon her. 

She knew this cough. It was a sign of strong vexa- 
tion, not with her, but with himself. He was actually 
discontented, not because much money was spent, but 
because he was reminded of what he wanted to forget. 

" I have ordered Sokolof to sell the corn, and to get 
the rent of the mill in advance. We shall have money 
enough." 

" No ; but I fear that, as a general thing .... " 

"Not at all, not at all," he repeated. "Well, good- 
by, darling." 2 

"Sometimes I wish I hadn't listened to mamma. 
How happy we were in the country ! I tire you all, 
waiting for me ; and the money we spend .... " 

" Not at all, not at all ! Not one single time since we 
were married till now have I thought that things would 
have been better than they are." 

" Truly ? " said she, looking into his face. 

He said that, thinking only to comfort her. But when 
he saw her gentle, honest eyes turned to him with an 
inquiring look, he repeated what he had said with his 
whole heart ; and he remembered what was coming to 
them so soon. 

"How do you feel this morning? Do .you think it 
will be soon ? " he asked, taking both her hands in his. 

" I sometimes think that I don't .think and don't know 
anything." 

"And don't you feel afraid?" 

She smiled disdainfully : — 

" Not the least bit. No, nothing will happen to-day ; 
don't worry." 

1 Nu prashchdi t dushenka; literally, Now, farewell, adieu, little soul. 



at 8 ANNA KARENINA 

" If that is so, then I am going to Katavasof s." 
" I am going with papa to take a little walk on the 
boulevard. We are going to see Dolly. I shall expect 
you back before dinner. Oh, there! Do you know, 
Dolly's position is getting to be entirely unendurable ? 
She is in debt on every* side, and has n't any money at 
all. We talked about it yesterday with mamma and 
Arseny,"- — this was her sister Natali Lvova's husband, 

— " and they decided that you should scold Stiva. It is 
truly unendurable. It is impossible for papa to speak 
about it ; but if you and he .... " 

"Well, what can we do?" asked Levin. 

" You had better go to Arseny's, and talk with him ; 
he will tell you what we decided about it." 

" All right ! I will follow Arseny's advice. Then, I 
will go directly to his house. By the way, if he is at the 
concert, then I will go with Natali. So good-by." 

On the staircase, the old bachelor servant, Kuzma, 
who acted in the city as steward, stopped his mas- 
ter. 

" Krasavtchika 1 has just been shod, and it lamed her," 

— this was Levin's left pole-horse, which he had brought 
from the country; — "what shall I do?" said he. 

When Levin established himself in Moscow, he brought 
his horses from the country. He wished to set up as 
good a stable as possible, but not to have it cost too 
much/ It seemed to him now that hired horses. would 
have been less expensive ; and even as it was, he was 
often obliged to hire of the izvoshchik. 

"Take her to the veterinary; perhaps she is going 
to have a swimmer." 

" Well, how shall you arrange for Katerina Aleksan- 
drovna ? ■' asked Kuzma. 

Levin was now no longer troubled as he had been at 
first, when he first came to Moscow, that for the drive 
from Vozdvizhenko to Svintsef Vrazhek it was necessary 
to have a span of heavy horses harnessed into his heavy 
carriage and drive in it four versts through mealy snow, 
and keep them waiting four hours there, and have to pay 
- * ~ - s . • - i Little Beauty. % " : 



ANNA KARENINA 219 

five rubles for it Now it seemed to him the natural 
thing to do. 

"Get a pair of horses from the izvoshchik, and put 
them into our carriage." 

"I will obey." 

And having thus decided simply and quickly, thanks 
to his training in city ways, a labor which in the coun- 
try would have cost him much trouble and attention, 
Levin went out on the porch, and, beckoning to an izvosh- 
chik, took his seat in the cab, and rode off • to the 
Nikitskaya Street. 

On the way the question of money did not occupy 
him, but he thought over how he was about to make 
the acquaintance of the sociological savant from Peters- 
burg, and what he should say to him in regard to his 
treatise. \ 

It was only during the first part of his stay in Mos- 
cow that Levin, who had been used to the productive 
ways of the country, was amazed at the strange and 
unavoidable expenses which met him on every side. 
But now he was wonted to them. He had somewhat the 
same experience as he had been told drunken men went 
through : each successive glass made him more reckless. 1 

When Levin took the first hundred-ruble note for the 
purchase of liveries for the lackey and Swiss, he could 
not avoid the consideration that these liveries were 
wholly useless to any one ; and yet they seemed to be 
unavoidable and indispensable, judging from the amaze^ 
ment of Kitty and her mother, when he made the re- 
mark that they might go without them — and he put it 
to himself that these liveries represented the wages of 
two laborers for a year, that is to say, about three 
hundred working days from- early in the morning till 
late at night ; so that the first hundred-ruble note corre- 
sponded to the first glass. 2 

But the second bill of twenty-eight rubles, expended 
for the purchase of provisions for a family dinner, cost 

1 An untranslatable Russian proverb: Piervaya rinmka — kolom; 
vtoraya sokolom^ a posh tretye — mietkimi ptashetchkami. 

2 The kolotn y or stake, of the proverb. 



220 ANNA KARENINA 

him less trouble, though he still mentally computed that 
this money represented nine chetverts, or more than 
fifty bushels, of oats which these same workmen, at the 
cost of many groans, had mowed, bound into sheaves, 
threshed, winnowed, gathered up, and put into bags. 

And now the money spent in this way had long ceased 
to evoke any such considerations, but they flew around 
him like little birds. He had long ceased to ask him- 
self whether the pleasure purchased by his money was 
anywhere near commensurate with the labor spent in 
acquiring it. He also forgot the common principle of 
economics, that there is a certain price below, which it is 
impossible to sell grain except at a loss. His rye, the 
price of which he had kept up so long, had to be sold 
at ten kopeks a' bushel cheaper than he had sold it a 
month earlier. Even the calculation that if he kept on 
at his present rate of expenditure it would be impossible 
to get through the year without getting into debt, did 
not cause him any anxiety. 

Only one thing troubled him : the keeping up his 
bank account, without asking how, so that there might 
be always enough for the daily needs of the household. 
And up to the present time he had succeeded in doing 
this. But now his deposit at the bank had run low, and 
he did not know exactly' how to restore it. And this 
problem was causing him some anxiety just at the time 
when Kitty asked him for some more money. But he 
did not want to bother about that just now. So he 
drove away, thinking of Katavasof and his* approaching 
acquaintance with Metrof. 



CHAPTER III 

During his present stay in. Moscow Levin had once 
more come 'into intimate relationship with his old uni- 
versity friend," Professor Katavasof, whom he had not 
seen since the time of his marriage. Katavasof was 
agreeable to him because of the clearness and simplicity 
of his philosophy. Levin thought that the clearness of 



ANNA KARENINA 221 

his philosophy arose from the poverty of his nature, 
while Katavasof thought that the incoherence of Le- 
vin's ideas arose from a lack of mental discipline. But 
Katavasof 's lucidity was agreeable to Levin, and Levin's 
fecundity of undisciplined ideas was agreeable to Kata- 
vasof, and they both liked to meet and discuss together. 

Levin had read several passages from his treatise to 
Katavasof, who had liked them. The evening before 
Katavasof, happening to meet Levin at a public lecture, 
told him that the celebrated scholar, Professor Metrof, 
whose article had pleased Levin, was in Moscow, and 
was greatly interested in what he had heard of Levin's 
work. He was to be at Katavasofs house the next day 
at eleven o'clock, and would be delighted to make Le- 
vin's acquaintance. 

" Delighted to see you, batyushka," said Katavasof, 
receiving Levin in his reception-room. " I ; heard the 

bell, and wondered if it could be time And now what 

do you think of the Montenegrins ? It looks to me like 
war." 

"What makes you think so ? " asked Levin. 

Katavasof in a few words told him the latest news, and 
then, taking him into his library, introduced him to a 
short, thick-set, and very pleasant-looking man : it was 
Metrof. The conversation for a short time turned on 
politics, and on the views held by the high authorities 
in Petersburg in regard to the recent elections. Metrof, 
in regard to this, quoted some significant words spoken 
by the emperor and one of the ministers, which he had 
heard from a reliable source. Katavasof had heard from 
an equally reliable source that the emperor had said some- 
thing quite different. Levin tried to imagine to himself 
the conditions in which the words in either case might 
have been said, and the conversation on this theme came 
to an end. * 

" Well ! here is the gentleman who is writing a book 
on the natural condition of the laborer, in relation to the 
soil," said Katavasof. " I am not a specialist, but it 
pleases me as a naturalist that he does not consider the 
human race outside of zoological laws, but recognizes 



222 ANNA KARENINA 

man's dependence on his environment, and seeks- to find 
in this dependence the laws of his development." 

"That's very interesting," said Metrof. 

"I began simply to write a book on rural economy," 1 
said Levin, reddening; "but in studying the principal 
instrument, the laborer, I arrived at a decidedly unex* 
pected conclusion, in spite of myself." 

And Levin expatiated on. his ideas, trying the ground 
carefully as he did so, for he- knew, that Metrof had 
written an article against the current views on political 
economy; and how, far he could hope for sympathy in 
his' new views, he did not know, arid could not tell from 
the scholar's calm, intellectual face. 

" How, in your opinion, does the Russian laborer 
differ from that of other peoples ? " asked Metrof. " Is 
it from the point of view which you call zoological ? or 
from that of the material conditions in which he finds 
himself?" 

This way of putting the question proved to Levin how 
widely their opinions diverged; nevertheless, he con- 
tinued to set forth his theory- which was based on the 
idea that the Russian people .could not have the same 
relation to the soil as the other /European nations; and 
to prove this position, he hastened to. add .that, in his 
opinion, the Russian people feels instinctively predes- 
tined to populate the immense uncultivated tracts stretch- 
ing toward the East. 

" It is easy to be mistaken about the general - destiny 
of a people, by forming premature conclusions," said 
Metrof, interrupting Levin ; '< and .the situation of the 
laborer will always depend on his relation to- land and 
capital."*, j ' : L ? 

. And, without giving Levin time to reply, ..he began 
to explain -the peculiarity of his own views. Levin did 
not understand, because he did not try to understand, 
in what consisted the peculiarity of his views ; he saw 
that Metrof, like all the rest, notwithstanding his article, 
in which he refuted the teachings of the economists, 
looked on the condition of the Russian people .from the 

1 Selskoye khozyatstvo. 



ANNA KARENINA 323 

standpoint of capital/ wages, and rent, though he was 
obliged to confess that for the eastern and by far the 
greater part of- Russia, there was no such thing as rent ; 
that for nine-tenths of Russia's eighty millions, wages 
consisted in a bare subsistence, and the capital did hot 
yet exist, except as it was represented by the most primi- 
tive tools. Although Metrof differed from other political 
economists, in many ways he regarded the 'laborer from 
this point of view, and he had a new theory as to wages, 
which he demonstrated at "length. 

Levin listened with some disgust, and tried to reply. 
He wanted to interrupt Metrof, in order to express his 
own opinions, which he felt deserved to be heard at far 
greater length. But, finally recognizing that they looked 
on the subject from such a radically opposite standpoint 
that they could never understand each other, he'nq 
longer tried to refute him, he let Metrof talk/and only 
listened. Though he was not at all interested in what 
he said, nevertheless he experienced a certain pleasure in 
listening to him. He was flattered that such a learned 
man would condescend to give him the benefit of his 
thoughts, sometimes by a hint pointing to a complete 
phase of the subject, and showing him so much defer- 
ence as to one thoroughly versed in the subject. He 
ascribed this to his own merits ;•' he did not know that 
Metrof, having talked this over with all his own intimates 
on this subject, was glad to have a new" auditor; and, 
moreover, that he liked to talk with any one on the sub- 
jects that occupied him, so as to elucidate certain points 
for his own benefit. *■ 1 

"We shall be r late," remarked Katavasof, consulting 
his watch as soon" as Metrof had concluded his argu- 
ment. " Yes I there is a special session to-day of the 
* Society of Friends' 1 in honor of the semi-centennial of 
Svintitch," he added, in reply to Levin's question. 
"We meet at the house of Piotr Ivanuitch; I promised 
to speak on his work in zoology. Comfc with us ; it will 
be interesting." j * 

" Yes, it is high time," said Metrof. " Come with us, 

1 Obshchtstvo iliuhitelyc* 



224 ANNA KARENINA 

and then afterward, if you like, come home with me. 
I should greatly like to hear your work." 

"It is only a sketch, not worth much; but I should 
like to go with you to the session." 

"What is that, batyushka ? Have you heard.?-! He* 
gave a special opinion," said Katavasof, who was putting 
on his dress-coat in the next room. 

And the talk turned on the university question. 

The university question was, a very important topic 
this winter in Moscow. /Three told professors in the 
council would not accept the opinion of the younger 
ones ; . the younger ones, expressed -a special opinion. 
This, opinion, according to some; was dreadful, accord- 
ing to others was the simplest and most righteous of 
opinions, , and the professors were divided into two 
parties. / . r - - ^ :>'• «> *oJ . ; 

The one to which Katavasof belonged saw in the 
opposition dastardly violation of faith, and deception ; 
the other' side charged their opponents with childishness 
and lack of confidence in the authorities.- / 

Levin, although he was' not, connected with the uni- 
versity,- had heard and talked much during his stay in 
Moscow regarding this affair, and had his own opinion 
regarding it. So he took part-in the conversation, which 
was continued even after -they- had got out into the 
street," and until they had all three reached the buildings 
of the old , university. r > 

-The session had already begun. Six men were sitting 
around a table covered with a cloth ; and one of them, 
nearly doubled up over a manuscript, was reading some- 
thing. -Katavasof and Metrof took their places at the 
table. Levin sat down in an unoccupied chair near a stu : 
dent, and asked him in! a low voice what they were read- 
ing?? The student, .looking angrily at; ^Leviri, replied: — 
j ^'/The biography." t b / 

Levin did not "care much for the savant's biography, 
still he could not help listening, and* he learned various 
interesting particulars of the life of the celebrated man. 
,?rWhen the' reader -came to an end, the chairman; con- 
gratulated him, and then read some verses which had 



ANNA KARENINA 225 

been sent to him in honor of the occasion by the poet 
Mient, of whose work -he spoke eulogistically. Then 
Katavasof read in his loud, harsh voice a sketch of the, 
work of Svintitch. When Katavasof had finished, Levin 
looked at his watch and found that it was already two 
o'clock;- he realized that he. should lose the concert if 
he should read his treatise to Metrof, and, moreover, he 
no longer cared to do it. 

During the reading of the papers he had come to a 
conclusion regarding the conversation he had just had. 
It was clear to his own mind that, though Metrof's ideas 
very likely had some value, yet his own ideas also had 
value, and that ideas could be made clear and profitable 
only when every person should work separately in his 
chosen path, but that the communication of these ideas 
was perfectly profitless. 

And, having decided to decline Metrof's invitation, 
Levin at the end of the session went up to him. Metrof 
introduced Levin to the chairman, with whom he was 
talking about the political news. Thereupon Metrof 
told the chairman what he had already told Levin, and 
Levin made the same remarks as he had made that morn- 
ing, but for the sake of variety he also told his new theory 
which had just come into his mind. After this the con- 
versation again turned on the university question. As 
Levin had already heard as much as he cared to about 
this, he made haste to tell Metrof that he regretted that 
he could not accept his invitation,- bade him good-by, 
and hastened to Lvof's. 



CHAPTER IV 

t 

Lvof, who had married Natalie, Kitty's sister, had 
spent his life in the European capitals, where he had not 
only received his education, but had also pursued his dip- 
lomatic career. 

The year before he had resigned his diplomatic ap- 
pointment, not because it was distasteful to him, — for 
he never found anything distasteful, to him, — and had 
vol. in. — 15 



226 ANNA KARENINA 

accepted a position in the department of the palace in< 
Moscow, so that he might be able to give a better educa- 
tion to his two sons. * - 

In spite of very different opinions and habits, and the 
fact that Lvof was considerably older than Levin, they 
had seen much of each other' this autumn, and had be- 
come great friends. 

Levin found his brother-in-law at home, and went in 
without ceremony. 

. Lvof, in a house-coat with a belt, '.and in chamois-skin 
slippers, was sitting in an arm-chair, and with blue glasses 
was reading a book- which rested on a stand, while he 
held a half-burned cigar in his shapely hand. His hand- 
some, delicate, and still youthful face, 'to which his shin- 
ing, silvery hair gave an expression of aristocratic dignity, 
lighted up with a smile as he saw Levin. * 

"Good! I was just going to send to find out about 
you all. How is Kitty ? " said he ; and, rising, he pushed 
forward a rocking-chair. "Sit down here:' you'll find 
this better. Have you read the last circular in the Jour- 
nal de St. Pttersbourg? I find it excellent," said he, with 
a slight French accent. 

Levin informed him of what he had heard as to the 
reports in circulation at Petersburg ; and, after having 
spoken of politics, he told about his acquaintance with 
Metrof and the session at the university. This r greatly 
interested Lvof. . nii>W 

"There! I envy you your intimacy- in that learned 
society," said he, and he went on speaking not in Rus- 
sian, but in French, which was far more familiar to him. 
"True, I could not meet them very well. My public 
duties, and my occupation with the children, would pre- 
vent it ; and then, I do not feel ashamed to say that my 
own education is too faulty." ^ 

" I can't think that," said Levin;' with a smile, and, as 
always, touched by his modest opinion of himself, ex- 
pressed not for the sake of bringing out a flattering con- 
tradiction; but genuine and honest. 

" Oh, dear ! I now feel how little I know. Now that 
I am educating my*' sons, I am obliged to refresh my 



ANNA KARENINA 227 

memory. I learn my lessons over again. Just as in 
your estate, you have to have workmen and overseers, 
so here it needs some one to watch the teachers. But 
see what I am reading/' — and he pointed to the gram- 
mar of Buslayef lying on the stand, — " Misha has to 
learn it, and it is so hard Now explain this to me." 

Levin wanted to explain to him that it was impossible' 
to understand it, that it simply had to be learned. But 
Lvof did not agree with him. 

" Yes, now you are making fun of it." 

"On the contrary, you can't imagine how much I 
learn, when I look at you, about the way to teach 
children." 

"Well ! You could not learn much from me." 

" I only know that I never saw children so well 
brought up as yours, and I should not want better chil- 
dren than yours." 

Lvof evidently.wanted to restrain himself so as not 
to betray his satisfaction, but his face lighted up with a 
smile. 

" Only let them be better than I. That is all that I 
want. But you don't know the bother," he began, 
"with lads who, like mine, have been allowed to run 
wild abroad." 

" You are regulating all that. They are such capable 
children. The main thing is — their moral training. 
And this is what I learn in looking at your children." 

" You speak of the moral training. You can't imag- 
ine how hard it is. Just as soon as you have conquered 
one crop of weeds, others spring up, and there is always 
a fight. If you don't have a support in religion, — be- 
tween ourselves, — no father on earth, relying on his own 
strength and without this help, could ever succeed in 
training them." 

This conversation, which was extremely interesting to 
Levin, was interrupted by the pretty Natalie Aleksan- 
drovna, dressed for going out " 

"I didn't know you were here," said she to Levin, 
evidently not regretting, but even rejoicing, that she had 
interrupted his conversation, which was too long for her 



228 ANNA KARENINA 

pleasure. " Well ! and how is Kitty ? I am going to 
dine with you to-day. See here,. Arseny," she said, 
turning to her husband, "you take the carriage."-.... 

And between husband and wife began a discussion of 
the question how they should spend -the day. As the 
husband had to attend to, his official business, and the 
wife was going to the .concert and to a public session of 
the Committee of .the Southeast,, it was needful to dis- 
cuss and think it all over. Levin, as a member of the 
family, was obliged to take part in these plans. „ It was 
decided that he should go with Natalie to the concert 
and to the public, meeting, and then send the carriage 
to the office for Arseny, who would come and take her 
to Kitty's, or if he .was not yet ready Levin would serve 
as her escort. /, . 

"This man is spoiling itie,"' said Lvof to his wife; 
"he assures me that our children are. lovely, when I 
know that they are full of faults.' f 

" Arseny goes to extremes. , I always say so," said 
his wife. " If you expect perfection, you will never be. 
satisfied. And papa is right in saying that when we 
were children they went to one extreme : they kept us 
on the entresol, while the parents lived in the beMage ; 
but now, on the contrary, the parents live in the lumber- 
room, and the children in the bel-e*tage. The parents 
are now of no account ; everything must be for the 
children." * - , 

" Supposing this is more agreeable.? " suggested Lvof, 
with his winning smile, as he offered her his arm. " Any 
one not knowing you would think that you were not a 
mother, but a step-mother." 

" No, it is not good to go to extremes in anything," 
said Natalie, , gently, laying his paper-cutter in its 
proper place on the table. . < ! 

o "Ah, here they are ! Come"in,ye perfect children," 
said Lvof to the handsome lads, who came in, and, after 
bowing to Levin, went to their father, evidently wishing 
to ask some favor of him. 

. Levin wanted to Speak with them, and to hear what 
they said to their father, but Natalie was talking with 



ANNA KARENINA 229 

him ; and just then Lvof's colleague, Makhotin, in his, 
court-uniform, came into the room, and began a lively 
conversation about Herzegovina, the Princess Korzin- 
sky, and the premature death of Madame Apraksin. 

Levin forgot all about Kitty's message. He remem- 
bered it just as they reached the vestibule. 

" Oh ! Kitty commissioned me to speak with you 
about Oblonsky," said he, as Lvof went with them to 
the head of the staircase. 

" Yes, yes ! maman wants us, les bemix-fr£res> to at- 
tack him," said Lvof, turning red. " But how can I ? " 

"Then I'll undertake it," said the smiling Madame 
Lvof, who, wrapped in her white dogskin rotonda, was 
waiting till they should finish talking. 



CHAPTER V 

Two very interesting pieces were to be given at the 
matinee. One was a fantasia or symphonic poem called 
"The King Lear of the Steppes," the other was a quar- 
tette dedicated to the memory of Bach. Both pieces 
were new and of the new school, and Levin desired to 
form his own opinion in regard to them. So, after he 
had conducted his sister-in-law to her place, he took his 
stand near a column, and determined to listen as atten- 
tively and conscientiously as possible. He tried not to 
allow his attention to be distracted and his impressions 
spoiled by letting his eyes follow the white-cravatted 
kapellmeister's waving arms, which are always so dis- 
turbing to the musical attention, or by looking at the 
ladies in their hats, who for concerts take especial pains 
to tie ribbons round their ears, or at all those faces 
either occupied with nothing, or occupied with the most 
heterogeneous interests, music being the last. He tried 
to avoid meeting the connoisseurs and the chatterers, 
but he stood alone by himself, looking down and listen- 
ing. 

But the more he listened to the "King Lear" fantasia, 
the more he felt the impossibility of forming a clear and 



230 ANNA KARENINA 

exact idea of it The musical thought, at the moment 
of its development, was constantly interrupted by, the 
introduction of new themes,, or." vanished, leaving only 
the impression of a complicated and laborious attempt- 
at instrumentation. But these same new themes, beau- 
tiful as some of them were* gave an unpleasant; impres- 
sion, because they were not expected or prepared for. 
G&yety and sadness and despdir :" and tenderness and 
triumph followed one another like the incoherent 
thoughts of a madman, to be themselves followed by 
others as wild. • ** J 

'During .the whole performance^ Levin experienced a 
feeling analogous to what' a deaf man, might have in 
looking at dancers.. r ! f Hfe«^asinra! state of utter dubiety 
when the piece came to an end, and he felt a great weari- 
ness from the strain of intellectual intensity which was 
never rewarded. V >I3T C FAH0 

On all sides were heard loud applause and clapping 
of hands. All got up and moved about/ talking. Wish- 
ing to get some light on his doubts by the impressions 
of others, Levin began to walk about, seeking for the- 
connoisseurs, and he was glad when at last he saw one 
of the best-known musical critics talking with his friend 
Pestsof. 

"It's wonderful," said Pestsof,' in his deep bass. 
" How are you, Konstantin Dmitritch ? The passage 
that is the, richest in * color, the most statuesque, so. to 
speak, is that where Cordelia appears, where woman, 
das ewig Weibliche, comes into I conflict with fate. 
Don't you think, so?" 

"Why Cordelia??' asked Levin, with hesitation, for 
he'had wholly forgotten that the symphonic poem had 
anything to do with King Lear. 

f "Cordelia appears here, " said Pestsof, tapping with 
his finger on the satin program which he. held in his 
hand/Then only did Levin notice the title of the sym- 
phonic poem, and hemade haste to read the text of 
Shakespeare, translated into Russian and printed on the 
back of the program; • ";Y6u can't follow it without 
that/* *said .Pestsof, addressing Levin, now that his 






ANNA KAREN INA 231 

friend, the critic, had gone, and there was nothing more 
to talk with him abolifc J> I ' f / 113 

Levin and Pestsof spent the intermission in discuss- 
ing f the merits" and' defects of the Wagnerian "tendencies 
in music. < Levin maintained that the mistake of Wag : 
ner and all his followers consisted in transferring music 
to the domain of an alien art, that poetry made the mis- 
take when it tried to depict the features of the human 
face, 'which it was the province of painting to do,, and as 
a concrete example of this kind.'ofc a mistake he' adduced 
the sculptor who should try to express in marble the 
shades of poetic imagery rising round the figure of the 
poet on the pedestal. 

" These shades are so far from being shades in the 
case of the sculptor, that they even .rest on the steps/' 
said Levin. This phrase pleased him, but he ' had 1 a 
lurking suspicion that he had once used this same 
phrase before, and' to Pestsof himself, and he felt 
confused. , * 

Pestsof argued that art is one, and that it can reach its 
loftiest manifestations only by combining all its forms. 

Levin could not listen to the second number on the 
program. Pestsof, who was standing near him, kept 
talking to him most o£ the time, criticizing it for its ex- 
cessive, mawkish, affected simplicity, and comparing it 
to the simplicity of the Pre-Raphaelites in painting. 

On his way out, he met various acquaintances, with 
whom he exchanged remarks on" politics, music, and 
other topics ; among, others he saw Count >Bohl, .and the 
call which he. should have made on him came to mind. 

"Well, go quickly," said Natalie, to whom he confided 
this. " Perhaps the countess is not receiving. If 'so, 
you will come and join me at the meeting. You will 
have plenty of time." , '. t 

/,' 1 't 



olo'j 



23.2 ANNA KARENINA 



CHAPTER VI • ' 

" Perhaps they are not receiving ? " asked Levin, as 
he entered the vestibule of Count Bohl's house. 

" Oh, yes ! permit me ! " answered the Swiss, resolutely 
taking the visitor's shuba.* 

"What a nuisance!" thought Levin, drawing off one 
of his gloves with a sigh, and .turning his hat in his 
hands. "Now, why did I come ? Now, what am I 
going. to say to them ? " - 

Passing- through the first drawing-room, he met the 
Countess Bohl at the door, who, with a perplexed and 
severe face, was giving orders to a servant. When she 
saw Levin, she smiled, and invited him to walk into a 
small parlor, where voices were heard. In this room 
were sitting her two daughters and a Muscovite colonel 
whom Levin .knew. Levin joined them, passed the 
usual compliments, and sat down near a divan, holding 
his hat on his knee. 

" How is your wife? Have you been to the concert? 
We were not able to go. Mamma had to attend the 
requiem," said one of the young ladies. 

"Yes, I .heard about it — what a sudden death!" — 
said Levin. 

The countess came in, sat down on the divan, and 
asked also about his wife and the concert. 

Levin replied, and asked some questions about the 
sudden death of Madame Apraksin. 

" But then, she was always in delicate health." 

" Were you at the opera yesterday ? " 

"Yes, J .was." * 

" Lucca was very good." 

"Yes, very good," he said ; and he began, seeing that 
it was entirely immaterial to him what they thought 
about him, to repeat what he had heard a hundred times 
about the singer's extraordinary talent. The Countess 
Bohl pretended that she was listening. Then, when he 
had said all he had to say, and relapsed into silence, the 
colonel, who had hitherto held his peace, began also to 



ANNA KARENINA 233 

speak. The colonel also talked about the opera and 
about an illumination. Then, saying something about a 
supposititious folle journte at Turin, the colonel, laugh- 
ing, got up, and took his departure. Levin also got up, 
but a look of surprise on the countess's face told him 
that it was not yet time for him to go. Two minutes 
more at least were necessary. He sat down. 

But, as he thought what a foolish figure he was cut- 
ting, he was more and more incapable of finding a* sub- 
ject of conversation. 

"Are you going to the public meeting?" asked the 
countess. " They say it will be very interesting/' 

" No, but I promised my belle-sceur that I would call 
for her there," replied Levin. 

Silence again ensued; the mother exchanged a look 
with her daughter. 

" Now it must be time to go," thought Levin ; and 
he rose. The ladies shook hands with him, and charged 
him with mille choses for his wife. 

The Swiss, as he put on his shuba for him, asked his 
address, and wrote it gravely in a, large, handsomely 
bound book. 

".Of course, it's all the same to me; but how useless 
and ridiculous it all is ! " thought Levin, comforting him- 
self with the thought that every one did the same thing, 
and he went to the public meeting of. the committee, 
where he was to find his sister-in-law to bring her home 
with him. 

At the public meeting of the committee there was a 
great throng of people, and society was well represented. 
Levin reached the place just in time to hear a sketch 
which all said was very interesting. When the reading 
of the sketch was finished, society came together, and 
Levin met Sviazhsky, who invited him to come that very 
evening to a meeting of the Society of Rural Economy, 1 , 
at which a very important report was to be read. He 
also met Stepan Arkadyevitch, who had just returned 
from the races, and many other acquaintances, and 
Levin talked much and heard many opinions relating to 

1 Obshchcstvo siehkava khozyaislva. 



234 ANNA KARENINA 

the meeting- and the new piece and the lawsuit. But 
apparently in consequence of his weariness and the 
strain which he began to feel, he made a blunder in 
speaking of a'certain lawsuit, andthis blunder he after- 
ward remembered with annoyance. Speaking of the 
recent punishment of a foreigner, who had been tried in 
Russia, and that it would have been irregular to punish 
him by exile, Levin repeated what r he had 'heard the 
evening before in a conversation with a friend of his. 

" I think that to send him abroad is just the same as to 
punish a fish by throwing "it into the water,"- said Levin. 

Too' late he remembered that this comparison which 
he put forth to express his thought, though he had heard 
his friend use it, was really taken from a fable by Krui- 
lof, and that his friend had taken it from the fenilletoii 
of a newspaper. 

Returning home with his sister-in-law, and finding 
Kitty well and happy, Levin went to the club. 



CHAPTER VII 

Levin reached the club very punctually. A number 
of the guests and members arrived there at the same 
time as he did. Levin had not been at the club very 
recently, indeed, not since the time when; having finished 
his studies at the university, he passed a winter at Mos- 
cow, and went into society. He remembered the club 
in a general sort of way, but had entirely forgotten the 
impressions which, in former days, it had made upon 
him. But as soon as Jie entered the great semicircular 
dvor, or court, sent away his izvoshchik, and mounted the 
steps andsaw the liveried Swiss noiselessly open the door 
for him, and bow as he ushered him in; as soon as he 
saw in the cloak-room the galoshes and shubas of the 
members,* who felt that it was less work to take them off 
down-stairs; and leave them with the Swiss, than to wear 
them up-stairs ; as soon as he heard the well-known 
mysterious sound of the bell, and as soon as he mounted 
the easy flight of carpeted stairs and saw the statue on 



'ANNA KARENINA 235 

the landing, and on the upper floor recognized the third 
Swiss in his club livery, who, having grown older, dis- 
played neither dilatoriness nor haste in opening the door 
for him, he once more felt the old-time impression of the 
club — the atmosphere of comfort, ease, and good- 
breeding. 

"Your hat, if you please," said the Swiss to Levin, 
who had forgotten the rule of the club to leave hats at 
the cloak-room. 

" It 's a long time since you were here," said the 
Swiss. "The prince wrote to you yesterday. Prince 
Stepan Arkadyevitch has not come yet." 

The Swiss knew not only Levin, but all his connec- 
tions and family, and took pleasure in reminding him 
of his relationships. 

Passing through the first connecting "hall" and the % 
conversation-room at the right where the fruit-dealer 
sits, Levin, who walked faster than the old attendant, 
entered the dining-room, which was filled with a noisy 
throng. He made his way along by the tables, almost 
all of which were occupied. As he looked about him 
on all sides, he saw men of the most heterogeneous 
types, old and young, most of them acquaintances and 
many of them friends. It seemed as if all of them had 
-left their cares and worries with their hats in the cloak- 
room, and had collected together to make the most of 
the material advantages of life. There were Sviazhsky 
and Shcherbatsky and Nevyedovsky and the old prince 
and Vronsky and Sergyef Ivanovitch. 

" Ah, why are you late ? " said the prince, with a smile, 
extending his hand to his son-in-law over his shoulder. 
"How is Kitty?" added he, putting a corner of his 
napkin into the button-hole of his waistcoat. 

" She is well, and is dining with her sisters." 

" Ah ! the old gossips ! Well, there 's no room with 
us. Go to that table there and get a seat as quickly as 
you can .... " said the prince, taking with care a plate of 
ukha, or soup made of lotes. 

"Here, Levin," cried a jovial voice from a table a 
little farther away. 



236 ANNA KARENINA 

It was Turovtsuin. He was sitting with a young 
officer, and near him were two chairs tilted up. Levin, 
with joy, went to join him. He always liked the good- 
hearted, prodigal Turovtsuin;' his reconciliation with 
Kitty was connected with him, and now, especially, 
after all his wearisome intellectual conversations, the 
sight of his jolly face was delightful. 

"These places were for you and Oblonsky. He will 
be here directly/' said Turovtsuin; and then he intro- 
duced Levin to the young officer, who held himself very 
straight and had bright, laughing eyes, — Gagin, from 
Petersburg. 

" Oblonsky is always late." 

" Ah ! here he is." 

" You have only just come, have n't you ? " asked 
^Oblonsky of Levin, hurrying up to him. "■ Your health. 
Will you take vodka? Come on, then." 

Levin got up, and went with him to a large table, on 
which all kinds of liquors and a most select zakuska 
were set out. It would seem as if the two dozen differ- 
ent kinds of drinks might have offered a choice, but 
Stepan Arkadyevitch thought good to ask for a special 
concoction, which a servant in livery hastened to get for 
him. They drank it from small glasses, and then re- 
turned to their places. 

At the very first, even while they were eating their 
ukha, Gagin had champagne served, and he ordered the 
four glasses filled. Levin did not refuse the wine when 
it was offered to him, and he in turn ordered a bottle. 

He was hungry, and ate and drank with great satis- 
faction ; and with still greater satisfaction took part in 
the gay and lively conversation of his neighbors. Gagin, 
lowering his voice, told a new Petersburg anecdote ; 
and, though it was indecorous and ridiculous, it was so 
funny that Levin laughed uproariously, till those around 
him looked at him in surprise. 

"That is in the same kind as 'Alas, I cannot endure 
it/ " quoted Stepan Arkadyevitch. " Do you remember ? 
AkhVit was lovely! Bring us another bottle," said he 
to the lackey, and he began to tell an anecdote. 



ANNA KARENINA 237 

"Piotr Ilyitch Vinovsky sends these," interrupted a 
little old lackey, addressing Stepan Arkadyevitch, and 
bringing two diminutive glasses of bubbling champagne, 
and offering them to Oblonsky and Levin. Stepan 
Arkadyevitch took the glass, and,- exchanging glances 
with a bald, ruddy, mustachioed man, at the other end of 
the table, nodded to him and smiled. 

" Who is that ? " asked Levin. 

" You met him at my house once, don't you remem- 
ber ? He 's a very good fellow." 

Levin followed Oblonsky's * example, and took his 
glass. Stepan Arkadyevitch's anecdote was also very 
diverting. Then Levin had his story to tell, and it 
likewise raised a laugh. Then the - conversation turned 
on horses, and the races that had taken place that day, 
and they told how brilliantly Vronsky's trotter, Atlasnui, 
had won the first prize. 

"Ah, here they are!" said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
toward the end of the dinner, turning round in his chair 
to extend his hand to Vrorisky, who was walking with a 
tall colonel of the Guards. Vronsky's face was also 
radiant with the good-natured gayety that reigned in the 
club. He leaned his elbow on Oblonsky's shoulder, and 
whispered some words in his ear with an air of good- 
humor,, and extended his hand with a friendly smile to 
Levin. 

" I am very glad to. meet you," said he. " I looked 
for you after the elections, but they told me you had 
gone." 

"Yes! I went away the same day We have just 

been speaking of your trotter. It was a very fast 
race." 

" Yes, it was. Have n't you race-horses, too ? " 

"I ? No. My father had horses, and I know about 
them." 

"Where did you dine ?•" asked Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

"At the second table, behind, the columns." 

" He has been loaded down with congratulations. It 's 
very pretty ....a second imperial prize. I wish, I could 
only have the same luck at play, as he does with horses. 



238 ANNA KARENINA 

Now ! how they waste golden time ! I am going to the 
Infernalnaya," said the tall colonel ; and he left theiji. 

" That's Yashvin," said Vronsky to Turovtsuin ; and 
sat down in a vacant place near them. Having drained 
the glass of champagne which was filled for him, he also 
ordered a bottle. Either from the effect of the wine 
which he had drunk, or from the social atmosphere of 
the club, Levin talked cordially with him about the best 
breeds of cattle, and was happy to feel no more hatred 
against his former rival. He even told him, among other 
things, that he had heard from his wife of the meeting 
which had taken place at the house of the Princess 
Mary a Borisovna. 

"Akh! the Princess Marya Borisovna? She's a 
charmer ! " exclaimed Stepan Arkadyevitch ; and he 
told an anecdote of the old lady which made every one 
laugh. Especially Vronsky laughed so heartily that 
Levin felt perfectly reconciled to him. 

"Well, gentlemen, have we finished?" said Oblonsky, 
getting up and smiling. "Then let us go." 



CHAPTER VIII 

On leaving the table Levin, in company with Gagin, 
walked through the lofty rooms to the billiard-room, and 
he felt that his walk was singularly straight, and that his 
hands moved easily. In the large "hall" he met his 
father-in-law. 

" Well ! How do you like our Temple of Indolence ? " 
asked the old prince, taking his son-in-law by the arm. 
" Come, take a turn." 

" I should like to look around. It is interesting." 

" Yes, to you ; but my interest in it is different from 
yours. When you see old men like that," said he, indi- 
cating a member of the club who, with stooping shoul- 
ders and falling lip, was slowly shuffling along in soft 
boots across the hall, "you would think that they were 
born shliupiks." - 

" Why do you call them ' little sloops * ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 239 

"Here you are, and don't know what that means! 
That is our club term. You know how eggs roll. Well, 
when any one goes with a gait like that, he becomes a 
shliupik. And so when any one of us goes stumbling 
through the club, he becomes a shliupik. You laugh, 
do you ? but one has to look out else he finds himself 
one. Do you know Prince Chechensky?" he asked; 
and Levin saw by his face that he was going to tell 
some ridiculous yarn. 

" No, I don't know him." 

"Well, no matter. Prince Chechensky is famous. 
Well, that is neither here nor there. He 's always play- 
ing billiards. Three years ago he wasn't among the 
shliupiks, but was a great galliard ! He himself called 
other people shliupiks. Only he came one time .... but 
our Swiss — you know Vasili, our tall one? — he is a 
great boninotist. Prince Chechensky asks him, 'Well, 
Vasili, is any one here yet ? have any shliupiks come ? ' 
And Vasili answers, ' You are the third.' Now, brother ! 
how is that?" 

The two men walked on, chatting, and greeting their 
friends, and passed through all the rooms, — the main 
room, where men accustomed to one another as partners 
were playing cards for small stakes; the divan-room, 
where others were having games of chess, and SergyeT 
Ivanovitch was talking with some one; the billiard-room, 
where, in the bay of the room, around a divan, a gay 
party, among them Gagin, had gathered and were drink- 
ing champagne. They glanced in also at the Infernal- 
naya, where, at the gambling-table, Yashvin, surrounded 
by men betting, was already established. With hushed 
voices, they entered the reading-room, where, under a 
shaded lamp, a young man with a stern face was turn- 
ing over the leaves of one journal after another, while 
near by was a bald-headed general absorbed in reading. 
They passed quietly into a room which the prince called 
the Hall of the Wits, 1 and there they found three gen- 
tlemen talking politics. 

"Prince, we're all ready, if you please," said one 

1 Umnaya Komnata^ the intellectual room. 



2 4 o ANNA KARENINA 

of his partners, finding him there. And the prince 
joined them. r 

Levin sat down, and listened to the three gentlemen, 
but, as he recalled all the conversations of the same kind 
he had heard since morning, he felt excessively bored. 
He got up, and went off to, find Turovtsuin and 
Oblonsky, who were sure to be gay. 

Turovtsuin was with the champagne-drinkers on the 
high divan in the billiard-room, and Stepan Arkadyevitch 
and Vronsky were talking in a corner near the door. 

"Not that she finds it tedious," Levin heard in pass- 
ing; "but it's the uncertainty, the indefiniteness of her 
position. " 

He was about to pass on discreetly, but Stepan 
Arkadyevitch called him. 

" Levin/' said he ; and Levin saw that there were in 
his eyes, not exactly tears, but moisture, as was always 
the case, either after he had been drinking, or when 
he was touched ; and just now it was both; " Levin, 
don't go;" and he took him by the arm, and detained 
him. "He is my sincere, if not my best, friend," said 
he, addressing Vronsky. "You, too, are more like a 
kinsman and a friend to me. I want to bring you 
together, and see you friends. You ought to be good 
friends, because you are both good men." 

"There's nothing left for us but to give the kiss of 
friendship," said Vronsky, gayly, offering his hand to 
Levin, who pressed it cordially. 

"I am very, very glad," said Levin. 

" Waiter, a bottle of champagne ! " cried Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. 

" I am also very glad," said Vronsky. 

But, in spite of Oblonsky's desires, and their mu- 
tual satisfaction, they had nothing to say, and both 
knew it. 

"Do you know, he doesn't know Anna?" remarked 
Oblonsky,; " and I want to introduce him to her. Come 
on, Levin." 

' "Is it possible?" said Vronsky. "She will be very 
much pleased. I should beg you to come at once, but 



ANNA KARENINA 241 

I am troubled about Yashvin, and I want to stay here 
till he has finished playing." 

" Is he going to lose? " 

"All he has, I am the only one who has any influ- 
ence over him," said Vronsky. 

" What do you say, Levin, shall we have a game of 
pool? First-rate," said Stepan Arkadyevitch. "Place 
the pyramid," said he, addressing the marker. 

" It is all ready," replied the marker, who had some 
time before put the balls in the triangular frame, and 
had placed the red ball in readiness to break the 
pyramid. 

"Well, then, go ahead." 

After their game, Vronsky and Levin sat down at 
Gagin's table, and Levin, at Stepan Arkadyevitch's 
instance, began to bet on the aces. Vronsky sat down 
for a time at the same table, where his acquaintances 
kept coming up and joining him; then, after a time, he 
went to the Infernalnaya to find out how Yashvin was get- 
ting along. Levin felt a pleasant sense of exhilaration 
after the intellectual weariness of the morning. He was 
pleased to have his unfriendly feelings toward Vronsky 
ended, and the impression of restfulness, good-fellow- 
ship, and comfort still remained by him. 

When the game was ended, Stepan Arkadyevitch 
took Levin's arm, saying: — 

" Well ! let us go to see Anna. We need n't wait for 
Vronsky. What say you ? She is at home. I promised 
her to bring you a long time ago. Where were you go- 
ing this evening ? " 

" Nowhere in particular. I only told Sviazhsky I 
would go to the Society of Rural Economy. But I '11 
go with you, if you wish." 

" Excellent ! let us go, then. See if my carriage has 
come," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, addressing a lackey. 

Levin went to the desk, paid the forty rubles which 
he had lost at cards, in some mysterious way gave his 
fee to the old lackey who was standing by the door, and 
went through the long rooms down to the entrance. 
vol. in. — 16 



242 ANNA KARENINA 



, CHAPTER IX 

" Oblonsky's carriage ! " cried the Swiss, in a porten- 
tous voice. 

The carriage came up, and the two friends got in. 
Only as long as the carriage was still in the courtyard 
did Levin continue to experience the feeling of clubbish 
comfort, of satisfaction, and of indubitable decorum, 
which had surrounded him. But as soon as the car- 
riage rolled out on the street, the jolting over the un- 
even pavement, the cries of an angry izvoshchik whom 
they met, and the sight of the red sign of a low public 
house and some shops lighted up, caused this impression 
to fade awayi and he began to think over what follies he 
had committed, and to ask himself if he were doing right 
in going to see Anna. What would Kitty say ? Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, as if he had divined what was passing in 
the mind of his companion, cut short his meditations. 

"How glad I am/' said he, "that you are going to 
know her ! You- know Dolly has been wishing it for a 
long time. * Lvof goes to her house, too. Though she 
is my sister," continued Stepan Arkadyevitch, " I am 
bold enough to say that she is a remarkable woman. 
You will see if. Her position is very hard, especially 
just now." 

" Why do you say ' especially now ' ? " 

" We are negotiating with her husband for a divorce, 
and he is willing ; but there are difficulties on account 
of the son ; and this matter, which ought to have been 
settled long ago, is dragging on now these three months. 
As soon as the divorce is granted, she will marry Vronsky. 
— How stupid it is, this old habit of dizziness, * Isaiah re- 
joice/ in which no one believes, and which destroys the 
happiness of people," exclaimed Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
interrupting what he was saying. Then he went on, 
" and then her position will become as regular as yours 
or mine." 

" Where does the difficulty lie ? " 

"Akh! it is a long and tiresome story; everything is 



ANNA KARENINA 243 

so undecided. But this is the point : she has been wait- 
ing three months for that divorce here in Moscow, where 
everybody knows her and him ; and she does n't see a 
single woman but Dolly, because, don't you see, she 
does n't wish that any one should come to see her from 
pity. What do you think? That fool of a Princess 
Varvara left her because she considered it irregular. 
Any other woman than Anna would not have found 
resources in herself; but you shall see how she lives, 
how dignified and calm she is. — To the left, at the cor- 
ner opposite the church," cried Oblonsky to the coach- 
man, leaning out of the window. " Fu, how hot it is ! " 
he added, throwing open "his shuba in spite of twelve 
degrees of cold. 

"Well, she has a daughter, hasn't she, to take up 
her time and attention ? " 

"You seem to imagine every woman to be only a 
setting-hen, tine couveuse" said Stepan Arkadyevitch. 
" Why, yes, of course, she gives her time and attention 
to her daughter ; but she does n't make any fuss about it. 
She is occupied mainly with her writing. I see you smile 
ironically, but you are wrong. She has written a book 
for young people. She has n't spoken of it to any one, 
except to me ; and I showed the manuscript to Vorkuyef, 
the publisher .... you know he is a writer himself, it seems. 
He is up in such matters, and he says that it is a remark- 
able thing. Do you think that she sets up for a blue- 
stocking? Not at all. Anna is, above all things, a 
woman with a heart, as you will see. She has in her 
house a little English girl and a whole family, and is 
looking after them." 

" What ? Some philanthropical scheme ? " 

" Here you are immediately trying to turn it into 
something absurd ! It is not for philanthropy's sake, 
but because she loves to do it. They had — that is, 
Vronsky had — an English trainer, a master in his call* 
ing, but a drunkard. He did nothing but drink — de- 
lirium tremens — and abandoned his family. Anna saw 
them, helped them, got drawn in more and more, and 
now has the whole family on her hands. I don't mean 



a 4 4 ANNA KARENINA 

merely by giving them money. She herself teaches the 
boys Russian, so as to fit them for the gymnasium ; and 
she has taken the little girl home with her. Well, you 
shall see her." 

At this moment the carriage entered a courtyard. 
Stepan Arkadyevitch rang at the door before which 
they had stopped, and, without inquiring whether the 
mistress of the house was at home, went into the vesti- 
bule. Levin followed him, more and more uneasy as to 
the propriety of the step he was taking. 

He saw, as he looked at himself in the glass, that he 
was very red in the face ; but he knew that he was not 
tipsy. He went up the carpeted stairs after Oblonsky. 
On the second floor a servant received them with a bow ; 
and Stepan Arkadyevitch, as if he were a connection, 
asked him, "Who is with Anna Arkadyevna?" and 
received the answer : — - 

" Mr. Vorkuyef." 

"Where are they?" 

" In the library." 

They passed through a small, wainscoted dining-room, 
and walking along on the thick carpet they came to the 
library, dimly lighted by a single lamp with a huge shade. 
A reflector-lamp on the wall threw its rays on a full-length 
portrait of a woman, which instantly attracted Levin's 
attention. It was the portrait of Anna, painted by Mi- 
kha'riof in Italy. While Stepan Arkadyevitch went on, 
and the man's voice, which had been heard, ceased speak- 
ing, Levin stood looking at the portrait which shone down 
from its frame, and he could not tear himself away. He 
forgot where he was ; and, not hearing what was said, 
he kept his eyes fixed on the wonderful portrait. It was 
not a painting, but a living, beautiful woman, with her 
dark, curling hair, bare shoulders and arms, and a pen- 
sive half-smile on her lovely lips, and gazing at him tri- 
umphantly and yet tenderly from her entrancing eyes. 
Only because it was not alive did it seem more beautiful 
than life itself, r 

" Ya otclien rada — I am very glad," said a voice, sud- 
denly, behind him; evidently addressed to him, — the 



ANNA KARENINA 245 

voice of the same woman whom he admired in the 
picture. 

It was Anna, who had been concealed by a lattice- 
work of climbing plants, and who rose to receive her 
visitor. And in the dusk of the library Levin recog- 
nized the original of the" portrait, in a simple dark blue 
gown, not in the same position, not with the same ex- 
pression, but with the same lofty beauty which had been 
represented by the artist in the painting. She was less 
brilliant in the reality, but the living woman had a new 
attraction which the portrait lacked. 



CHAPTER X 

She advanced to meet him, and did not conceal the 
pleasure which his visit caused her. With the ease and 
simplicity which Levin recognized as characteristic of a 
woman of the best society, she extended to him a small, 
energetic hand, introduced him to Vorkuyef, and called 
his attention to a light-complexioned r and pretty little 
girl — her pupil, she said — who was seated with her 
work near the table. 

" I am very, very glad," she repeated ; and in these 
simple words, spoken by her, Levin found an extraordi- 
nary significance. " I have known you and liked you 
for ever so long, both because of your friendship with 

Stiva and because of your wife I knew her a very 

short time, but she gave tne the impression of a flower, 
a lovely flower. And to think! she will soon be a 
mother ! " 

She talked freely and without haste, occasionally look- 
ing from Levin to her brother, and Levin was conscious 
that the impression which he produced was excellent, 
and he immediately felt perfectly at his ease with her 
and on the simplest and most friendly terms, as if he 
had known her from childhood. 

To Oblonsky, who asked if smoking was allowed, she 
replied : — 

' " That is why we have taken refuge in Aleksefs study ; " 



246 ANNA KARENINA 

and, looking at Levin, instead of asking " Do you 
smoke? " she held over a tortoise-shell cigar-case to him, 
and took a cigarette herself. 

" How are you to-day ? " asked her brother. 

n Pretty well ; a little nervous, as usual/' 

11 Isn't it extraordinarily good ? " said Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, noticing Levin's admiration of the portrait. , 

" I never saw a better portrait." 

"An extraordinary likeness, is n't it?" added Vorkuyef. 

Levin looked from the portrait to the original. Anna's 
face lighted up with a peculiar glow as she felt conscious 
of his eyes resting on her. He blushed, and, to conceal 
his confusion, was just going to ask her when she had 
seen Darya Aleksandrovna. But at that instant Anna 
said : — 

" Ivan Petrovitch and I were talking just now of 
Vashchenkof's pictures. Do you know them ? " 

" Yes ; I have seen them," answered Levin. 

" But I beg your pardon .... you were just going to ask 
me something ? " 

Levin asked whether she had seen Dolly lately. 

" She was here yesterday. She was indignant at what 
happened to Grisha at the gymnasium. It seems his 
Latin teacher was unfair to him." 

41 Yes ; I saw the pictures. They pleased me very 
much," said Levin, returning to the topic which they 
had begun to talk about. 

What Levin now said was entirely free from' the tech- 
nical formality with which he had talked in the morning. 
Every word of the conversation with her seemed to be 
significant. And pleasant as it was to talk with her, it 
was still pleasanter to listen to her. Anna talked not 
only naturally and intelligently, but, though intelligently, 
still without pretense, not arrogating any great importance 
to her own thoughts but attributing great importance to 
what her friends said. 

The conversation turned on the new tendencies of art 
and on some new illustrations to the Bible which a 
French artist had recently made. 

Vorkuyef severely criticized the realism which the 






ANNA KARENINA 247 

artist carried to brutality ; Levin remarked that the 
French had carried conventionality in art to greater 
lengths than any other people, and that, therefore, they 
found especial merit in the reaction toward realism. 
They discovered poetry in the fact that they no longer 
lied. 

Never had Levin said a clever thing which gave him 
anything like the pleasure that this did. Anna's face 
grew suddenly bright, as the full force of his remark 
dawned on her. She laughed. 

"I am delighted," she said; "just as you are when 
you see a very lifelike portrait. What you just said is 
characteristic of all French art at the present time — 
painting and even literature : Zola, Daudet. But pos- 
sibly this is always the way that men form their 
conceptions from imaginary, conventional figures, but 
afterward — all the combinaisons made, the imaginary 
figures weary, and people begin to invent more natural 
and truthful figures/' 

"That is perfectly true," said Vorkuyef. 

" Have you been to the club ? " asked Anna, turning 
to her brother. 

" Yes, yes, here is a genuine woman/' said Levin to 
himself, forgetting himself, and gazing steadily into her 
handsome, mobile face, which now suddenly changed 
its expression. Levin did not hear what she was talk- 
ing about as she bent over toward her brother, but he 
was struck by the change in her expression. Beautiful 
as it had been before in repose, it now suddenly as- 
sumed a mixed expression of curiosity, wrath, and pride. 
But this lasted for only one minute. She half closed 
her eyes, as if she were trying to remember something. 

" However, this is interesting to no one," said she, 
and she addressed the English girl in English. "Please 
order the tea in the drawing-room." 

The girl rose and went out. 

" Well, has she passed the examination ? " asked 
Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

" Perfectly. She is a very capable girl, and a lovely 
character." 



a 4 8 ANNA KARENINA 

"You will end by loving her better than your own 
daughter." 

" That's just like a man. In love, there is' no such a 
thing as more or less. I love my daughter in one way, 
and this girl in another." 

"I tell Anna Arkadyevna," said Vorkuyef, "that if she 
would spend a hundredth part of the activity she devotes 
to this little' English girl for the benefit of Russian chil- 
dren, what a service her energy would render. She 
would accomplish prodigies." 

" Now there ! What you want, I can't do ! Count 
Alekse'f Kirillovitch " — she glanced with an air of timid 
inquiry at Levin as she pronounced this name, and he 
involuntarily responded by a look which was encourag- 
ing, and full of admiration - — "used to encourage me, 
when we were in the country, to visit the schools. . I 
went <a few times. They were very pleasant, but I 
could n't get interested in this occupation. You talk of 
energy ; but the foundation of energy is love, and love 
does not come atwill; So I love this little English girl, 
but I really don't know why." 

She looked at Levin again ; and her smile and her 
look all told him that she spoke only with the aim of 
gaining his approval, though sure in advance that they 
understood each other. 

* " I agree with you thoroughly," cried he. " You can't 
put your heart into schools and such things, and I think 
that from the same reason philanthropic institutions gen- 
erally give such small results." 

She was silent a moment, then she smiled. "Yes, 
yes," she replied, " I never could. Je n*ai pas le cceur 
assez large to love a whole asylum of wretched little 
girls, cela ne m' a Jamais r/ussi. Women only do it to win 
for themselves position socia/e. Even now, when I have 
so much need of occupation," added she with a sad, con- 
fiding expression, addressing Levin, though she was 
speaking to her brother, "even now I cannot." Then, 
suddenly. frowning, — and Levin saw that she frowned 
because sh6 had begun to speak of herself) — she 
changed the subject. 



ANNA KARENINA 249 

" I know about you," said she, smiling at Levin; "you 
have the reputation of being only an indifferent citizen, 
but I have always defended you as well as I could." 

" How have you defended me ? " 

"That has depended on the attacks. But suppose 
we have some tea," said she. She rose and took a 
morocco-bound book which was lying on the table. 

" Give it to me, Anna Arkadyevna," said Vorkuyef, 
pointing to the book, "it is well worth while." 

" No ; it 's all so unfinished ! " 

" I have told him about it," remarked Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, indicating Levin. 

" You were wrong. My writings are like those little 
baskets and carvings made by prisoners, which Liza 

Myertsalova used to sell She managed the prisons 

for our society," said she, turning to Levin. "Those 
unfortunates used to do perfect miracles of patience." 

Levin was struck by still a new feature in this remark- 
able, fascinating woman. Besides wit, grace, beauty, 
she had sincerity. She did not wish to conceal the 
thorns of her situation. As she said that she sighed, and 
her face suddenly assumed a stern expression, as if 
it were changed to stone. With this expression on her 
face, she was even more beautiful than before. But 
that expression was new; it was entirely alien to that 
which a few moments before had seemed to irradiate 
happiness, and which the artist had managed to repro- 
duce in the portrait. Levin looked once more at the 
portrait and at the original of it, while Anna took her 
brother's arm, and a feeling of tenderness and pity came 
over him, surprising even himself. She let the two 
gentlemen pass into the parlor, and remained behind to 
speak to Stiva. 

"What is she talking with him about ? — the divorce ? 
Vronsky ? what he was doing at the club ? about me ? " 
thought Levin ; and he was so stirred that he heard 
nothing that Vorkuyef was saying to • him about the 
merits of the story for children which Anna Arkadyevna 
had written. 

During tea, a pleasant conversation full of ideas was 



250 ANNA KARENINA 

carried on. There seemed to be no lack of subjects at 
any moment ; but it was felt that there was time to say 
all that any one wanted to say, and each was willing to 
listen when the other talked. And all that was said, not 
only by Anna herself, but by Vorkuyef and by Stepan 
Arkady evitch, had a special significance, thanks to her 
interested attention and her pertinent remarks; so at 
least it seemed to Levin. 

All the time they were talking' Levin studied her, and 
admired her beauty and the cultivation of her mind, and 
not less her perfect simplicity and naturalness. He lis- 
tened and talked, and all the time thought about her and 
her inner life, and tried to penetrate her feelings; and 
he, who had formerly criticized her so severely, now by 
some strange train of thought justified her and pitied 
her, and confessed to himself the fear that Vronsky did 
not wholly understand her. 

It was more than eleven o'clock when Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch rose to go. Vorkuyef had already left some 
time before. Levin rose, too, but with regret. He felt 
as if he had only just come. 

" Prashcha'ite — farewell/' said Anna to him, holding 
his hand in hers, and looking into his eyes with a fas- 
cinating look. " I am glad que la glace est rompue" 

She let go his hand, and her eyes twinkled. 

" Tell your wife that I love her as I have always done; 
and, if she cannot forgive me my position, tell her how 
I hope she may never' pardon me ; for to pardon, it is 
necessary to understand what I have suffered ; and God 
preserve her from that ! " 

MYes! I will surely tell her," answered Levin, and 
the color came into his face. 



CHAPTER XI 

"What a wonderful, lovely, and pitiable woman! 1 ' 
thought Levin, as he went out with Stepan Arkadyevitch 
into the cold night air. 

"There! what did I tell you?" demanded Obion- 



ANNA KARENINA i S i 

sky, as he saw that Levin was perfectly overcome. 
"Wasn't I right?" 

"Yes," answered Levin, thoughtfully, "an extraordi- 
nary woman! Not only intellectual, but she has a won- 
derfully warm heart. What a terrible pity it is about 
her!" 

" Now, thank God, all will soon be arranged, I 
hope. Well, after this, don't form hasty judgments," 
said Stepan Arkadyevitch, opening his carriage-door. 
" Proshchai — farewell; we go different ways." 

Levin went home, never ceasing to think about Anna, 
recalling the smallest incidents of the evening, bringing 
back all the charm of her face, and understanding her 
situation better and better, and, at the same time, feel^ 
ing the deepest commiseration for her. 

When he reached his house, Kuzma told Levin that 
Katerina Aleksandrovna was well, and that her sisters 
had but just left her. He handed him at the same time 
two letters. Levin, as he stood in the vestibule, ran 
through them at once so as not to be distracted after- 
ward. One was from his superintendent, Sokolof. 
Sokolof wrote that he had not found a purchaser who 
would give more than five and a half rubles for the 
wheat, and that he could not raise the money elsewhere. 
The other letter was from his sister. She reproached 
him because her affairs were not yet regulated. 

" Well, we '11 sell for five rubles and a half if they 
won't give more," thought he, settling with extraordinary 
promptness the first question which had been troubling 
him. 

" It is wonderful how the time here is occupied," he 
said to himself, thinking of the second letter. He felt 
that he was to blame toward his sister, because he had 
not yet accomplished what she had asked him to do for 
her. " To-day I did not get to the court either, but I did 
not have a moment's time." And, making up his mind 
that he would surely go the next day, he went to his 
wife's room. On his way, he cast a quick glance back 
at his day. There had been nothing except conversa- 



252 ANNA KARENINA 

tions, — conversations in which he had listened, and in 
which he had taken part. No one of the subjects 
touched on would have, occupied him when in the coun- 
try, but here they were very interesting. And all the 
conversations in which he had engaged were good ; only 
in two places they were not absolutely good, — one was 
his remark about the fish at the club, the other was 
something intangibly wrong in his feeling of tender 
pity for Anna. 

Levin found his wife sad and absent-minded. The 
dinner of the three sisters had been merry ; but after- 
ward they had waited and waited for him, and the 
evening had seemed long to them ; and now Kitty was 
alone. 

" Well, what have you been doing ? " she asked him, 
looking at him, as she did so, with a suspicious light in 
her eyes ; but she took good care to conceal her inten- 
tions, so as not to prevent him from telling her the 
whole story, and with an encouraging smile she listened 
as he told her how he had spent the evening. 

" Well, I met Vronsky at the club, and I am very glad 
of it. I felt very much at my ease with him, and enjoyed 
it. Of course, I shall try to avoid him, but still henceforth 
I shan't feel that awkwardness in his society." As he 
said these words, he remembered that in order not to 
"avoid him," he had immediately gone to Anna's house, 
and his face grew red. "Here we say the peasantry 
drink; but I don't know which drink more, the peas- 
antry, or men in society. The peasantry drink on fes- 
tival days, but.... " < 

Kitty was not interested in the question how much the 
peasantry drink. She saw her husband's face grow red, 
and she wanted to know the reason. 

"Well, where else did you go ? " 

" Stiva insisted on my going with him to Anna Arka- 
dyevna's," answered he, blushing more and more, and his 
doubts as to the propriety of his visit to Anna were de- 
cided for him. He now knew that he ought not to have 
done so. 

Kitty's eyes opened wide and flashed lightning at the 



ANNA KARENINA 253 

mention of Anna ; but she restrained herself, and, con- 
cealing her emotion, she misled him. 

She merely said, "Ah!" 

"You are not going to be vexed because I went? 
Stiva begged me to go; and Dolly wanted me to." 

"Oh, no!" said she; but in her eyes he saw a look 
which boded little good. 

" She is a very charming woman, who is very much 
to be pitied, a good woman," continued Levin ; and he 
described the life which Anna led, arid gave her message 
of remembrance to Kitty. 

"Yes, of course she is to be pitied," said Kitty, when 
he had finished. " Whom did you get a letter from ? " 

He told her, and, misled by her apparent calmness, 
went to undress. 

When he came back, he found Kitty in the same arm- 
chair. When he approached, she looked at him, and 
burst into tears. 

" What is it ? What 's the matter ? " he asked, with 
some annoyance ; for he understood the cause of her 
tears. 

" You are in love with that horrid woman. She has 
bewitched you. I saw it in your eyes. Yes, yes ! What 
will be the end of it ? You were at the club ; you drank 
too much; you gambled; and then you went — where! 
No ! this shall not go on. We must leave. I am going 
home to-morrow ! " 

It was long before Levin could pacify his wife ; and 
when at last he succeeded, it was only by acknowledg- 
ing that his feeling of pity for Anna, together with the 
wine, had clouded his brain, and that he had fallen 
under her seductive influence, and by promising that he 
would avoid her. What he acknowledged with more 
sincerity was the ill effect produced on him by this idle 
life in Moscow, passed in eating, drinking/ and gossip- 
ing. They talked till three o'clock in the morning. 
Only when it was three o'clock were they sufficiently 
reconciled to go to sleep. 



254 ANNA KARENINA 

i j 

CHAPTER XII 

After having said good-by to her visitors, without 
sitting down Anna began to walk up and down the full 
length of her apartments. 

Of late she had got into the habit of unconsciously 
doing all she could to attract young men to her ; and 
so this whole evening she had striven to awaken a feel- 
ing of love in Levin. But though she knew that she 
had succeeded in doing this as far as it was possible 
with a chaste married man, and though he pleased her 
very much,. — and in spite of the sharply defined dis- 
similarity between Vronsky and Levin, she as a woman 
was able to detect the subtile likeness between them 
which had caused Kitty to be in love with them both, — 
yet as soon as he had left the room she ceased to think 
about him. 

One thought and one only in various guises followed 
her: — 

" Why, since I have so evidently an attraction for 
others, — for this married man, who is in love with his 
wife, — why is he so cold to me?.... Yet not exactly cold; 
he loves me, I know; but lately something new has 
come between us. Why has he spent the whole eve- 
ning away? He told Stiva that he could not leave 
Yashvin, but had to watch him while he played. Is 
Yashvin a baby ? It must be true ; he never tells lies. 
But, there's something else back of it. He is glad of 
the chance to show me that he has other duties. I 
know this. I don't object to it, but what need has he 
to assert it so ? He wants to show that his love for me 
must not interfere with his independence! But the 
proof is not necessary. I must have his love. He 
ought to understand the wretchedness of the life I lead 
here in Moscow. Why am I living ? I am not living, 
— only dragging out life, in hope of a turn in affairs, 
which never, never comes. And Stiva says that he 
can't go to Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch. And I can't write 
again. I cannot do anything, I can't begin anything, 



ANNA KARENINA 255 

or make any changes, but only control myself, wait, 
and invent amusements — this English family, my read- 
ing, my writing; but it is all only to deceive myself, 
like this morphine. He ought to be sorry for me," she 
said, feeling how the tears of pity at her own lot filled 
her eyes. . . 

She heard the door-bell Vronsky rang violently ; and 
instantly she wiped away her tears, not only wiped 
away the "tears, but sat down near the lamp with a book, 
and pretended to be calm. She felt that she must show 
her dissatisfaction because he had not returned as he 
had promised, but not to let her grief be seen. She 
might pity herself, but Vronsky must not be allowed to 
pity her. She did not want a contest, she blamed him 
because he wanted to quarrel, but she herself involun- 
tarily took the attitude of an opponent. 

"Well! you weren't lonely, were you?" said he, 
briskly and cheerfully, as he came toward her. j " What 
a terrible passion gambling is." 

" No, I was not lonely. I long ago learned not to 
be lonely. Stiva and Levin have been here to see me." 

" Yes, I knew that they intended to come. Well, and 
how do you like Levin ? " he asked, as he sat down near 
her. 

"Very much. They have only just gone. How 
about Yashvin ? " 

" He had won seventeen thousand rubles. 'I got him 
away, but he escaped from me, and went back again ; 
and now he's losing." 

"But why did you abandon him?" said Anna, sud- 
denly raising her eyes to his. The expression of her 
face was cold and unpleasant. " You told Stiva that 
you were going to stay, to bring him away. Now you 
abandon him! " 

" In the first place, I did not send any message to 
you ; in the second place, I never tell lies ; and chiefly, 
I wished to stay and I stayed," he answered angrily. 
"Anna, why, why do you do so?" added he, after a 
moment's silence, holding out his hand to her, in the 
hope that she would place hers in it. 



256 ANNA KARENINA 

She was glad of this appeal to her love, but some 
strange spirit of evil prevented her front yielding. 

" Of course you stayed because you wanted to ; you 
always do as you please. But why tell me so ? What 
is the good?" answered she, growing more and more 
heated. "Who. denies that you tell the truth? You 
wish to justify yourself, do so then ! " 

Vronsky drew back his hand, and his face became 
more set than before. 

■1 For you this is a matter of obstinacy," she cried, 
looking at him fixedly, and suddenly finding the term by 
which to call the expression of his face which exasper- 
ated her — "sheer obstinacy. For you the question is 
to see whether you will win the victory over me. But 
the question for me .... " and again the sense of her piti- 
able lot came over her, and she almost sobbed. "If 
you knew what it meant for me when I feel, as I do 
now, that you hate me, .... yes, hate me ! If you knew 
what it meant for me ! If you knew how near I am to 
horrible misfortune at these moments! how I fear.... 
how I fear for myself," — and she turned away to hide 
her sobs. 

"But what's all this for?" said Vronsky, alarmed at 
this despair, and leaning toward Anna to take her hand 
and kiss it. "Do I seek outside diversion? Don't I 
avoid the society of women ? " 

" As if that were all ! " said she. 

"Well! Tell me what I must do to make you con- 
tent. I am ready to do anything that you may be 
happy," said he, moved to see her in such despair. 
" What would I not do to spare you such grief, Anna ! " 
he said. 
r "It 's nothing, nothing," she replied. " I myself don't 

know. It 's the loneliness : it 's my nerves There, let 's 

not talk about it any more Tell me what happened 

at the races. Why have n't you told me about it ? " she 
asked, attempting to conceal the pride she felt at her 
victory, for she knew it rested with her. 

Vronsky asked for some supper, and as he was eat- 
ing described to her the incidents of the races; but 



ANNA KARENINA 257 

from the sound of his voice, and from his glance, that 
grew colder and colder, she saw that he would not for- 
give her for the victory, that the sense of obstinacy 
which she had struggled to overcome was as firm in 
him as ever. He was colder toward her than before, 
as if he regretted having yielded to her. And as she 
remembered the words that won her the victory, espe- 
cially the words, " How near I am to horrible misfor- 
tune, and I fear for myself," she realized that it was a 
dangerous weapon, and that she must never employ it 
again. But she felt that along with the love which 
united them, there stood between them an evil spirit of 
conflict which she had not the power to drive from his 
heart, and still less from her own. 



CHAPTER XIII 

There are no imaginable conditions to which a man 
cannot accustom himself, especially if he sees that all 
those who surround him are living in the same way. 

Three months before Levin would not have believed 
that he could have slept tranquilly under the conditions 
in which he found himself at the present time, — that 
living an aimless, unprofitable life, spending more than 
his income, getting tipsy, — for he could not call his 
experience at the club anything else, — his absurd inti- 
macy with a man with whom his wife had once been 
in love, and his still more absurd visit to a woman whom 
it was impossible to regard as respectable, and after the 
fascination which she had exerted over him and the 
mortification which he had caused his wife — that under 
all these conditions he could sleep serenely. But under 
the influence of his weariness, the long hours without 
a nap, and the wine which he had drunk, he slept soundly 
and serenely. 

At five o'clock the noise of an opening door wakened 
him. He sat up and looked around; Kitty was not in 
bed next him. But behind a screen there was a light 
moving, and he heard her steps. 
vol. in. — 17 



258 ANNA KARENINA 

" What 's the matter ? " he asked, still only half awake. 
" Kitty, what is it ? " 

"Nothing/* answered she, coming from behind the 
screen with a candle in her hand, and smiling at him 
with a peculiarly sweet and significant smile ; " I don't 
feel quite well." 

"What! Is this the beginning? Must we send?" 
exclaimed he in alarm, and he began to dress as quickly 
as possible. 

" No, no," said she, smiling, and holding his hand ; 
"it's nothing; I did not feel quite well; it's all right 
now. ?? 

Going back to bed, she put out the light, and lay 
down again, keeping perfectly still, although her very 
stillness and the way she, as it were, held her breath, 
were suspicious, and still more so the expression of pe- 
culiar tenderness and alertness with which, as she came 
out from behind the screen, she said to him, "it's noth- 
ing " ; still, he was so overcome by drowsiness that he 
immediately went to sleep again. 

It was only afterward that he realized the calmness 
of her spirit, and appreciated all that was passing in 
her dear, gentle heart as she lay thus motionless near 
him, awaiting the most solemn moment of a woman's life. 

About seven o'clock he was awakened by her hand 
touching his shoulder and her low whisper. She appar- 
ently hesitated between the fear of waking him and the 
wish to speak to him. 

" Kostia, don't be afraid, it's nothing; but I think.... 
Lizavyeta Petrovna had better be called." 

The candle was again lighted. She was sitting on 
the bed, holding the knitting on which she had been at 
work during the last few days. 

" Please don't be alarmed. I 'm not in the least 
afraid," said she, seeing her husband's terrified face; 
and she pressed his hand to her breast, then to her lips. 

Levin leaped from his bed, and, unconscious of him- 
self, without taking his eyes off his wife for a moment, 
hurried on his dressing-gown. It was necessary for 
him to go, but he could npt tear himself away. Dearly 



ANNA KARENINA 259 

as he loved her face, well as he knew her expression, 
her eyes, yet never before had he seen her look as she 
did then. How ugly and horrible did he now seem as 
he saw her now, and remembered the mortification which 
he had caused her the evening before ! Her flushed 
face, with the clustering soft curls escaping from under 
her nightcap, was radiant with joy and resolution. 

Natural and simple as Kitty's character in general 
was, Levin was amazed by what unfolded itself before 
him now, when suddenly all the curtains were withdrawn, 
and the very essence of her soul shone in her eyes. 
And in this simplicity and revelation, she, her very self, 
whom he loved, was more apparent than ever. She 
looked at him, and smiled. But suddenly her brows 
contracted, she lifted her head, and, coming to him, took 
his hand, and clung to him, sighing painfully. She 
suffered, and yet she seemed to pity him for her suffer- 
ings. At first, as he saw this silent suffering, it seemed 
to him that he was to blame for it. But in her look 
there was tenderness which told him that she not only 
did not blame him, but that she loved him all the more 
for her suffering. 

" If not I, who, then, is to blame for this ? " he asked 
himself. She suffered, and she seemed to take pride 
in her pain, and to rejoice in it. He saw that in her 
soul some beautiful transformation was taking place ; 
but what? he could not understand. It was above his 
comprehension. 

" I have sent for mamma. Now go quick, and get 
Lizavyeta Petrovna .... Kostia .... it 's nothing .... it is all 
over." 

She went to the other side of the room, and rang the 
bell. 

"There, now, please go. Pasha is coming; I want 
nothing." And Levin, with astonishment, saw her take 
up her work again. 

As he went out of one door, he heard Pasha, the maid, 
come in at the other. He paused on the threshold and 
listened as Kitty gave directions for arranging the room, 
and as she herself began to move the bed. 



260 ANNA KARENINA 

He dressed, and when he had ordered his carriage, 
since it was too early for izvoshchiks, he flew up to her 
room again, not on tiptoes, but on wings, as it seemed 
to him. Two maids were busily engaged in moving 
something in the room. Kitty was walking up and 
down, knitting swiftly, slipping the knots, and giving 
directions. 

" 1 'm going for the doctor immediately. Lizavyeta 
Petrovna has been sent for, but I will call there. There 's 
nothing more, is there? Oh, yes, — Dolly." 

She looked at him, evidently without hearing what he 
said. "Yes, yes, go," said she, and motioned to him 
with her hand. He was just passing through the draw- 
ing-room, when he heard a groan, pitiful, but instantly 
suppressed. He stood still, and could not make up his 
mind. 

" It is she," he said to himself ; and, putting his hands 
to his head, he rushed out. 

" Lord have mercy on us ! pardon us ! save us ! " he 
exclaimed ; and these words, which suddenly and unex- 
pectedly came to his lips, were not spoken merely by 
his lips, unbeliever though he was. 

Now at this instant, he knew perfectly well that all 
his doubts and the impossibility which his reason found 
in belief, had not the slightest influence to prevent him 
from addressing himself to God. Everything of this 
sort now vanished like dust from his soul. To whom 
could he address himself if not to Him in whose hands 
he felt were held himself, and his soul, and his love ? 

The horse was not yet ready, but, feeling the special 
strain of physical powers unemployed, and of the work 
before him calling for his attention, he started on foot 
so as not to lose a single instant, and ordered Kuzma 
to follow him. At the corner of the street he met a 
night, izvoshchik hurrying along. In the little sledge 
sat Lizavyeta Petrovna, in a velvet cloak, with her head 
wrapped up in a kerchief. " Thank God ! " J he mur- 
mured, as he saw with joy her pale little face, which had 
a peculiarly serious, and even stern, expression. Not 

1 Slava Bohu. 



ANNA KARENINA 261 

ordering the driver to stop, he ran along with it back to 
the house. 

" Only two hours ? not more ? V asked Lizavyeta Pe- 
trovna. " You may speak to Piotr Dmitritch, but don't 
hurry him. Yes, please get some opium at the apothe- 
cary's." 

" Do you think all will go on well ? " asked he. " God 
help us ! - he added, as he saw his horse starting from 
the door ; he got into the sledge alongside of Kuzma, 
and ordered him to hurry to the doctor's. 



CHAPTER XIV 

The doctor was not yet up ; and a servant, who was 
busy cleaning the lamps, announced that his master had 
gone to bed late, and had given orders not to be waked, 
but would be up before long. 

The lackey was polishing lamp-chimneys and seemed 
very much absorbed in this occupation. At first this ab- 
sorption of the lackey in his lamp-chimneys, and his in- 
difference to what was going on at home, made Levin 
indignant; but on reflection he realized that no one knew 
anything about it or was obliged to share in his feelings, 
and that consequently it was incumbent on him to be 
calm, reasonable, and firm, so as to break down that 
wall of indifference, and attain his end. 

" I must not spoil matters by haste," said Levin to 
himself, feeling all the time a growing intensity of 
physical energy and concentration on what was before 
him. 

Now that he knew that the doctor was, not up, and 
had given orders not to be disturbed, Levin thought 
over several plans which presented themselves to him, 
and finally decided on the following : to send Kuzma 
with a note to another doctor, to go himself to the apothe- 
cary's for the laudanum, and, if on his return the doctor 
was not up, then either by bribery or by main force, if 
the man would not consent, to waken the doctor at any 
cost. 



262 ANNA KARENINA 

At the apothecary's, the lean clerk, with the same in* 
difference as the lackey cleaning the lamp-chimneys had 
shown, put a seal on the powders for the waiting coach- 
man, and refused to deliver the opium. Striving not to 
get impatient or angry, and mentioning the doctor and 
midwife by name, and telling what it was needed for, 
Levin pleaded with him. The clerk asked his employer 
in German if it should be permitted, and, receiving a 
favorable reply from behind the screen, he proceeded to 
get out a bottle and a funnel, and slowly poured the 
liquid from it into a smaller vial, pasted on a label, 
sealed it, and in spite of Levin's urgency not to do so, 
was even going to wrap it up. This Levin could not 
endure ; he resolutely snatched the vial out of the clerk's 
hands, and rushed through the great glass doors. 

The doctor was still asleep ; and, this time, the ser- 
vant was shaking the rugs. 

Levin, leisurely getting from his pocket a ten-ruble 
note, and dwelling on his words, but not wasting time, 
gave him the money, and explained that Piotr Dmitri- 
evitch — how great and significant now seemed this 
hitherto unimportant Piotr Dmitrievitch — had prom- 
ised him to be on hand at any time, so that he would 
certainly not be angry, and 1 that, therefore, he must 
instantly awaken him. 

The lackey consented, and went up-stairs and showed 
Levin into the reception-room. 

Levin could hear in the next room. how the doctor 
coughed, walked about, washed his face and hands, and 
made some remark. 

Three minutes passed; it seemed to Levin that it 
was more than an hour. He could no longer contain 
himself. 

" Piotr Dmitrievitch ! Piotr Dmitrievitch ! " he cried, 
through the opened door, in a beseeching voice. " For 
God's sake, forgive me. Let me come in just as you 
are. It has been more than two hours now." 

" I '11 be out immediately," replied a voice, and Levin 
to his surprise knew by the sound of the doctor's voice 
that he was smiling as he spoke. 



ANNA KARENINA 263 

"Just for one little minute." 

" I '11 be out immediately." 

Two minutes more went by, while the doctor was 
putting on his boots, and another two minutes while he 
was brushing his hair and putting on his coat. 

" Piotr Dmitrievitch," Levin was just saying once 
more ; but at that instant the doctor came in, all ready 
dressed and with his hair brushed. 

" These people have no hearts," thought Levin. " He 
can brush his hair, while we are dying." 

" Good morning! " said the doctor, entering the recep- 
tion-room serenely, and offering to shake hands. "Don't 
feel anxious. Well, how is it ? " 

Levin began at once a long and circumstantial ac- 
count, filled with a crowd of useless details, and inter- 
rupted himself at every moment to urge the doctor to 
set out. 

"Yes, but you must not be anxious. You see you 
don't know. I really am not needed yet ; still I have 
promised, and I assure you I '11 go. But there 's no 
hurry. Please sit down; won't you have some coffee?" 

Levin looked at him, with a questioning look, asking 
with his eyes if he were not laughing at him ; but the 
doctor was in serious earnest. 

" I know, I know," added the physician, smiling ; " I 
myself am a family man, and we husbands cut a sorry 
figure in such cases. The husband of one of my pa- 
tients always, on such occasions, goes off to the stable." 

"But do you think, Piotr Dmitrievitch, — do you 
think she '11 get on well ? " 

" All the indications point to a fortunate issue." 

"Won't you come at once?" said Levin, looking 
with angry eyes at the servant who was bringing the 
coffee. 

" Within an hour." 

" For God's sake ! " 

"Well, let me take my coffee." 

The doctor proceeded to take his breakfast. Both 
were silent. 

" It seems the Turks are beating. Did you read the 



264 ANNA KARENINA 

telegram last evening?" asked the doctor, biting into 
a roll. 

" No; but I 'm going/' said Levin. "Will you come 
in a quarter of an hour?" 
, " Make it a half." 

"On your honor?" 

When Levin got home, he found the princess at the 
door, and they went to Kitty's room together. The 
princess had tears in her eyes, and her hands trembled. 
When she saw Levin, she threw her arms round him, 
and kissed him. 

"How is it, Lizavyeta Petrovna, dearie," 1 said she, 
seizing the midwife's hand as she came to meet them 
with a radiant but solicitous face. 

." It is going well," said she; " It would be well for 
her to lie down. Try to persuade her. She would find 
it easier." 

Ever since Levin, on waking, had understood the 
situation, he had made up -his mind, without indulging 
in anxious thought, or forebodings, crushing down all 
his anxieties and feelings, firmly, without worrying his 
wife, but, on the contrary, calming her and sustaining 
her courage, that he would endure what was "before 
him. Not allowing himself even to think of what was 
coming or how it might end, judging by answers to 
his questions, how long it generally lasted, Levin in his 
imagination prepared to have patience and hold his 
heart in, his hands for five hours, and this seemed to 
him within the limit of possibility. But when he re- 
turned after his visit to the doctor's, and found Kitty 
still suffering, again he cried more and more frequently, 
"Lord, forgive us, and be merciful!" and he was afraid 
that he could not endure it, so terrible was it to him; 
thus an hour went by. 

And after this another hour passed, and a second, and 
a third, and the five which he had set as the very ulti- 
mate limit of his endurance ; and the situation was still 
the same, and still he was enduring the suspense, because 
there was nothing else to do except endure, thinking 

1 Dushenkay little soul. 



ANNA KARENINA 265 

every moment that he had reached the last limit, and 
that his heart would burst with his agony. But the 
minutes still went by, hours and hours, and his feelings 
of agony and horror kept growing worse and more un- 
endurable. All the ordinary conditions of life, without 
which it is impossible to take cognizance of anything, 
ceased to exist for Levin. He lost all consciousness of 
time. Now the minutes when she called him to her and 
he held her moist hand, which at one time would press 
his with extraordinary force, and again push him away, 
seemed hours ; then again the hours would seem to him 
minutes. 

He was surprised when Lizavyeta Petrovna asked 
for a light, and he learned that it was five o'clock 
in the evening. If they had told him that it was only 
ten o'clock in the morning, he would have been just as 
much surprised. Where the time had gone, what he 
had done, where he had been, he could not have told. 
Sometimes he saw Kitty's flushed face, now troubled 
and piteous, then calm and almost smiling, as she tried 
to reassure him. Then he saw the princess, flushed with 
anxiety, her gray curls in disorder, swallowing down her 
tears and biting her lips to keep from crying. He had 
also seen Dolly, and the doctor smoking great cigar- 
ettes, and Lizavyeta Petrovna, with a calm, serious, but 
reassuring look, and the old prince, pacing the dining- 
room with a frowning face. But how they came and 
went, and where they had been, he could not tell. 

The princess had been with the doctor in Kitty's room, 
then in the library, where a well-set table had appeared ; 
then she disappeared, and Dolly was in her place. 

Then Levin remembered that they sent him somewhere ; 
he moved a divan and a table zealously, thinking it was 
for her sake; and only when it was done did he learn 
that they were preparing his own bed for the night. 

He was sent to the library to ask the doctor some- 
thing; the doctor replied, and then began to speak of 
the disorders of the duma, or town-council. Then they 
sent him to the princess's bedchamber to get a holy 
image made of silver, with a golden trimming, from 



266 ANNA KARENINA 

there ; and, with the aid of an old chambermaid of the 
princess's, he climbed up to get it from the cabinet; 
and, in doing so, broke a little lamp, and the old woman 
consoled him for this accident, and encouraged him about 
his wife. And he had carried the image to Kitty, and 
placed it at. her head, carefully arranging it behind her 
pillow. But where, when, and why all this was done 
was more than he could tell. 

Neither did he comprehend why the old princess took 
him by >the hand, and, looking at him compassionately, 
begged him to calm himself; or why Dolly tried to per- 
suade him to eat something, and led him from the room ; 
or why even the doctor looked at him gravely and sym- 
pathetically, and offered him a pill. 

He knew and felt conscious only that what was occur- 
ring was like that which had occurred the year before at 
the hotel of the government city, by the death-bed of 
his brother Nikolaf. That was grief, this was happiness. 
But that grief and this happiness were in the same way 
outside of the ordinary conditions of life ; were in this 
peculiar life, as it were, the loopholes through which 
appeared something higher. And in exactly the same 
way, while the hard, painful event was accomplishing 
before him, in exactly the same way incomprehensible, 
his soul, at the contemplation of this loftiness, raised 
itself to a height which he had never before dreamed 
possible, and whither his reason could not follow. 

" Lord, have mercy and aid us," he kept repeating, in 
spite of his long lack of practice, and yet feeling that he 
was addressing God with the same simplicity, the same 
confidence, as in his childhood and early youth. All 
this time he seemed to be leading two separate exis- 
tences ; one was away from Kitty, with the doctor smok- 
ing one fat cigarette after another, and knocking the 
ashes off against the rim of the unemptied ash-tray ; or 
with Dolly and the old princess, who insisted on talking 
about dinner, politics, or the illness of Marya Petrovna, 
and with whom Levin suddenly, for an instant, would 
forget entirely what was taking place, and feel wide 
awake; and the other was in her presence, by her bed- 



ANNA KARENINA 267 

side, where his heart felt as if it would burst, and it 
almost did break with compassion, and where he did not 
cease to pray to God. 

And every time when he would be aroused from 
momentary oblivion by a cry coming from her chamber, 
he would fall under the same strange delusion as had at 
the first moment taken possession of him ; every time he 
heard the cry he would spring to his feet, hasten to 
her room, and on the way remember that he was not to 
blame, and would long to protect and help. And as he 
looked on her, he would see that there was no help to 
be given her; and again the pity would seize him, and 
he would pray, " Lord, forgive and help us ! " 

And in proportion as the time passed by, the stronger 
became the two conditions of mind, — he would be 
calmer at one moment, perfectly oblivious of her, while 
remaining out of her presence, and then again the more 
painful would become his sympathetic torments and the 
feeling of helplessness before them. He would spring 
to his feet, feel the impulse to escape somewhere, and 
hasten to her. 

Sometimes when she would keep calling for him he 
would reproach her ; but, seeing her submissive, smiling 
face, and hearing her words, " I have tired you out," he 
would reproach God ; but, remembering what God was, 
he would beg for pardon and aid. 



CHAPTER XV 

He did not know whether it was late or early. The 
candles had already burned down. Dolly had just come 
into the library, and was proposing to the doctor to lie 
down. Levin had been sitting there listening to the doc- 
tor's story of the charlatanry of magnetizers, and look- 
ing at the ash at the end of his cigarette. It was one of 
the moments of rest, and he was oblivious. He had en- 
tirely forgotten what was taking place. He listened to 
the doctor, and followed him understandingly. 

Suddenly was heard a cry unlike anything he had 



268 ANNA KARENINA 

ever heard. This cry was so terrible that Levin did 
not even stir, but, holding his breath, he looked at the 
doctor with eyes full of questioning terror. 
1 The doctor bent his head, as if to hear better, and 
smiled with an air of approbation. Levin had reached 
the point where nothing could surprise him ; and he 
said inwardly, " Evidently that must be so ; but why 
that cry ? " He went back to the Sick-room on tiptoe, 
passed round by Lizavyeta Petrovna and the princess, 
and stood in his place by the bedside. The cry had 
ceased, but evidently there was some change. What, 
he did not know, and did not care to know. But he 
saw it by the grave expression of Lizavyeta Petrovna's 
pale face. Her face was stern and pale, and just as 
resolute as ever, although her lower jaw trembled a 
little. Her eyes were kept steadily fixed on Kitty. 
Her flushed, tortured face, with the little tufts of hair 
clinging to it, was turned toward him, and her eyes 
sought his. She raised her hand and tried to take his. 
When once she had got hold of it, she tried with her 
moist hand to press it to her forehead. 

"Don't go, don't go ! I am not afraid," said she, 
quickly. " Mamma, take away my ear-rings ; they 

annoy me You aren't afraid ? .... Lizavyeta Petrovna, 

quick, quick ! " — She spoke rapidly, and tried to smile ; 
but suddenly her face grew convulsed, and she pushed 
him away. "This is terrible! I shall die, I shall die! 
go ! go ! " Then came the same unearthly cry. 

Levin seized his head in r his hands, and rushed from 
the room. 

"That/is nothing; all is going well," said Dolly, fol- 
lowing after him*. 

But, whatever they might say, he knew that now all 
was lost ! Leaning his head against the lintel, he stood 
in the adjoining room and listened to screams and 
moaning — such sounds as he had never heard before, 
and he knew that what was making such animal : like 
noise was she who had once been Kitty. He had long 
ceased to care about the child. He now hated that 
child. He even went so far as not to wish for Kitty 



ANNA KARENINA 269 

to live, provided only her horrible agonies might be 
ended. 

" Doctor, what does that mean ? My God ! V he said, 
seizing the doctor's arm as he went in. 

" It is the end," replied the doctor ; and his face was 
so serious, as he said this, that Levin thought he meant 
that Kitty was dead. 

Not knowing what would become of him, he went 
back to the bedroom. 

What he first saw was Lizavyeta Petrovna's face ; it 
was even more than before portentous and stern. It 
was no longer Kitty's face that was there ; in the place 
where it had been before, there was something terrible 
both by reason of the agony which contracted it, and by 
reason of the sound that came from it. He bowed his 
head against the wooden frame of the bed, feeling that 
his heart would burst. The awful shriek still continued, 
it grew more piercing than ever, as if the last limit of 
horror had been reached. Then suddenly the shriek 
ceased. He could not belieye it, but he could not 
doubt; and he heard a gentle rustling and a quick 
breathing, and his wife's living, loving, happy voice 
whispered, " Kanetchna — It is over ! " 

He raised his head. As she lay there, beautiful with 
a supernatural beauty, with her arms nervelessly resting 
on the counterpane, she looked at him, and tried to 
smile at him, but could not. 

Coming suddenly out of that mysterious and terrible 
world where he had been living for twenty-two hours, 
Levin felt himself transported back into his ordinary 
every-day world of luminous happiness, and he could 
not bear it. The cords long tense snapped. He burst 
into tears ; and the sobs of joy which he could not fore- 
see shook his whole body so violently that he could not 
speak. 

He knelt beside Kitty, and pressed his lips on her 
hand, and her gentle fingers answered his caress. And 
meantime, at the foot of the bed, in the skilful hands of 
Lizavyeta Petrovna, like the small, uncertain flame of a 
lamp, flickered the life of a human being, which just 



270 ANNA KARENINA 

before had not been, and* which with every right and 
every responsibility would live, and propagate its kind. 

"He lives, he lives! Yes, it is a boy! Don't be 
worried," Levin heard Lizavyeta's voice saying, while 
with a trembling hand she slapped the little one's back. 

" Mamma, is it true ? " asked Kitty. 

And the princess's sobs answered her. 

And amid the silence, like an indubitable answer to 
the young mother's questions, was heard a voice, abso- 
lutely different from the subdued voices speaking in the 
room. It was the bold, decided, imperious, almost im- 
pertinent cry of the new human being, which had come 
whence no one knew. 

Just before, if Levin had been told that Kitty was 
dead, that he himself had died with her, and that their 
children were angels, and that they were all in the pres- 
ence of God, he would not have been surprised. -And 
now that he had come back to reality, it took a prodig- 
ious effort of thought to comprehend that his wife was 
alive, that she was doing well, and that this desperately 
screeching creature was his son. Kitty was saved, her 
suffering was passed, and he was inexpressibly happy. 
That he could understand, and it made him happy ; but 
the child ! Whence ? Why ? What was it ? .... He could 
not wont himself to the thought of it. It seemed to him 
somehow too much, too overwhelming ; and it was long 
before he became accustomed to it. 



CHAPTER XVI 

The bid Prince Sergyel Ivanovitch and Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch met at Levin's the next morning, about ten 
o'clock, and after they talked about the little mother, 
they began to converse about irrelevant topics. Levin 
listened to them, and involuntarily remembering what 
had taken place, what had been going on that morning, 
he also remembered what he himself had been but a 
few hours before. 

It was as if a hundred years had passed since then. 



ANNA KARENINA 271 

He felt that he was on some unattainable height from 
which he endeavored to descend to. their level, that he 
might not offend those with whom he was talking. While 
talking about indifferent things, he was thinking of his 
wife, of the state of her health, and of his son, to the 
idea of whose existence he was trying to accustom him- 
self. The whole world of womanhood, which had taken 
on a new and incomprehensible significance to him, even 
after his marriage, occupied such a lofty place, that he 
could not begin to realize it. He heard the men talking 
about their dinner at the club; but he was thinking, 
" What is she doing now ? Is she asleep ? How is 
she ? What is in her mind ? Is the son Dmitri cry* 
ing?" And, in the midst of the conversation, in the 
midst of a sentence, he sprang up, and left the room. 

"Send word down if I may see her," said the old prince. 

"Very good.... I will at once," replied Levin, and 
without pausing he went to her room. 

She was not asleep, but was softly talking with her 
mother, making plans about the christening. 

With clean clothes and with her hair brushed, she 
lay comfortably arranged in bed, with her hands rest- 
ing on the counterpane, and a mob-cap with blue rib- 
bons on her head, and as her eyes met his she drew 
him to her by their look. Her face lighted up more and 
more brightly as he approached her. There was in it 
that change from the earthly to the superhuman calm 
which one sees in death, but, instead of a farewell, she 
welcomed him to a new life. Again an emotion, like 
that which he had felt during her agony, seized his 
heart. She took his hand, and asked him if he had 
slept. 

He could not answer, but turned his head away, yield- 
ing to his weakness. 

" I have had a nap, Kostia," she said; " and I feel so 
well now." 

She looked at him, and suddenly the expression of 
her face changed. She heard her baby cry. 

" Give him to me, Lizavyeta P etrovna, and let me 
show him to his father," she said. 



272 ANNA KARENINA 

"There, now, let" papa look," said Lizavyeta Petrovna, 
taking up and exhibiting something red, strange, and 
wobbling. " Wait, we must change it first/' and Liza- 
vyeta Petrovna deposited this red and wobbling some- 
thing on the bed, and proceeded to unswathe it and 
then swathe it again, lifting and turning it over with one 
finger, and shaking some kind of powder over it. 

Levin, as he looked at the poor little bit of humanity, 
tried in vain to discover within his soul some paternal senti- 
ments toward it. His only feeling was one of repulsion ; 
but when they took off its things, and he saw its little tiny 
delicate arms and legs, still saffron-colored, and its still 
tinier fingers, and even a thumb differentiated from the 
others, and when he saw Lizavyeta Petrovna handling 
its little, waving arms, just as if they were delicate 
springs, and putting them into linen garments, such pity 
seized him, and such terror lest she should hurt it, that 
he made a gesture to stop her. 

Lizavyeta Petrovna laughed. 

" Never fear, never fear," she said. 

When the child was dressed, and metamorphosed into 
a regular doll, Lizavyeta Petrovna tossed him up and 
down, as if proud of her work, and held him off so that 
Levin might see his son in all his beauty. 

Kitty, not taking her eyes from him, was alarmed. 

" Give him to me, give him to me," she cried ; and 
she even lifted herself up. 

" But, Katerina Aleksandrovna, you must know that 
any such motions are forbidden. Be patient; I will 
give him to you. But we must let papasha see what a 
fine young man we are." 

And Lizavyeta Petrovna handed to Levin with one 
hand — the other supported the limp occiput — this 
strange, weak, red creature, whose head fell limply on 
its swaddling-clothes. All that was to be seen of it was a 
nose, a pair of eyes that looked in two directions, and 
smacking lips. 

" Prekrasnui rebyonok — a splendid baby," said Liza- 
vyeta Petrovna. 

Levin drew a deep breath of mortification. This 



ANNA KARENINA 273 

splendid baby inspired him only with a feeling of pity 
and disgust. It was not at all the feeling that he 
expected. 

He turned away while the nurse placed it in Kitty's 
arms. Suddenly a laugh caused him to raise his head. 
It was Kitty who laughed; the baby had taken the 
breast. 

"There! that's enough, that's enough," said Liza- 
vyeta Petrovna ; but Kitty would not let go of her son, 
who had gone to sleep on her arm. 

" Look at him now," said she, turning the child so 
that his father might see him. The little old face sud- 
denly grew still more wrinkled, and the child sneezed. 

Levin, smiling and hardly able to restrain his tears 
of tenderness, kissed his wife, and left the room. 

The feelings which this little being awakened in him 
were entirely different from what he had expected! 
There was neither pride nor joy in the feeling, but 
rather a new and painful fear. It was the consciousness 
that he had become vulnerable in a new way. And this 
consciousness at first was so acute, his fear lest this poor, 
defenseless creature might suffer was so poignant, that 
it drowned the strange feeling of thoughtless joy, and 
even pride, that rose in his heart when the infant 
sneezed. 



CHAPTER XVII 

The affairs of Stepan Arkadyevitch had reached a 
critical stage. 

The money brought by the sale of two-thirds of the 
timber had long ago been spent, and he had obtained 
from the merchant at a discount of ten per cent a large 
part of the remaining third in advance. Now the mer- 
chant would not advance anything more ; as Dolly, for 
the first time in her life asserting her rights to her per- 
sonal property, had refused her signature to the contract 
when it was proposed to give a receipt for the sale of 
the last third of the wood. All the salary was used up 

VOL. III. — l8 



274 ANNA KARENINA 

for household expenses, arrd for the payment of unavoid- 
able debts. There was absolutely no money to be had. 

It was disagreeable and awkward, and Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch felt that it ought not to be continued. The reason of 
it, in his opinion, lay in the fact that he got too small a 
salary. The place which he Held had been very good 
five years before, but it was so no longer. Petrof, the 
director of a bank, got twelve thousand ; Sventitsky, a 
member of the Council, got seventeen thousand ; Mitin, 
the head of a bank, got fifty thousand. 

" Apparently I have been asleep, and they have for- 
gotten me," said Stepan Arkadyevitch to himself; and 
he began to keep his eyes and ears open ; and at the 
end of the winter he discovered a very good place, and 
matured his attack upon it, beginning at Moscow through 
his uncles, his aunts, and his friends, and then, when 
the time seemed ripe in the spring, he himself went 
down to Petersburg. 

It was one of those lucrative sinecure places which 
nowadays are found, varying in importance, worth any- 
where from iooo to 50,000 rubles a year. This place 
was in the Commission of the Consolidated Agency for 
the Mutual Credit-Balance of the Southern Railway 
and Banking Establishments. This place, like all such 
places, required at once such varied talents and such 
extraordinary activity, that it was hard to find them united 
in one person ; but since it was hopeless to find any one 
with all these qualities, it was certainly better that the man 
put in should be an honest rather than a dishonest man. 

Now Stepan Arkadyevitch was an honest man in 
every sense of the term ; for in Moscow the word chest- 
nui, meaning honest, has two significations, depending 
on its accent. They speak of an honest agent, an honest 
writer, an honest journal, an honest institution ; and it 
means not only that men or institutions are not dishonest, 
but that they know how to adapt themselves to circum- 
stances. Stepan Arkadyevitch belonged in Moscow to 
that class of people who used that convenient word; 
and, as he passed for honest, he therefore felt that he 
had a better right than any one else to that place. 



ANNA KARENINA 



275 



This place was worth from 7000 to 10,000 rubles a 
year ; and Oblonsky could accept this position, and not 
resign his present duties. Everything depended on two 
ministers, a lady, and two Jews ; and, although they 
were ready to grant what he wished, he had to go to 
Petersburg to solicit their aid. Moreover, he faithfully 
promised Anna that he would obtain from Karenin a 
decisive answer about the divorce, and, having extorted 
fifty rubles from Dolly, he set* out for Petersburg. 

Sitting in Karenin's library and listening to his ex- 
position of a project for reforming the status of Russian 
finance, Stepan Arkadyevitch waited as patiently as he 
could till he might put in a word about his personal 
affairs and about Anna. 

"Yes! That is very true," said he, when Aleksei 
Aleksandrovitch took off the pince-nez without which 
he could not read now, and looked inquiringly at his 
brother-in-law ; " that is very true in detail ; but never- 
theless, the leading principle of our age is liberty." 

"Yes, but I advocate another principle which embraces 
freedom," replied AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, accenting 
the word "embraces," and putting on his pince-nez to 
read over the passage where he had said that very 
thing. 

And, turning over the pages of his elegantly written 
manuscript, with its wide margins, he again read the 
concluding paragraph : — 

" ' For if I sustain the protectionist system, it is not 
for the advantage of private individuals, but for the 
general good, for all classes alike, both low and high ; ' 
and it is that which they will not understand/' added 
he, looking over his pince-nez at Oblonsky, " absorbed as 
they are in their personal interests, and so easily satisfied 
with phrases." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch knew that when Karenin began 
to speak of what was said and done by those who were 
opposed to his views, and who were the source of all 
evil in Russia, he was nearing the end ; and so he will- 
ingly renounced his "principle of liberty," and agreed 
with him. AlekseY Aleksandrovitch came to a pause, 



276 ANNA KARENINA 

and turned over the leaves of his manuscript with a 
thoughtful air. 

"Oh, by the way," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, " I wanted 
to ask you, in case you should meet Pomorsky, to say a 
little word to him for me ; that I should very much like 
to be appointed a member of the Commission of the 
Combined Agencies of the Mutual Credit-Balance of 
the Railways of the South." To Stepan Arkadyevitch 
the name 1 of this positfon which was so dear to his 
heart was already very familiar, and he could rattle it 
off with great rapidity and without making a mistake. 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch asked what the functions of 
this new commission were to be, and then he reflected. 
It seemed to him that the existence of this commission 
was directly opposed to his projects of reform. But as 
the operations of this commission were very complicated, 
and his own projects of reform occupied a very vast 
field, he felt that he could not settle this question at a 
glance, and, taking off his pince-nez, he said : — 

" Without doubt I could speak to him ; but why are 
you especially desirous to have this place?" 

" The salary is good, — nine thousand rubles, — and 
my means.... " 

" Nine thousand rubles ! " repeated AlekseY Aleksan- 
drovitch, and he frowned. The high emolument of this 
position reminded him that Stepan Arkadyevitch's sup- 
posititious function was directly opposed to the principal 
feature of his projects, which always inclined to economy. 

" I believe, and I show in my pamphlet, that in our 
day these enormous salaries are signs of the defective- 
ness of the economic assiette of our administration/* 

" Yes ; but what would you have ? " said Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. " Now let us see ! A bank director gets 
ten thousand, he is worth it ; or an engineer gets twenty 
thousand. These are not sinecures." 

" I .opine that salaries are payments for merchandise, 
and ought to be subject to the law of supply and demand. 
If salaries are not subject to this law, — if, for example, 

1 Cklen komissii ot soytdinennava agcnstva kreditno-vzaimnava balansa 
yuzhno-zheleznuikh dorog. 



ANNA KARENINA 277 

I see two engineers of equal capacity, having pursued 
the same studies at the institute, one receiving forty 
thousand rubles, while the other contents himself with 
two thousand ; or if I see a hussar, who has no special 
knowledge, become director of a bank with a phenomenal 
salary, I conclude that these salaries are fixed, not in 
accordance with the law of supply and demand, but by 
sheer partiality. And so, here is an abuse, great in itself 
and disastrous in its influence on the imperial service. I 
opine .... " 

Stepan Arkadyevitch made haste to interrupt his 
brother-in-law : — 

"Yes, but you agree that a new and undoubtedly 
useful institution has been opened. It's a live thing, 
and it is certainly worth while to have it conducted 
honestly," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, emphasizing the 
adjective. 

But the Muscovite signification of the adjective had 
no force for Alekse* Aleksandrovitch. 

" Honesty is only negative merit," he replied. 

" But you will do me a great favor, nevertheless," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, " if you will speak a little word 

to Pomorsky When you happen to meet him, you 

know." 

" Yes, certainly ; but it seems to me that this depends 
more on Bolgarinof," said Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch. 

"Bolgarinof on his part is well disposed," said Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, reddening. Stepan Arkadyevitch red- 
dened at the remembrance of Bolgarinof, because that 
very morning he had been at the Jew's house, and this 
visit had remained as an unpleasant recollection. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch knew perfectly well that the 
commission of which he wished to become a member 
was a new, important, and honorable enterprise; but 
that morning, when Bolgarinof, evidently with malice 
prepense, kept him with other petitioners waiting in his 
reception-room for two hours, the whole affair became 
awkward to him. 

Whether it was awkward to him that he, a descendant 
of Rurik, a Prince Oblonsky, had to wait two hours in 



278 ANNA KARENINA 

the Jew's reception-room,^ or because he, for the first 
time in his life, was not following the example of his 
ancestors in serving the government, but had got into a 
new field, at all events it was awkward. 

During these two hours of waiting at Bolgarinof s, 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, briskly walking up and down 
through the reception-room, smoothing his side whiskers, 
occasionally entering into conversation with the other 
petitioners, and trying to work out a pun on his long 
waiting at the Jew's, diligently concealed from the 
others, and also from himself, the trying feeling. But 
all that time he felt awkward and annoyed, he did not 
know why ; it was either because he had not succeeded 
very well with his pun on the word Jew — >how he had 
to chew 1 6n the cud of expectation — or for some other 
reason. 

When at last Bolgarinof, with excessive humility, re- 
ceived him, evidently triumphing in his humiliation, and 
almost refused his request, Stepan Arkadyevitch made 
haste to forget it all. But now, remembering it again, 
he reddened with shame. 

CHAPTER XVIII 

"Now, I have yet one more thing to talk over with 
you; and you know what it fa about, — Anna," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, after a moment's silence, and 
shaking off these disagreeable memories. 

When Oblonsky spoke Anna's name, Karenin's face 
entirely changed ; in place of its former vivacity it tock 
on an expression of corpse-like rigidity and weariness. 

"What more do you want of me?" said he, turning 
abbut on his arm-chair, and shutting his pince-nez. 

" A decision .... some sort of a decision, Aleksei' Alek- 
sandrovitch. I address you, not as .... " he was going to 
say " a deceived husband," but fearing it might hurt his 
cause he stopped, and substituted with little appropriate- 
ness, "not as a statesman, but simply as a man, and a good 
man and a Christian. You ought to have pity on her." 

1 " Builo dyelo do-Zhida I ya dozhidaAsb." 



ANNA KARENINA 279 

"In. what way could I, properly?" asked Karenin, 
quietly. 

" Yes, have pity upon her. If you saw hei; as I do, — 
I have seen her all winter, — you would pity her. Her 
position is cruel." 

"I thought," said Karenin, suddenly, in a piercing, 
almost whining voice, " that Anria Arkadyevna had 
obtained all that she wished." 

* "Oh! AlekseX Aleksandrovitch, for God's sake, let us 
not make recriminations. What is past is past ; and 
you know what she is now waiting for and hoping for is 
.... the divorce." 

" But I understood, that in case I kept my son, Anna 
Arkadyevna refused the divorce ; and so my silence was 
equivalent to a reply, and I thought the question settled. 
I consider it settled," said he, with more and more 
warmth. 

" For God's sake don't get angry," said Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, touching his brother-in-law's knee. "This 
question is not settled. If you will allow me to recapit- 
ulate, the affair stands thus : When you separated, you 
were as great, as magnanimous, as was possible to be. 
You granted her everything .... her freedom, even a 
divorce if she wanted one. She appreciated it. No, 
you don't think so ; but she appreciated it absolutely, — 
to such a degree that, at first, feeling her guilt toward 
you, she^did not, she could not, reason about it at all. 
She refused everything. But the reality and time have 
shown her that her position is painful and intoler- 
able." 

"Anna Arkadyevna's life cannot interest me," said 
Karenin, raising his eyebrows, 

" Permit me to disbelieve that," replied Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, gently. " Her position is painful to her, and 
without any escape whatever. She deserves it, you say. 
She acknowledges that, and does not complain. She 
says up and down that she should never dare to ask 
anything of you. But I, and all of her relatives, all who 
love her, beg and implore you to, have pity on her. 
Why should she suffer? Whose advantage is it?" , 



280 ANNA KARENINA 

"Excuse me; you seeni to accuse me of being to 
blame/'.... 

"Oh! not at all, not at all, understand me," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, touching Karenin's arm, as if he 
believed that personal contact would have a mollifying 
effect on his brother-in-law. " I merely say this. Her 
position is painful ; and you can relieve it, and it will 
not cost you anything. I will so arrange the matter 
that you shall have no trouble about it. Besides, you 
have promised." 

" My consent has been already given ; and I had 
supposed that the question of our son had decided the 
matter.' Besides, I hoped that Anna Arkady evna would 
in her turn have the generosity to understand ...." his 
trembling lips could hardly utter the words, and he 
turned pale. 

" She leaves all to your magnanimity. She asks, she 
implores, for only one thing — to be relieved from this 
unendurable position in which she finds herself. She 
asks for her son. AlekseK Aleksandrovitch, you are a 
good man. Just enter for a moment into her feelings. 
The question of the divorce is for her a matter of life or 
death. If you had not given your promise, she would 
have been resigned to her situation, and lived in the 
country. But you did give your promise ; and she 
wrote you, and came to Moscow. And there in Mos- 
cow, where every familiar face was a knife in her heart, 
she has been living for six months, every day expect- 
ing an answer. Her situation is that of a condemned 
criminal, who for months has had the rope around his 
neck, and does not know whether he is to expect par- 
don or execution. Pity her ; and, besides, I will take 
care to arrange all.... vos scrupules." .... 

"I am not speaking of that, not of that...." said 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, with some disgust; "but per- 
haps I promised more than I had the right to promise." 

" Then, you refuse to do what you have promised ? " .... 

" I never refused to do all that I could ; but I must 
have time to consider how far what I promised is per- 
missible." 



ANNA KARENINA aSi 

" No, Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch," said Oblonsky, leap* 
ing to his feet, " I do not wish to believe this. She is 
as unhappy as it is possible for a woman to be ; and 
you cannot refuse such...." 

" How far what I promised is permissible ? ' Votes 
profess ez d'etre tin litre pensetir; but I, as a believer, 
cannot defy the law of Christianity in a matter so 
important." 

" But in Christian communities, and here in Russia, 
divorce is permitted," said Stepan Arkadyevitch. " Di- 
vorce is permitted by our Church, and we see ...." 

" Permitted, but not in this sense." 

" Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, I don't know you," said 
Oblonskyi after a moment's silence. " You are not the 
same man you were. Did you not forgive all ?.... and did 
we not appreciate your magnanimity ? .... were you not 
moved by genuine Christian feeling? Weren't you 
ready to sacrifice everything ? You yourself said, ' If 
any man will take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak 
also.' And now...." 

" I beg of you," said Karenin, rising suddenly, and 
turning pale, and with a trembling jaw, " I beg of you," 
he said, in a high-pitched voice, "to cut short, to cut 
short this conversation ! " 

" Oh, well, pardon me, pardon me, if I have offended 
you ! " said Stepan Arkadyevitch, in confusion, holding 
out his hand; "but I had to fulfil the mission I was 
charged with." 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch gave him his hand, and said, 
after a moment's reflection : — 

" I must have time to think about it, and seek for 
light. You shall have my final answer day after to- 
morrow." 

CHAPTER XIX 

Stepan Arkadyevitch was going out, when Korne'f 
came in, and announced, " Sergye'f Alekseyevitch." 

"Who is Sergye'f Alekseyevitch?" Oblonsky began 
to ask, but in an instant he remembered. 



282 ANNA KARENINA 

"Oh, Serozha!" he exclaimed; "and here was I, 
thinking it was some direktor of a department," he said 
to himself. "Anna begged me to see him.'* 

And he recalled the sad, timid expression with which, 
as he left her, Anna had said to him, "You will see 
him, and can find out what he is doing, and where he is, 
and who is taking care of him. And, Stiva....if possi- 
ble ! Would it be possible ?".... 

He knew what she meant by the words, "if possible ,f ; 
if it were possible to get the divorce, so as to have her 
son. But now Stepan Arkadyevitch knew that this was 
out of the question. He was none the less glad to see 
his nephew again. 

Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch reminded his brother-in-law 
that he must not talk to him of his mother, and begged 
him not even by a word to remind him of her. 

" He was very ill after that interview with his mother, 
which we were not prepared for," said Aleksei' Aleksan- 
drovitch, "and for a while we feared for his life. But 
sensible medical treatment and sea-bathing in the sum- 
mer restored him to health, and I have followed the 
doctor's advice, and sent him to school. Activity, being 
with companions of his own age, have had a happy influ- 
ence on him ; his health is good, and he is studying 
well", 

" Why, he *s become quite a young man ! he is no longer 
Serozha; he is full-grown Sergyel Alekseyevitch," said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, with a smile, as a handsome, tall, 
robust boy, dressed in a ktirtotchka, or jacket, and long 
trousers, came in briskly and without constraint. The boy 
had a look of sound health and good spirits. He bowed 
to his uncle as to a stranger. Then, as he remembered 
him, he reddened, and, as if offended and angry at some- 
thing, turned away, and handed his school report to his 
father. 

"Well, that is excellent," said Karenin; "now you 
may go and play." 

" He has grown tall and slender, and lost his childish 
look and become a real boy ; I like it," remarked Stepan 
Arkadyevitch, with a smile. " Do you remember me ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 283 

The boy quickly glanced at his father. 

" I remember you, mon ancle" answered the boy, look- 
ing at Stepan Arkadyevitch, and then casting down his 
eyes. 

The uncle called the lad to him, and took his hand. 
"Well, how are you?" he asked, wanting to talk, but 
not knowing what to say. 

The boy, blushing, and not answering, hastily with- 
drew his hand, and, as soon as his uncle had released it, 
flew away like a bird set free. 

A year had passed since Serozha had seen his mother 
for the last time. During this time he had not even 
heard anything about her. He had been sent to school, 
and had become acquainted with boys of his own age, 
and learned to like them. His dreams and recollections 
about his mother, which after his interview with her had 
made him ill, now no longer occupied his mind. When 
they recurred to him he even tried to get rid of them, 
regarding them as disgraceful for a boy and, fit only 
for girls ; he knew that his parents had quarreled and 
parted, and that he must accustom himself to the idea of 
remaining with his father. 

The sight of his uncle, who looked like his mother, 
was unpleasant to him, because it awakened memories 
which caused him shame ; and it was still more unpleas- 
ant, because, from certain words which he had caught 
as he entered the door, and by the peculiar expression 
of his father's and his uncle's faces, he knew that they 
were talking about his mother, , And so as not to blame 
his father, with whom he lived and on whom he was 
dependent, and especially so as not to give way to a sen- 
timent which he felt was too degrading, he tried not to 
look at his uncle, who had come to disturb his tranquil- 
lity, and not to think of the past 

But when, shortly after, Stepan Arkadyevitch went 
out, he found the boy on the stairs, and he called him to 
him, and asked him how he spent his spare time, now 
that he was at school, Serozha, out of his father's pres- 
ence, talked freely. 

"We have a railroad now," he said, in answer to his 



284 ANNA KARENINA 

question. " Just see ! These two are sitting on the 
seat ; they are passengers ; and there is one man trying 
to stand on the seat; and they are all going, and by 
means of our arms and our belts we go through the 
whole length of the hall, and the doors open in front. 
And I tell you it's very hard here for the conductor." 

"Is that the one standing?" asked Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch, amused. 

"Yes. He has to be bold and skilful, because the 
train comes to a very sudden stop, and he might get 
thrown over." 

"Well, that is no joke," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
sadly, as he looked at the boy's bright eyes, which were 
like his mother's, and which had already lost their child- 
ish look of innocence. And, although he had promised 
AlekseY Aleksandrovitch not to speak of Anna, he could 
not resist. 

" Do you remember your mother ?" he asked suddenly. 

"No, I- do not," Serozha answered quickly, turning 
red ; and his uncle could not make him talk any more. 

When the Russian tutor found Serozha on the stairs, 
half an hour after, he could not make out whether he 
was crying or was sulky. 

"Did you hurt yourself when you fell?" he asked. 
" I said this was a dangerous game, and I shall have to 
tell your father? " 

" If I had, no one should find it out," answered the boy. 

"Well, what 's the matter, then ? " 

"Let me alone !.... What is it to him whether I 
remember or not ? .... Why did he remind me ? .... Let me 
be...." and the boy seemed to defy not only his tutor, 
but the whole world. 

CHAPTER XX 

Stepan Arkadyevitch, as usual, did not waste his 
time at Petersburg. He had not only his business to 
attend to : his sister's divorce and his new position to 
look after ; but, moreover, as he said, to refresh himself 
after musty Moscow. 



ANNA KARENINA 285 

< 

For Moscow, in spite of its cafes-chantantS) and its 
omnibuses, was still only a stagnant marsh. Stepan 
Arkadyevitch always felt that this was so. Living in 
Moscow, especially in proximity to his family, he was 
conscious that his spirit flagged. When his life in 
Moscow was long unbroken by a trip to Petersburg, 
he even began to be annoyed by his wife's bad temper 
and reproaches, and to worry over his health, the educa- 
tion of his children, and the petty details of the house- 
hold. He even went so far as to be disturbed about his 
debts. 

As soon as he set foot in Petersburg, and entered 
that circle where life was really life, and not vegetat- 
ing, as in Moscow, immediately all such thoughts dis- 
appeared like wax in the fire. 

His wife?.... He had just been talking with Prince 
Chetchensky. Prince Chetchensky had a wife and fam- 
ily, — grown-up boys, pages now ; and he had another 
establishment, outside the law, and in this also there 
were children. But, though the first family was well 
enough in its way, Prince Chetchensky felt happier 
with his second family ; and he had introduced his old- 
est legitimate son into his other family ; he told Stepan 
Arkadyevitch he considered it a good way to train him 
and develop him. What would have been said about 
that in Moscow ? 

Children ? In Petersburg, fathers did n't trouble them- 
selves with their children. Children were educated in 
institutions, and there was no sign of that crazy notion 
in vogue in Moscow — Lvof shared in it — that children 
should have all the luxuries, and their parents nothing 
but care and trouble. 

The government service ? The service, too, was not 
that tiresome, hopeless treadmill that it was in Mos- 
cow. Here there was interest in the service. Meetings 
with men in authority, mutual services, opportune words 
spoken, the knowledge of how to take advantage of 
chances — and a man might suddenly find himself high 
in his career, like Brianzef, whom Stepan Arkadyevitch 
met that evening, and who was now a leading dignitary 



286 ANNA KARENINA 

Yes, there was something "interesting in the service 
here. 

The Petersburg views about money especially ap- 
pealed to Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

Bartnyansky, who now spent at least fifty thousand 
rubles, judging by the rate at which he was living, made 
a remark which deeply impressed him. Just before 
dinner, as they were talking together, Stepan Arkadye- 
vitch had said : — 

" You seem to have some connection with Mordvinsky. 
You might do me a favor ; please say a little word to 
him in my behalf. It is a place which I should like to 
have, member of the commission." ,... 

"Well, I won't forget Only what pleasure can you 

have in attending to this railroad business with the 
Jews?.... Of course, if you want it; but still it's a 
wretched business." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch did not say to him that it was 
"no sinecure." Bartnyansky would not have known 
what he meant. 

" I need money ; I must have something to live on." 

" But don't you live, then ? " 

V Yes, but in debt." 

" Much ? " asked Bartnyansky, sympathetically. 

M Yes; twenty thousand rubles." 

Bartnyansky broke out into a gay laugh. 

" Oh, happy man ! I have a million and a half of 
debts, and not a ruble ; and, as you see, I live all the same." 

And Stepan Arkadyevitch saw that this was not mere 
words, but was actually true. Zhivakhof was in debt 
three hundred thousand, and had not a kopek. Petrov- 
sky had spent five millions, and yet he went on living 
just as before, and had charge of the finances, and had 
only twenty thousand salary. 

Petersburg had a delightful physical influence on 
Stepan Arkadyevitch. It made him feel younger. In 
Moscow he sometimes detected gray hairs, he would 
fall asleep after dinner, it made him breathe hard to go 
up-stairs, he was dull in the company of young women, 
he no longer, danced at balls. 



ANNA KARENINA 287 

At Petersburg he experienced what the sixty-year-old 
Prince Piotr Oblonsky, who had just returned from 
abroad, told him one evening : — 

" We don't know how to live here," said Piotr Oblon- 
sky. " For example, I spent the summer at Baden, 
and now, honestly, I feel like a new m&n. I see a 
young woman, and.... I enjoy my dinner, I can take my 
wine ; I *m well and vigorous. When I come back to 
Russia, I have to see my wife, have even to go into the 
country. You wouldn't believe it, but in a couple of 
weeks I am in my dressing-gown. Good-by to the 
young beauties. I am old, think only of the salvation 
of my soul. To make me over, I go to Paris." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch felt the same difference as Piotr 
Oblonsky did. In Moscow he reached such a low ebb 
of vitality that he felt sure that, if he ever attained the 
same age, he too should be driven to thinking about the 
salvation of his soul ; in Petersburg he was conscious of 
being a well-regulated man. 

Between the Princess Betsy Tversky and Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch there had been for a long time a very strange 
relationship. He always jested with her, arid he always 
said very improper things by way of jest, knowing that 
they pleased her more than anything else. The day 
after his interview with Karenin, Stepan Arkadyevitch 
went to see her ; and, feeling particularly young, he con- 
ducted himself with more than his usual levity ; and 
went so far in his impropriety that he could not retrieve 
his steps, and, unfortunately, he felt that she was not 
only displeased, but was even opposed to him. Yet this 
tone had been established because it generally amused 
her. So he was glad to have the Princess Miagkaya 
interrupt their tete-a-tete. 

"Ah, here you are ! " said she, when she saw him; "Well ! 
and how is your poor sister ? Do not look at me so. Since 
women who are a thousand times worse than she throw 
stones at her, I think she did quite right. I can't forgive 
Vronsky for not letting me know that she was in Peters- 
burg. I should have gone to see her, and gone with her 
everywhere. Give her my love, Now tell m$ about hen" 



288 ANNA KARENINA 

"Well! her position is a *very painful one; she .... " 
Stepan Arkadyevitch began, in the simplicity of his 
heart, taking the princess's words as genuine money, 
when she said, "Tell me about your sister." But the 
princess, in her usual way, interrupted him, and began 
to talk herself. "She did what everybody but myself 
does and hides. But she was not willing to lie, and she 
did right ; and she has at least bettered herself in having 
forsaken that imbecile, — I beg your pardon, — your 
brother-in-law. Everybody said he was a genius. A 
genius ! I was the only one who said he was a goose ; 
and people have come to be of my opinion, now that he 
has taken up with the Countess Lidia and Landau. I 
should like not to agree with everybody .... it 's stupid; 
but this time I can't help it" 

" Now please explain something to me," said Stepan 
Arkadyevitch. " What does this mean ? Yesterday I 
was at his house, talking of the divorce, and I asked 
him for a definite answer ; my brother-in-law said to mc 
that he could not give me an answer without reflection ; 
and this morning I received an invitation from Lidia 
Ivanovna for this evening instead of an answer." 

Vj Now ! That 's just it ! " cried the princess, delighted. 
"They will consult Landau as to what to say." 

" Why Landau ? who is Landau ? " 

"What! you don't know Jules Landau.... le fameux 
Jules Landau, le clairvoyant? He also in my opinion 
is an imbecile, but on him depends your sister's fate. 
That 's what comes of living in the provinces. Landau, 
you must know, was commis of a mercantile house at 
Paris, and went to see a doctor. He fell asleep in the 
waiting-room, and, while he was asleep, gave advice to 
all the sick .... most astonishing advice. Then Yuri 
Melyedinsky's wife — you know he was sick — called 
him to see her husband. He treated her husband. In 
my opinion, he did n't do him any good, for Melyedinsky 
is just as sick as he was before; but his wife and he 
believe in Landau. They took him into their house, 
and they brought him to Russia. Naturally, people 
here have thrown themselves at him. He treats every- 



ANNA KAJtENINA 289 

body. He cured the Countess Bezzubof, and she fell so 
in love with him that she has adopted him." 

"How! adopted him?" 

" Yes, adopted him. He is n't Landau any more, but 
Count Bezzubof. But Lidia — and I like her very much, 
in spite of her crankiness — must needs be smitten with 
him ; and nothing that she and AlekseY Aleksandrovitch 
take up is decided without consulting him. Your sister's 
fate is, therefore, in the hands of this Count Bezzubof, 
alias Landau." 



CHAPTER XXI 

After an excellent dinner with Bartnyansky, and 
considerable cognac, Stepan Arkadyevitch went to the 
Countess Lidia Ivanovna's a little later than the hour 
designated. 

"Who is with the countess?.... the Frenchman?" he 
asked of the Swiss, as he noticed beside AlekseY Alek- 
sandrovitch's well-known overcoat a curious mantle with 
clasps. 

"Alekse* Aleksandrovitch Karenin and the Count 
Bezzubof," answered the servant, stolidly. 

"Princess Miagkaya was right," thought Oblonsky, 
as he went up-stairs. "Strange! it would be a good 
thing to cultivate the countess. She has great influ- 
ence. If she would say a little word in my behalf to 
Pomorsky, it would be just the thing." 

It was still very light outdoors, but the blinds were 
drawn in the Countess Lidia Ivanovna's little drawing- 
room, and the lamps were lighted. 

At a round table, on which was a lamp, the countess 
and Alekseif Aleksandrovitch were sitting, engaged in a 
confidential talk. A short, lean, pale man, with knock- 
kneed legs and a feminine figure, with long hair falling 
over his coat-collar, and handsome, glowing eyes, was 
examining the portraits on the wall at the other end of 
the room. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch, after having greeted the coun* 
VOL. in. — 19 



290 ANNA KARENINA 

tess and AlekseT Alcksandrovitch, involuntarily turned 
round to look OttCe more at this singular personage. 

" Monsieur Landau," said the countess, gently, and 
with a precaution which struck Oblonsky. The intro- 
duction was made. 

Landau hastily glanced around, and coming up, placed 
his moist, unresponsive hand in Oblonsky's, and im- 
mediately went back to look at the portraits. Lidia 
Ivanovna arid Aleksef Aleksandrovitch exchanged sig- 
nificant glances. 

" I am very glad to see you to-day," said the countess 
to Stepan Arkadyevitch, motioning him to a chair. 
"You noticed," added she, in a low voice, glancing at 
the Frenchman, " that I introduced him to you by the 
name of Landau ; but his name is really Count Bezzubof, 
as you probably know. Only he is not fond of the 
title." 

"Yes, I heard about it," said Stepan Arkadyevitch; 
" it is said he perfectly cured the Countess Bezzubof." 

" She came to see me to-day," said the countess, ad- 
dressing AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, "and it was sad to 
see her. This separation is terrible for her. It is such 
a blow to her." 

" Then he is positively going ? " 

"Yes; he is going to Paris. Yesterday he heard a 
voice," said Lidia Ivanovna, looking at Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch. 

"Oh, a voice?" repeated he, feeling that it was nec- 
essary to use great prudence among these people, where 
things occurred or might occur, without his being able 
to explain them. 

A moment's silence ensued, at the end of which the 
Countess Lidia Ivanovna, as if accidentally stumbling 
on the chief topic of their conversation, said, with a 
sweet smile, addressing Oblonsky : — 

" I have known of you for a long time, and I am de- 
lighted to make your acquaintance. Les amis de nos 
amis sont nos amis. But to be truly friends, we must 
know what is passing in the souls of those we love ; and 
I fear you do not with regard to Alekse'f Aleksandro- 



ANNA KARENINA i 9 i 

vitch. You understand what I mean," said she, rais- 
ing her beautiful, dreamy eyes. 

" I understand in part that AlekseY Aleksandrovitch's 
position ...." answered Oblonsky, not understanding very 
well what she was talking about, and preferring to con- 
fine himself to generalities. 

"The change is not in his external position/' said the 
countess, solemnly, and at the same time looking ten- 
derly at Aleksei Aleksandrovitch, who had risen to join 
Landau; "it is his heart which has changed, — a new 
heart has been given to him, — and I very much fear 
that you do not realize sufficiently the great transforma- 
tion which has taken place in him. ,, 

"That is ....in a general way, I can perceive the 
change in him. We have always been friends, and 
now. .J' said Oblonsky, answering the deep gaze of 
the countess with a tender one, as he queried with 
which of the two ministers she could do him the most 
effective service. 

" This transformation cannot diminish his love for his 
neighbor; on the contrary, the change which has taken 
place must increase love. But I fear you don't under- 
stand me Will you not have some tea?" she asked, 

looking toward a lackey who entered with a tea-tray. 

"Not altogether, countess; of course, his misfor- 
tune...." 

" Yes, he underwent a misfortune, but it became the 
highest happiness, because his heart was renewed," said 
she, raising her eyes lovingly to Stepan Arkadyevitch. 

" I believe I shall have to get her to speak to them 
both," thought Oblonsky. "Oh! assuredly, countess," 
said he, "but I think that these changes are so per- 
sonal l that no one likes to speak of them, even to his 
most intimate friends." 

"On the contrary, we ought to speak, and to help 
one another." 

" Yes, without doubt ; but there are such differences 
of conviction; and, moreover...." and Oblonsky smiled 
unctuously. 

1 Intimuu 



292 ANNA KARENINA 

"There cannot be differences in regard to sacred 
truth." 

"Oh, yes, of course, but...." 

Stepan Arkadyevitch grew confused, and stopped 
speaking. He perceived that the countess was talking 
about religion. 

" It seems to me that he 's going to sleep/' said Alek- 
seT Aleksandrovitch, approaching the countess, and 
speaking in a significant whisper. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch turned round. Landau was 
seated near the window, with his elbow leaning on the 
arm and back of a chair, and his head bowed as he saw 
the looks turned toward him. He raised his head and 
smiled in a narve and childlike manner. 

" Don't pay any attention to him," said the countess, 
pushing a chair toward Aleksel Aleksandrovitch. " I 
have noticed...." she began, but was interrupted by a 
lackey bringing her a letter. She read it through with 
extraordinary rapidity, sent a reply, and resumed the 
thread of her discourse. " I have noticed that Musco- 
vites, the men especially, are very indifferent to religion." 

" Oh, no, countess ! I think that Muscovites have the 
reputation of being very pious," replied Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch. 

" But as far as I have observed, you yourself," said 
Alekself Aleksandrovitch, with his weary smile, " I am 
sorry to say, belong to the category of the indiffer- 
ents." 

" Is it possible to be indifferent ? " cried Lidia 
Ivanovna. 

" I am not indifferent, but rather in the attitude of 
expectation," answered Oblonsky, with his most agree- 
able smile. " I do not think that the time for me to 
settle such questions has come yet." 

Aleksel Aleksandrovitch and the countess exchanged 
glances. 

"We can never' know whether the time for us has 
come or not," said AlekseT Aleksandrovitch, sternly, "we 
ought not even to think whether we are prepared or not. 
The blessing does not follow human calculations^ does 



ANNA KARENINA 293 

not always light upon the most deserving, but comes to 
those who are unprepared ; witness Saul." 

"It seems that it isn't to be now," murmured the 
countess, following with her eyes the movements of the 
Frenchman. Landau got up and joined them. 

" May I listen ? " asked he. 

"Oh, yes! I did not. wish to disturb you," said the 
countess, tenderly. " Sit down with us." 

" The essential thing is not to close one's eyes to the 
light," continued Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch. 

" Akh ! if you knew what a blessing we experience 
when we feel His constant presence in our souls," said 
the Countess Lidia Ivanovna, with an ecstatic smile. 

" But a man may feel himself incapable of rising to 
such a height," said Stepan Arkadyevitch, convinced 
that the heights of religion were not his forte, but fear- 
ing to offend a person who, by one word to Pomorsky, 
might get him the place that he wanted. 

" You mean that sin may prevent him ? " asked Lidia 
Ivanovna. "But that is a mistaken view. For him 
who believes, there is no more sin. Sin is already re- 
deemed. Pardon" she added, as the lackey brought 
her another note. She read it, and answered verbally, 
" Say to-morrow at the grand duchess's; " then she con- 
tinued, " For the believer there is no sin." 

" Yes ; but ' faith without works is dead,' " said 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, recalling this phrase of his cate- 
chism, with a smile establishing his independence. 

"That is the famous passage in the Epistle of St. 
James," said Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch, in a reproachful 
tone, looking at the countess, as if to recall frequent dis- 
cussions on the subject. " How much harm the false 
interpretation of that passage has done ! It has driven 
more persons from the faith than anything else ! * I 
have no works, therefore I cannot believe,' is the logi- 
cal conclusion from it. It means exactly the opposite." 

" It is our monks who claim to be saved by works, by 
their fastings, their abstinences," said the countess, with 
an air of fastidious scorn. " Our way is far better and 
easier," she added, looking at Oblonsky with that scorch- 



294 ANNA KARENINA 

ing smile with which, at court/she was wont to wither 
young maids of honor, disconcerted at the newness of 
their position. 

" We are saved by Christ who suffered for us ; we are 
saved by faith/* resumed Aleks'ex Aleksandrovitch. 

" Votes comprenez l y anglais ? " asked Lidia Ivahovna ; 
and, receiving an affirmative Answer, she rose, and took 
a small book from a side^table. " I 'm going to read to 
you, ' Safe anil Happy ; or, Under the Wing/ " said she, 
with a look of interrogation at Kkrenin* "It is very 
short," added she, resuming her seat and opening the 
book. " Here the way is described by which faith is 
attained, and the joy which is higher than any that 
earth can give, which fills the soul of the believer. Man 
who believes cannot be unhappy, because he is no longer 
alone. Yes, and here you see...." She was abciut to 
go on reading, when again the lackey appeared. " From 
Borozdin ? Say to-morrow, at two o'clock; «... Yes/' she 
said, with a sigh, marking the place in the book with 
her finger, and looking up with her perisive, loving 
eyes. "This is the way true faith is acquired. Are 
you acquainted with Marie Sanina ? You have heard 
of her great affliction ? She lost her only sbn. She 
was in despair. Well, how is it now ? She found this 
friend. She thanks Grid for the death of her child* 
Such is the happiness faith can give ! " 

"Ah, yes; this is very....** murmured Stepan Arka- 
dyevitch, glad to be able to keep silent during this read- 
ing, and to think over hi£ affairs a little. " I shall do 
better not to ask anything to-day," thought he ; " only how 
can I get Out of this without compromising myself ? " * 

"This will be dull for you," said the countess to Lan. 
dau. " You don't understand English ; but this is short." 

" Oh ! I shall understand," skid he, with a smile ; and 
he shut his eyes* 

Aiekse'f Aleks&ndrdvitch and the countess significantly 
looked at one another, and the reading began* 






ANNA KARENINA 295 



CHAPTER XXII 

Stepan Arkadyevitch felt perfectly bewildered by 
these strange and to him unwonted discourses to which 
he had been listening. After the stagnation of Moscow, 
the complication of life in Petersburg as a general thing 
had an enlivening effect on him ; but he liked it and was 
at home in it when he was among those whom he knew 
well. In this unfamiliar environment, he was bewildered 
and stupefied, and could not make anything out of it. 

As he listened to the reading, and saw the brilliant 
eyes of Laudau — naive or knavish, he could not tell 
which — fixed on him, he felt a peculiar heaviness in his 
head. The most heterogeneous thoughts went whirling 
through his brain. 

" Marie Sanina is happy in having lost her son 

It would be good if I could only smoke ! .... To be saved, 
one needs only to believe The monks do not under- 
stand about this, but the Countess Lidia Ivanovna 
does. What makes my head feel so heavy ? Is it the 
brandy, or the strangeness of all this ? I have done 
nothing out of the way as yet ; but I shan't venture to 
ask anything to-day. It is said they make you say your 
prayers. Suppose they should make me say mine! 
That would be too nonsensical. What stuff that is she 
is reading! But she reads well. Landau Bezzubof .... 
why is he Bezzubof ? " 

Suddenly Stepan Arkadyevitch felt that his lower 
jaw was irresistibly beginning to accomplish a yawn. 
He smoothed his whiskers to conceal the yawn, and 
shook himself ; but the next moment he felt sure that; 
he was asleep, and even beginning to snore. The voice 
of the Countess Lidia Ivanovna waked him, saying : — 

" He '§ asleep. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch waked with a start, feeling a 
consciousness of guilt. But instantly he was relieved 
to find that the words, "He's asleep," had reference, 
not to himself, but to Landau. The Frenchman was as 
sound asleep as Stepan Arkadyevitch had been. But 



296 ANNA KARENINA 

Stepan Arkadyevitch's nap would have offended them, 
— he did not think of this at the time, so strange did 
everything seem, — but Landau's rejoiced them exceed- 
ingly, and especially the Countess Lidia Ivanovna. 

" Mon ami" said the Countess Lidia Ivanovna, cau- 
tiously, so as not to disturb him ; and, picking up the 
folds of her silk gown, in the enthusiasm of the moment, 
calling Karenin, not Alekset Aleksandrovitch, but, " Mon 
ami, do?t?zez lui la main! vons voyez? Sh-h ! " said she 
to the lackey, who once more entered the parlor with 
a message. " I can't receive it now." 

The Frenchman slept, or pretended to sleep, leaning 
his head on the back of his arm-chair, and resting his 
hand on his knee, but making feeble gestures, as if he 
were trying to catch something. 

Alekset Aleksandrovitch got up, and cautiously, 
though he tripped over a table as he did so, stepped over 
to the chair, and put his hand into the Frenchman's 
hand. Stepan Arkadyevitch also got up, and opening 
his eyes wide, and trying to decide whether he were 
asleep or not, looked from one to the other, and felt his 
ideas growing more and more confused. 

" Que la personne qui est arrivie la demiere, celle qui 
demande, qu'elle ....sorte. Qti } elle sorte" x murmured the 
Frenchman, without opening his eyes. 

" Vous mexcuserez, mais vous voyez — revenez vers 
dix keureSy encore niieux demain" 2 

" Qiielle sorte" repeated the Frenchman, impatiently. 

"Cest ?noi, ijest ce pas?" asked Oblonsky, and at 
an affirmative sign, forgetting what he was going to ask 
Lidia Ivanovna, forgetting his sister's affairs, with one 
single desire to escape as soon as possible, hastened out 
on his tiptoes and rushed down into the street, as if he 
were fleeing from a pest-house, and for a long time 
talked and jested with his driver, so as to bring back 
his spirits. 

1 The person who came in last .... the one who is questioning .... let him 
go away. 

2 You will excuse me, but you understand .... come back at ten o'clock, 
or, still better, to-morrow. 



ANNA KARENINA 297 

At the French Theater, which he reached in time for 
the last act, and afterward over his champagne at the 
the Tartars', Stepan Arkadyevitch gradually began to 
breathe more freely in the familiar atmosphere. Never- 
theless, all that evening he was very far from being 
himself. 

When he returned to the house of Piotr Oblonsky, 
where he made his home in Petersburg, he found a note 
from Betsy. She wrote him that she was very desirous 
of finishing their talk, and urged him to call the next 
day. He had hardly finished reading this note and 
making up a face at it, when heavy shuffling steps were 
heard down-stairs as of men lifting some heavy object. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch went out to see what it was. It 
was the rejuvenated Piotr Oblonsky, who was so tipsy that 
he could not walk up-stairs ; but when he caught sight of 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, he ordered his attendants to put 
him on his feet, and, clinging to Stepan Arkadyevitch's 
arm, he managed to reach his room, where he began to 
relate how he had spent the evening, till he fell asleep. 

Stepan Arkadyevitch himself was in such a weak 
state of mkid, that, contrary to his custom, he did not 
fall asleep quickly. What he had heard and seen dur- 
ing the day was disgusting. But more disgusting than 
anything else was the recollection of the evening at the 
Countess Lidia Ivanovna's. 

The next day he received from Alekse'f Aleksandro- 
vitch a flat refusal in the matter of the divorce, and 
knew that this decision was based on the words which 
the Frenchman had uttered during his slumber, real or 
feigned. 

CHAPTER XXIII 

In order that anything may be accomplished in family 
life, it is requisite that between the husband and wife 
there should be either absolute discord or loving har- 
mony. But when the relations between the two are 
uncertain, and there is neither the one nor the other, 
nothing can be accomplished. 



298 ANNA KARENINA 

Many families remain for yeafs in places of which the 
husband and wife both are tired and disgusted, simply 
because there is neither full discord nor full concord. 

Unendurable to Vronsky and Anna was their life in 
Moscow, in the heat and dust, when the sun shone, not 
now with its springtime beauty, but with summer fervor, 
and all the trees along the boulevards had been long in 
leaf, and the leaves were already thick with dust. Though 
they had long before decided to remove to Vozdvizhen- 
skoye, still they continued to live in Moscow, which was 
detestable to them both, and the reason for this was that 
of late there had been no harmony between them. 

The exasperation which tended to keep them apart 
had no tangible cause, and all attempts at an explanation, 
instead of closing the chasm, only widened it. It was 
an internal irritation which, as far as she was concerned, 
had for its source the diminution of his love for her, and 
on his part his annoyance because, thanks to her, he 
found himself placed in an embarrassing position, which 
she, instead of trying to relieve, made still more difficult. 
Neither he nor she formulated any definite complaints, 
but each considered the other in the wrong, and at every 
opportunity tried to make this evident. 

She considered that he, with all his habits, ideas, 
desires, with all his spiritual and physical tendencies, 
had one distinguishing quality, — the power of loving 
women ; and this love, she felt, ought by good rights to 
be wholly concentrated on her. This love had diminished ; 
consequently, in her opinion, a part of this love must 
necessarily be transferred to others or to some other 
woman, and — she was jealous. She was jealous, not of 
any definite woman, but of his diminished love for her. 

Having as yet no definite object for her jealousy to rest 
on, she was on the watch for one. On the slightest pre- 
text she would transfer her jealousy from one person to 
another. Sometimes she suspected him of low amours, 
which he .might enter into as an unmarried man about 
town ; sometimes she distrusted ladies whom he might 
meet in society ; then again, with the imaginary young 
lady whom he would be likely to marry in case he broke 



ANNA KARENINA 299 

with her. This form of jealousy especially tormented 
her, for the reason that he himself had carelessly, in a 
moment of confidence one day, spoken of his mother's 
lack of tact in having ventured to propose to him to 
marry the young Princess Sorokin. 

And being thus jealous, Anna felt indignant with him 
and kept finding reasons for her indignation. For all 
the painfulness of her position she blamed him. She 
considered him responsible for her painful state * of 
expectancy which she was enduring in Moscow, as it 
were suspended between heaven and earth, for the 
uncertainty in which she lived, for Alekself Aleksandro- 
vitch's delay and indecision, and for her loneliness. If 
he loved her, he would understand the difficulty of her 
position, and save her from it. He was to blame because 
she was living in Moscow and not in the country. He 
could not live in the country, as she wanted to do. He 
wanted society, and so condemned her to this horrible 
position, the trials of which he could not comprehend, 
And, again, he was responsible for depriving her forqver 
of her son. Even those rare moments of tenderness 
which they occasionally enjoyed did not appease her; 
she now detected in his tenderness a shade of calmness, 
of assurance, which he had never before shown, and 
which exasperated her. 

It was getting dark. Vronsky was at a gentlemen's 
dinner; and Anna, while waiting for him, had taken 
refuge in his library, where the noise of the street was 
less oppressive than in the rest of the house. She 
walked up and down, going over in memory their last 
altercation. 

As she recalled in memory the insulting words that 
had been spoken, and tried to think what had led to it, 
she at last remembered how the quarrel had begun. For 
some time she found it impossible to believe that any 
dissension could have arisen from such an inoffensive 
conversation, from a subject which was so unimportant 
to any one. But such was the fact. It all began from 
his having made sport of women's gymnasia, declaring 
them unnecessary, and she had taken up the cudgels in 



3 oo ANNA KARENINA 

their defense. He had disrespectfully attacked the 
education of women in general, and had said that Han- 
nah, Anna's English protigie, had not the slightest need 
of knowing anything about physics. 

That had irritated Anna. She saw in it a derogatory 
reference to her own occupations, and she conjured up 
and uttered a phrase which was meant to repay him for 
the pain he inflicted on her. 

" I did not expect that you would comprehend me and 
my feelings as a man who really loved would, but I ex- 
pected at least some delicacy," said she. 

And in reality he had reddened with vexation and 
made some unpleasant remark. She did not remem- 
ber what retort she then made, but, whatever it was, 
he had said with the manifest intention of hurting her 
feelings : — 

" I confess your devotion to that girl does not interest 
me, because I can see in it nothing but an affecta- 
tion." 

This cruelty of his, with which he demolished the 
fabric which she had with such labor erected so as to 
endure the trials of her life, this injustice of his in accus- 
ing her of pretense and affectation, drove her frantic. 

"It is very unfortunate that only what is low and 
material is comprehensible to you," she had retorted, 
and she left the room. 

When, in the evening, he came to see her, the discus- 
sion was not resumed, but they both felt that it was not 
forgotten. 

All this day he had not been at home ; and she was 
so lonely and wretched, as she thought of their quarrels, 
that she resolved to forget everything, to ask his forgive- 
ness, and to take the blame on herself, so as to bring 
about a reconciliation at any cost. 

"I am to blame; I am irritable; I am absurdly jeal- 
ous. I will make it up with him, and we will leave for the 
country, arid there I shall be calmer," she thought. 

" Affectation ! " — nenatitralno. She suddenly remem- 
bered the word which had so affronted her, above all in 
his intention of causing her pain by it. 



ANNA KARENINA 301 

* I know what he meant. He meant by affected that 
I did not love my daughter, but loved another's child. 
What does he know of the love a child can inspire ? 
Has he the least idea what I sacrificed for him in giving 
up Serozha? But this desire to wound me! No, he 
loves another woman; it must be so." 

And seeing that, even while she wanted to calm her- 
self she was once more going over the circle she had 
so many times traversed, and was once more returning 
to the same state of irritation, she was horror-struck. 

" Is it wholly out of the question ? Can I not attach 
him to myself ? " she queried, and then she began at the 
beginning again. " He is true, he is honorable, he loves 
me. I love him ; in a day or two dissension will be 
ended. What is necessary ? Calmness, gentleness, and 
I shall bring him back to me. Yes; now, when he 
comes, I will tell him that I was to blame .... although 
I was not to blame ; .... and we will go off." 

And, in order not to think any more, and not to give 
way to her irritation, she gave orders to bring down her 
trunks, to begin preparations for departure. 

At ten o'clock Vronsky came in. 



CHAPTER XXIV 

"Well, did you have a gay time ?" asked Anna, going 
to meet him with an apologetic and affectionate look on 
her face. 

"As such things usually are," answered he, noticing 
at once by her face that she was in one of her best 
moods. He was already accustomed to such metamor- 
phoses, and this time he was particularly glad, because 
he himself was in his happiest frame of mind. "What 
do I see? This is good," he added, pointing to the 
trunks in the entry. 

" Yes, we must go. I went out to walk to-day, and it 
was so good that I longed to get back to the country. 
There 's nothing to keep you here, is there ? " 



302 ANNA KARENINA 

"I should like nothing betted .... I will be back imme* 
diately, and we will talk it over ; all I want is to change 
my coat. Have the tea brought.*' 

There was something irritating in the tone in which 
he said, "This is good," as one speaks to a child which 
has ceased to be capricious, and still more irritating was 
the discrepancy between her apologetic and his self- 
confident tone, and for a moment she felt rising within 
her the desire to be pugnacious. But making an effort 
to restrain herself, she relinquished it, and met Vronsky 
as gayly as before. 

When he came in, she told him calmly the incidents 
of the day, and her plans for departure, using in part 
the very words she had thought over. 

"Do you know, it came over me like an inspiration," 
said she, — " why wait here for the divorce ? Will it not 
be all the same when we are in the country ? I cannot 
wait longer. I want to stop hoping about the divorce. 
I don't want to hear anything more about it. I think 
it won't have any more effect on my life. Don't you 
agree with me ? " 

"Oh, yes!" said he, looking with disquietude at 
Anna's excited face. 

" Come, tell me what you did ; who were there ? " 
said she, after a moment's silence. 

Vronsky named over the guests. 

"The dinner was excellent. And we had a boat-race, 
and it was all very jolly. But in Moscow nothing can 
be done sans ridicule. Some woman, the swimming- 
teacher of the queen of Sweden, gave us an exhibition 
of her art." 

" What ! Did she swim for you ? " demanded Anna, 
frowning. 

" Yes, in an ugly red' costiime de natation. She was 
old and hideous What day do we go ? " 

" What an inane idea ! Was there anything extraor- 
dinary about her method of swimming?" asked Anna, 
not replying to his question. 

" Not at all. I tell you it was horribly stupid. When 
have you decided to go ? " 



ANNA KARENINA 303 

Anna tossed her head as if to get rid of a disagree- 
able thought. 

"When shall we go? The sooner the better. To- 
morrow we can't, but the day after." 

" Yes .... no .... wait ! Day after to-morrow is Monday. 
I shall have to go to maman" said Vronsky, somewhat 
confused ; because, as he mentioned his mother's name, 
he saw Anna's eyes fixed with a look of suspicion on 
him, and his confusion increased her distrust. She for- 
got the queen of Sweden's swimming-teacher in her 
alarm about the Princess Sorokin, who was living at a 
country seat in the suburbs of Moscow with the old 
countess. 

" Can't you go there to-morrow ? " 

" Why, no ! That 's impossible. There is some busi- 
ness that I must attend to, — a power of attorney; and 
the money will not be ready to-morrow." 

" If that is so, we won't go at all." 

"But why not?" 

" I won't go if it is put off later. Sunday or never ! " 

"Why so ? " cried Vronsky, in astonishment. "There 's 
no sense in that." 

" It has no sense for you, because you never take me 
into account at all. You can't understand my life. 
The only thing that interests me here is Hannah. You 
say that it is hypocrisy. You said last evening that 
I did not love my daughter, but that I pretended to love 
this English girl, that this was affectation. I should 
like to know what can be natural in the life I lead 
here ? " 

For an instant she came to herself, and was fright- 
ened because she had broken her vow. But, though 
she knew that she was dashing to destruction, she could 
not resist the temptation of proving to him that he was 
in the wrong, she could not help heaping insults on him. 

" I never said that : I said that I did not sympathize 
with this sudden tenderness for her." 

" Why do you, who boast of being straightf orwai d, 
tell me a lie ? " 

" I never boast, and I never tell lies," said he, re- 



3 o 4 ANNA KARENINA 

pressing the anger which was rising within him ; " and 
I am very sorry if you do not respect...." 

" Respect ! That was invented to cover up the lack 
of love. If you don't love me any more, it would be 
better and more honorable to say so." 

" No ! this is becoming intolerable," cried the count, 
suddenly leaping from his chair ; and, standing in front 
of her, speaking in measured tones : " Anna," he asked, 
" why do you try my patience so ? " and she could see 
how he was holding back the bitter words that were 
ready to escape him. " It has its limits." 

"What do you mean by that?" she cried, looking 
with terror at the unconcealed expression of hate on his 
whole face, and especially in his fierce; cruel eyes. 

" I mean ...." he began. Then he stopped. " I have 
a -right to demand what you wish of rue." 

" What can I wish ? I can only wish that you do not 
abandon me, as you are thinking of doing," she said, 
comprehending all that he left unsaid. "Everything 
else is secondary. I wish to be loved ; but love is gone. 
All is over." 

She turned toward the door. 

if Stop ! sto-op ! " said Vronsky, still darkly frowning, 
but holding her' by the arm. "What is the trouble? T 
said that it is necessary to postpone our starting for 
three days, and you answer by saying that I lie and am 
dishonorable." 

" Yes ; and I repeat it that a man who throws it into 
my face that he has sacrificed everything for me," said 
she, alluding to a former quarrel, " is worse than dis- 
honorable: he is heartless." 

n ."That settles it; my patience is at an end," cried 
Vronsky, quickly dropping her hand. 

M He hates me; that is certain," she thought, as she 
went from the room in silence with tottering steps. 
" H£ loves some other woman ; that is more certain 
still," she said to herself, as she reached her room. " I 
wish to be loved, but love is gone. All is over." She 
repeated the words that she had said, — " I must put an 
end to it." 






ANNA KARENINA 305 

"But how?" she asked herself, sinking into a chair 
before her mirror. 

The most heterogeneous thoughts crowded upon her. 
Where should she go ? To her aunt, who had brought 
her up ? To Dolly ? or simply go abroad alone by her- 
self ? What was he doing alone in his study ? Would 
the rupture be final, or was there a possibility of recon- 
ciliation ? How would Alekset Aleksandrovitch look 
upon it ? and what would her former acquaintances in 
Petersburg say ? Many other ideas of what would hap- 
pen came into her mind, but she could not take any 
satisfactory account of them. A vague idea came into 
her mind, and awakened some interest, but she could 
not express it. Thinking once more of Alekse'f Alek- 
sandrovitch, she recalled a phrase which she had used 
after her illness, and the feeling that clung- to her, — 
"Why didn't I die?" and immediately the words awoke 
the feeling which they had at that time expressed. Yes, 
that was the idea which alone settled everything. 

" Death, yes, that is the only way of escape. My 
terrible shame, and the dishonor which I have brought 
on Aleksei Aleksandrovitch and Serozha, all will be 
wiped away by my death. If I die, he will repent for 
me then ; he will be sorry, he will love me, he will suffer 
for me." 

A smile of pity for herself came over her face as she 
kept mechanically taking off and putting on the rings 
of her left hand, and with vivid imagination she pictured 
how he would feel after she was dead. 

Approaching steps — his steps — caught her ears. 
She affected to be busily engaged in taking off her 
rings, and did not turn her head. 

He came to her, and, taking her hand, said tenderly : 
" Anna, we will go day after to-morrow if you wish. I 
am ready for anything Well ? " said he, waiting. 

She did not speak. 

" What do you say ? " he asked. 

"You yourself know," said she; and then, unable 
to control herself longer, she burst into tears. " Leave 
me, leave me," she murmured through her sobs. " I 
vol. in. — 20 



3o6 ANNA KARENINA 

am going away to-morrow I will do more. What am 

I ? A lost woman, a millstone about your neck. I 
don't want to torment you. I will set you free. You 
do not love me; you love another." 

Vronsky begged her to be calm. He swore there 
was not the slightest ground for her jealousy, and that 
he had never ceased and never should cease to love her ; 
that he loved her more than ever. 

"Anna, why torture yourself and me so?" he asked, 
as he kissed her hand. His face expressed the deepest 
tenderness ; and it seemed to her that her ears caught 
the sound of tears in his voice, and that she felt their 
moisture on her hand. 

Passing suddenly from jealousy to the most passionate 
tenderness, she covered his head, his neck, his hands, 
with kisses. 



CHAPTER XXV 

Feeling that their reconciliation was complete, Anna 
the next morning eagerly made her preparations for 
departure. Although it was not yet definitely decided 
whether they should start on Monday or Tuesday, since 
Doth days had certain contingencies, Anna was busily 
making her preparations for the journey, feeling now 
perfectly indifferent whether they went a little sooner 
or a little later. She was engaged in her room taking 
various articles from an open trunk, when Vronsky, 
already dressed, came to her earlier than usual. 

" I am going now to maman. Perhaps she can get 
me the money through Yegerof, and then I shall be 
ready to go to-morrow," he said. 

She was feeling particularly cheerful, but his reference 
to his visit to his mother's datcha was like a stitch in the 
side. 

" No ; I shall not be ready myself ; " and immediately 
she thought, "So then it was possible to arrange it so as 
to do as I wished." — " No ; do just as you intended to. 
And now go to the dining-room, and I will join you as 



ANNA KARENINA 307 

soon as I have taken out these unnecessary things," she 
added, giving something more to Annushka, whose arms 
were already laden with a heap of articles. 

Vronsky was eating his beefsteak when she entered 
the dining-room. 

" You can't realize how odious these apartments have 
become to me," she said, as she sat down by him. 
" Nothing is more detestable than these chambres 
gamies. There is no individuality in them, no soul. 
The clock, the curtains, and especially the wall-papers — 
they are a cauchemar. I think of Vozdvizhenskoye as of 
the promised land. Shall you not send on the horses in 
advance ? " 

" No, they will follow us. But were you going any- 
where ?" 

" I wanted to go to the Wilsons' ; I must get a gown. 
So it is decided that we go to-morrow, is it ? " she added, 
in a joyous tone. But suddenly her face changed. 
Vronsky's valet came in, and asked him to sign a receipt 
for a despatch from Petersburg. Still there was nothing re- 
markable in Vronsky's receiving a telegram, but he acted 
as if he wanted to conceal something from her ; and, saying 
that he would sign it in his library, he turned to her: — 

" To-morrow without fail I shall have finished every- 
thing." 

"From whom is the despatch?" she asked, not hear- 
ing him. 

" From Stiva," answered the count, reluctantly. 

" Why did n't you show it to me ? What secret can 
there be between Stiva and me ? " 

Vronsky called the valet back, and ordered him to 
bring in the telegram. 

" I did not care to show it because Stiva has a pas- 
sion for telegraphing. Why need he send me a despatch 
to tell me that nothing was decided ? " 

"About the divorce?" 

"Yes. He maintains that he cannot get a definite 
answer. Here, see for yourself." 

Anna took the despatch with a trembling hand. It 
read as Vronsky had told her. At the end it said : — 



308 ANNA KARENINA 

" Little hcpe ; but I shall do everything possible and 
impossible. " 

" I told you yesterday that it was absolutely immaterial 
to me when I received the divorce, or whether I get it 
at all," said she, flushing, "so it is perfectly useless to 
hide anything from me. In the same way, he can hide 
from me his correspondence with women," thought she. 

" Yashvin wanted to come this morning with VoYtof," 
said Vronsky. " It seems that he has been gambling 
again, and has won from Pyebtsof all he has and more 
than he can pay.... about sixty thousand rubles." 

" No," said she, vexed because by this change in the 
conversation he so evidently insinuated that she was 
vexed. " Why do you think that this news interests me 
so much that you must hide it from me? I told you 
that I did not want to think about it, and I should wish 
that you had as little interest in it as I." 

" It interests me because I like clearness." 

" Clearness ! But in love, not in mere outside show," 
she said, getting more and more angry, not at his words, 
but at the tone of cool calmness in which he spoke. 
" Why do you want a divorce ? " 

'f Bozhe mot ! Always ' love/ " thought Vronsky, 
frowning. " You know very well why ; it is for your 
sake and for the children we may have." 

"There will not be any more children." 

" I am sorry for that." 

" You feel the need of it, because of the children ; but 
don't you have some thought of me ? " said she, forget- 
ting that he had just said "for your sake and the 
children's." 

The question of the possibility of having children had 
been long vexatious and trying to her. She took his 
desire to have children as a proof of indifference toward 
her beauty. 

" Akh ! I said for your sake .... more than all for your 
sake ; for I am convinced that your irritability comes 
largely from the uncertainty of your position," he an- 
swered, scowling with annoyance. 

"Yes, now he has ceased to pretend, and all his cold 



ANNA KARENINA 309 

hatred of me is plain to be seen," she said to herself, 
not hearing his words, but gazing with horror at a cold 
and cruel judge who looked out of his eyes, and mocked 
her. 

"That is not the cause," said she; "and I do not 
understand how my irritability, as you call it, can be 
caused by the fact that I have come absolutely into your 
power. How is my position indefinite? It seems to 
me the contrary. " 

" I am sorry that you are not willing to understand/* 
he replied, obstinately determined to express his thought. 
" Its uncertainty comes from this, — that you think that 
I am free." 

" Oh ! as far as that goes, you can be perfectly easy," 
she said, turning from him, and beginning to drink her 
coffee. She took the cup, raising her little finger, and 
put it to her lips; and as she drank she looked at him, 
and by the expression of his face saw clearly that her 
motions and the sounds that she made in swallowing 
were repulsive to him. 

" It is absolutely indifferent to me what your mother 
thinks, and how she intends to marry you off," said she, 
putting down the cup with trembling hand. 

"We will not talk of that." 

" Yes, we will too ; and I assure you that a heartless 
woman, whether young or old, — your mother or any- 
body else, — does not interest me; and I don't want to 
know her." 

" Anna, I beg you not to speak disrespectfully of my 
mother." 

" A woman who has no conception of what the honor 
and happiness of her son consist in, has no heart." 

" I repeat my request that you will not speak disre- 
spectfully of my mother, whom I respect," reiterated the 
count, raising his voice, and looking severely at Anna. 

She did not reply, but looked attentively at his face 
and his hands, and recalled with all its details, the scene 
of the evening before, and his passionate caresses 
" Just such caresses he has lavished, and will still con 
tinue to lavish, on other women," she thought. 



3 io ANNA KARENINA 

"You don't love your mother. Those are simple 
words, words, words ! " she said, looking at him with 
eyes full of hatred. 

" If that is the case, it is necessary ...." 

" It is necessary to decide ; and I have decided," said 
she, and was preparing to leave the room, when the 
door opened, and Yashvin entered. 

She stopped immediately, and bade him good-morning. 

Why, when her soul was full of bitterness ; when she 
felt that she was at the turning-point of her life, which 
might take a terrible direction, — why, at this moment, 
she had to dissimulate before a stranger, who sooner or 
later would know all, she could not tell; but, calming 
the inner tumult of her feelings, she sat down again, 
and began to talk with the guest. 

" Well, how are your affairs ? Have they paid you 
your debt ? " she asked. 

" No; not yet. Probably I shall not get it all. And 
I Ve got to leave Wednesday," said Yashvin, awkwardly, 
glancing at Vronsky, and evidently suspecting that a 
quarrel was in progress. " When do you leave ? " 

"Day after to-morrow, I think," said Vronsky. 

"You have taken long to make up your minds." 

" But now it is all decided," said Anna, looking straight 
into Vronsky's eyes with a look that told him how im- 
possible it was to think of reconciliation. 

" Did n't you feel sorry for that unlucky Pyebtsof ? " 
asked Anna, addressing Yashvin. 

" I have never asked myself whether I pitied a mai 
or not, Anna Arkadyevna. My whole fortune is here,* 
said he, pointing to his pocket. " Now I am a rich 
man, but I may come out of the club this evening a 
beggar. Whoever plays with me would gladly leave 
me without a shirt, and I him. Well ! We engage in 
war, and that makes the fun." 

" Well, but if you were married, how would it be foi 
your wife ■?" 

Yashvin laughed. 

" But I am not married, and I don't expect to marry.' 

" But how about Helsingfors ? " suggested Vronsky 



ANNA KARENINA 311 

joining in the conversation, and looking at Anna's 
smiling face. But as she met his glance her face 
suddenly assumed a set and cold expression, as much 
as to say to him : " I have not forgotten. It 's still the 
same." 

"And haven't you ever been in love?" she asked of 
Yashvin. 

" Oh, Lord ! plenty of times. Only remember, one 
may sit down to cards, but must be able to get up when 
the time comes for a rendezvous ; but I interest myself 
in love-affairs in such a way that I need not be late to 
play my hand in the evening. And so I always arrange 
matters," 

" You misunderstand ; I did not ask about that, but 
about actual ...." She wanted to say Helsingfors^ but 
she did not like to use a word which Vronsky had just 
spoken. 

Voitof came at this moment to see about a horse 
which he had bought ; Anna got up and left the room. 

Before he left the house, Vronsky went to her room. 
She pretended to look for something on the table, but 
then, being ashamed of this dissimulation, she looked 
him straight in the face. She asked him coolly in 
French, " What do you want ? " 

"The certificate for Gambetta; I have sold him," an- 
swered Vronsky, in a tone which said louder than words, 
" I have not time for explanations, nor would they lead 
to anything." 

" I 'm not to blame," thought he ; "if she wants to 
punish herself, taut pis pour elle" 

However, as he left the room he thought she said 
something to him, and his heart was suddenly touched 
with compassion for her. 

" What is it, Anna ? " he asked. 

" I said nothing," she answered coldly and calmly. 

"Nothing! taut pis" he said again to himself. On 
his way out, as he passed a mirror, he caught sight in 
it of her pale face and trembling lips. He was tempted 
to go back and say some comforting words to her, but 
he was already too far on his way. He passed the 



312 ANNA KARENINA 

entire day outside the house ; and when he came home 
the maid informed him that Anna Arkadyevna had a 
headache, and begged him not to disturb her. 



CHAPTER XXVI 

Never before had they let a day end with a quarrel 
unsettled. This was the first time. This was not a 
mere quarrel ; it was evidently the avowal of permanent 
coldness. How was it possible for him to look at her 
as he had done when he came into her room after his 
document? how could he look at her, and see that her 
heart was full of despair, and then go out with a calm, in- 
different face ? He had not only grown cold to her, but 
lie hated her, because he loved some other woman. 
This was clear. And, as she recalled all the cruel 
words which he had said to her, Anna began to imagine 
also the words which she was certain he would like to 
say to her and might say, and she grew more and more 
irritated. 

"I will not keep you," she imagined him saying. 
"You may go wherever you please. As you don't care 
to be divorced from your husband, you probably intend 
to go back to him. If you want money, I will give it 
to you. How many rubles do you want ? " 

AH these insulting words which the cruel man might 
say were said merely in her imagination, but she could 
not forgive him any more than if he had really said 
them. 

" But did he not swear to me only yesterday that he 
loved me ? Is he not a sincere and honest man ? " she 
said to herself a moment afterward. " Have I not been 
in despair several times before, all for nothing ? " 

She passed the entire day, except two hours during 
which she made a visit- to her prottgfc, the Wilsons, in 
alternate doubt and hope. Was all at an end? Was 
there any chance of a reconciliation ? Should she leave 
him then and there, or should she wait and see him once 
again ? She waited for him all day ; and in the eve- 



ANNA KAREN1NA 313 

ning she went to her room, telling Annushka to say that 
she had a headache. 

" If he comes in spite of that, it will show that he 
loves me still ; if not, it is over, and I shall make up my 
mind what there is for me to do.".... 

Late in the evening she heard his carriage-wheels on 
the pavement, his ring, and his steps, and his colloquy 
with the maid ; he believed what he was told, he did not 
care to make any further inquiries, and he went to his 
room. Evidently all was at an end. And Death as the 
only means of establishing a love for her in his heart, of 
punishing him, and of winning the victory in the struggle 
which the evil spirit that had possession of her soul was 
waging with him, clearly, vividly, presented itself before 
her. 

Now everything was a matter of indifference — 
whether they went to the country or not, whether she 
procured the divorce or not — it was unnecessary ; the 
one essential thing was to punish him. 

When she poured out her usual dose of opium, and 
it came over her that if she swallowed all that was in 
the vial she would die, it seemed so easy and simple 
that she felt a real joy in imagining how he would 
mourn, repent, and love her when it was too late. She 
lay on her bed with open eyes, and watched the dying 
candle-light on the molded cornice of the ceiling mingle 
with the shadow of the screen which divided the room ; 
she vividly pictured to herself how he would think when 
she was no more, when she was only a memory. " How 
could I speak to her such cruel words?"' he would say 
to himself. " How could I leave her without saying 
anything at all ? and now she is no more ; she has left 
us forever ! She is there ...." 

Suddenly the shadow of the screen seemed to waver 
and cover the whole cornice, the whole ceiling; other 
shadows from the other sides joined in with it; for an 
instant they seemed to be running, then with new rapid- 
ity they trembled, melted together, and all became dark. 

" Death ! " thought she ; and such a great terror seized 
upon her, that for a long time she did not know where 



3 14 ANNA KARENINA 

she was; and it was long .before her trembling hands 
could find the matches, in order to light another candle 
in place of the one that had burned down and gone out. 
, "No, no! anything,... only, to live! I love him, and 
he loves me; these dreadful days will go by!" she said 
to herself, feeling that tears of joy poured down her 
cheeks at her return to life. And to escape her, terror 
she fled to Vron sky's library. 

He was in his library, soundly sleeping. She went to 
him, and, holding the candle above his face,, looked at 
him a long time. Now, as he slept, she felt such love 
for him, that at the sight of him she could not refrain 
from tears, of tenderness; but. she knew that, if he woke 
he. would look, at her >vith a cold, self -justifying look, 
and that before she spoke a word of her love she would 
not be able to resist the temptation of proving to him 
how wrong he was. 

Without waking him she went back to her room ; and, 
after a second dose of opium, she fell into'a heavy sleep 
which lasted till morning, and all the time she was con- 
scious of herself. »• r ' r, j h 

Toward morning she had, the frightful nightmare 
which she had experienced- several times even before 
her liaison with Vronsky. She saw a little old man, 
with unkempt beard, doing something, bending over a 
gourd, and muttering unintelligible French words; and, 
as always when she had this nightmare, and therein 
lay the horror of the dream, she felt that the little old 
man paid no heed to her, but did this horrible some- 
thing in the gourd over her head. She awoke in a cold 
perspiration. 

When she got up, the events of the day before seemed 
enveloped in mist. 

" There was a quarrel. It has happened several 
times before. I said I had a headache, and he didn't 
come to see me. That is all. To-morrow we shall go 
away. I must see him, and get ready for our depar- 
ture," she said to herself ; and, knowing that he was in 
his library, she started to go to him. 

But, in crossing the drawing-room, her attention was 



ANNA KARENINA 315 

arrested by the sound of a carriage stopping, and she 
looked out of the window and saw a carriage, from the 
window of which a young girl in a light hat was putting 
out her head, and giving orders to the footman, who 
was at the door-bell. After a colloquy in the vestibule, 
some one came up-stairs, and Anna heard Vronsky's 
steps in the room next the drawing-room. Then he ran 
swiftly down-stairs. Anna looked out again, and saw 
him go out to the door-steps bare-headed, and approach 
the carriage. The young girl in the lilac-colored hat 
handed him a package. Vronsky smiled as he spoke 
to her. The carriage drove away, and Vronsky came 
quickly up-stairs again. 

The mist which enwrapped everything in Anna's soul 
suddenly cleared away. The feelings of the day before 
tore her anguished heart more cruelly than ever. She 
now could not understand how she could have so far 
debased herself as to stay a single day under his roof. 
She went to his library, to acquaint him with the resolu- 
tion that she had taken. 

" The Princess Sorokin and her daughter have brought 
me the money and papers from maman. I could not 
get them yesterday. How is your headache ? better ? " 
he said quietly, seeming not to notice the gloomy and 
solemn expression of Anna's face. 

She did not reply ; but, standing in the middle of the 
room, she looked fixedly at him. He glanced at her 
for an instant, his brows contracted, and he continued to 
read his letter. Without speaking, Anna turned slowly 
about, and left the room. He might yet detain her ; but 
she had reached the door. He said not a word, the only 
sound heard was the rustling of the sheet of paper. 

" Oh ! by the way," he exclaimed, just as she was on 
the threshold, " do we really go to-morrow ? " 

" You, but not I," answered she, turning round on him. 

"Anna, it is impossible to live in this way." 

"You, not I," she repeated. 

" It 's becoming intolerable ! " 

" You .... you will be sorry for this," said she ; and she 
went out. 



316 ANNA KARENINA 

Frightened at the despairing tone with which she 
spoke those last words, he sprang up and started to 
follow her ; but, on reflection, he seated himself again, 
and, firmly clenching his teeth, he frowned. That unbe- 
coming threat, as he termed it, irritated him. " I have tried 
every means," he said to himself : " the only thing left is 
to pay no attention ; " and he made up his mind to go to 
the city and to his mother's again, to have her sign a deed. 

Anna heard the sound of his steps in his library and 
the dining-room. He stopped at the drawing-room. 
But he did not come to her : he only gave some direc- 
tions about sending the stallion to Vo'itof. Then she 
heard the calash drive to the entrance, a door opened 
and Vronsky went out. Then he came back into the 
vestibule again and some one ran up-stairs. It was his 
valet, who was sent to get a pair of forgotten gloves. 
She went to the window, and saw Vronsky take his 
gloves, then touch the coachman's back, and say some 
words to him ; and then, without glancing at the window, 
he sat down as usual, in the carriage, crossing one leg 
over the other. And, putting on the gloves, he turned 
the corner, and disappeared from Anna's sight 



CHAPTER XXVII 

"He is gone. It's all over," said Anna to herself, as 
she stood at the window ; and the impression of black- 
ness which she had felt in the night at the dying candle 
and that of the nightmare blending in one, filled her 
heart with chill horror. " No, I cannot endure this," she 
cried, and, crossing the room, she rang the bell violently. 
She was so afraid to stay alone, that, without waiting, 
she went to meet the servant. 
• "Find out where the count has gone." 

The man replied that he had gone to the stables. 
" He left word that the carriage would return immedi- 
ately if you wished to go out." 

" Very well. Wait, I am going to write a note, send 
Mikhail with it to the stables. Have him hurry." 



ANNA KARENINA 317 

She sat down and wrote : — 

I am to blame. Come back. We must explain things. 
For Heaven's sake, come ! I am frightened. 

' She sealed the note, and gave it to the servant ; and, 
in her fear of being alone, she went* to the nursery. 

" Why, he is not the same as he was. Where are his 
blue eyes, and his pretty, timid smile ? " was her first 
thought when she saw the plump and rosy little girl, with 
her dark curly hair, instead of Serozha, whom, in the 
confusion of her thoughts, she had expected to see. 

The little girl was seated at the table, noisily tapping 
on it with a glass stopper. She looked unintelligently at 
her mother with two dark, currant-colored eyes. Answer- 
ing the English nurse that she was well, and expected to 
go to the country the next day, Anna sat down beside 
the little girl, and began to spin the stopper from the 
carafe in front of her. The motion of the child's brows 
and her hearty laugh recalled Vronsky so vividly that 
Anna, choking down her sobs, rose suddenly, and hur- 
ried from the room. 

" Is it possible that all is over ? No, it cannot be," 
thought she. " He will return. But how can he explain 
that smile of his and his animation, after he spoke with 
her? But even if he doesn't explain it, I shall believe 
him ; if I do not believe, there is only one thing left, 
and that I do not want." 

She looked at her watch. Twelve minutes had gone by. 

" Now he must have received my note, and must come 
back in ten minutes. And what if he should n't come 
back ? No, but that 's impossible. * He must not find 
me with red eyes; I'll go and bathe my face. There, 
there! Have I brushed my hair yet?" She could not 
remember. She put her hands to her head. " Yes, I 
brushed my hair, but I really don't remember when it 
was." She actually did not believe that her hands told 
her truly, and she went to the pier-glass to see. Her 
hair was properly arranged, but she could not remember 
anything about it. 

" Who is this ? " she asked herself, as she caught sight 



3 1 8 ANNA KARENINA 

of a glowing face and strangely brilliant eyes gazing at 
her from the mirror. " Yes, it is I." And she suddenly 
seemed to feel his kisses ; and she shivered; and shrugged 
her shoulders. Then she put her hand to her lips, and 
kissed it. "It must be that. I am going Out of my 
mind ; " and she fled to her room, which Annushka was 
putting in order. < 

" Annushka/* she said, as she stood before the maid, 
not knowing what to say. 

" Will you go to Darya Aleksandrovna's ? " said the 
maid, as if reading her thoughts. 

■ " To Darya Aleksandrovna's ? Yes, I will go there. 
Fifteen minutes to go, fifteen to come back. He ought 
to be here." She looked at her watch. "Oh! how 
could he leave me in such a condition ? How can he 
live, and not be at peace with me ? " She went to the 
window, and looked out into the street; perhaps she 
had made a mistake in calculating, and she began over 
again to count the minutes since he left. 

Just as she was about going to consult the great clock, 
so as to verify hers, a carriage stopped before the door. 
It was the count's calash, but no one came up-stairs, and 
she heard voices in the vestibule. It was the messenger, 
who came back in the calash. She hurried down to him. 

" They were too late for the count. He had gone to 
the Nizhegorodsky railway station!" j«j < j 

" What is the matter ? what is it ? V she asked, address- 
ing the ruddy, jolly Mikhatl, who handed her back the 
note. Oh, yes ; he did not receive it, she remembered. 

" Go with this note to the Countess Vronsky's in the 
country, you understand? and bring, an answer back to 
me immediately 1" 

"But what shall I do?" she thought. "Yes, I will 
go to see Dolly, to be sure, or else I shall go out of my 
mind. Ah! I? might telegraph ! " /And she wrote the 
following despatch : — ■ 

I absolutely must speak to you. Come back immediately. 

Having sent the telegram, she went and dressed ; and 
then, with her hat on, she again looked at the stout, 



ANNA KARENINA 319 

good-natured Annushka, whose little, gentle gray eyes 
were full of sympathy. 

" Annushka, my dear, what am I to do ? " murmured 
she, dropping into an arm-chair with a sob. 

" You mustn't excite yourself so, Anna Arkadyevna. 
Go out for a drive ; that will divert you. These things 
will happen," said the maid. 

"Yes, I am going out," said Anna, collecting her 
thoughts, and rising. li If a despatch comes while I am 
gone, send it to Darya Aleksandrovna's. Or ....no, I 
will come back — I must keep from thinking. I must 
do something, and go out, and, above all, get out of this 
house," thought she, listening, with alarm, to the wild 
beating of her heart. She hastened out and got into the 
calash. 

" Where do you wish to go ? " asked Piotr, just before 
he took his seat on the box. 

" To Znamenko, to the OblonskysV 



CHAPTER XXVIII 

The weather was clear. A fine, thick rain had fallen 
all the morning, but now it had just cleared off. The 
roofs and flagstones and harnesses and the metal-work 
of the carriages glittered in the May sunshine. It was 
three o'clock, the liveliest time in the streets. 

Sitting in the corner of the comfortable calash, which 
swung easily on its elastic springs as it rolled swiftly 
along, drawn by a pair of grays, Anna, soothed by the 
monotonous rumble of the wheels and the hurrying im- 
pressions that she received in the fresh, pure air, reviewed 
the events of the past few days, and her situation seemed 
entirely different from what it had been at home. Now, 
the idea of death did not frighten her so much, and death 
itself did not seem to her so inevitable. Now she blamed 
herself for the humiliation to which she had stooped. 

" I begged him to forgive me. I bent before him. I 
accused myself, Why did I ? Can't I live without 
him?" 



320 ANNA KARENINA 

And, leaving this question unanswered, she began to 
read the sign-boards mechanically. 

" Kontor i sklad. Zubnol ' Vratch. 1 — Yts, I will tell 
Dolly all about it. She does not love Vronsky. It will 
be hard, shameful, .... but I will confess everything. She 
loves me. I will follow her advice. I will not allow 
him to treat me like a child. Philoppof — Kalatchi ; 
they say they send those loaves as far as Petersburg. 
The water at Moscow is so good; ah! the wells of 
Muitishchensky ! " i ^ 

And she remembered how long, long ago; when she 
was seventeen, she had gone with her aunt to the 
monastery of Troftsa. 2 ; • 

'J They traveled with horses in those days. Was it 
really I, with the red hands? How many things which 
seemed then ibeautif ul and unattainable are worthless to 
me now! What I was then, is passed forever beyond 
recall ! And ages could not bring me back. Would I 
have believed then that I could have fallen into such 
debasement?.... How proud and self-satisfied he will be 

when he reads my note! But I will tell him How 

disagreeable this paint smells! Why are they always 
painting and building? Modui i ttborui. Fashionable 
Dressmaker" she read. 

A man bowed to her ; it was Annushka's husband. 

" Our parasites, as Vronsky says. Ours ? Why otirs ? 
Ah, if one could tear out the past by the roots ! But 
that's impossible; one can only avoid thinking about it. 
And I do that." 

And yet, here she recalled her past with Aleksef 
Aleksandrovitch, and how she had driven him out of her 
memory. i i i • „■ 

" Dolly will think that I am leaving the second hus- 
band, and that I am, therefore, really bad. Do I want 
to be good? I cannot.".... And she felt the tears com- 

< *. f» 

1 Office and warehouse. Surgeon-Dentist. 

2 The Troiiskaia Lavra, or Trinity Laura, near Moscow, founded by 
St. Sergius in r »the fourteenth century in the time of the Grand Prince 
Simeon; the' richest and most fambus institution of its kind in Russia. At 
one time it had 700 monks and 110,000 souls, or male serfs. 



ANNA KARENINA 321 

ing. And, seeing two happy young girls going by, she 
fell to wondering why they were smiling at each other. 
" Probably about love. They don't know how sad 

and wretched it is The boulevards and the -children ! 

There are three little boys, playing horse. Serozha! 
my little Serozha. I shall lose all. I shall never have 

him again Well, if he does not come back, all is 

indeed lost. Perhaps he missed the train, and has 
already reached home. Do I wish to humiliate myself 
still more?" she said, reproaching herself for her weak- 
ness. " No, I 'm going to Dolly's. I shall say to her, 
'I am unhappy, I am suffering; I deserve it; but I am 
so unhappy, help me ! ' Oh, these horses, this calash ! 
how I hate to use them ! they are his. I will never see 
them again ! " 

While thinking over what she should say to Dolly, and 
deliberately torturing her heart, she reached the house, 
and went up the steps. 

" Is there any one here ? " she asked, in the anteroom. 

" Katerina Aleksandrovna Levina," answered the 
servant. 

" Kitty, the same Kitty with whom Vronsky was once 
in love," thought Anna; "and he thinks of her with 
love, and is sorry that he did not marry her; and he 
thinks of me with hate, and is sorry that he ever met 
me." 

When Anna arrived, the two sisters were talking over 
the subject of feeding babies. Dolly went alone to the 
drawing-room to receive the guest that had come to 
disturb their conversation. 

"You haven't gone away yet? I was just going to 
your house," said Dolly. " I have a letter from Stiva 
to-day." 

" We had a despatch," answered Anna, glancing round 
to see if Kitty was coming. 

" He writes that he does not understand what Aleksef 
Aleksandrovitch requires, but that he will not come away 
till he has a definite answer." 

" I thought you had company. May I read the 
letter?" 

VOL. III. — 21 



yi<F ANNA KARENINA 

' "Yes, .... Kitty/' said Dolly, confused ; "she is in the 
nursery. You know she has been very ill." 

u I heard 'so. > May I read the letter ? V 

" Certainly ; I '11 go and get it.' AlekseY Aleksandro- 
vitch does not refuse; on the contrary, Stiva is quite 
hopeful," said Dolly, stopping at the door. 

" I neither hope nor want anything," said Anna. 

" Does Kitty think it humiliating to meet me ? " 
thought Anna, when she was left alone. " Perhaps she 
is right ; but she who once loved Vronsky has no right 
to thrust it in my face, even if she is right. I know 
that a virtuous woman cannot receive me in my present 
position. I have given up everything for him, and this 
is my reward ! Ah, how I hate him ! Why did I come 
here ? t I am more wretched here than at home." 

She heard the voices of the two sisters in an adjoin- 
ing room. 

"And what am I to say to Dolly ? Delight Kitty with 
the spectacle of my misery ? Submit to her condescen- 
sion? Never! Even Dolly wouldn't understand. I 
will not say anything to her. All I should want to see 
Kitty for would be to show her that I am indifferent, — 
that I scorn every one and everything." 

Dolly came in with the letter ; Anna silently looked 
it through,* and returned it. » 

"I knew all that," said she; "but it doesn't interest 
meat all." 

" Now, why not ? I have good hopes," said Dolly, look- 
ing critically at Anna. She had never seen her in 
such a strange state of irritation. "When do you go 
away?" 

'Anna half closed her eyes, and looked before her with- 
out answering. 

>n "Is Kitty afraid of me?" she asked, after a moment, 
glancing toward the door, with heightened color. 

" Akh, what nonsense ! But she is nursing the baby 

.... it does riot" go very well yet I have been giving 

her §ome advice .... she will be delighted, and is coming 
directly," answered Dolly, awkwardly, not knowing how 
to tell a fib. " Oh, there she is now." 



ANNA KARENINA 323 

When Kitty heard that Anna was there, she had not 
wished to appear ; but Dolly had persuaded her. Con- 
trolling her repugnance, she went to the parlor, and, 
blushing as she approached Anna, she held out her 
hand. 

" I am very glad," said she, in a trembling voice. 

Kitty was confused by the struggle between her dis- 
like of this wicked* woman and her desire to be polite 
to her ; but, as soon as she saw Anna's beautiful, attrac- 
tive face, all her unfriendliness vanished. 

" I should not have been surprised if you had refused 
to see me; I am used to every thing," said Anna. "You 
have been very ill ; yes, you have changed." 

Kitty felt that Anna looked at her with dislike, and 
she attributed her unfriendliness to the awkward position 
in which she stood in regard to herself, having once been 
her especial favorite. Her heart was filled with com- 
passion. 

They talked of Kitty's illness, about her baby, and of 
Stiva ; but evidently nothing interested Anna. 

"I came to bid you good-by," she said to Dolly, as 
she rose. 

" When do you go ? " 

But, without answering her, Anna turned to Kitty. 

"Well, I am very glad to have seen you again," said 
she, with a smile. " I 've heard so much about you from 
every one, and especially from your husband. He came 
to see me, and I liked him very much," she added, with 
a wicked emphasis. " Where is he ? " 

" He has gone to the country," answered Kitty, 
blushing. 

" Give my love to him ; now don't forget ! " 

" I will do it, certainly," said Kitty, simply, with a com- 
passionate look. 

"So, prashchai, Dolly, good-by," said Anna, kissing 
her ; and, shaking hands with Kitty, she hastened away. 

"She is as fascinating as ever," remarked Kitty, to 
her sister, when Dolly rejoined Kitty. "And how 
beautiful she is ! But there is something very painful 
about her .... terribly painful." 



324 j ANNA KARENINA 

" She does n't seem to be in her usual state to-day. 1 
thought she came near bursting into tears, when I accom- 
panied her into the anteroom." 



CHAPTER XXIX 

Anna took her seat in her carriage in an even unhap- 
pier state of mirid than she had been when she left her 
house. In addition to her former sufferings, she now 
felt the humiliation and sense of moral degeneracy which 
her meeting with Kitty had clearly made evident. 

" Where would you wish to go now ? Home ? V asked 
Piotr. 

"Yes, home," she replied, now not thinking at all 
where she was going. 

"They looked on me as some strange, incomprehen- 
sible curiosity. — What can that man be saying so 
eagerly to the other ? " thought she, seeing two passers- 
by talking together. "Is it possible to say what one 
really feels? I wanted to confess to Dolly, and- 1 am 
glad that I kept still. How she would have rejoiced at 
my unhappiness ! She would have tried to hide it, but 
at heart she would have been glad ; she would have 
thought it, just that I should be punished for that happi- 
ness which she begrudged me. And Kitty would have 
been still more pleased. How I read her through and 
through ! She knows her husband liked me uncommonly 
well, and she is jealous, and hates me; and, what 's more, 
she despises me. In her eyes, I am an immoral woman. 
If I had been an immoral woman I might have made 
him fall in love with me, if I had wanted to ! I confess 
I thought of it. — There goes a man who is delighted 
with his own looks," she said to herself, as a tall, florid 
man went by, and, mistaking her for an acquaintance, 
lifted his shiny hat from his shiny bald head, and 
instantly recognized his mistake. 

" He thought he knew me ! He knows me quite as 
well as any one in the world knows me. I don't know 
myself ; I only know my appetites, as the' French say. — 



ANNA KARENINA 325 

They covet some of that bad ice-cream/' she said to 
herself, as she watched two little street children stand- 
ing in front of a vender, who had just set down from 
his head his tub of ice-cream, and was wiping his face 
with a corner of his coat. 

"We all want our sweet delicacies; if not sugar- 
plums, then bad ice-cream, just like Kitty, who, not 
catching Vronsky, took Levin. She envies me, she 
hates me; and we all hate one another, I Kitty, and 
Kitty me. That is a fact. — Tint kin coiffeur — Je mefais 

coiffer par Tint kin I will tell him this nonsense 

when he comes," thought she, and smiled, and then 
instantly remembered that there was no one now to 
whom she could tell amusing things. " There is noth- 
ing amusing, nothing gay; it is all disgusting. The 
vesper-bell is ringing, and that storekeeper is crossing 
himself so quickly that one would think he was afraid 
of losing the chance. 

"Why these churches, these bells, these lies? Just 
to hide the fact that we all hate one another, like those 
izvoshchiks who are swearing at each other so angrily. 
Yashvin was right when he said, ' He is after my shirt, 
and I am after his.' That is a fact." 

She was so engrossed by these thoughts that she for- 
got her grief for a while, and was surprised when the 
carriage stopped in front of her house. The sight of 
the Swiss, coming to meet her, reminded her that she 
had sent a letter and a telegram. 

" Is there an answer yet ? " 

"I will go and see," said the Swiss; and, looking on 
the secretary, he came back in a moment with a tele- 
gram in a thin, square envelop. Anna read : — 

I cannot be back before ten o 'clock. Vronsky. 

"And has the messenger come back?" 

"Not yet," replied the Swiss. 

"Ah! if that is so, then I know what I must do;" 
and, feeling a vague sense of anger and a desire for 
vengeance arising in her soul, she ran up-stairs. 

" I myself will go and find him," thought she. 



3 26 ANNA KARENINA 

"Before I go away forever, I will .tell him all, I never 
hated any one as I hate this man ! " 

And when she caught sight of Vronsky's hat hanging 
on the peg, she shivered, with aversion. She did not 
reflect that the despatch was in answer to her telegram, 
and that he could not as yet have received her note. 
She imagined him now chatting gay ly, with his mother 
and the Princess Sorokin, without a thought of her 
suffering. 

" Yes, I must go as quickly as possible," she said, not 
knowing at all whither she should go. 

She felt that she must fly from the thoughts that 
oppressed her in this terrible house. The servants, the 
walls, the furniture, everything about it, filled her with 
disgust and pain, and crushed her with a terrible 
weight. 

"Yes, I must go to the railroad station, and if not 
there, then somewhere else, to punish him." 

She looked at the time-table in the newspaper. The 
evening train went at two minutes past eight. 

"Yes, I shall have plenty of time." 
, She ordered the two other horses to be harnessed, and 
she had transferred from her trunk to her traveling-bag 
things enough to last for several days. She knew that 
she should never come back again. She revolved a 
thousand plans in her head, and determined that when 
she had done what she had in mind to do, either at the 
countess's country seat, or at the station, she would go 
to the first city on the Nizhni Novgorod Railway and 
stay there. i 

Dinner was on the table. She went to r it, smelt the 
bread and cheese, and persuading herself that the odor 
of the victuals was repugnant to her, she ordered 
the carriage again, and went out. The house was 
already casting a shadow across the wide street; but 
the sky was clear, and it was warm in the sun. An- 
nushka, who brought her things, and Piotr, who carried 
them to the carriage, and the coachman, who was evi- 
dently angry, all were disagreeable to her, ancj. vexed 
her with their words and motions. . j ; 



ANNA KARENINA 327 

" I do not need you, Piotr." 

" Who will get your ticket ? " 

" Well, go if you wish ; it makes no difference to me," 
she said pettishly. 

Piotr nimbly mounted the box, and, folding his arms, 
ordered the coachman to drive to the station. 



CHAPTER XXX 

u Now I am myself again. Now I remember it all," 
said Anna to herself, as soon as the calash started, and, 
rocking a little, rattled along over the cobble-stones of 
the pavement ; and once more her impressions began to 
go whirling through her mind. 

" Yes, what was that good thing that I was thinking 
about last? Tiutkin, the coiffeur? Oh, no; not that. 
Oh, yes; what Yashvin said about the struggle for 
existence, and hatred, the only thing that unites men. 
No; we go at haphazard." 

She saw in a carriage drawn by four horses a party 
of merrymakers, who had evidently come to the city for 
a pleasure-trip. 

"And the dog which you take with you does not help 
you at all. You can't get out of yourself." Glancing 
in the direction where Piotr was turning, she saw a 
working-man almost dead drunk, who, with a flopping 
head, was being led by a policeman. She added : " That 
man's way is quicker. Count Vronsky and I did not 
reach this pleasure, though we expected much." 

And now for the first time Anna turned this bright 
light, all-revealing, upon her relations with the count; 
hitherto she had steadfastly refused to do so. 

" What did he seek in me ? A satisfaction for his 
vanity, rather than for his love ! " 

She remembered Vronsky's words, and the expression 
of his face, which reminded her of a submissive dog, 
when they first met and loved. Everything seemed a 
confirmation of this thought. 

" Yes ; he cared for the triumph of success above 



3^8 ANNA KARENINA 

everything. Of course, he loved me, but chiefly from 
vanity. Now that he is not proud of me any .more, it- is 
over. He is* ashamed, of me. He has taken from me 
all that he could take, and now I am of no use to him. 
I weigh. upon him, land he does not want to be in dis- 
honorable relationship with me. He said, yesterday, he 
wanted the divorce and to marry me so as to burn his 
ships. Perhaps he loves me still, — but how? The 
zest is gone," she said in English.^ "That man likes 
to show off, and he is mighty proud of himself," she 
added, as she looked at a ruddy-faced man riding by on 
a' hired horse. . . 

" There is nothing about me any longer to his taste. 
If I leave him, he will rejoice in the bottom of his heart." 

This was not mere hypothesis ; she saw this clearly, 
in that .penetrating light which now revealed to her the 
meaning of life, and of her false relations. 

" My love has been growing more and more passion- 
ate and selfish ; his has been growing fainter and fainter. 
That is why we cannot get on together." ^She went on 
thinking. . " There can't be any help for it. He is all in 
all to 'me. I struggle to draw him closer and closer to 
me, and he wants to fly from me. Up to the time of 
our union, we flew to meet each other ; but now we move 
irresistibly apart. This cannot be altered. He accuses 
me of being absurdly jealous, — and I am; I confess 
that I am absurdly jealous, and yet I am not either. I am 
not jealous, but my love is no longer satisfied. But .... " 
she opened her mouth to speak, and, in the excitement 
caused by the stress of her thoughts, she changed her 
place in the carriage. \\* 

j ¥ If I could only be something else than a passionate 
mistress, but; I cannot, and I do not wish to be ; and by 
this very .wish I awake his dislike of me, while he stirs 
up all my evil passions, and this cannot be. otherwise. 

" Don't I know that he would not deceive me, that he 
is no longer. in love, with Kitty, that he has no intention 
of marrying Sorokina ? I know it well, but it is none 
the easier for me. If now that he no longer loves me, 
he is kind, affectionate to me, merely from a sense of 



ANNA KARENINA 329 

ditty, but cannot be what I must have, that would be a 
thousand times worse than to have him angry with me. 
That would be — hell! And so it is. He has long 
ceased to love me. When love ceases, hate begins. — I 
don't know these streets at all. What hosts of houses ! 
in them, people, people, — no end of them! and they 
all hate one another ! 

"Well! let me think what could happen to me now 
that would give me happiness again ? Suppose that 
Alekse'f Aleksandrovitch should consent to the divorce, 
and would give me back Serozha, and that I should marry 
Vronsky? " 

And as she thought of AlekseY Aleksandrovitch, Anna 
could see him with extraordinary vividness before her, 
as if alive, with his dull, lifeless, faded eyes, his white, 
blue-veined hands, and his cracking joints, and the in- 
tonations of his voice, and, as she recalled their relation 
to each other, which had been called love> she shuddered 
with aversion. 

" Well ! Suppose I got the divorce, and were married 
to Vronsky, would not Kitty still look at me as she 
looked at me to-day? She certainly would. Would 
not Serozha ask and wonder why I had two husbands ? 
But between me and Vronsky what new feeling could I 
imagine ? Is it possible that our relations might be, if 
not pleasanter, at least not so tormenting as they are 
now ? No, and no ! " she replied, without the least hesi- 
tation. " Impossible ! We are growing apart ; and I 
make him unhappy ; he makes me unhappy, and I can- 
not change him ; every means has been tried. The screw 
has been turned for the last time 

" Now, there 's a beggar with a child. She thinks 
she inspires pity. Were we not thrown into the world 
to hate one another, and to torment ourselves and every- 
body else? Here come the schoolboys out to play! 
Serozha ? " 

It reminded her of her son. 

" I used to think that I loved him, and I was touched 
by his gentleness. I have lived without him, I have 
given him up for my love, and was not sorry for the 



330 ANNA KARENINA 

change, as long as Iwas contented with him whom I 
loved." :••! >,':.-■ . 

And she remembered with disgust what .she called 
that love. And the clearness with which she now saw 
her own life, . as well as the lives of others, delighted 
her. 

"Thus am I, and Piotr and the coachman, Feodor, 
and that merchant, and, all people from here to the 
Volga, wherever these -remarks are applicable.... and 
everywhere and always," she thought, as the carriage 
stopped in front of the low-roofed, station of the Nizhni 
Novgorod Railway, and the porters came hurrying out 
to. meet her. 

"Shall i;book you for Obiralovka ? " asked Piotr. 

She had entirely forgotten why she had come, and 
only by a great effort could she understand what he 
meant. 

" Yes," she, said, handing him her purse; and, taking 
her little red bag, she got out of the carriage. As she 
entered the waiting-room for the first-class passengers 
with the throng, she reviewed all the details of her situ- 
ation and the plans between which she was halting. 
And again hope and despair in alternation irritated the 
wounds in her tortured, cruelly palpitating heart. As 
she sat on the stelliform divan waiting for the train, she 
looked with aversion on the people.going and coming, — 
they were all her enemies, — and thought now of how, 
when she reached the station, she would write to him, 
and what she would write, and then how at this very 
moment he — not thinking of her suffering — was com- 
plaining to his mother of his position, ' and how she 
would go to his room, and what she would say to him. 

The thought that she might yet live happily crossed 
her brain ; and how hard it was to love and hate him at 
the same time! And, above all, how frightfully her 
heart was beating ! 



ANNA KARENINA 331 



CHAPTER XXXI 

A bell sounded, and some impudent young men, ugly 
and vulgar, and yet mindful of the impression they pro- 
duced, hurried before her. Then Piotr, in his livery 
and top-boots, with his dull, good-natured face, crossed 
the waiting-room, and came up to escort her to the car- 
riage. The noisy men about the door stopped talking 
while she passed out on the platform ; then one of them 
whispered to his neighbor some remark, which was ap- 
parently impudent. Anna mounted the high steps, and 
sat down alone in the compartment on the dirty sofa 
which once had been white, and laid her bag beside her 
on the springy seat. Piotr, at the window, raised his 
gold-laced hat, with an inane smile, for a farewell, and 
departed. The saucy conductor shut the door. A 
woman, deformed, and ridiculously dressed up, followed 
by a little girl laughing affectedly, passed below the car- 
window. Anna looked at her with disgust. " Katerina 
Andreyevna has everything, ma tante" screamed the little 
girl. 

"That child, even she is grotesque and makes gri- 
maces," thought Anna; and she seated herself at the 
opposite window of the empty apartment, to avoid seeing 
the people. 

A dirty hunchback muzhik passed close to the win- 
dow, and examined the car-wheels ; he wore a cap, 
from beneath which could be seen tufts of disheveled 
hair. 

" There is something familiar about that humpbacked 
muzhik," thought Anna; and suddenly she remembered 
her nightmare, and drew back, trembling with fright, 
toward the carriage-door, which the conductor was just 
opening to admit a lady and gentleman. 

" Do you want to get out? " 

Anna did not answer ; under her veil the conductor and 
the passengers did not see the horror in her face. She 
returned to her corner and sat down again. The couple 
took seats opposite her, and cast stealthy but curious 



33* ANNA KARENINA 

glances at her gown. The husband and wife were ob 
noxious to her. The Husband asked her if she objected 
to smoking, — evidently not for the sake of smoking, 
but as 'an excuse for" entering into conversation with 
her. Having obtained her permission, he remarked to 
his wife in French that he felt even ..more inclined to 
talk than to smoke. They exchanged stupid remarks, 
with the hope of attracting Anna's attention. 

Anna clearly saw how they bored each other, how 
they hated each other. It was impossible not to hate 
such painful monstrosities. 

The second gong sounded, and was followed by the 
rumble of baggage, noise, shouts, laughter. Anna saw 
so clearly that there was nothing to rejoice at, that this 
laughter roused her indignation, and she longed to stop 
her ears so as not to hear it. 

At last the third signal was given, the locomotive 
whistled, there was a sound of escaping steam, the train 
started, and the gentleman crossed himself. 

" It would be interesting to ask him what he meant by 
that," thought Anna, looking at him angrily. Then she 
looked past the woman's head, out of the car-window, 
at the people apparently moving backward even while 
they were standing and walking on the platform. The 
carriage in which Anna sat moved past the stone walls 
of the station, the switches, the other carriages. The 
vvheels with a ringing sound moved more easily and 
-smoothly over the rails; the rays of the setting sun 
slanted into the car-window, and a light breeze played 
through the slats of the blinds in the carriages, and 
Anna r forgot her neighbors, breathed in the fresh air, 
and took up again the course of her thoughts. 

"There! What was I thinking about? Oh, yes, I 
was 'just deciding that I. could not imagine any situa- 
tion in which my life could be anything but one long 
misery. We are all dedicated to unhappiness; we all 
know it, and only seek for ways to deceive ourselves. 
But when we see the truth, what is to be done ? " 

''Reason was given to man, that he might avoid what 
annoys him,'' remarked the woman, -in French, appar- 



ANNA KARENINA 333 

ently delighted with her sentence, and putting out hex 
tongue. 

The words fitted in with Anna's thought. 

"To avoid what annoys him," she repeated, and a 
glance at the red-faced man, and his thin companion, 
showed her that the woman looked on herself as a mis- 
understood creature, and that her stout husband did not 
contradict this opinion, and took advantage of it to de- 
ceive her. Anna, as it were, read their history, and 
looked into the most secret depths of their hearts ; but 
it was not interesting, and she went on with her 
reflections. 

" Yes, it annoys me very much, and reason was given 
to avoid it ; therefore it must be done. Why not extin- 
guish the light when it shines on things disgusting to 
see ? But how ? Why does the conductor keep hurry- 
ing through the car ? Why do the young people in this 
carriage scream so loud ? Why do they speak ? What 
are they laughing at ? It is all false, all a lie, all decep- 
tion, all vanity and vexation." 

When the train reached the station, Anna went out 
with the other passengers, and, with the idea of avoiding 
too rude a contact with the bustling crowd, she hesitated 
on the platform, trying to recollect why she had come, 
and what she meant to do. All that seemed to her pos- 
sible before to do, now seemed to her difficult to exe- 
cute, especially amid this noisy crowd, which would not 
leave her in peace. Now the porters came to her, to 
offer her their services ; now some young men, clattering 
with their heels up and down the platform, and talking 
loud, observed her curiously ; now hurrying passengers 
pushed her aside. 

Finally, remembering that she was proposing to go 
farther if there was no answer from Vronsky, she 
stopped an official, and asked him if a coachman had 
not been there with a letter for Count Vronsky. 

"Count Vronsky? Just now some one was here. 
Princess Sorokin and her daughter met him. What 
kind of a looking man is this coachman ?" 

Even while she was talking with the official, the coach* 



334 ANNA KARENINA 

man MikhaYl, rosy and gay in his elegant blue livery and 
watch-chain, immensely proud that he had fulfilled his 
commission so well, came to her and handed her a 
note. r ' . 

Anna broke the seal, and her heart stood still even 
before she had read the carelessly written lines: — 

I am very sorry that your note did not find me in Moscow. 
I shall return at ten o'clock. 

"Yes, that is what I expected/' she said to herself, 
with ah angry grimace. 

"Very good, you may go home," she said to Mikhafl. 

She spoke the words slowly and gently, because the 
tumultuous beating of her heart almost prevented her 
from breathing. 

-/ " No, I will not let you make me suffer so/' thought 
she, addressing, with a threat, neither Vronsky nor her 
own- self, so much as the thought that was torturing her ; 
and she moved along the platform, past the station. 
Two chambermaids walking on the platform turned to 
look at her, and made audible remarks about her toilet. 
" She has genuine lace," they said. ,The young men 
would not leave her in peace. They stared at her, and 
passed her again and again, joking and talking with loud 
voices. The station-master came to her, and asked if 
she was going, to take the train. A lad selling kvas did 
not fake his eyes from her. 

« " Bozhe moll where, shall I go?" she said to her- 
self, as she walked farther and farther along the plat- 
form. ' '" - , ' ; u\t ,/ruh 

.When she reached the end of it, she stopped. Some 
women and children, who Had come to the station to 
meet a man in spectacles, were talking and laughing. 
They too stopped talking, and turned to see Anna pass 
by* She hastened her steps, and reached the very limit 
of the platform. A freight-train was coming. The plat- 
form shook, and made her, feel as if she were on a mov- 
iiigitrain. 

Suddenly she .remembered the man who was run over 
on the day when she met Vronsky for the first time, and 



ANNA KARENINA 335 

she knew then what was left for her to do. With light 
and swift steps she descended the stairway which led 
from the water-tank at the end of the platform down t6 
the rails, and stood very near the train, which was slowly 
passing by. She looked under the cars, at the chains 
and the brake, and at the high iron wheels of the first 
car, and she tried to estimate with her eye the distance 
between the fore and back wheels, and the moment when 
the middle would be in front of her. 

"There," she said, looking at the shadow of the car 
thrown upon the black coal-dust which covered the 
sleepers, "there, in the center; he will be punished, 
and I shall be delivered from it all .... and from my- 
self." 

She was going to throw herself under the first car as 
its center came opposite where she stood. Her little red 
traveling-bag caused her to lose the moment ; she could 
not detach it from her arm. She awaited the second. 
A feeling like that she had experienced once, just before 
taking a dive in the river, came over her, and she made 
the sign of the cross. This familiar gesture called back 
to her soul a whole series of memories of her youth and 
childhood ; and suddenly the darkness which hid every- 
thing from her was torn asunder. Life, with its elusive 
joys, glowed for an instant before her. But she did not 
take her eyes from the car; and when the center, be- 
tween the two wheels, appeared, she threw away her 
red bag, drawing her head between her shoulders, and, 
with outstretched hands, threw herself on her knees 
under the car. For a second she was horror-struck at 
what she was doing. 

" Where am I ? What am I doing ? Why ? " 

She tried to get up, to draw back; but something 
monstrous, inflexible, struck her head, and threw her on 
her back. 

" Lord, forgive me all ! " she murmured, feeling the 
struggle to be in vain. 

A little muzhik was working on the railroad, mumbling 
in his beard. 

And the candle by which she had read the book 



336 ANNA KARENINA 

that! was. filled with fears, with deceptions, with anguish, 
and with evil, flared up with greater brightness than she 
had ever known, revealing to her all that before was 
in darkness, then flickered, grew faint, and went out 
forever. - , 



PART EIGHTH 



CHAPTER I 

ALMOST two months had passed by, half the hot 
summer was gone, but SergyeT Ivanovitch had only 
just made up his mind to leave Moscow. An important 
event for him had just occurred. The year before he 
had finished his book, entitled, " An Essay on the Prin- 
ciples and the Forms of Government in Europe and in 
Russia," the fruit of six years of labor. The introduc- 
tion, as well as some fragments from the book, had 
already appeared in the reviews, and certain parts had 
been read by the author to the people of his circle, so 
that the ideas contained in this treatise could not be a 
perfect novelty for the public; but nevertheless SergyeT 
Ivanovitch expected that the book on its appearance 
would attract serious attention, and produce, if not a 
revolution in science, at least a powerful sensation in 
the learned world. 

This book, after careful revision, had been published 
the year before, and distributed among the booksellers. 

Though Sergyei" Ivanovitch answered reluctantly and 
with pretended indifference the questions of his friends 
who asked how the book was going, and though he 
refrained from inquiring of the booksellers how it 
was selling, nevertheless he followed eagerly and with 
strained attention every sign of the impression which 
his book was producing on society and literature. 

But a week passed, a second, a third, and there was 
not a sign of any impression. His friends, specialists 
and savants, evidently out of politeness, spoke to him 
about it; but the rest of his acquaintances, not being 
interested in a book of scientific purport, did not speak 
about it at all. Society, also, which just at that time 
vol. m. — 22 337 



338 ANNA' KARENINA 

was preoccupied with entirely different matters, showed 
utter unconcern. In literary circles, also, during the 
lapse of a month, there was not a word about his book. 
SergyeY Ivanovitch carefully calculated the time neces- 
sary for preparing critical reviews, but months passed 
by and there also was absolute silence. 

Only in the Northern Beetle, in a facetious feuilleton 
regarding the singer Drabanti, who had lost his voice, 
a few scornful words were said in regard to Koznuishefs 
book, showing "that it had already been criticized by 
all, and was given over to universal ridicule. At length, 
after three months, a critical article appeared in a journal 
of importance. SergyeY Ivanovitch knew who the author 
was. He had met him once at Golubtsof s. 

He was a very young and feeble critic, very, clever as 
a' writer, but perfectly uneducated, and cowardly in his 
private relations. 

Notwithstanding Sergyer Ivanovitch's contempt of 
the author, he began to read the article with extraordi- 
nary interest. It proved to be abominable. 

Evidently, the critic understood the whole book just 
exactly as he should not have understood it. But he 
had so cleverly put together a selection of extracts, that 
for those who had not read the book — and apparently 
almost no one had read it — it was perfectly clear that 
the entire book, in spite of its high pretensions, was 
nothing but a tissue of pompous phrases, and these not 
always intelligible, as the critic's frequent interrogation 
points testified, and that the author of the work was a 
perfect ignoramus ; and it was done in such a witty way 
that Sergyef Ivanovitch himself could not deny the wit 
of it ; but, after all, it was abominable. 

SergyeY Ivanovitch, in spite of the unusual conscien- 
tiousness with which he examined into the justice of 
these remarks, did not for a moment think of answer- 
ing the ridiculous errors and blunders; but he could not 
help instantly remembering all the least details of his 
meeting and conversation with the author of the article. 
" Did I say anything to affront him ? " said Sergyei 
Ivanovitch. 



ANNA KARENINA 339 

And remembering how, when he met the young 
author of the article, he had shown up his ignorance 
in conversation, he, therefore, understood the animus of 
the criticism. 

The appearance of this article was followed by a 
silence, unbroken by either voice or journal, and Ser- 
gyef Ivanovitch saw that his six years* labor, into which 
he had put so much of his heart and soul, had been 
wasted. 

And his position was made all the more trying be- 
cause, now that his book was off his hands, he had 
nothing especial to occupy the larger part of his time. 

He was bright, well educated, in perfect health, and 
very active ; and he did not know how to employ his 
industry. Conversations with callers, visits to the club, 
and the meetings of committees, where there was a 
chance for him to talk, took some of his time ; but he, 
a man long wonted to life in the city, did not permit 
himself to talk with every one, as his inexperienced 
brother did when he was in Moscow; so that he had 
much leisure and a superfluity of intellectual energy. 

To his joy, just at this time, which was so trying to 
him because of the failure of his book, and after his 
interest in dissenters, American subjects, the famine in 
Samara, expositions, spiritualism, was exhausted, the 
Slavic question began to engross public attention ; and 
Sergyei Ivanovitch, who had been one of its earliest 
advocates, gave himself up to it with enthusiasm. 

Among Sergyei Ivanovitch's friends nothing else was 
thought about or talked about except the Serbian war. 
All the things that lazy people are accustomed to do 
was done for the help of these brother Slavs. Balls, 
concerts, dinners, matches, ladies' finery, beer, drinking- 
saloons, — everything bore witness of sympathy for the 
Slavs. 

With much that was said and written on this subject, 
Sergyef Ivanovitch could not agree. He saw that the 
Slav question was one of those fashionable movements 
that always carry people to extremes. He saw that 
many people with petty personal ends in view took 



340 ANNA KARENINA 

part in it. He recognized that the newspapers made 
many useless and exaggerated statements, in order to 
attract attention to themselves, and belittle their rivals. 
He saw that in this common impulse of society, upstarts 
put themselves forward, and outdid one another in mak- 
ing a noise, — commanders-in-chief without an army, 
ministers without a ministry, journalists without a jour- 
nal, party-leaders without partizans. He saw much that 
was childish and absurd ; but he also saw and admired 
the enthusiasm which united all classes, and which it 
was impossible not to share. 

The massacre of the Serbians, who professed the same 
faith, and spoke almost the same language, aroused sym- 
pathy for their sufferings, and indignation against their 
persecutors ; and the heroism of the Serbs and Mon- 
tenegrins, who were fighting for a great cause, aroused 
a universal desire to help their brethren, not only in 
word, but in deed. 

But there was another phenomenon which delighted 
Sergye'f Ivanovitch especially. This was the manifesta- 
tion of public opinion. Society actually spoke out its 
desires. "The national soul received expression," as 
SergyeY Ivanovitch expressed it; and the more he studied 
this movement as a whole, the more evidently it seemed 
to him that it was destined to grow to enormous propor- 
tions and to constitute an epoch. 

He devoted himself to the service of this great cause, 
and forgot to think about his book. . 

All his time was now so occupied that he could 
scarcely reply to the letters and demands made upon 
him. 

He had worked all the spring and a part of the sum- 
mer, and only in the month of July could he tear himself 
away to go to his brother in the country. 

He went for a fortnight's vacation, and rejoiced to 
find even in the depths of the country, in the very 
holy of holies of the peasantry, the same awakening of 
the national spirit in which he himself and all the 
inhabitants of the capital and the large cities of the 
empire firmly believed. 



ANNA KARENINA 341 

Katavasof seized the opportunity to fulfil a promise 
he had made to visit Levin, and the two friends left 
town together. 



CHAPTER II 

Sergyei Ivanovitch and Katavasof had just reached 
the station of the Kursk Railway, which was especially 
crowded that day, and, leaving their carriage, they were 
looking at a lackey who had followed them laden with 
various articles, when four cabs filled with volunteers 
also drove up. Ladies carrying bouquets met them, and 
accompanied by a crowd they entered the station. 

One of the ladies who had come to meet the volun- 
teers came out of the waiting-room and addressed SergyeK 
Ivanovitch. 

" Did you also come to see them off ? " she asked, 
speaking in French. 

" No ; I am going myself, princess, to have a little 
rest at my brother's. But are you still on escort duty ? " 
he added, with a scarcely perceptible smile of amusement. 

" I have to be," replied the princess. " But tell me, is 
it true that we have sent off eight hundred already? 
Malvinsky told me so." 

" More than eight hundred. We Ve sent off more than 
a thousand, if we count those not immediately from 
Moscow," said Sergyeif Ivanovitch. 

" There, I said so ! " cried the lady, delighted. " And 
is it true that the subscriptions amount to nearly a 
million ? " 

" More than that, princess." 

" Have you read the news ? They have beaten the 
Turks again." 

"Yes, I read about it," replied Sergyeif Ivanovitch. 
She referred to a recent despatch, which confirmed the 
report that three days before the Turks had been beaten 
at every point, and had fled, and that the next day a 
decisive battle was expected. 

"Oh, by the way, do you know a splendid young 



3^2 ANNA K ARENINA 

fellow is petitioning to go? I don't see why they put 
obstacles in his way. I wanted to ask you to put your 
signature on his petition. I know him. He comes 
from the Countess Lidia Ivanovna." 

After asking some particulars in regard to the young 
man, Sergye'f Ivanovitch went into the waiting-room, 
affixed his signature to the document, and handed it 
back to the princess. i i /oh r: 

" Do. you know Count Vronsky, the famous, is going 
on this train ?" said the princess, with a triumphant and 
significant smile, as he rejoined her and handed her the 
petition. .* r ; 

"I heard that he was going; but I did not know 
when. On this train ? " 

" I just saw him. He is here. His mother is the only 
one with him/ All things considered, I do not think he 
could do anything better." 

"Oh, yes! Of course." 

During this conversation the crowd had rushed into 
the restaurant of the station, where a man with a glass 
in his hand was making an address to the volunteers : — 

"For the service of our faith and humanity and our 
brethren," he said, raising his voice, " Matushka Mdskva 
— Mother Moscow — gives you her blessing in this noble 
cause. May it prosper ! " he concluded, with tears in his 
eyes. The crowd responded with cheers, and a fresh 
throng poured into the waiting-room, nearly, overwhelm- 
ing the princess. 

"Ah, princess! What do you say to this?" cried 
Stepan Arkadyevitch, who, with a radiant smile of joy; 
suddenly appeared in the midst of the throng. " Did n't 
he speak gloriously ? Bravo ! And here *s SergyeY 
Ivanovitch. You ought to speak just a few words, you 
know, of encouragement, you do it so well," added Ob- 
lonsky, touching Koznuishef's arm, with an expression 
of suave, flattering deference. 

" Oh, no ; I am leaving immediately." 

"Where?" 

"To the country — to my brother's," replied Sergyel 
Ivanovitch. 



ANNA KARENINA 343 

* "Then you'll see my wife. I have written her, but 
you '11 see her before she gets my letter. Please tell her 
that you met me, and everything is all right, she will 
understand ; and be so good as to tell her, too, that I got 
my place as member of the Commission of.... Well, she 
knows what that is, you know, les petites miskres de la 
vie htimaine" said he, turning to the princess, as if in 
apology. " MiagkaTa, not Liza, but Bibiche, sends a 
thousand guns and twelve hospital nurses. Did I tell 
you ? V 

" Yes ; I heard about it," answered Koznuishef, coldly. 

f* But what a pity you are going away," replied Ste- 
pan Arkadyevitch. " We give a farewell dinner to-mor- 
row to two volunteers, — at Dimer's, — Bartnyansky of 
Petersburg, and our Veslovsky — Grisha. Both are 
going. Veslovsky is just married. He's a fine lad. 
Isn't it so,princess?" he added, addressing the lady. 

The princess did not reply, but looked at Koznuishef. 
The fact that the princess and Sergyef Ivanovitch evi- 
dently wanted to get rid of him did not in the least dis- 
concert Stepan Arkadyevitch. Smiling, he glanced now 
at the princess's hat plume, now off to one side or the 
other as if searching for a new subject ; and, as he saw 
a lady going by with a subscription-box, he beckoned 
to her, and handed her a five-ruble note. 

" I can't bear to see these subscription-boxes pass by 
me, now that I have ready money," he said. "What 
splendid news there is ! Hurrah for the Montenegrins ! " 

" What 's that you say ? " he cried, when the princess 
told him that Vronsky was going by the first train. For 
an instant Stepan Arkadyevitch's face grew sad, but the 
next moment, slightly limping with both feet, and stroking 
his side-whiskers, he went off to the room where Vronsky 
was. He had already entirely forgotten the tears he had 
shed over his sister's grave, and saw in Vronsky only a 
hero and an old friend. 

"One must do him justice, in spite of his faults," said 
the princess to Sergye'f Ivanovitch, when Oblonsky was 
gone. " He has the true Russian, the Slavic, nature. 
But I am afraid it will be disagreeable to the count 



344 ANNA KARENINA 

to see him. Whatever people may say, I pity that 
unhappy man. Try to talk a little with him on the 
journey," said the princess. 

"Certainly, if I have a chance." 

" T never liked him, but what he is doing now makes 
up for much. He is not only going himself, but he 's 
taking out a squadron of cavalry at his own expense." 

"Yes, so I have heard." 

The bell rang, and the crowd pressed toward the doors. 

" There he is," said the princess, pointing out Vronsky, 
who was dressed in a long coat and a broad-brimmed 
black hat. His. mother was leaning on his arm. Ob- 
lonsky followed them, talking vivaciously. 

Vronsky was frowning, and looked straight ahead, as 
if not listening to what Stepan Arkadyevitch said. 

Apparently at Oblonsky's suggestion, he looked in 
the direction where Sergyef Ivanovitch and the princess 
were standing, and raised his hat silently. 

His face, which had grown old and worn, was like 
stone. Going out on the platform, Vronsky, silently 
quitting his mother's side, vanished from sight in his 
compartment. 

On the platform, men were singing the national 
hymn. 1 Then hurrahs and vivas resounded. One of 
the volunteers, a tall, very young man, with stooping 
shoulders, ostentatiously responded to the public, wav- 
ing above his head a felt hat and a bouquet; while 
behind him two officers, and an elderly man with a full 
beard and a greasy cap, put out their heads, also bowing. 



CHAPTER III 

After Sergyer Ivanovitch had taken* leave of the 
princess, he and Katavasof, who had joined him, entered 
their carriage, which was packed, and the train started. 

When the train rolled into the station at Tsaritsuino 
it was met by a chorus of young men singing the 
" Slav'sa." Again the volunteers put out their heads 
1 Bozhe Tsar a Khrani, " God bless the Tsar." 



ANNA KARENINA 345 

and bowed, but SergyeT Ivanovitch paid no attention to 
them ; he had had so much to do with volunteers that 
he already knew this general type, and it did not inter- 
est him. But Katavasof, who on account of his peda- 
gogical occupations had not enjoyed any opportunity to 
observe the men who volunteered, was very much inter- 
ested, and asked his friend about them. 

SergyeT Ivanovitch advised him to look into their 
carriage and talk with some of them. 

At the next station, Katavasof followed this advice. 
As soon as the train stopped, he went into the second- 
class carriage, and made the acquaintance of the vol- 
unteers. 

Some of them were seated in a corner of the carriage, 
talking noisily, aware that they were attracting the at- 
tention of the other passengers and of Katavasof, whom 
they saw come in. The tall, sunken-chested young man 
was talking louder than the others. He was evidently 
tipsy, and was telling the story of something which had 
happened in their establishment. 

Opposite him sat an old officer in the Austrian mili- 
tary jacket of the Guard uniform. He was listening 
with a smile to the narrator, and occasionally prompting 
him. A third volunteer, in an artillery uniform, was 
sitting on a box near them. A fourth was asleep. 

Katavasof entered into conversation with the youth, 
and learned that he had been a rich merchant in Mos- 
cow, who, before he was twenty-two years old, had 
succeeded in squandering a considerable fortune. Ka- 
tavasof did not like him, because he was effeminate, 
conceited, and sickly. He evidently felt, especially now 
that he was drunk, that he was doing a heroic deed; 
and he boasted in the most disagreeable manner. 

The second, a retired officer, also impressed Kata- 
vasof unpleasantly ; he was a man who had apparently 
tried his hand at everything ; he had worked on a rail- 
way, and had been director of an estate, and had estab- 
lished a factory; and he talked of everything without 
any necessity of doing so, and often used words which 
showed his ignorance. 



346 ANNA KARENINA 

The third, the artilleryman, on the contrary, pleased 
Katavasof very much. He was a modest gentleman. 
He was evidently disgusted by the affected knowledge 
of the retired officer and the young merchant's boasted 
heroism, and he would say nothing about himself. 
When Katavasof asked him what induced him to go to 
Serbia, he answered modestly : — 

"I am going because every one else is going. We 
must help the Serbians. It is too bad." 

"They have very few of our artillerymen, I believe." 

" My service in the artillery was very short. I may 
be assigned to the infantry or the- cavalry." 

"Why in the infantry, when they need artillerymen 
more than all ? " asked Katavasof, gathering from the 
artillerist's age that he must have already reached a 
considerable rank. 

" I did not serve very long in the artillery, but left 
the service when I was only a yunker." 

And he began to explain why he had not passed his 
examination. 

All this together produced on Katavasof a generally 
unpleasant impression/and when the volunteers rushed 
out into one of the stations to get something to drink, 
Katavasof felt the desire to talk with some one so as to 
confirm his unfavorable impression. 
j One of his fellow-travelers, a little old man in a mili- 
tary paletot, had been listening all the time to Kata- 
vasof s talk with the volunteers/ As the two were left 
alone together in the carriage, Katavasof addressed 
him : — * 

."What a diversity in the condition of all these men 
that are going south," said Katavasof, vaguely, wishing 
to express his opinions and at the same time draw out 
the old man's views. 

/ The old man was a soldier who had fought in two 
campaigns, and he knew what it meant to go to war ; 
and in the actions and words of these gentlemen, the 
bravery with which they kept applying themselves to 
the flask, he read their inferiority as soldiers. More- 
over, his residence was in a district city, and he wanted 



ANNA KARENINA 347 

to relate how from that place a good-for-nothing fellow, 
a drunkard and thief whom no one would hire as a 
workman, had gone as a soldier. But, knowing by ex- 
perience that in the present state of excitement under 
which society was laboring, it was dangerous to express 
himself frankly against the general sentiment, and espe- 
cially to criticize the volunteers, he merely looked at 
Katavasof. 

" Well, men are needed there," said he, smiling with 
his eyes. 

And they began to talk over the latest war news, and 
each of them concealed from the other his doubt whether 
a battle was to be expected on the next day, since, ac- 
cording to the latest report, the Turks had been defeated 
at all points. And so they parted without either of 
them having expressed what he really thought. 

When Katavasof returned to his own carriage, he 
told Sergye'f Ivanovitch, with some twinges of con- 
science, that he enjoyed talking with the volunteers, and 
he declared that they were excellent lads. 

In the great .station where they next stopped, the 
chorus, the cheers, the bouquets, and the beggars again 
appeared, and again the ladies with bouquets conducted 
the volunteers into the restaurant ; but there was much 
less enthusiasm than there had been at Moscow. 



CHAPTER IV 

While the train stopped at a certain government 
capita], Sergye'f Ivanovitch did not go to the restaurant, 
but walked up and down the platform. 

The first time he passed Vronsky's compartment, he 
noticed that the window was shaded. But, when he 
passed the second time, he saw the old countess at the 
window. She called him to her. 

" You see, I am going as far as Kursk with him." 

"Yes, I heard he was going," answered Koznuishef, 
stopping at the window, and looking in. "What a 



348 ANNA KARENINA 

noble action on his part!" he added, seeing that Vron* 
sky was not in the carriage. 

'/Well ! What could he do after his misfortune?" 

"What a horrible thing it was ! " said Sergye* Ivano- 
vitch. 

"Akh! What have I not been through! — Yes, do 
come in. — Akh! What have I not been through!" 
she repeated, as^Sergye'f Ivanovitch came in and sat 
down on the seat beside her. " You could not imagine 
it. For six weeks he never said a word to any one, and 
he only ate when I begged him to do so. We dared not 
leave him alone a single instant ; we took away every- 
thing which he might kill himself with. We lived on 
the first floor, but we had to be on the watch all the 
same. You know he shot himself once before, for her 
sake," said the old countess, her face clouding at this 
remembrance; "yes, she died as was fit for such a 
woman to die. Even the death she chose was low and 
wretched."' * 

"It is not for us to judge* her, countess," replied 
SergyeY Ivanovitch, with a sigh. " But I can imagine 
what you have suffered." 

" Akh ! Don't speak of it ! My son was with me at 
my country place. A note was brought him. He an- 
swered immediately. We did not know at all that she 
was at the station. That evening I had just gone to my 
room, and my Mary told me that a lady had thrown her- 
self under the train. I felt something like a shock. I 
understood instantly what had happened; I knew it was 
she. My first words were, ' Let no one tell the count/ 
But they had just told him. His coachman was at the 
station when it happened, and saw it all. I ran to my 
son's room. He was beside himself; it was terrible to 
see him. Without speaking one word, he left the 
house; and what he found, I do not know; but they 
brought him back like one dead. I should never have 
known him. 'Prostration complete] the doctor said. 

Then he became almost insane Akh! What can be 

said ? " cried the countess, waving her hands. " It was 
a terrible time. No; let people say what they will, 



ANNA KARENINA 349 

she was a bad woman. Think ! What a desperate pas- 
sion she was in ! She did it to make an extraordinary 
sensation, and she succeeded ! She has done irrepara- 
ble injury to the lives of two men of rare merit, — her 
husband and my son, — and ruined herself." 

" How about her husband ? " 

" He has taken her little girl. At first Alyosha con- 
sented to everything ; now he is awfully sorry, having 
given up his daughter to a stranger, but he could not 
take back his word. Karenin went to the funeral ; we 
succeeded in preventing a meeting between him and 
Alyosha. For him, — that is, her husband, — this death 
is a deliverance ; but my poor son gave up everything 
for her, sacrificed everything, — me, his position, his 
career, — and she was not contented with that, but 
wanted to ruin him besides. No ! whatever you may 
say, her death is the death of a bad woman, a woman 
without religion. May God forgive me ! but when I 
think of the harm she has done my son, I cannot help 
cursing her memory." 

" How is he now ? " 

"This Serbian war is our salvation. I am old, and 
don't understand much about it; but God sent it for 
him. Of course, to me, as his mother, it is painful; 
and besides, they say ce riest pas trh bien vu a Piters- 
burg, but what can be done about it ? This is the only 
thing that could save him. Yashvin, his friend, gambled 
away all he had, and enlisted. He came to Alyosha, 
and persuaded him to go to Serbia with him. Now this 
is occupying him. Do talk with him, I beg of you, he 
is so sad. And then, besides his other troubles, he has 
a toothache. But he will be glad to see you. Please 
talk with him. He is walking up and down on the 
other side of the track." 

Sergyel Ivanovitch said that he would be very glad to 
talk with the count, and went over to the side where 
Vronsky was. 



350 ANNA KARENINA 

i^sqtjb r t i liri 

CHAPTER V 

u » 

In the oblique evening shadow cast by a heap of 
baggage piled on the platform, Vronsky, in his long 
paletot and slouch hat, with* his hands in his pockets, 
was walking, like a wild beast* in a cage, up and down 
a narrow space where he could not take more than a 
score of steps. It seemed to Sergye'f Ivanovitch, as he 
drew near, that Vronsky saw him, but pretended hot to 
recognize him. * But to Sergye'f Ivanovitch this was all 
the same. He was above any petty susceptibility. 

At this moment, Vronsky, in his eyes/ was an im- 
portant actor in a grand event, and deserved to be 
sustained and encouraged. He approached the count. 

Vronsky stopped, looked at him, recognized him, and, 
taking a few steps to meet him, cordially held out his hand. 

"Perhaps you would prefer not to see me," said 
Sergyef Ivanovitch; "but can I be, of any service to 
you ? " 

"No one could be less unpleasant for me to meet 
than you," answered Vronsky. ''Pardon me. There 
is nothing pleasant for me in life." 

" I understand, and I want to offer you my services," 
said Koznuishef, struck by the deep suffering that was 
apparent in the count's face. c "Might not a letter to 
Ristitch or Milan be of some use to you ? " , 

"Ohj no!" answered Vronsky, making an effort to 
understand. "If it is all the same to y6u, we will walk 
a little.. It is so stifling in the train ! A letter ? No, 
thank you. One needs no letter of introduction to get 
killed. In this case, one to the Turks, perhaps," added 
he, A with a- smile at the corners of : his mouth." His 'eyes 
kept the same expression of bitter sadness. 

t Well ! It would make it easier for, you to come into 
relations with men prepared for action. Still, as you 
please ; but I was very glad to learn of your decision. 
The very fact that a man of your standing has joined 
the volunteers will raise them above all cavil in the 
public estimation." 



ANNA KARENINA 351 

" My sole merit," replied Vronsky, " is that life is of 
no value to me. As to physical energy, I know it will 
not be wanting for any purpose ; and I am glad enough 
to give my life, which is not only useless to me, but 
disgusting, to be useful to somebody ; " and he made 
an impatient motion with his jaw, caused by his un- 
ceasing toothache, which prevented him from talking 
with the expression he desired. 

"You will be regenerated, is my prediction/' said 
SergyeT Ivanovitch, feeling touched. "The deliverance 
of one's oppressed brethren is an aim for which one 
might as well live as die. May God grant you full 
success, and fill your soul with peace!" he added, and 
held out his hand. 

Vronsky pressed his hand cordially. 

"As a field-piece, I may be of use But as a man, 

.... I am only a ruin," murmured the count, with intervals 
between the phrases. The throbbing pain in his tooth, 
which filled his mouth with saliva, made it an effort for 
him to speak. He stopped, and fixed his eyes mechan- 
ically on the engine-wheels, which advanced, revolving 
slowly and smoothly on the rails. 

And suddenly a sense of intense spiritual anguish 
caused him for a moment to forget his toothache. At 
the sight of the engine and the rails, through the in- 
fluence of his talk with an acquaintance whom he had 
not seen since his misfortune, she suddenly appeared to 
him, or, at least, that which remained of her, as, when he 
rushed like a madman into the barracks near the station, 
where they had carried her, he saw, lying on a table, 
shamelessly exposed to the sight of all; her bleeding 
body, which had so lately been full of life. Her head, 
uninjured, with its heavy braids, and its flight cu rls 
clustering about the temples, was leaning back, with the 
eyes half closed ; and in the lovely face hovered still 
a strange, wild expression, while her rosy lips, slightly 
opened, seemed prepared to utter once again that terri- 
ble menace, and predict to him, as she had in their dis- 
pute, that he "would repent." 

And he tried to remember how she looked when he 



352 ANNA KARENINA 

first met her, also at a railroad station, with that myste- 
rious, poetic, charming beauty, overflowing with life and 
gayety, demanding and bestowing happiness, and not 
bitterly revengeful as he remembered her at their last 
interview. He tried to remember the happy moments 
he had spent with her, but these moments were forever 
spoiled for him. He remembered only her face, haughtily 
expressing her threat of unnecessary, but implacable, 
vengeance. He ceased to be conscious of his toothache, 
and sobs convulsed his face. 

After walking up and down by the baggage once or 
twice, the count controlled himself, and spoke calmly 
with SergyeY Ivanovitch. 

" Have you seen the latest telegrams ? Yes ; they have 
fought three times, and another battle is expected to- 
morrow." 

And, after a few words about King Milan's proclama- 
tion, and the immense effect which it might have, the 
two men separated at the ringing of the second bell and 
went to their respective compartments. 



CHAPTER VI 

As Sergyet Ivanovitch had not known just when^it 
would be possible for him to leave Moscow, he did not 
telegraph his brother to send for him. Levin was not 
at home when he and Katavasof, black as negroes with 
smoke and dust, reached Pokrovskoye about noon, in a 
tarantas which they hired at the station. 

Kitty was sitting on the balcony with her father and 
sister when she saw her brother-in-law approaching, and 
she ran to meet him. 

" Your conscience ought to prick you for not letting 
us know," said she, shaking hands with Sergyer Ivano- 
vitch, and offering her brow to be kissed. 

"We got along splendidly, and we did not have to 
bother you. I am so dusty that I fear to touch you. 
I was so busy that I did not know when I could leave. 
And you look the same as ever," said he, smiling, 



ANNA KARENINA 353 

"enjoying the gentle current of your softly flowing hap- 
piness. And here is our friend, Feodor Vasilyevitch 
who has come at last." 

" But I am not a negro. When I have washed, I 
shall look like a human being," said Katavasof, with 
his usual pleasantry, offering his hand, and laughing, 
so that his white teeth gleamed out from his dusty face. 

" Kostia will be very glad. He is out on the farm, 
but he ought to be back by this time." 

"Always occupied with his estate," said Katavasof. 
"The rest of us can think of nothing but the Serbian 
war. How does my friend regard this subject? He is 
sure not to think as other people do." 

" Yes, he does, .... but .... perhaps not like everybody," 
said Kitty, a little confused, looking at Sergyei Ivano- 
vitch. " I will send some one to find him. We have 
papa with us just now ; he has recently come back from 
abroad." 

And Kitty, while making her arrangements to send 
for Levin, and to furnish her guests a chance to wash 
off the dust — the one in the library, the other in the 
room assigned to Dolly — and then to have luncheon 
ready for them, enjoyed the full power of quick mo- 
tion which before her baby was born she had been 
so long deprived of. Then she went to the balcony 
where her father was : — 

" It 's Sergyef Ivanovitch and Professor Katavasof." 

" Okh ! in this heat ! It will be a bore ! " 

"Not at all, papa; he is very nice, and Kostia loves 
him dearly," said Kitty, laughing at the expression of 
consternation on her father's face. 

"Go entertain them, dushenka," she said to her sister. 
" They saw Stiva at the station ; he was well. And I 
am going to the baby for a little while. I actually have 
not nursed him since morning ; he will be crying if I 
don't go," and she, feeling the pressure of milk, hastened 
to the nursery. In reality it had not been guesswork 
with her, — the tie that bound her to the child was still 
unbroken, — she actually knew by the flow of milk that 
he needed something to eat. Even before she reached 
vol. in. — 23 



354 ANNA KARENINA 

the nursery she knew that he would be crying* And, 
indeed, he was* 

She heard his voice, and quickened her steps. But 
the more she huirried, thelouder he cried. It was a fine, 
healthy scream, a scream of hunger and impatience. 

"Am I late, nurse, late? "'asked Kitty, sitting down, 
and getting ready to suckle the child. "There, give 
him to me, give him to me, quick. Akh, nurse! how 
stupid ! Take off "his cap afterward," said she, quite as 
impatient as her baby. ' 

The baby screamed as if it were famished. " Now, 
now, it can't be helped, little mother ! " said Agafya 
Mikha'flovna, who could not keep out of the nursery. 
" You must do things in order. Agu, agu," she chuckled 
to the infant, not heeding Kitty's impatience. 

The nurse gave the child to his mother. Agafya 
Mikhaflovna followed the child, her face all aglow with 
tenderness. 

" He knows me ! He knows me } God is my witness, 
he knew me, Matushka Katerina Aleksandrovna," she 
cried. U 

But Kitty did not hear what she said. Her impatience 
was as great as the baby's. It hindered the very thing 
that they both desired. The baby, in his haste to suckle, 
could not manage to take hold, and was vexed. At last, 
after one final shriek of despair, the arrangements were 
perfected ; and mother and child, simultaneously breath- 
ing a sigh of content, became calm. 

"The poor little thing is all in a perspiration," whis- 
pered Kitty. " Do you really think he knew you ? " she 
added, looking down into the child's eyes, which seemed 
to her to peep out roguishly from under his cap, as his 
little cheeks sucked in and out, while his little hand, with 
rosy palm y flourished arouhd his head. " It cannot be. 
For, if he knew 'you, he would surely know me," con- 
tinued Kitty, with a smile, when Agafya Mikharlovna 
persisted in her belief that he knew her. 

She smiled, because though she said that he could not 
recognize her, yet she knew in her heart that he not 
only recognized Agafya Mikhallovna, but that he knew 



ANNA KARENINA 355 

and understood all things, and knew and understood what 
no one else understood, and things which she, his mother, 
was now beginning to understand only through his 
teaching. For Agafya Mikhailovna, for the nurse, for 
his grandfather, even for his father, Mitya was just a 
little human being, who needed nothing but physical 
care ; for his mother, he was a being endowed with 
moral faculties, who already had a whole history of spirit- 
ual relationships. 

"You will see if he doesn't when he wakes up. 
When I do this way, his face will light up, the . little 
dove ! It will light up like a bright day," said Agafya 
Mikhailovna. 

" There ! very well, very well, we shall see," whispered 
Kitty; "now go away; he is going to sleep." 



CHAPTER VII 

Agafya Mikhailovna went away on tiptoe ; the 
nurse closed the blinds, chased away the flies which 
were hidden under the muslin curtain of the cradle ; 
then she sat down, and began to wave a little withered 
branch over the mother and child. 

" It 's hot, hot ! pray God, He may send a little 
shower," she said. 

"Da! da! sh-sh-sh," was the mother's reply, as she 
rocked gently to and fro, and pressed Mitya to her 
breast. His eyelids now opened, and now closed; and 
he languidly moved his chubby arm. This little arm 
disturbed Kitty; she felt a strong inclination to kiss 
it, but she feared to do so lest it should wake him. At 
last the arm began to droop, and the eyes closed more 
and more. Only rarely now he would raise his long 
lashes, and gaze at his mother with his dark, dewy eyes. 
The nurse began to nod, and dropped off into a nap. 
Overhead she could hear the old prince's voice, and 
Katavasof's sonorous laugh. 

" Evidently, they don't need me to help in the con- 
versation," thought Kitty ; " but it is too bad that Kostia 



3S 6 ANNA KARENINA 

is not there ; he must have gone to his bees. Some- 
times it disturbs me to have him spend so much time 
over them ; but then, on the whole, I am glad ; it 
diverts him, and he is certainly more cheerful than he 
was in the spring. Then " he was so gloomy, and so 
unhappy ! What a strange man he is ! " 

Kitty knew what caused her husband's disquiet. It 
was his doubting spirit ; and although, if she had been 
asked if she believed that, in the world to come, he 
would fail of salvation owing to his want of faith, she 
would have been compelled to say yes, yet his skepti- 
cism did not make her unhappy; and she, who believed 
that there was no salvation for the unbelieving, and 
loved more than all else in the world her husband's soul, 
smiled as she thought of his skepticism, and called him 
a strange man. 

" Why does he spend all his time reading those philo- 
sophical books ? If all this^ is written in those books, 
then he can understand them. But if it is not true, why 
does he read them ? He himself says that he longs for 
faith. Why doesn't he believe? Probably he thinks 
too much ; and he thinks too much because he is lonely. 
He is always alone. He can^t speak out all his thoughts 
to us. I think he will be glad that these guests have 
come, especially Katavasof. He likes to discuss with 
him." 

And immediately Kitty's thoughts were diverted by 
the question where it would be best for Katavasof to 
sleep. Ought he and SergyeY Ivanovitch to have a 
room together or apart ? And here a sudden thought 
made her start, so that she disturbed Mitya, who opened 
his eyes and looked at her reproachfully. 

"The washerwoman hasn't brought back the linen. 
I hope Agafya Mikhaflovna hasn't given out all we 
had ! " and the color rushed to Kitty's forehead. 

"There, I must find out myself," thought she; and, 
reverting to her former thoughts, she remembered that 
she had not finished the important train of spiritual 
thoughts which she had begun, and she once more 
repeated : — 



ANNA KARENINA 357 

"Yes, Kostia is an unbeliever;" and, as she did so, 
she smiled. 

"Yes, he is an unbeliever, but I 'd far liefer he should 
always be one than a person like Madame Stahl, or as I 
wanted to be when I was abroad. At any rate, he will 
never be hypocritical." And a recent example of his 
goodness recurred vividly to her memory. 

Several weeks before, Stepan Arkadyevitch had writ- 
ten Dolly a letter of repentance. He begged her to sav^ 
his honor by selling her property to pay his debts. 

Dolly was in despair. She hated her husband, despised 
him ; and at first she made up her mind to refuse his 
request, and apply for a divorce; but afterward she de- 
cided to sell a part of her estate. Kitty, with an involun- 
tary smile of emotion, recalled her husband's confusion, 
his various awkward attempts to find a way of helping 
Dolly, and how, at last, he came to the conclusion that 
the only way to accomplish it without wounding her was 
to make over to Dolly their part of this estate. 

"How can he be without faith, when he has such a 
warm heart, and is afraid to grieve even a child? He 
never thinks of himself — always of others. Sergye'f 
Ivanovitch finds it perfectly natural to consider him his 
business manager; so does his sister. Dolly and her 
children have no one else but him to lean upon. He is 
always sacrificing his time to the peasants, who come to 
consult him every day. 

"Yes ; you cannot do better than to try to be like your 
father," she murmured, touching her lips to her son's 
cheek, before laying him into the nurse's arms. 



CHAPTER VIII 

Ever since that moment when, as he sat beside his 
dying brother, Levin had examined the problem of life 
and death in the light of the new convictions, as he 
called them, which from the age of twenty to thirty-four 
years had taken the place of his childhood's beliefs, he 



358 ANNA KARENINA 

was terrified not only at death, but at life; because it 
seemed to him that he had not the slightest knowledge 
of its origin, its purpose, its reason, its nature. Our 
organism and its destruction, the indestructibility of mat- 
ter, the laws of the conservation and development of 
forces, were words which were substituted for the terms 
of his early faith. These words, and the scientific theo- 
ries connected with them, were doubtless interesting from 
an intellectual point of view, but they stood for nothing 
m the face of real life. 

And Levin suddenly felt in the position of a man who 
in cold weather had exchanged his warm shuba for a 
muslin garment, and who for the first time should indu- 
bitably, not with his reason, but with his whole being, 
become persuaded that he was absolutely naked, and 
inevitably destined to perish miserably. 

From that time, without in the least changing his out- 
ward life, and though he did not like to confess it, even 
to himself, Levin never ceased to feel a terror of his 
ignorance. 

Moreover, he vaguely felt that what he called his 
convictions not only came from his ignorance, but were 
idle for helping him to a clearer knowledge of what he 
needed. 

At first his marriage, with its new joys and its new 
duties, completely blotted out these thoughts ; but they 
came back to him, with increasing persistence demand- 
ing an answer, after his wife's confinement, when 'he 
lived in Moscow without any serious occupation. 

The question presented itself to him in this way,:^ — 

" If I do not accept the explanations offered me by 
Christianity on the problem of my existence, then what 
answer shall I find ? " 

And he scrutinized the whole arsenal of his scientific 
convictions, and found no answer whatever to his ques- 
tions, and "nothing like an answer. * 

He was in the position of a man who seeks to find 
food in a toy-store or a gun-shop. 

Involuntarily and unconsciously he sought now in every 
book, in every conversation, and in every person whom 



ANNA KARENINA 359 

he met, some sympathy with these questions and their 
solution. 

More than by anything else, he was surprised and 
puzzled by the fact that the men of his class, who for 
the most part had, like himself, substituted science for 
religion, seemed to experience not the least moral suffer- 
ing, but to live entirely satisfied and content. Thus in 
addition to the main question there were others which 
tormented him : Were these men sincere ? Were they 
not hypocrites. Or did they understand more clearly 
than he did the answer science gave to these trouble- 
some questions ? And he took to studying these men, 
and books which might contain the solutions which he 
so desired. 

One thing which he had discovered, however, since 
these questions had begun to occupy him, was that he 
had made a gross error in taking up with the idea of 
his early university friends, that religion had outlived 
its day, and no longer existed. The best people whom 
he knew were believers, — the old prince, Lvof, of whom 
he was so fond, Sergyei Ivanovitch, and all women had 
faith ; and his wife believed just as he had believed when 
he was a child, and nine-tenths of the Russian people 
— all people whose lives inspired the greatest respect — 
were believers. 

Another strange thing was that, as he read many 
books, he became convinced that the men whose opinions 
he shared did not attach to them any importance ; and that 
without explaining anything they simply ignored these 
questions, without an answer to which life seemed to 
him impossible, and took up others which were to him 
utterly uninteresting, — such, for example, as the devel- 
opment of the organism, the mechanical explanation of 
the soul, and others. 

Moreover, at the time of his wife's illness, he had 
what to him seemed a most extraordinary experience : 
he, the unbeliever, had prayed, and prayed with sincere 
faith. But as soon as the danger was over, lie felt that 
he could not give that temporary disposition any abiding- 
place in his life. 



360 ANNA KARENINA 

He could not avow that the truth appeared to him 
then, but that he was mistaken now ; because, as he began 
calmly to analyze his* feelings, they eluded him. He 
could not avow that he had been deceived then, because 
he had experienced a temporary spiritual condition ; and 
if he pretended that he had succumbed to a moment of 
weakness, he would sully a sacred moment. He was in 
a state of internal conflict, and he strove with all the 
strength of his nature to free himself from it 



CHAPTER IX 

These thoughts tormented him with varying intensity, 
but he could not free himself from them. He read and 
meditated ; but the more he read and meditated, the end 
desired seemed to grow more and more remote. 

During the latter part of his stay in Moscow, and 
after he reached the country, he became convinced of 
the uselessness of seeking in materialism an answer to 
his doubts ; and he read over the philosophers whose 
explanations of life were opposed to materialism, — 
Plato and Spinoza, and Kant and Schelling, and Hegel 
and Schopenhauer. 

These thoughts seemed to him fruitful while he was 
reading, or was contrasting their doctrines with those of 
others, especially with those of a materialistic tendency ; 
but just as soon as he attempted, independently, to apply 
these guides to some doubtful point, he fell back into 
the same perplexities as before. The terms "mind" 
"willy' "freedom" "essence" had a certain meaning to 
his intellect as long as he followed the clew established 
by the deductions of these philosophers, and allowed 
himself to be caught in the snare of their subtle dis- 
tinctions ; but when practical life asserted its point of 
view, this artistic structure fell, like a house built of 
cards ; and it became evident that the edififce was built 
only of beautiful words, having no more connection than 
logic with the serious side of life. 

Once, as he was reading Schopenhauer, he substituted 



ANNA KARENINA 361 

the term " love " for that which this philosopher calls 
" will," and this new philosophy consoled him for a few 
days while he clung to it. But it also proved unsatis- 
factory when he regarded it from the standpoint of 
practical life ; then it seemed to be the thin muslin with- 
out warmth as a dress. 

SergyeY Ivanovitch advised him to read Khomyakof 's l 
theological writings : and though he was at first repelled 
by the excessive affectation of the author's style, and his 
strong polemic tendency, he was struck by their teach- 
ings regarding the Church ; he was struck also by the 
development of the following thought : — 

" Man when alone cannot attain the knowledge of 
theological truths. The true light is kept for a com- 
munion of souls who are filled with the same love ; that 
is, for the Church." 

He was delighted with the thought : How much easier 
it is to accept the Church, which united with it all believ- 
ing people and was endowed with holiness and infallibil- 
ity, since it had God for its head, — to accept its teachings 
as to Creation, the Fall, and Redemption, and through 
it to reach God, — than to begin with God, a far-off, 
mysterious God, the Creation, and the rest of it. 

But, as he read, after Khomyakof, a history of the 
Church by a Catholic writer, and the history of the 
Church by an Orthodox writer, and perceived that 
the Orthodox Greek Church and the Roman Catholic 
Church, both of them in their very essence infallible, 
were antagonistic, he saw that he had been deluded by 
Khomyakof s church-teachings ; and this edifice also 
fell into dust, like the constructions of philosophy. 

During this whole spring he was not himself, and 
passed hours of misery. 

" I cannot live without knowing what I am, and why 

1 Aleksel Stepanovitch Khomyakof was born in 1804 ; after serving in 
the Guard and taking active part in the Turkish campaign, he retired to 
private life. He wrote several romantic tragedies in verse, also a number 
of poems of Panslavonic tendencies ; he is chiefly remembered as a theo- 
logical writer, and some of his works have been translated into French and 
even English. In 1858 he was president of the Moscow Society of the 
Friends of Russian Literature. He died in i860. — Ed. 



3 62 ANNA KARENINA 

I exist Since I cannot reach this knowledge, life is 
impossible," said Levin to himself, 

" In the infinitude of time, in the infinitude of matter, 
in the infinitude of space, an organic cell is formed, 
exists for a moment, and bursts. That cell is — I." 

This was a cruel lie ; but it was. the sole, the supreme, 
result of the labor of the human mind for centuries. 

It was the final creed on which were founded the latest 
researches of the ^scientific spirit; it was the dominant 
conviction; and Levin, without knowing exactly why, 
simply because this theory seemed to him the clearest, 
was involuntarily held by it. u 

But this conclusion was not merely a lie, it was the 
cruel jest of some "evil spirit,- — cruel, inimical, to which 
it was impossible to submit. 

To get away from it was a duty ; deliverance from it 
was in the power of every one, and the one means of 
deliverance was — death. 

* And Levin, the happy father of a family, a man in 
perfect health, was sometimes so tempted to commit 
suicide, that he hid ropes from sight, lest he should 
hang himself, and feared to go out with his gun, lest he 
should shoot himself. 

But Levin did not hang himself, or shoot himself, but 
lived and struggled on. 



CHAPTER X 

When Levin puzzled over what he was, and why he 
was born, he found no answer, and fell into despair ; but 
when he ceased to ask himself these questions, he seemed 
to know what he was and why he was alive, for the very 
reason that he resolutely and definitely lived and worked ; 
even during the more recent months he had lived far more 
strenuously and resolutely than ever before. 

Toward the end of June he returned to the country and 
resumed his ordinary work at Pokrovskoye. The super- 
intendence of the estates of his brother and sister, his 
relations with his neighbors and his muzhiks, his family 



ANNA KARENINA 363 

cares, his new enterprise in bee-culture, which he had 
taken up this year, occupied all his time.. These inter- 
ests occupied him, not because he carried them on with a 
view to their universal application, as he had done before, 
but, on the contrary, because being now on the one hand 
disillusionized by the lack of success in his former 
undertakings for the common good, on the other being 
too much engrossed by his own thoughts and the very 
multitude of affairs calling for his attention, he entirely 
relinquished all his attempts of cooperative advantage 
and he occupied himself with his affairs, simply because it 
seemed to him that he was irresistibly impelled to do what 
he did, and could not do otherwise. 

Formerly — almost from childhood till he reached 
manhood — when he began to do anything that would 
be good for all, for humanity, for Russia, he saw that the 
thought of it gave him, in advance, a pleasing sense of 
joy; but the action in itself never realized his hopes, 
nor had he full conviction that the work was neces- 
sary, and the activity itself which seemed at first so 
important kept growing smaller and smaller, and came 
to naught. 

But now that since his marriage he had become more 
and more restricted by life for its own sake, though 
he had no pleasure at the thought of his activity, he felt 
a conviction that his work was indispensable, and saw 
that the results gained were far more satisfactory than 
before. 

Now, quite against his will, he cut deeper and 
deeper into the soil, like a plow that cannot choose its 
path, or turn from its furrow. 

To live as his fathers and grandfathers had lived, to 
carry out their work so as to hand it on in turn to his 
children, seemed to him a plain duty. It was as neces- 
sary as the duty of eating when hungry ; and Tie knew 
that, to reach this end, he was under obligation so to 
conduct the machinery of the estate 1 at Pokrovskoye 
that there might be profit in it. As indubitably as a 
debt required to be paid, so was it incumbent on him to 
1 JChozhyahtvcnnaya tnashina. 



364 ANNA KARENINA 

preserve his paternal estate in such a condition that his 
son, receiving it in turn, might say, " Thank you, my 
father," just as Levin himself was grateful to his ancestors 
for what they had cleared and tilled. He felt that he 
had no right to rent his land to the muzhiks, but that he 
himself must keep everything under his own eye, — 
maintain his cattle, fertilize his fields, set out trees. 

It was as impossible not to look out for the interests 
of Sergye'f Ivanovitch and his sister, and all the peasants 
that came to consult him, as it was to abandon the child 
that had been given into his hands. He felt obliged to 
look' after the interests of his sister-in-law, who with her 
children was living at his house, and of his wife with 
her child, and he had to spend with them at least a small 
part of his time. And all this, together with his hunt- 
ing and his new occupation of bee-culture, filled to over- 
flowing his life, the meaning of which he could not 
understand when he reflected on it. 

Not only did Levin see clearly what it was his duty 
to do, but he saw how he must fulfil it, and what had 
paramount importance. 

He knew that it was requisite to hire laborers as 
cheaply as possible; but to get them into his power by 
paying down money in advance, and getting them at less 
than market price, he would not do, although this was 
very advantageous. It was permissible to sell fodder 
to the muzhiks in time of scarcity, even though he felt 
sorry for those who were improvident ; but he felt it his 
duty to do away with inns and drinking-places, even 
though they brought in great profit. On principle he 
punished as severely as he could thefts from his wood ; 
but when he found cattle straying he was not inclined 
to exact a fine, and though it annoyed the guards and 
brought the punishment into contempt, he always insisted 
on 'having the cattle driven out again. He advanced 
money to Piotr, to save him from the claws of a money- 
lender, who charged him ten per cent a month ; but he 
made no allowance for arrears in the obrok or money 
due him from negligent muzhiks. He found it impos- 
sible to pardon an overseer because a small meadow was 



ANNA KARENINA 365 

not mowed and the grass was wasted ; but he would not 
let them mow a piece of land amounting to eighty 
desyatins — or two hundred and sixteen acres — on which 
a young forest had been planted. He would not excuse a 
muzhik who went home in working hours because his 
father had died, — sorry as he was for him, — and he had 
to pay him lower wages for the costly months of idle- 
ness ; but he was bound to give board and lodging to 
old servants who were superannuated. 

Levin felt that it was right, on returning home, to go 
first to his wife, who was not well, though some muzhiks 
had been waiting for three hours to see him ; and he 
knew, in spite of all the pleasure that he should have in 
seeing his bees hived, nevertheless he felt in duty bound 
to deprive himself of this pleasure and let his old bee- 
man transfer the swarm without him, and go and talk 
with the muzhiks who had come to the apiary for him. 

Whether he did well or ill, he knew not ; and he did 
not try to settle it, but, moreover, he avoided all thoughts 
and discussions on the subject. Reasoning led him to 
doubt, and prevented him from seeing what was right 
to do, or not to do. When he ceased to consider, but 
simply lived, he never failed to find in his soul the 
presence of an infallible judge, telling him which of two 
possible courses was the best to take, and which was the 
worst ; and when he failed to follow this inner voice, he 
was instantly made aware of it. 

Thus he lived, not knowing, and not seeing the pos- 
sibility of knowing, what he was, or why he lived in the 
world, and tortured by his ignorance to such a degree 
that he feared committing suicide and yet resolutely pur- 
suing the course of life traced out for him. 



CHAPTER XI 

The day on which Sergyef Ivanovitch reached Pokrov* 
skoye had been unusually full of torment for Levin. 

It was at that hurried, busy season of the year when 
all the peasantry are engaged in putting forth an extraor- 



366 ANNA KARENINA 

dinary effort, and showing an endurance, which are 
quite unknown in the ordinary conditions of their lives, 
and which would be prized Very highly if it were not 
repeated every year, and did not produce such very 
simple results. Mowing and sowing rye and oats, reap- 
ing, harvesting, threshing, —these are labors which seem 
simple and commonplace; but to accomplish them in the 
short time accorded by nature, every one, old and young, 
must set to workr For three or four weeks they must 
be content with the simplest fare, -—black bread, garlic, 
and kvas ; must sleep only a few hours, and must not 
pause night or day. And every year this happens 
throughout all Russia. 

Having lived the larger part of his life in the coun- 
try, and in the closest relations with the peasantry, Levin 
always at harvest-time felt that this universal activity 
among the people embraced his own life. 

In the early morning he had gone to the field of early 

* rye, to the field where they were carrying off the oats in 

ricks. Then he came back to breakfast with his wife 

and sister-in-law, and had afterward gone off on foot to 

the farm, where he was trying a new threshing-machine. 

This whole day, Levin, as he talked with the overseer 
and the muzhiks in the field, as he talked at the house 
with his wife and Dolly and the children and his father- 
in-law, thought of only One thing; and constantly the 
same questions pursued him : " What am I ? and where 
am I ? and why am I here ? " 

As he stood in the cool shadow of his newly thatched 
barn, where the hazelwood timbers, still smelling of the 
fragrant leaves, held down the straw to the freshly peeled 
aspen timbers that made the roof, Levin gazed, now 
through the open doors, where whirled and played the 
dry and choking dust thrown off by the threshing- 
machine ; now at the hot sunlight lying on the grass of 
the threshing-floor, and at the fresh straw just brought 
out Of the barn ; now at the white-breasted swallows 
with their spotted heads, as they flew about twittering, 
and settled under the eaves, or, shaking their wings, 
darted through the open doors ; and then again at the 



ANNA KARENINA 367 

peasantry, bustling about in the dark and dusty barn, 
and strange ideas came into his mind : — 

"Why is all this done?" he asked himself, "Why 
am I standing here ? Why am I compelling them to 
work, and why are they working so hard ? Why are 
they doing their best in my presence ? Why is my old 
friend Matriona putting in so with all her might? I 
cured her when a beam fell on her at the fire," he said 
to himself, as he looked at a hideous old baba, who was 
walking with bare, sunburned feet across the hard, 
uneven soil, and was plying the rake vigorously, " She 
got well then. But if not to-day or to-morrow, then in 
ten years, she must be borne to her grave, and there will 
be nothing left of her, nor of that pretty girl in red, who 
is husking corn with such graceful, swift motions. They 
will bury her, And that dappled gelding will soon die," 
he thought, as he looked at the horse, breathing painfully 
with distended nostrils and heavily sagging belly, as it 
struggled up the ever descending treadmill. "They will 
carry him off. And Feodor, the machine-tender, with 
his curling beard, full of chaff, and his white shoulder 
showing through a tear in his shirt — they will carry him 
off too. But now he gathers up the sheaves, and gives his 
commands, and shouts to the women, and, with quick 
motions, arranges the belt on the machine. And it will be 
the same with me. They will carry me away, and nothing 
of me will be left. Why ? " 

And, in the midst of his meditations, he mechanically 
took out his watch to calculate how much they threshed 
in an hour. It was his duty to do this, so that he could 
pay the men fairly for their day's work. 

"So far, only three ricks," he said to himself; and 
he went to the machine-tender, and, trying to make 
his voice heard above the racket, told him^ to work 
faster. 

"You put in too much at once, Feodor; you see it 
stops it, so it wastes time. Do it more regularly." 

Feodor, his face black with dust and sweat, shouted 
back some unintelligible reply, but entirely failed to 
carry out Levin's directions. 



368 ANNA KARENINA 

He mounted the drum, took Feodor's place, and began 
to do the feeding. 

He worked thus till it was the muzhiks' dinner-hour, 
not a very long time ; and then, in company with Feodor, 
he left the barn, and talked with him, leaning against a 
beautifully stacked pile of yellow rye saved for plant- 
ing. 

Feodor was from a distant village, the very one where 
Levin had formerly let the association have some land. 
Now it was rented to a dvornik.* 

Levin talked with Feodor about this land, and asked 
him if it were not possible that Platon, a rich and trust- 
worthy muzhik of his village, would take it for the next 
year. 

" Price too high ; won't catch Platon, Konstantin Dmi- 
tritch," replied the muzhik, wiping the chaff from his 
sweaty chest. 

" Yes ; but how does Kirillof make money out of 
it?" 

" Mitiukh ! " — by this contemptuous diminutive Feo- 
dor called the dvornik, — " what does n't he make money 
out of ! He puts on the screws and gets the last drop ! 
He has no pity on the peasants. But Uncle Fokanuitch," 
— so he called the old man Platon, — " does he try to 
fleece a man ? And he gives credit, when any one owes 
him. He does not try to squeeze it out of them. He 's 
that kind of a man ! " 

" Yes ; but why does he give credit ? " 

" Well, of course men differ. ' One lives for his belly, 
like Mitiukh ; but Fokanuitch, — he 's an honest man, — 
he lives for his soul. He remembers God." 

" How does he remember God and live for his soul? " 
exclaimed Levin, eagerly. 

" Why, that 's plain enough. It 's to live according to 
God, .... according to truth. People differ. Take you, 
Konstantin Dmitritch, for example ; you could n't wrong 
a man." .... 

"Yes, yes; prashchai — good-by," exclaimed Levin, 
deeply moved ; and, taking his cane, he turned toward 
the house. 



ANNA KARENINA 369 

As he recalled the muzhik's words, how " Fokanuitch 
lived for his soul, according to God .... according to 
truth," confused but weighty thoughts arose within him 
from some hidden source, and filled his soul with their 
brilliant light. 



CHAPTER XII 

Levin, with long steps, strode along the highway, 
filled, not so much with his thoughts, — he could not 
as yet get rid of them, — as with a spiritual impulse, 
such as he had never known before. 

The peasant's words had had in his soul the effect of 
an electric spark, suddenly condensing the cloud of dim, 
incoherent thoughts, which had not ceased to fill his 
mind, even while he was talking about the letting of his 
field. 

He felt that some new impulse, inexplicable as yet, 
filled his heart with joy. 

" Not to live for one's self, but for God ! What God ? 
Could he have said anything more meaningless than 
what he said ? Ho said that we must live, not for our- 
selves, that is, for what interests and pleases us, but for 
something incomprehensible, for God, whom no one 
knows or can define. Still, call it nonsense, did I under- 
stand Feodor ? Did n't I also feel convinced of its truth ? 
Did I find it either false or absurd ? 

" Nay ; I understood it, and find in it the same mean- 
ing as he finds, and understood it more completely and 
clearly than anything else in life. And not alone I, 
but all, all the world, perfectly understand this and have 
no doubt of it, and are unanimous in its favor. 

" And I was seeking for miracles, and regretting that 
I could not see one which might fill me with arriazement. 
A material miracle would have seduced me. But the 
real miracle, the only one possibly existing, surrounds 
me on all sides — and I have not remarked it. 

" Feodor says Kirillof, the dvornik, lives for his belly. 
I know what he means by that. No rational being, 

VOL. III. — 24 



370, ANNA KARENINA 

none of us; can live in any other way. But Feodor says, 
too, that it is wrong to live for the belly, but that we 
should live for truth, for God ; and I know what that 
means as well. I, and millions of men, muzhiks, and 
sages who have thought and written on the subject, or 
in their obscure language have talked about it, in the 
past and in the present, — we are in accord on one 
point;* and that is, that we should Jive for 'the good.' 
The only knowledge that I and all men possess that 
is clear, indubitable, absolute, is here. We have not 
reached it by reason. Reason excludes it, for it has 
neither cause nor effect. 'The good/ if it had a cause, 
would cease to be the good; if it had an effect, — a re- 
ward, U± it would cease to be the good. The good must 
be outside of the chain of cause < and effect. And I 
know this, and we all know it. Can there be greater 
miracle than this ? 

"Have I really found the solution of my doubts? 
Shall I cease to suffer?" Levin asked himself as he 
followed the dusty road, insensible to weariness and 
heat, and feeling that his long travail was at an end. 
The sensation was so delightful, that he could not be- 
lieve that it was true. He choked with emotion ; his 
strength failed him ; and he left the highroad, and went 
into the woods, and sat down under the shadow of 
an aspen on the unmown grass. ' He uncovered his 
moist forehead, and stretched himself out on the succu- 
lent wood-grass, and leaned his head on his hand, 

" Yes, I must reflect and consider/' he thought, look- 
ing attentively at the untrodden grass in front of him, 
and watching the movements of an earth-beetle crawl- 
ing up the stalk of couch-grass, and stopped by a leaf. 
"What discovery have I made?" he said to himself, 
removing the leaf from the beetle's way, and bending 
down another stalk of couch-grass to help the beetle on. 
" What makes me so happy ? What discovery have I 
made ? 

" I have made no discovery. I have only opened my 
eyes to what I already know. I have learned to recog- 
nize that power which formerly gave me life, and gives 



ANNA KARENINA 371 

me life again to-day. I have freed myself* from error 
I have come to know my master. 

" I used to say that there was going on in my body, 
in the body of this grass, in the body of this beetle/' — 
the beetle did not want to go to the other stalk, but 
spread its wings, and flew away, — ■ " incessant change 
of matter, in conformity to certain physical, chemical, 
and physiological laws ; and in all of us, together with 
the aspens and the clouds, and the nebulae, there was 
evolution. Evolution from what ? into what ? Endless 
evolution and conflict. -*■ But was conflict with the Infi- 
nite possible ? And I was surprised to find nothing 
along this line, in spite of my best efforts, which could 
reveal to me the meaning of my life, my motives, my 
longings. But the consciousness that there is a mean- 
ing is, nevertheless, so strong and clear, that it forms 
the very foundation of my. existence ; and I marveled 
and rejoiced when the muzhik said, 'To live for God, 
for the soul.* 

" Now I can say that I know the meaning of life : it 
is to live for God, for my own soul. And this meaning, 
in spite of its clearness, is mysterious and miraculous. 
And such is the meaning of all existence. Yes, there 
is pride," said he to himself, turning over on his stomach 
and beginning to tie into a knot the stalks of grass, 
while trying not to break them. " Not only pride of 
intellect, but the stupidity of intellect. Yes, it is the 
wickedness of intellect," he repeated. 

He succinctly went over in memory the course of his 
thought for the last two years, from the day when the 
idea of death struck him, on seeing his beloved brother 
hopelessly sick. 

Then he had clearly resolved that, since man had no 
other prospect than suffering, death, and eternal oblivion, 
he must either commit suicide, or find the explanation 
of the problem of existence, and in such manner as to 
see in it something more than the cruel irony of a malevo- 
lent spirit. 

But he had not done either, but continued to live, to 
:hink, and to feel. He had married, and had experienced 



372 ANNA KARENINA 

new joys, wh'ich made him happy when he did not pon- 
der on the meaning of life. 

What did this mean ? It meant that he was thinking 
badly, and living well. Without knowing it, he had been 
sustained by those spiritual verities which he had sucked 
in with his mother's milk, and he indulged in thought, 
not only now not recognizing those truths, but even stren- 
uously avoiding them. Now it was clear to him that he 
could live only through the blessed influence of the faith 
in which he had been taught. 

" What should I have been, how should I have lived, 
if I had not absorbed these beliefs.... if I had not known 
that I must live for God, and not for the satisfaction of 
my desires ? I should have been a thief, a liar, a mur- 
derer. Nothing of what seems the chief joy of my life 
would have had any existence for me." 

And, though he made the most strenuous efforts of his 
imagination, he could not picture to himself what kind 
of a wild creature he might have been, if he had not 
really known the aim of his existence. 

" I was in search of an answer to my question ; thought 
could not give it, for the problem was too lofty. Life 
itself, with the innate knowledge of good and evil, alone 
could give me an answer. And this knowledge I did 
not acquire. It was given to me, like all the rest ; given, 
I could not know where to get it. Did I get it from 
reason ? But would reason ever have proved to me that 
I ought to love my neighbor, instead of choking him ? 
I was taught it in my childhood ; but I believed it gladly, 
because it was already existent in my soul. Reason dis- 
covered the struggle * for existence, — that law which 
demands the overthrow of every obstacle in the way of 
our desires. That is the result of reason ; but reason 
has nothing to do with loving our neighbor." 

CHAPTER XIII 

Levin remembered a recent scene between Dolly and 
her children. The children had been left alone, and had 
amused themselves by making raspberry jam over a can- 



ANNA KARENINA 373 

die, and throwing milk into each other's faces. Their 
mother, catching them in the act, scolded them in their 
uncle's presence, and sought to make them understand 
how much work was involved in what they were destroy- 
ing, that the labor was performed for their benefit ; that, 
if they broke the cups, they couldn't have anything to 
drink from ; and if they wasted their milk, they would n't 
have any more, and would starve to death. 

Levin was struck by the indifference and skepticism 
with which the children heard their mother's words. 
They were only sorry to have their interesting sport 
interrupted, and they did not believe a word of what 
she said. They did not believe, because they did not 
know the value of what they were playing with, and did 
not understand that they were destroying their own 
means of subsistence. 

"That is all very well," they thought; "but there is 
nothing interesting or worth while in it, because it is 
always the same, and always will be. And it is monoto- 
nous. We don't have to think about it, it is done for 
us ; but we do like to do something new and original ; 
and here we were making jam in a cup over the candle, 
and squirting the milk into each others' faces. It is fun. 
It is new, and not half so stupid as to drink milk out of 
a cup." 

" Is it not thus that we act, is it not the way I have 
acted, in trying to penetrate by reasoning the secrets of 
nature and the problem of human life? Is it not the 
same that all the philosophers have done with their 
theories which lead, by a course of reasoning strange 
and unnatural to man, to the knowledge of what he long 
has known, and known so surely that without it he could 
not live ? Do we not see clearly, in the development of 
the theory of each, that the real meaning of human exis- 
tence is as indubitably known as it is known to Feodor, 
the muzhik ; and do they see any more clearly than he 
does the principal meaning of life? Do they not all 
come back to this, even though it be by a route which 
is often equivocal ? If we were to leave the children to 
get their own living, make their own utensils, do the 



374 ANNA KARENINA 

milking, instead ot playing pranks, they would die of 
hunger. \. jl 

" There, now ! give us over to our own ideas and pas- 
sions, with no knowledge of our Creator, without the 
consciousness of moral good and evil, and what would 
be the result ? We reason because we are spiritually 
satiated. We are children. Whence comes this joyous 
knowledge, which I share with the muzhik, and which 
alone gives me serenity of; spirit? Where did I get it? 
Here am I, a Christian, brought up in the faith, sur^ 
rounded by the blessings of Christianity, living upon 
these spiritual blessings without being conscious of them ; 
and like children I have been reasoning, or at least try- 
ing to reason, out the meaning of life. 

" But in the serious moments of life, in the hour of 
suffering, just as when children are cold and hungry, I 
turn to Him, and, like these same children whom their 
mother reprimands for their childish faults, I feel that 
my childish efforts to get out of the mad circle of rea- 
soning have done me no good. 

"Yes, reason has taught me nothing. What I know 
has been given, revealed to me through the heart, and 
especially through faith in the teachings of the Church. 

"The Church, the Church?" repeated Levin, turning 
over again, and, as he rested his head on his hand, look- 
ing at a herd of cattle down by the river at a distance. 
"Can I really believe all that the Church teaches?" said 
he, to test himself, and to bring up everything that might 
destroy his present feeling' of security. He expressly 
called to mind the Church teachings which more than 
all had seemed strange to him, and disgusted him. 

"Creation? Yes; but how did I myself explain ex^ 
istence? existence? the devil? sin? How did I explain 
evil? redemption? 

v But I know nothing and can know nothing except 
what is told me and every one else." 

And now it seemed to him that not one of these Church 
dogmas was inimical to the great objects of life, — faith 
in God, in goodness. 

On the contrary, all tended to produce that greatest 



ANNA KARENINA 375 

of miracles, that which consists in enabling the whole 
world, with its millions of human beings, young and old, 
the muzhik and Lvof, and Kitty and peasants and tsars, 
married and single, to comprehend the same great truths, 
so as to live that life of the soul which alone is worth 
living, and which is our only aim. 

Lying on his back, he looked up into the high, cloud- 
less sky. " Do I not know," thought he, " that that is 
infinity of space, and not a vault of blue stretching above 
me ? But, however I strain my sight, I can see only a 
vaulted dome; and, in spite of my knowledge of infinite 
space, I have more satisfaction in looking at it as a blue, 
vaulted dome, than when I try to look beyond." 

Levin stopped thinking. He listened to the myste- 
rious voices which seemed to wake joyfully in him. 

"Is it really faith?" he thought, fearing to believe in 
his happiness. "My God, I thank Thee!" he cried; 
and he swallowed down the sobs that arose, and brushed 
away with both hands the tears that filled his eyes. 



CHAPTER XIV 

Levin looked away, and saw the herd, and his one- 
horse telyega and his coachman, who approached the 
herd of cattle, and began to talk to the herdsman. Then 
he heard the sound of wheels and the neighing of the 
horse ; but he was so occupied with his thoughts that he 
did not think why it was that his coachman was coming 
for him. 

He only realized it when the coachman, while still 
some distance off, cried: — i 

"The mistress sent for you. Your brother and an- 
other barin have come." 

Levin got in at once, and took the reins. 

As if awakened from sleep, it was long before he 
could collect his thoughts. He looked at the well-fed 
horse, and at the spot on his neck where the harness 
rubbed ; and he looked at Ivan, the coachman, sitting 
beside him ; and he thought of how he had been expect- 



376 ANNA KARENINA 

ing his brother, and that his wife was probably troubled 
because he was gone so long, and he tried to guess who 
the unknown guest who had come with his brother might 
be. And his brother and his wife and the unknown guest 
now seemed to him different from what they had been 
before. He felt that henceforth all his relations with 
these friends would be more pleasant than they had been. 

" Now there shall be no more of that coldness, such 
as there used to be, between my brother and me.... no 
more disputes. Nor will Kitty and I quarrel any more ; 
and whoever my guest is I shall be polite to him, and 
kind to the servants and to Ivan .... all will be dif- 
ferent." 

And holding in his good horse, which was whinnying 
with impatience and pleading for permission to show his 
paces, Levin kept looking at Ivan, who was sitting next 
him, not knowing what to do with his idle hands, and 
constantly pulling down his shirt, which the wind tugged 
at ; and in his attempt to find a pretext for beginning a 
conversation with the man, he thought of saying that 
the horse's girth was buckled up too tightly, but then 
this seemed like censuring him, and he wanted to say 
something pleasant. 

"You had better turn to the right and avoid that 
stump," said the coachman, taking hold of one of the 
reins. 

"Please not touch, or try to give me lessons," said 
Levin, exasperated by his coachman's interference. 
Just the same as always he was made angry by any 
interference with his affairs, and he immediately became 
conscious how mistaken he, was in supposing for a 
moment that his new spiritual condition could keep its 
character unchanged on contact with the reality. 

When they had arrived within a quarter of a verst of 
the house, Levin saw Grisha and Tania running to meet 
him. / 

" Uncle Kostia, mamma is coming, and grandpa and 
Sergyel Ivanovitch and some one else," they cried, as 
they ran up to the cart. 

"Tell me, who is it?" 



ANNA KARENINA 377 

" Oh, he 's an awful, horrid man, who does so with his 
arms,'* said Tania, climbing up into the cart and mimick- 
ing Katavasof. 

"Tell me, is he young or old?" asked Levin, laugh- 
ing, reminded of some one by Tania's performance. 

" Akh, I only hope he is not a bore," said Levin to 
himself. 

As soon as they reached a turn in the road and saw 
the party approaching, Levin recognized Katavasof, who 
was in a straw hat, and gesticulating exactly as Tania 
had represented it. 

Katavasof was very fond of talking philosophy, and 
his conceptions were wholly drawn from the natural 
sciences, which had always been his specialty ; and 
in Moscow Levin had frequently had discussions with 
him. 

And one of these discussions, in which Katavasof had 
evidently felt that he was victorious, occurred to Levin's 
mind as soon as he saw him. 

" Henceforth," he said to himself, " I will not enter 
into discussions, or express myself so flippantly." 

Leaping from the cart and joining Katavasof and his 
brother, he asked where Kitty was. 

" She has taken Mitya to Kolok," — Kolok was a piece 
of woodland near the house, — "she wanted to get him 
established there, it was so hot at the house," said 
Dolly. 

Levin always advised his wife against taking the baby 
to the woods, because he felt it was dangerous ; so this 
news was not pleasant to him. 

" She carries that son of hers from one place to 
another," said the old prince. " I told her she 'd better 
try the ice-house." 

" She wanted to go to the beehives. She thought 
you were there," added Dolly. " That is where we were 
going." 

"Well, what have you been doing that's good?" 
said Sergyer Ivanovitch, dropping behind the others, 
and walking with his brother. 

" Oh, nothing particular ; as usual, busy with the farm- 



378 ANNA .KARENINA 

ing. 1 You'll stay with us awhile, now? We've been 
expecting you a long time.'' 

" Only a fortnight. I have a great deal to do at 
Moscow." 

At these words the two brothers looked at one another, 
and Levin, in spite of his usual and now especially 
strong desire to have friendly, and above all simple, 
relations with his brother, felt* that it was awkward for 
him to look at him: He dropped his eyes and was at 
a loss what to say. 

Trying to select some topic of conversation which 
would be agreeable to Sergyef Ivanovitch, and avoiding 
the Serbian war and the Slavonic question, a hint at 
which Sergyet Ivanovitch's remark about his occupation 
in Moscow gave, Levin began to talk about his brother's 
.book. 

11 Well," he asked, " have there been many reviews of 
your book?" 

Sergye'f Ivanovitch smiled at the intention of the 
question, 

" No one thinks anything about it, — I, least of all," 
he said. " You see, Darya Aleksandrovna, we 're going 
to have a shower," he added, pointing with his umbrella 
to the white clouds which w£re piling up above the 
aspen-tops. u 

It was evident by the£e words that the relationship 
between the brothers, which Levin wanted to overcome, 
was just the same as of old, *— if not unfriendly, at least 
cool. 

Levin approached Katavasofr 

" How good it was of you to come to us ! " said he. 

" I have wanted to come for a long time. Now we 
shall have time to talk. Have you read Spencer? " 

" Not thoroughly, I don't get anything out of him." 

" How so ? that is interesting. Why is that ? " 

" I have definitely made up my mind that the answers 
to certain questions which interest me are not to be 
found in him. or his followers. , Now »>.." 

But he was suddenly struck by the pleasant and 

1 Khozyaistvo. 



ANNA KARENINA 379 

serene expression of Katavasofs face, and he felt So 
sorry at having evidently disturbed his mental equi- 
librium by his remark, that, suddenly remembering his 
resolution, he stopped short* :< However, we will talk 
about that by and by," he added. " If we are going to 
the apiary let us go this way, by this path," he said, 
turning to the others. 

Passing through a narrow path along by an Unmown 
field, covered on one side with an abundance of those 
bright flowers called Ivan-da-Marya, and in the midst of 
which grew frequent patches of the tall, dark green 
hellebore, Levin led his guests — who were afraid of 
being stung — to the cool dense shade of some young 
aspens, and established them on some benches and logs 
especially prepared for the purpose of receiving the bee- 
hives, and he himself went to the storehouse to fetch 
for the children, and the grown people as well, some 
bread, cucumbers, and fresh honey. 

Trying to make as little disturbance as possible, and 
listening to the bees, which came flying more and more 
thickly around him, he strode along the path that led 
to the izba. At the very door, a bee entangled in his 
beard began to buzz, but he carefully freed himself from 
it. Going into the cool entry, he took his wire mask 
down from the peg where it hung, and put it on, and, 
thrusting his hands into his pockets, he went into the 
inclosure of the apiary, where, amid a smoothly shaven 
lawn, stood in straight rows on linden stakes all the old 
hives, each having for him its own special history, while 
the newer ones which had been set up that year were 
ranged along the wall. At the entrance of the hives 
he could see the young bees and the drones clustering 
together and tumbling over one another, while in their 
midst the working bees were industriously darting off in 
a straight line toward the forest, where the linden trees 
were in bloom, and quickly returning laden with their 
pollen. 

His ears were filled with the incessant, monotonous 
humming made by the workers as they flew in with 
their burdens, by the drones enjoying their holiday, and 



380 ANNA KARENINA 

by the guardian bees giving warning of the approach of 
an enemy and ready to sting. 

On one side of the inclosure the old bee-keeper was 
smoothing a hoop, and did not see Levin ; and Levin, 
without speaking to him, stood in the midst of his 
apiary. 

He was glad of the chance of being alone so as to 
collect himself hxface of the reality which had so sud- 
denly come into vivid contrast with his recent state of 
mind. 

He remembered that he had already been angry with 
Ivan, had shown coldness to his brother, and had spoken 
foolishly with Katavasof. 

"Can it be possible that my happiness was only a 
transitory feeling, which will pass away, and leave no 
trace behind ? " 

But at the same moment as he analyzed his state of 
mind, he felt with joy that his experience had left new 
and important results. Practical life had only temporarily 
disturbed the spiritual calm which he had found ; but in 
his heart it was still intact. Just as the bees, buzzing 
around him, threatened him, and robbed him of his 
physical calm, and compelled him to defend himself, 
so did the cares which surrounded him, as he sat in his 
little cart, disturb his spiritual calm ; but this lasted only 
while he was in their midst. Just as his physical strength 
was intact while he was defending himself against the 
bees, so his newly attained spiritual power was also 
unimpaired 



CHAPTER XV 

"Do you know, Kostia, whom SergyeT Ivanovitch 
found on the train ? M said Dolly, after she had given 
her children their cucumbers and honey. " Vronsky. 
He 's going to Serbia." 

"Yes! and not alone either. He's taking out a 
squadron of cavalry at his own expense," said Katavasof. 

"That's like him," answered Levin. "But are vol- 



ANNA KARENINA 381 

unteers still going off ? " added he, looking at Sergyet 
Ivanovitch. 

Sergyei* Ivanovitch was busy with a knife-blade rescu- 
ing a live bee from the honey that had flowed out of the 
white honeycomb at the bottom of his cup, and he did 
not answer. 

" Indeed ! I should say so ! " said Katavasof, biting 
into a cucumber. " If you had only seen them at the 
station this morning ! " 

" Now, what an idea this is ! For Christ's sake, tell 
me, SergyeT Ivanovitch, where all these volunteers are 
going, and whom they are going to fight with ? " asked 
the old prince, evidently pursuing a conversation which 
they had begun before Levin joined them. 

"With the Turks," answered Sergyet Ivanovitch, 
smiling quietly, as he at last rescued the helpless honey- 
smeared bee on the point of his knife, and set him on 
an aspen leaf. 

" But who has declared war on the Turks ? Is it Ivan 
Ivanovitch Ragozof and the Countess Lidia Ivanovna 
and Madame Stahl ? " 

" No one has declared war ; but the people sympathize 
with their oppressed brethren, and want to help them," 
said SergyeT Ivanovitch. 

" The prince was not speaking of help, but of war," 
said Levin, coming to the assistance of his father-in-law. 
" The prince means that private persons have no right 
to take part in a war without being authorized by the 
government." 

" Kostia, look out ! there 's a bee ! Won't he sting ? " 
cried Dolly, defending herself from a wasp. 

" That 's not a bee ; that 's a wasp ! " said Levin. 

"Come, now! give us your theory," demanded Kata- 
vasof, evidently provoking Levin to a discussion. " Why 
shouldn't private persons have that right?" 

"Well, my theory is this: war, on the one hand, is 
such a terrible, such an atrocious, thing that no man, at 
least no Christian man, has the right to assume the 
responsibility of beginning it ; but it belongs to govern- 
ment alone, when it becomes inevitable. On the other 



382 ANNA KARENINA 

hand, both in law and in commoh sense, where there are 
state questions, and above all in matters concerning war, 
private citizeiis have no right to use their own wills." 
* n Sergye'f Ivanovitch and Katavasof were both ready 
at the same instant with answers. « 

"That's where you're mistaken, batyushka," said 
Katavasof "There may be cases when government 
does not dairy out the will of its citizens, and then 
society declares its own will." 

But Sergyer Ivanovitch did nbt approve of this reply. 
He frowned as Katavasof spoke, and put it another 
Way : — 

"You state the question all wrong. Here there is no 
declaration of war, but simply an expression of hurrian, 
of Christian, sympathy.- Our brethren, men of the same 
blood, the same faith, are butchered. Now, we do not 
merely regard them as brethren and as coreligionists, 
but as women, children, old men. Our feelings are 
stirred, and the whole Russian people fly to help check 
these horrors. Suppose you were walking in the street, 
and saw a drunken man beating a woman or a child. 
I think you would not stop to ask whether war had been 
declared or had not been declared on such a man before 
you attacked him and protected the object of his fury." 
, ." No ; but I should not kill him." 

"Yes, you might even kill him." 

" I don't know. If I saw such a sight, I might yield 
to the immediate feeling. I cannot tell how it would 
be. But in the oppression of the Slavs, there is not, 
arid cannot be, such a powerful motive;" < 

" Perhaps not for you* but other people think differ- 
ently," Said Sergyer Ivanovitch, angrily. "The people 
still keep the tradition of sympathy with brethren of the 
Orthodox faith, who are groaning under the yoke of the 
'unspeakable Turk/. They have heard of their terrible 
Sufferings, and &re aroused," 

"That may be," answered Levin, in a conciliatory 
tone, "only I don't see it* I myself am one of the 
people, and I don't feel it." 

-"-I can say the feamc," put in the old prince, - " I was 



ANNA KARENINA 383 

living abroad ; I read the newspapers, and I learned 
about the Bulgarian atrocities ; but I never could under- 
stand why all Russia took such a sudden fancy for their 
Slavic brethren. I am sure I never felt the slightest 
love for them. I was greatly ashamed. I thought I 
must be either a monster, or that Carlsbad had a bad 
effect on me. But since I have come back, I don't feel 
stirred at all; and I find that I am not the only one 
who is not so much interested in the Slav brethren as in 
Russia. Here is Konstantin." 

"Private opinions are of no consequence — there is 
no meaning in private opinions — when all Russia, whe.n 
the whole people, signified what they wished," said 
Sergyeif Ivanovitch. 

"Yes. Excuse me. I don't see this. The people 
don't know anything," said the prince. 

" But, papa, how about that Sunday in church ? " said 
Dolly, who had been listening to the conversation. — 
" Get me a towel, please," she said in an aside to the 
old bee-keeper, who was looking at the children with a 
friendly smile. " It can't be that all ...." 

" Well ! What about that Sunday at church ? They 
tell the priest to read a prayer. He reads it. Nobody 
understands one word. They snore just as they do dur- 
ing the whole sermon," continued the prince. "Then 
they tell them that the salvation of their souls is in 
question. Then they pull out their kopeks, and give 
them, but why they have not the least idea." 

" The people cannot know their destiny. They have 
an instinctive feeling, and at times like these they show 
it," said Sergyei Ivanovitch, looking at the old bee- 
keeper. 

The handsome, tall old man, with his black beard, 
wherein a few gray hairs were beginning to show, and 
with his thick, silvery hair, stood motionless, holding a 
cup of honey in his hand, looking at the gentlemen 
with a mild, placid air, evidently not understanding a 
word of the conversation, nor caring to understand. 

He nodded his head with deliberation as he heard 
SergyeY Ivanovitch's words, and said : — 



384 ANNA KARENINA 

" That 's certainly so." 

"Well, now! Ask him about it," said Levin. "He 
doesn't know. He doesn't think. — Have you heard 
about the war, Mikharluitch ? V asked he of the old man. 
" You know what was read on Sunday at church, don't 
you ? What do you think ? Ought we to fight for the 
Christians? " 

"Why should we think? Our Emperor Aleksander 
Nikolayevitch will ~think for us, as in everything else. 
He knows what to do. — ■ Should you like some more 
bread ? shall I give some to the little lad ? " asked he, 
turning to Darya Aleksandrovna, and pointing to Grisha, 
who was munching a crust. 

" What 's the use of asking him ? " said Sergyet Ivan- 
ovitch. "We have seen, and still see, hundreds and 
hundreds of men- abandoning all they possess, giving 
their last penny, enlisting and trooping from every 
corner of Russia, all clearly and definitely expressing 
their thought and purpose. What does that signify ? " 

" It signifies, in my opinion/' said Levin, beginning 
to get excited, " that out of eighty millions of men, there 
will always be found hundreds, and even thousands, 
who have lost their social position, are restless, and are 
ready to take up the first adventure that comes along, 
whether it is to follow Pugatchof or to go to Khiva or 
to fight in Serbia." 

"I tell you they are not adventurers who devote them- 
selves to this work, but they are the best representatives 
of the nation," cried SergyeY Ivanuitch, excitedly, as 
if he were defending his last position. " There are the 
contributions ; is n't that a test of popular feeling ? " 

" That word ' people ' is so vague," said Levin ; " long- 
haired scribblers, professors, and perhaps one in a thou- 
sand among the peasants understand what it is all about, 
but the rest of the eighty millions do as MikhaTluitch 
here does. They not only don't express their will, but 
they have n't the slightest idea that they have any will 
to express. What right, then, have we to say that this 
is the will of the people? " 



ANNA KARENINA 385 



CHAPTER XVI 

Sergyei Ivanovitch was skilled in dialectics, and 
without replying he took up another side of the ques- 
tion. 

" Yes, if you want to get at the mind of the nation by 
an arithmetical process, of course it will be very hard 
work. We have not the proper gifts, and cannot reckon 
it that way. But there are other means of learning it 
besides arithmetic. It is felt in the air, it is felt in the 
heart, not to speak of those submarine currents which 
flow through the stagnant ocean of the people and which 
are evident to every unprejudiced person. Take society 
in a narrower sense. Take the intelligent classes, and 
see how on this point even the most hostile parties com- 
bine. There is no longer a difference of opinions ; all 
the organs of society express the same thing. They 
have all become aware of an elemental force which fills 
the nation with its own motive power." 

"Yes; the newspapers all say the same thing, that 
is true," said the old prince, "but then, so do all the 
frogs croak before a storm. That does n't signify much." 

" Whether frogs or not, — I don't edit newspapers, 
and I don't set up to defend them. I am talking of 
the unanimity of opinion among intelligent people," 
said Sergye'f Ivanovitch, turning to his brother. 

Levin was about to reply, but the old prince took the 
words from his mouth : — . 

"Well, something else may be said in regard to that 
unanimity. Here 's my son-in-law, Stepan Arkadyevitch, 
you know. He has just been appointed member of some 
committee, commission, or other, — I don't know what, 
— with a salary of eight thousand a year, and nothing 
to do. — Now, Dolly, that's not a secret. — Ask him if 
his office is useful ; he will tell you that it is indispensa- 
ble. And he is an upright man; but you could not 
make him cease to believe in his full eight thousand 
salary." 

" Oh, yes ! he told me to tell Darya Aleksandrovna 
vol. in. — 25 



3 $6 ANNA KARENINA 

that he had got that place," said Sergyel Ivanovitch, 
angrily, considering that the princes remark was not 
a propos. 

<* Of course the newspapers are unanimous. That is 
easily explained, War will double their circulation. 
How can they help supporting the Slavic question and 
the national instinct ? " 

: " I don/t like many of the papers, hut you are unjust," 
said Sergyef Ivanovitch. 

" I will only add one more suggestion,'* said the old 
prince. "Alphonse Karr wrote a clever thing just 
before . the Franco-Prussian war, when he said, ' You 
say this war is absolutely necessary ? very good ; go to 
the front, then, and be under the first fire, and lead the 
first onslaught/ " 

M Good editors would be glad to do that," said Katava- 
sof, with a loud laugh, and trying to imagine certain 
editorial friends of his in this chosen legion. . 

" Yes ; but when they ran away," said Dolly, " they 'd 
bother the others." 

" Just as soon as they begin to run put a mitrailleuse 
behind them, or some Cossacks with whips," said the 
prince. 

" Well, that 's a joke, but not a very good joke j excuse 
me, prince," said Sergye'f Ivanovitch. 

" I don't think it was a joke," said Levin ; " it was .... " 

But his brother interrupted him. 

" Every member of society is called upon to do his 
duty," said he, "and thoughtful men perform theirs by 
giving expression to public opinion ; and the unanimous 
and full expression of public opinion is creditable to the 
press, and at the same time a good symptom. Twenty 
years ago we should have kept quiet ; to-day we hear 
the voice of the Russian people, which is ready to rise 
like one man, and ready to sacrifice itself for its op- 
pressed brethren. It is a great step taken, ■*— a proof 
of power." 

" Yes, not only to avenge their brethren, but to kill 
the Turks," said Levin, timidly. " The people will 
sacrifice itself and be ready to sacrifice itself for the 



ANNA KARENINA 387 

salvation of their souls, but not for murder," he added, 
involuntarily connecting this conversation with the 
thoughts of the morning. 

"What do you mean by soul? • That, to a naturalist, 
you must remember, is a very puzzling expression. 
What is the soul ? " demanded Katavasof, with a smile. 

" Oh, you know/' 

"Ton my word, 1 I haven't the least idea," and the 
professor broke into a burst of laughter. 

" Christ said, * I am come not to bring peace, but a 
sword/ " remarked SergyeT Ivanovitch, quoting as simply 
as if it were something comprehensible, a passage from 
the Gospel which had always troubled Levin. 

"That's just so," repeated the old bee-keeper, who 
had been standing near them, in response to a chance 
look directed to him. 

" Come, batyushka, you 're beaten, you 're beaten, — 
wholly beaten! " cried Katavasof, gayly. 

Levin reddened with vexation, not because he was 
beaten, but because he had been drawn into discussion 
again. 

" No ; it is impossible for me to dispute with them," 
he thought; "their armor is impenetrable, and I am 
defenseless." 

He saw that he could not defeat his brother and Kata- 
vasof, and it was equally impossible to agree with them. 
Their arguments were the fruit of that same pride of the 
intellect which had almost ruined him. He could not 
admit that a handful of men, his brother among them, 
had the right, on the ground of what was told them by 
a few hundred eloquent volunteers who came to the 
capital, to claim that they and the newspapers expressed 
the will and sentiment of the people, especially when 
this sentiment expressed itself in vengeance and 
butchery. 

He could not agree with this because he did not dis- 
cover the expression of these thoughts among the peo- 
ple in whose midst he lived, and he did not find them in 
himself — and he could not consider himself as anything 

1 Vqtyei Bogu, literally, "Here by God." 



388. ANNA KARENINA 

else than one of the men constituting the Russian na- 
tion — but principally because he did not, anymore than 
the rest of men, know — nor could he know — what con- 
stituted the general good ; but he firmly believed that the 
attainment of this general good was brought about only 
by the strenuous fulfilment of that law of right which is 
revealed to every one, and therefore he could not desire 
war, or preach it as a means of attaining any general 
end whatever. 

He and Mikha'dovitch, and the people in general, ex- 
pressed themselves in somewhat the same language as 
was used when the early Russians invited the Variags 
to come from Scandinavia : — 

" Come and rule over us, we gladly promise absolute 
submission. We are enduring all trials, all humilia- 
tions, all sacrifices, but we do not judge and we do not 
decide." 

And now, according to Sergyef Ivanovitch, the peo- 
ple were ready to turn their backs on a right which they 
had purchased at such a price ! 

He wanted to say in addition that if the general opin- 
ion is an infallible judge, then why should not the Revo- 
lution, the Commune, be as useful to the Slavs as law- 
ful means ? 

But all these were thoughts which could not decide 
anything. The only thing that he could clearly see was 
that at the present moment the discussion was exasper- 
ating to SergyeY Ivanovitch, and therefore it was wrong 
to discuss it So Levin held his peace, and turned the 
attention of his guests to the clouds that were rolling up, 
and he advised them to hurry home if they did not want 
to get wet. 



CHAPTER XVII 

The prince and Sergye'f Ivanovitch seated themselves 
in the cart and drove on ; the rest of the party, quick- 
ening their steps, started back on foot. 

But the thunder-storm, white on top, black under- 



ANNA KARENINA 389 

neath, came up so rapidly that they had to hurry so as 
to reach the house before the rain was on them. The 
clouds coming on as the vanguard, hung low, were as black 
as soot, and drove across the sky with extraordinary 
rapidity. They had reached within two hundred feet of 
the house, and already the wind had begun to rise, and 
the downpour might be expected at any second. 

The children ran on ahead laughing and screaming 
with delight and terror. Darya Aleksandrovna, strug- 
gling with her skirts, which the wind blew round her 
legs, no longer walked, but ran, not letting the children 
out of her sight. The gentlemen, holding on their hats 
with difficulty, walked with long strides. They had just 
reached the porch when the great drops began to strike 
and splash against the edge of the iron gutter. The 
children, and just behind them their elders, with gay 
exclamations ran under the shelter of the porch. 

" Where is Katerina Aleksandrovna ? " asked Levin 
of Agafya Mikhai'lovna, who was coming out of the 
door, loaded with shawls and plaids. 

" We supposed she was with you." 

" And Mitya ? " 

" He must be in the Kolok woods with his nurse." 

Levin seized the plaids, and started for Kolok. 

In the few minutes that had elapsed, the storm had 
reached beyond the sun, and it was as dark as if there 
was an eclipse. The wind blew obstinately as if insist- 
ing on its own way, tried to stop Levin, and, tearing 
off the leaves and flowers from the lindens, and rudely 
and strangely baring the white branches of the birches, 
bent everything to one side, — acacias, flowers, bur- 
docks, the grass, and the tree-tops. The girls working 
in the garden ran squealing under the shelter of the 
servants' quarters. The white screen of the pouring 
rain had already cut off the distant forest and half of 
the adjacent field, and was rapidly advancing on Kolok. 
The dampness of the shower was felt in the atmosphere 
like fine drops. 

Bending his head, and fighting vigorously against the 
gale, which tugged at his shawls, Levin was already on 



390 ANNA KARENINA 

his way to Kolok. He thought he already saw white 
forms behind a well-known oak, when suddenly a glare 
of light seemed to burst from the ground before him, 
and the vault of the sky above him to fall with a crash. 
When he opened his dazzled eyes, he looked through 
the thick curtain formed by the rain, which cut him off 
from the Kolok woods, and saw, to his horror, that the 
green top of a well-known oak which stood in the forest 
had strangely changed its position, Even before he 
could ask, " Can the lightning have struck it?'! he saw 
it bending over more and more rapidly, and then disap- 
pearing behind the other trees, and he heard the crash 
the great oak made as it fell, carrying with it the neigh- 
boring trees. The glare of the lightning, the crash of 
the thunder, and the sensation of chill running over his 
whole body blended for Levin in one impression of 
horror. 

"My God! my God! keep them safe," he ex- 
claimed. 

And though he instantly felt the absurdity of the- 
prayer, since the oak had already fallen, he neverthe- 
less said it over and over, for he knew that, absurd as 
it was, he could not do anything else to help them. 

He hastened toward the spot where they generally 
went, but he did not find them, They were in another 
part of the woods under an ojd linden, and they called 
to him. Two figures dressed in dark clothes — they 
usually wore white r-^ were bending over something 
under the trees. It was Kitty and the nurse. The 
rain had stopped, and it was beginning to grow lighter 
when Levin reached them. The bottom of the nurse's 
dress was dry, but Kitty's gown was wet through and 
clung to her. Though it was no longer raining, they 
were standing just as they had been when the shower 
began. Both were leaning over the baby-carriage, with 
its green parasol. 

" Alive? safe? God be praised!" he cried, as, splash- 
ing through the puddles, he ran to them with his shoes 
full of water. 

Kitty's glowing face, all wet, was turned to him, and 



ANNA KARENINA 391 

she smiled timidly from under her hat, which had lost 
its shape in the rain. 

" There now, are n't you ashamed ? I can't understand 
how you could do such a careless thing," he began, in 
his vexation scolding his wife. 

" Goodness, 1 it was not my fault. We were just start- 
ing to go when he began to be restless. We had to 
change him. We were just ...." Kitty said, trying to 
defend herself. 

Mitya was safe, dry, and still soundly sleeping. 

"Well! God be thanked! I don't know what I'm 
saying." 

They hastily picked up the w r et diapers, the nurse took 
the baby, and Levin, ashamed of his vexation, gave his 
arm to his wife, and led her away, pressing her hand 
gently. 



CHAPTER XVIII 

In the course of all that day, during the most varied 
conversations in which Levin took part, as it were, only 
with the external side of his mind, and notwithstanding 
his disillusion at finding that the moral regeneration had 
not taken place in his nature after all, he did not cease 
to be pleasantly conscious that his heart was full. 

After the shower, it was too wet to go out for a walk, 
and, moreover, other threatening clouds were piling up 
on the horizon, and here and there reaching up high into 
the sky, black; and laden with thunder. All the house- 
hold spent the rest of the day within doors. 

Discussions were avoided, and after dinner ail were in 
the gayest frame of mind. 

Katavasof at first kept the ladies laughing by his 
original turns of wit, which always pleased people when 
they made his acquaintance ; then afterward being drawn 
out by SergyeT Ivanovitch, he related his very interesting 
observations on the different characteristics and features 
of male and female flies, and their habits. 

1 Yet Boen. 



39 2 ANNA KARENINA • 

Sergye'f Ivanovitch also was very gay ; and at tea he 
explained the future of the Eastern question so simply 
and well that all could follow him. Kitty alone did not 
hear him. She had been ^summoned to the nursery to 
give Mitya his bath. 

A few moments after Kitty had left the room, Levin 
also was called to follow her. 

Leaving his tea, and feeling regretful at having an 
interesting conversation interrupted, and at the same 
time troubled because they had called him to the nur- 
sery, a thing which had hitherto happened only in cases 
of emergency, Levin followed his wife. 

In spite of the fact that he was greatly interested in 
his brother's partly outlined scheme of making th§ 
newly enfranchised world of forty millions of Slavs join 
with Russia in establishing a new epoch in history — for 
it was something entirely novel to him, in spite of his 
curiosity and anxiety at having been summoned to the 
nursery, as soon as he had left the drawing-room and 
was once more alone, he immediately remembered his 
thoughts of the morning. And all these theories as to 
the significance of the Slav element in the universal his- 
tory seemed to him so insignificant in comparison with 
what was taking place in his own soul, that for a mo- 
ment he forgot all about it, and returned to the moral 
state that had so delighted him at the beginning of the 
day. 

This time he did not wholly retrace the course of 
thought which had led him to this state of mind, nor 
was it necessary. He was borne immediately back to 
that feeling which had guided him, which had been con- 
nected with those thoughts, and he now found the feel- 
ing stronger and more definite in his soul than ever be- 
fore. Now there was no longer what had always marked 
his previous imaginary attempts at gaining spiritual 
calmness, when he had been obliged to call a halt to the 
whole course of his thoughts in order to find the feel- 
ing ; now, on the contrary, the feeling of joy and calm- 
ness was more vivid than before, but thought did not 
overtake the feeling. He walked along the terrace, and 



ANNA KARENINA 393 

saw two stars glowing in the already darkening sky, and 
suddenly he remembered a course of reasoning : — 

"Yes/' said he to himself, "as I looked at the heav- 
ens I thought that the vault which I gaze at is not a lie. 
But there was the something that remained half thought 
out in my mind, — something that I hid from myself. 
Now, what was it ? There cannot be an answer. If 
one could think it out, all things would be explained." 

Just as he entered the child's chamber, he remem- 
bered what it was that he hid from himself. It was 
this : — 

" If the chief proof of the existence of God lies in 
the revelation of good, why should this revelation be 
limited to the Christian Church ? How about those 
millions of Buddhists and Mohammedans, who are also 
seeking for the truth and doing right?" 

It seemed to him that there must be an answer to 
this question, but he could not find and express it before 
entering the room. 

Kitty, with her sleeves rolled up, was bending over 
the bath-tub, in which she was washing the baby. As 
she heard her husband's steps, she turned her face to 
him, and with a smile called him to her. With one 
hand she was supporting the head of the plump little 
fellow, who was floating on his back in the water and 
kicking with his legs ; with the other she was squeezing 
the sponge, on him. 

" Come here ! look, look ! " said she, as her husband 
came up tocher. "Agafya Mikhai'lovna is right; he 
knows us." 

The fact was that Mitya to-day for the first time gave 
indubitable proof that he knew his friends. 

As soon as Levin went to the bath-tub, the experi- 
ment was tried, and it was wholly successful. A cook, 
who was called for the purpose, bent over the tub. The 
baby frowned and shook his head. Kitty bent over him, 
and he smiled radiantly, and clung with his little hands 
to the sponge and sucked with his lips, producing such 
a strange and contented sound that not only the mother 
and the nurse, but Levin himself, were enchanted 



394 ANNA KARENINA 

They took the baby from the water, wiped him, and, 
after he had expressed his disapprobation with a pierc- 
ing scream, they gave him to his mother. 

"Well, I am very glad to see that you begin to love 
him," said Kitty, as she sat down in a comfortable seat, 
with the child at her breast. " I am- very glad. It 
really troubled me when you said you h&d n't any feel- 
ing for him." 

" No ! did I say that I had no feeling for him ? I 
only said that I was disappointed." 

" How were you disappointed ? " 

" I was n't disappointed in him, but in the feeling 
that he would arouse. I expected more. I expected .as 
a surprise some new and pleasant feeling ; and instead 
of that, it was pity, disgust." 

She listened to him as she put on her slender fingers 
the rings which she had taken off while bathing the 
baby. 

"And more of fear and pity than of satisfaction. I 
never knew until to-day, after the storm, how I loved 
him." 

Kitty smiled with radiant joy. 

"Were you very much afraid?" she asked. "And 
so was I. But it seems more terrible to me now when 
the danger is all past. I shall go and look at the 
oak to-morrow. How nice Katavasof is ! Well, the 
whole day has been so pleasant. You are so delightful 
with your brother when you want to be. .;..Well, go to 
them. It is always hot and stifling here after the 
bath." 



CHAPTER XIX 

Levin, on leaving the nursery and finding himself 
alone, began to follow out his line of thought, in which 
there had been something obscure. 

Instead of going back to the drawing-room, where he 
heard the sound of voices, he remained on the terrace, 
and, leaning over the balustrade of the terrace, he looked 



ANNA KARENINA 395 

at the sky. It had grown very dark, and there was not 
3. cloud in the south where he was looking. The clouds 
were all in the opposite quarter. From time to time it 
would lighten, and the distant thunder would be heard. 
Levin listened to the drops of rain falling rhythmically 
from the lindens, and looked at the stars and then at the 
Milky Way. Whenever the lightning flashed, then not 
only the Milky Way but also the bright stars would dis- 
appear from his vision ; but by the time the thunder 
sounded they would reappear in their places as if a 
careful hand had readjusted them in the firmament. 

"Well, now what is it that troubles me?" Levin 
asked himself, already beginning to feel that a resolu- 
tion of his doubts, though it had not yet become a 
matter of knowledge, was ready in his soul. 

" Yes, there is one evident, indubitable manifestation 
of the Divinity, and that is the laws of right which are 
made known to the world through Revelation, and of 
which I am conscious as existing in myself, and in the 
recognition of them I am in spite of myself, willingly 
or unwillingly, united with other men into one brother- 
hood of believers, which is called the Church. 

"Yes; but are Hebrews, Confucians, Mohammedans, 
Buddhists, in the same relation ? " he asked himself, re- 
curring to the dilemma which had seemed so portentous 
to him. "Can these hundreds of millions of men bq 
deprived of the greatest of blessings, of that which 
alone gives a meaning to life ? " 

He paused, but immediately recovered his train of 
thought, 

"What am I asking myself? 

" I am questioning the relation of the various forms 
of human belief to Divinity. I am questioning the rela- 
tion of God to the whole universe, with all its nebulae. 
But what am I doing ? And at the moment when 
knowledge, sure, though inaccessible to reason, is re- 
vealed to me, shall I still persist in dragging in 
logic ? 

" Do I not know that the stars do not move ? " said he, 
noticing the change that had taken place in the, po3ition 



396 ANNA KARENINA 

of the brilliant planet which he had seen rising over the 
birches; "but, seeing the stars change place, and not 
being able to imagine the revolution of the earth; then 
I should be right in saying that they moved. Could 
the astronomers have made any calculations, and gained 
any knowledge, if they had taken into consideration the 
varied and complicated motions of the earth ? Have 
not their marvelous conclusions as to the distances, the 
weight, the motions, and revolutions of the celestial 
bodies all been based on the apparent movements of 
the stars around a motionless earth, — these", very move- 
ments which I now witness, as millions of men for 
centuries have witnessed them, and which can always 
be verified ? And just as the conclusions of the astrono- 
mers would have been inaccurate and false if they had 
not been based on their observations of the heavens 
such as they appeared relatively to a single meridian 
and a single horizon, so all my conclusions as to the 
knowledge of good and evil would be inaccurate and 
false if they were not founded on that comprehension 
of good and evil which for all men always has been and 
always will be one and the same, and which Christianity 
has revealed to me and which my soul can always verify. 
The relations of human belief to God must, for me, re- 
main unfathomable; to search them out belongs not 
to me." 

"Haven't you gone in yet?" said Kitty's voice, sud- 
denly. She was on her way to the drawing-room by 
the way of the terrace. " There 's nothing that troubles 
you, is there ? " asked she, looking wistfully up into her 
husband's face and trying to study its expression by the 
starlight. By the light of a flash of lightning on the 
horizon, she saw that he was calm and happy, and she 
smiled. 

"She understands me," thought he. "She knows 
what I am thinking. Shall I tell her, or not ? Yes, I 
will tell her." 

But just as he was about to speak, Kitty broke in, 

"Kostia," said she, "do be so kind and go to the cor- 
ner room and see how they have arranged for SergyeT 



ANNA KARENINA 397 

Ivanovitch. I don't like to. See if they put in the new 
washstand properly." 

" Certainly, I '11 go," answered Levin, rising, and kiss- 
ing her. 

" No; better be silent," thought he, as she went past; 
" this secret has no importance save for me alone, and 
words could not explain it. This new feeling has neither 
changed me nor suddenly enlightened me nor made me 
happy, as I imagined it would. It is just like my feel- 
ing for my son. There is no element of surprise in it. 
But it is faith .... no, not faith .... I know not what it is. 
But the feeling stole into my soul through suffering, and 
there it is firmly established. 

" I shall continue to be vexed with Ivan the coach- 
man, and get into useless discussions, and express 
my thoughts blunderingly. I shall always be blaming 
my wife for what annoys me, and repenting at once. I 
shall always feel a certain barrier between the Holy of 
Holies of my inmost soul, and the souls of others, even 
my wife's. I shall continue to pray without being able 
to explain to myself why. But my whole life, every 
moment of my life, independently of whatever may 
happen to me, will be, not meaningless as before, but 
full of the deep meaning which I shall have the power 
to impress upon it." 



THE END 






j 



CI^J 



University of California 

SOUTHERN REGIONAL LIBRARY FACILITY 

Return this material to the library 

from which it was borrowed. 









A 000 132 743 6 



